Safety and efficacy of cytology brushings versus standard FNA in evaluating cystic lesions of the pancreas: a pilot study.Cystic neoplastic lesions of the pancreas (CNLP) are increasingly detected and are associated with a potential for malignant transformation. Diagnostic assessment of these lesions is often limited by the cystic nature and focality of neoplastic progression of these lesions. EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) of cyst fluid and exfoliated cells is one of the most accurate methods of diagnosis but still has limited sensitivity. A new, through-the-needle cytologic brush system has recently been approved for use during EUS evaluation of cystic lesions of the pancreas.To evaluate the cytologic yield and safety profile of the new cytobrush compared with conventional FNA in evaluating CNLP.Ten consecutive patients with CNLP were included. All cysts were sampled by standard EUS-FNA (0.5 of cyst volume) followed by brush cytology, then by aspiration of the remaining fluid. Fluid samples were separately submitted (standard FNA and cytobrushings FNA) but were read by the same pathologist. Complications were assessed during the immediate postprocedure period (2-3 hours) and by a telephone call conducted approximately 30 days after the procedure to inquire about any new symptoms, including abdominal pain, melena, hematochezia, hematemesis, fever, nausea, and vomiting.High-volume EUS referral center.Ten consecutive patients with CNLP that measured at least 20 mm in maximal dimension were included.Cellularity and presence of diagnostic cells on the FNA.In 7 of 10 cases, the EchoBrush specimen was superior to FNA in terms of cellularity and detection of diagnostic cells. Two cases had complications: 1 major and 1 minor intracystic bleed. No infection or pancreatitis was observed.The interpreting pathologist for the case was not blinded to the results of either of the samples. In addition, this pilot study represents only a single-center experience.This study suggests that brush cytology specimens obtained at the time of EUS are superior to conventional FNA because of the higher yield of epithelial cells. It is unclear whether bleeding is more common after EchoBrush sampling; however, caution should be taken in patients who require anticoagulation until further data are available.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration of pancreatic cystic lesions provides inadequate material for cytology and laboratory analysis: initial results from a prospective study.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is considered a valuable and safe technique for further investigation of pancreatic cystic lesions. In the framework of a prospective study on the accuracy of EUS-FNA we report our initial technical results regarding puncture access, sample adequacy, and complicationsConsecutive patients with indeterminate pancreatic cystic lesions underwent EUS and EUS-FNA. Pancreatic cyst fluid was collected for cytopathological analysis and measurement of amylase, carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), and carbohydrate antigen 19.9 (CA 19.9) levels. Main outcome parameter for this analysis was the percentage of samples adequate for cytologic and laboratory analysis.Of 143 patients (median age 63 years; median cyst size 2.8 cm) who underwent EUS, FNA was performed in 128 (90 %). The various reasons for not doing FNA included large distance between transducer and cystic lesion (n = 9), cyst not seen or too small (n = 2), and evident diagnosis not requiring FNA (n = 3). FNA was not possible in four patients (technical failures). Cyst fluid sent for cytology provided adequate cellular material in 44 cases only, accounting for an intention-to-diagnose yield of 31 % (44/143). Sufficient fluid for biochemical analysis was obtained in 68 cases (49 %). Complications occurred in three patients (2.4 %).Although EUS-guided FNA was technically feasible in the majority of patients with pancreatic cystic lesions (87 %), it was possible to obtain a classifying cytopathologic diagnosis and a chemical analysis in only a third and a half of cases, respectively.Histologic and imaging features of mural nodules in mucinous pancreatic cysts.Mural nodules predict malignancy within pancreatic cysts, but it is not clear whether endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and computed tomography (CT) accurately identify nodules. We assessed images and the histology of mural nodules in branch duct intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (BD-IPMNs) and mucinous cystic neoplasms (MCNs) and identified criteria to distinguish mural nodules from mucus.We reviewed pathology specimens and EUS and CT images from consecutive patients with resected BD-IPMNs or MCNs. A blinded interobserver study of the EUS images was then conducted to identify features that distinguished nodules from mucus. After education about these features, the raters interpreted the EUS images again.On the basis of histologic analysis, 22 of 57 cases had epithelial nodules. Cancer or high-grade dysplasia was found in 23% of cysts with nodules versus 3% without nodules (P = .02). On the basis of reports, EUS detected epithelial nodules with 75% sensitivity and 83% specificity, whereas these values were 24% and 100%, respectively, for CT. Mucus accounted for 65% of intracystic lesions detected by EUS and was often diagnosed by using change in body position and fine-needle aspiration. Interobserver analysis identified 3 features that were detected by EUS (echogenicity, edge, and rim) that distinguished mucus from epithelial nodules. The diagnostic accuracy of the raters improved from a mean of 57% to 79% after education about these features (P = .004); accuracy was 90% when all 3 features of mucus were present.Malignancy is associated with epithelial nodules in BD-IPMNs and MCNs, but most echogenic lesions detected in cysts by EUS are mucus. Knowledge of features that discriminate mucus from mural nodules improves the diagnostic accuracy of EUS.Factors predicting the number of EUS-guided fine-needle passes for diagnosis of pancreatic malignancies.The factors that affect the number of needle passes needed to diagnose pancreatic malignancies using endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) -guided fine-needle aspiration are unknown.Patient and endosonographic data were prospectively recorded on 121 consecutive patients with pancreatic malignancy. Of these, 110 underwent EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration. A cytopathologist was in attendance for all aspiration procedures.Initial EUS detected a pancreatic mass in 96% of cases; 23% of these were not seen by computed tomography. EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration was performed in 109 of 110 (99%) patients, including 95 masses, 7 lymph nodes, and 7 hepatic metastases. EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration provided a cytologic diagnosis of malignancy in 104 of 110 (95%). Only tumor differentiation and the site of aspiration affected the number of passes.With the participation of a cytopathologist, EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration can diagnose pancreatic malignancies with a high degree of accuracy. Only the aspiration site (mass versus node/liver metastasis) can be used to direct the number of passes if a cytopathologist is not present. Without a cytopathologist in attendance, 5 to 6 passes should be made for pancreatic masses and 2 to 3 for liver metastases or lymph nodes; however, this approach will be associated with a 10% to 15% reduction in definitive cytologic diagnoses, extra procedure time, increased risk and additional needles.Differential diagnosis of groove pancreatic carcinomas vs. groove pancreatitis: usefulness of the portal venous phase.To clarify if the portal venous phase is helpful for the differential diagnosis of groove pancreatic carcinomas and groove pancreatitis.MDCT and MRI of groove pancreatic carcinomas (n=7) and groove pancreatitis (n=15) were retrospectively reviewed by two radiologists independently. The signal intensity on T2-weighted images was subjectively assessed. The presence or absence of common bile duct (CBD) and main pancreatic duct (MPD) strictures, calcifications, and cystic lesions was evaluated. Additionally, the appearance of groove pancreatic carcinoma and that of groove pancreatitis in the portal venous phase on dynamic MDCT and MRI were compared.There were no significant differences in the signal intensity on T2-weighted images and in the presence or absence of CBD and MPD strictures, calcifications, and cystic lesions between groove pancreatic carcinomas and groove pancreatitis. However, patchy focal enhancement in the portal venous phase was more commonly observed in groove pancreatitis than groove pancreatic carcinoma (Reviewers 1 and 2: 14/15 [93.3%] vs. 1/7 [14.3%], P<0.0001). In addition, peripheral enhancement was only seen in groove pancreatic carcinomas (Reviewer 1: 4/7 [57.1%] vs. 0/15 [0%], P<0.005, and Reviewer 2: 3/7 [42.9%] vs. 0/15 [0%], P<0.05).The portal venous phase may be helpful for the differential diagnosis of groove pancreatic carcinomas and groove pancreatitis.18Fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography in the management of patients with suspected pancreatic cancer.To assess the accuracy and clinical impact of 18fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography (18FDG-PET) on the management of patients with suspected primary or recurrent pancreatic adenocarcinoma, and to assess the utility of 18FDG-PET in grading tumor response to neoadjuvant chemoradiation.The diagnosis, staging, and treatment of pancreatic cancer remain difficult. Small primary tumors and hepatic metastases are often not well visualized by computed tomographic scanning (CT), resulting in a high incidence of nontherapeutic celiotomy and the frequent need for "blind resection." In addition, the distinction between local recurrence and nonspecific postoperative changes after resection can be difficult to ascertain on standard anatomic imaging. 18FDG-PET is a new imaging technique that takes advantage of increased glucose metabolism by tumor cells and may improve the diagnostic accuracy of preoperative studies for pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Eighty-one 18FDG-PET scans were obtained in 70 patients undergoing evaluation for suspected primary or recurrent pancreatic adenocarcinoma. Of this group, 65 underwent evaluation for suspected primary pancreatic cancer. Nine patients underwent 18FDG-PET imaging before and after neoadjuvant chemoradiation, and in eight patients 18FDG-PET scans were performed for possible recurrent adenocarcinoma after resection. The 18FDG-PET images were analyzed visually and semiquantitatively using the standard uptake ratio (SUR). The sensitivity and specificity of 18FDG-PET and CT were determined for evaluation of the preoperative diagnosis of primary pancreatic carcinoma, and the impact of 18FDG-PET on patient management was retrospectively assessed.Among the 65 patients evaluated for primary tumor, 52 had proven pancreatic adenocarcinoma and 13 had benign lesions. 18FDG-PET had a higher sensitivity and specificity than CT in correctly diagnosing pancreatic carcinoma (92% and 85% vs. 65% and 62%). Eighteen patients (28%) had indeterminate or unrecognized pancreatic masses on CT clarified with 18FDG-PET. Seven patients (11%) had indeterminate or unrecognized metastatic disease clarified with 18FDG-PET. Overall, 18FDG-PET suggested potential alterations in clinical management in 28/65 patients (43%) with suspected primary pancreatic adenocarcinoma. Of the nine patients undergoing 18FDG-PET imaging before and after neoadjuvant chemoradiation, four had evidence of tumor regression by PET, three showed stable disease, and two showed tumor progression. CT was unable to detect any response to neoadjuvant therapy in this group. Eight patients had 18FDG-PET scans to evaluate suspected recurrent disease after resection. Four were noted to have new regions of 18FDG-uptake in the resection bed; four had evidence of new hepatic metastases. All proved to have metastatic pancreatic adenocarcinoma.These data confirm that 18FDG-PET is useful in the evaluation of patients with suspected primary or recurrent pancreatic carcinoma. 18FDG-PET is more sensitive and specific than CT in the detection of small primary tumors and in the clarification of hepatic and distant metastases. 18FDG-PET was also of benefit in assessing response to neoadjuvant chemoradiation. Although 18FDG-PET cannot replace CT in defining local tumor resectability, the application of 18FDG-PET in addition to CT may alter clinical management in a significant fraction of patients with suspected pancreatic cancer.The string sign for diagnosis of mucinous pancreatic cysts.Pancreas cyst fluid analysis does not provide optimal discrimination between mucinous and nonmucinous cysts. The aim of this study was to assess the performance characteristics of the "string sign" - a test performed at the time of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA), for the diagnosis of mucinous pancreatic cysts (branch duct intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms [bIPMN] and mucinous cystic neoplasms).Patients undergoing EUS-FNA of pancreatic cystic lesions at one referral center between 2003 and 2012 were included. The string sign was performed prospectively, and was considered positive if ≥ 1 cm string formed in cyst fluid and lasted for ≥ 1 second. Performance characteristics of the string sign and a sequential cyst fluid test interpretation model were assessed.For 98 histologically proven cases, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of the string sign for diagnosis of mucinous cysts were 58 % (95 % confidence interval [CI] 44 % - 70 %), 95 % (83 % - 99 %), 94 % (81 % - 99 %), and 60 % (46 % - 72 %), respectively. When string sign results and carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) concentration (≥ 200 ng/mL) were combined, diagnostic accuracy improved from 74 % and 83 %, respectively, to 89 % (P ≤ 0.03). Among bIPMN, a positive string sign was associated with gastric and intestinal epithelial subtypes. The sequential cyst fluid test interpretation model (including cytology, mucin stain, CEA, and string sign) yielded an overall sensitivity for mucinous lesions of 96 %, with a specificity of 90 %.The string sign is highly specific for diagnosis of mucinous pancreatic cysts, and improves overall diagnostic accuracy of pancreatic cyst fluid analysis. Sequential cyst fluid test interpretation yields high diagnostic sensitivity and specificity for mucinous cysts.Influence of on-site cytopathology evaluation on the diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) of solid pancreatic masses.The aim of this study was to evaluate the influence of on-site cytopathological evaluation on the diagnostic yield of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) for the differential diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses in an unselected series of consecutive patients.Patients undergoing EUS-guided FNA of solid pancreatic lesions over a 2-year study period were included. Samples were either evaluated on site by a cytopathologist or processed by the endoscopist and sent to the pathology department for evaluation. Diagnostic accuracy for malignancy, number of needle passes, adequate-specimen collection rate, cytological diagnosis, and final diagnosis, and complication rate according to the presence or absence of on-site cytopathologist were evaluated.A total of 182 patients were included. An on-site cytopathologist was available in 95 cases (52.2%). There was no difference between groups in terms of age, sex, location, and size of the lesions. A significantly higher number of needle passes was performed when an on-site cytopathologist was not available (3.5±1.0 vs. 2.0±0.7; P<0.001). The presence of an on-site cytopathologist was associated with a significantly lower number of inadequate samples (1.0 vs. 12.6%, P=0.002), and a significantly higher diagnostic sensitivity (96.2 vs. 78.2%; P=0.002) and overall accuracy (96.8 vs. 86.2%; P=0.013) for malignancy. Three patients developed complications (two acute pancreatitis, one local bleeding), all of them belonging to the group without on-site cytopathology.On-site cytopathological evaluation improves the diagnostic yield of EUS-guided FNA for the cytological diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses. This is associated with a significantly lower number of inadequate samples and a lower number of needle passes.Endoscopic diagnosis and staging of mucinous cystic neoplasms and intraductal papillary-mucinous tumors.The number of patients with cystic neoplasms of the pancreas as detected using various types of imaging techniques has been steadily increasing. Among the cystic neoplasms, mucinous cystic neoplasms (MCNs) and intraductal papillary-mucinous tumors (IPMTs) were comparatively more frequently encountered. We used imaging techniques to focus on the differential diagnosis of MCNs and IPMTs, and tumor staging.Fifteen patients with MCNs with ovarian-like stroma and 109 patients with IPMTs were experienced. We examined the image findings for the differential diagnosis and stage diagnosis of these two types of cystic neoplasms.Endoscopic ultrasonography could reveal detailed images of internal structure and was effective for the diagnosis of MCNs. Other endoscopic imaging modalities could not give specific findings for MCNs. Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP; including duodenoscopic findings and pancreatogram) and pancreatoscopy showed the characteristic and specific findings of IPMTs. Also, endoscopic ultrasonography and intraductal ultrasonography were found to have high sensitivity and diagnostic accuracy for their differential diagnosis of neoplastic/nonneoplastic and invasive/noninvasive lesions in IPMTs.Endoscopic imaging techniques are capable of revealing the detailed structure of pancreatic cystic lesions. They are effective for differential diagnosis, for assessing the degree of malignancy, and for deciding upon an appropriate treatment in patients with IPMTs.Value of EUS in early detection of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinomas in patients with intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms.Pancreatic ductal adenocarcinomas (PDAC) sometimes arise in patients with intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs). This study examined the incidence of PDACs concomitant to or derived from branch duct IPMNs. The usefulness of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) relative to other imaging methods for detecting these tumors was also assessed.This retrospective study used data from clinical records and imaging studies that were collected prospectively. During 2001-2009, 167 consecutive patients with IPMNs underwent EUS, ultrasonography, computed tomography (CT), and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). The 102 patients whose branch duct IPMNs lacked mural nodules/symptoms and thus did not qualify for resection were followed up by semiannual EUS and annual ultrasonography, CT, and MRI. The sensitivity and specificity with which the four modalities detected IPMN-derived and -concomitant PDACs at the first examination and throughout the study period were evaluated. The rate of PDAC development during follow-up was analyzed by the Kaplan-Meier method.A total of 17 IPMN-derived and 11 IPMN-concomitant PDACs were diagnosed at the first examination. Lesions that did not qualify for resection or chemotherapy were followed up for a median of 42 months. Seven IPMN-concomitant PDACs and no IPMN-derived PDACs were detected during follow-up. The 3- and 5-year rates of IPMN-concomitant PDAC development were 4.0% and 8.8%, respectively. At the first examination, EUS was superior to other imaging modalities in terms of IPMN-derived and -concomitant PDAC detection. Throughout the study period, including follow-up, EUS was significantly better at detecting IPMN-concomitant PDACs than the other modalities.IPMN-concomitant PDACs are quite often found at diagnosis and during follow-up. EUS examination of the whole pancreas plays an important role in the management of IPMNs as it allows the early detection of these small invasive carcinomas.Long-term follow-up of patients with clinically indeterminate suspicion of pancreatic cancer and normal EUS.EUS often is performed because of a clinical suspicion of pancreatic cancer when the results of other noninvasive diagnostic tests are indeterminate. The aim of this study was to determine the true negative predictive value of a normal EUS in a cohort of patients with an indeterminate suspicion of pancreatic cancer by obtaining long-term follow-up information.Patients referred for EUS of the pancreas for the following indications were identified: elevated carbohydrate-associated antigen (CA 19-9) without other definitive evidence of pancreatic cancer, subtle abnormalities on CT of the pancreas, and unexplained abdominal pain and/or weight loss. Endoscopy procedure reports, as well as inpatient and outpatient records were obtained. In addition, referring physicians, as well as patients, were contacted to acquire adequate follow-up information.A total of 80 patients were included in the study. Follow-up of at least 6 months was obtained for 76 (95%) patients (mean follow-up 23.9 months). No patient with a normal EUS of the pancreas developed pancreatic cancer or required pancreatic surgery during the follow-up period. One patient in whom a diagnosis of chronic pancreatitis was made by EUS subsequently was found to have pancreatic cancer at surgery.A normal EUS of the pancreas in the setting of subtle radiologic findings, serologic abnormalities, and/or nonspecific symptoms definitively rules out the presence of pancreatic cancer.Measurement of the apparent diffusion coefficient in intraductal mucin-producing tumor of the pancreas by diffusion-weighted echo-planar MR imaging.We investigated whether diffusion-weighted echo-planar magnetic resonance (MR) imaging can help differentiate intraductal mucin-producing tumors of the pancreas from other cystic lesions.Diffusion-weighted echo-planar MR imaging was performed in patients with mucin-producing tumors (n = 19), pseudocysts (n = 9), chronic pancreatitis with diffuse main pancreatic dilatation (n = 5), and serous cystadenomas (n = 2). Images were obtained with diffusion sensitizing gradients of 30, 300, and 900 s/mm2. The apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC) was calculated.The mean (+/- standard deviation) ADCs of mucin-producing tumors (2.8 x 10(-3) mm2/s +/- 1.0 x 10(-3)), pseudocysts (2.9 x 10(-3) mm2/s +/- 1.2 x 10(-3)), dilated main pancreatic duct in chronic pancreatitis (3.3 x 10(-3) mm2/s +/- 1.2 x 10(-3)), serous cystadenomas (2.9 x 10(-3) and 2.6 x 10(-3) mm2/s), and cerebrospinal fluid (3.5 x 10A(-3) mm2/s +/- 1.1 x 10(-3)) were not statistically different.It is difficult to differentiate between mucin-producing tumors and other cystic lesions by ADC measurements when using diffusion-weighted echo-planar MR imaging.Prospective evaluation of reader performance on MDCT in characterization of cystic pancreatic lesions and prediction of cyst biologic aggressiveness.Our objective was to evaluate the accuracy of MDCT features of pancreatic cystic lesions in cyst characterization and in predicting cyst biologic aggressiveness.In this prospective study, 114 patients (40 men and 74 women; age range, 23-89 years) with 130 cystic lesions (size range, 31-160 mm) in the pancreas underwent contrast-enhanced dual-phase (n = 92) and portal phase (n = 22) examinations with 16- or 64-MDCT scanners. Using defined morphologic features of cystic lesions on MDCT, two readers performed blinded evaluations for cystic characterization and predicting biologic aggressiveness (invasive lesions, carcinoma in situ, and moderate grade dysplasias) before pancreatic surgery. Receiver operating characteristic analysis was performed to assess the accuracy of MDCT using pathologic evaluation of the surgical specimen as a reference standard.On the basis of MDCT features, the radiologic accuracy (reader 1 and reader 2) for stratifying lesions into mucinous and nonmucinous subtypes was 85% and 82% and for recognizing cysts with aggressive biology was 86% and 85%, respectively. Predictive values of MDCT were superior for lesions > 30 mm and nonmucinous lesions. Features favoring aggressive biology were main pancreatic duct dilation > 10 mm (p < 0.0001), biliary obstruction (p=0.01), mural nodule (p < 0.0001), main-duct intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (p < 0.0001), and advanced age (p = 0.0001). Sensitivity of detecting morphologic features was higher with the dual-phase pancreatic protocol CT.Morphologic features of pancreatic cystic lesions on MDCT allow reliable characterization into mucinous and nonmucinous subtypes and enable prediction of biologic aggressiveness.Accuracy of cytologic interpretation of pancreatic neoplasms by fine needle aspiration and pancreatic duct brushings.To investigate the accuracy of fine needle aspiration (FNA) specimens and pancreatic duct brushings in the detection of pancreatic lesions and to compare the results with follow-up biopsy and/or surgical interpretation.We reviewed a total of 57 specimens (37/20), 37 FNA specimens and 20 pancreatic duct brushings, from 45 patients treated at Froedtert Memorial Lutheran Hospital, affiliated with the Medical College of Wisconsin, Milwaukee, over a 4-year period. The FNA and brushing samples were categorized as follows: positive for malignancy (21/3 = 24), suspicious for malignancy (8/7 = 15) and atypical (8/10 = 18). The results were then correlated with the tissue diagnosis.The 24 cytologic samples positive for malignancy included 23 (20/3) pancreatic ductal carcinoma (CA) and 1 (1/0) neuroendocrine CA; in the suspicious category, 11 (6/5) were pancreatic ductal CA; 2 (0/2) mucinous neoplasms and (2/0) neuroendocrine neoplasms; in the atypical category; 2 (2/0) suggestive of mucinous neoplasia, 1 (1/0) suggestive of serous neoplasia and 9 (2/7) favor reactive; and 6 (3/3) without further categorization. Tissue diagnoses were available in 26 cases: 12 (10/2) cases positive for malignancy, 8 (5/3) suspicious for malignancy and 6 (5/1) atypical. The 12 cytologically positive cases confirmed by histology showed 10 ductal CA, 1 neuroendocrine CA and 1 negative. All 8 cases (100%) suspicious for malignancy revealed positive results, including 5 ductal CA, 1 neuroendocrine neoplasm, 1 mucinous cystic neoplasm and 1 lymphoma. Of the 6 atypical lesions, 1 showed ductal CA, 2 mucinous cystic neoplasm and 3 chronic pancreatitis.Pancreatic FNA and duct brushings [table: see text] are accurate methods in identifying pancreatic lesions, particularly ductal CA. Accuracy can be improved in the case of mucinous and other lesions with adequate cellularity of the smear and recognizing the limitations of brush samples in the case of mucinous cystic lesions. False negative results may occur in cases of poor representation of malignant cells or poor sampling.Positron emission tomography does not add to computed tomography for the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer.Positron emission tomography (PET) has been proposed for pancreatic cancer diagnosis and staging.112 patients with suspected pancreatic cancer underwent 18F-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose gamma camera PET and computed tomography (CT), of whom 62 also had laparoscopic ultrasonography and 70 underwent abdominal exploration for potential resection. The final diagnosis was malignancy in 78 and benign disease in 34 patients (25 with chronic pancreatitis).The diagnostic sensitivity and specificity for PET were 73 and 60% compared to 89 and 65% for CT respectively (Cohen's kappa = 0.59). In 30 patients CT was equivocal with cancer in 14 and benign disease in 16. PET correctly diagnosed 13 of these patients (cancer in 6 and benign disease in 7), interpreted 4 as equivocal (cancer in 3 and benign disease in 1) but was incorrect in the remaining 13 patients (cancer in 5 and benign disease in 8). The sensitivity and specificity for detecting small volume metastatic disease were 20 and 94% for CT and 22 and 91% for PET, respectively.PET had a similar accuracy to that of CT for imaging pancreatic cancer but it did not provide any additional information in patients with equivocal CT findings and currently would seem of little benefit for the staging of pancreatic cancer.Diagnosis of pancreatic cystic neoplasms: a report of the cooperative pancreatic cyst study.Cysts of the pancreas display a wide spectrum of histology, including inflammatory (pseudocysts), benign (serous), premalignant (mucinous), and malignant (mucinous) lesions. Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) may offer a diagnostic tool through the combination of imaging and guided, fine-needle aspiration (FNA). The purpose of this investigation was to determine the most accurate test for differentiating mucinous from nonmucinous cystic lesions.The results of EUS imaging, cyst fluid cytology, and cyst fluid tumor markers (CEA, CA 72-4, CA 125, CA 19-9, and CA 15-3) were prospectively collected and compared in a multicenter study using histology as the final diagnostic standard.Three hundred forty-one (341) patients underwent EUS and FNA of a pancreatic cystic lesion; 112 of these patients underwent surgical resection, providing a histologic diagnosis of the cystic lesion (68 mucinous, 7 serous, 27 inflammatory, 5 endocrine, and 5 other). Receiver operator curve analysis of the tumor markers demonstrated that cyst fluid CEA (optimal cutoff of 192 ng/mL) demonstrated the greatest area under the curve (0.79) for differentiating mucinous vs. nonmucinous cystic lesions. The accuracy of CEA (88 of 111, 79%) was significantly greater than the accuracy of EUS morphology (57 of 112, 51%) or cytology (64 of 109, 59%) (P < 0.05). There was no combination of tests that provided greater accuracy than CEA alone (P < 0.0001).Of tested markers, cyst fluid CEA is the most accurate test available for the diagnosis of mucinous cystic lesions of the pancreas.Intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas: features with multimodality imaging.The radiologic diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous tumor (IPMT) of the pancreas is important to establish because of its malignant potential and in order to determine the site of tumor origin and its extent. These pancreatic tumors are recognized more often now than previously because of the increasing use of imaging modalities such as computed tomography and magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography. The main features of IPMT are given in this pictorial essay, with illustrations provided from a series of 50 patients with a surgically proven diagnosis of IPMT.Differential diagnosis of pancreatic cancer from normal tissue with digital imaging processing and pattern recognition based on a support vector machine of EUS images.EUS can detect morphologic abnormalities of pancreatic cancer with high sensitivity but with limited specificity.To develop a classification model for differential diagnosis of pancreatic cancer by using a digital imaging processing (DIP) technique to analyze EUS images of the pancreas.A retrospective, controlled, single-center design was used.The study took place at the Second Military Medical University, Shanghai, China.There were 153 pancreatic cancer and 63 noncancer patients in this study.All patients underwent EUS-guided FNA and pathologic analysis.EUS images were obtained and correlated with cytologic findings after FNA. Texture features were extracted from the region of interest, and multifractal dimension vectors were introduced in the feature selection to the frame of the M-band wavelet transform. The sequential forward selection process was used for a better combination of features. By using the area under the receiver operating characteristic curve and other texture features based on separability criteria, a predictive model was built, trained, and validated according to the support vector machine theory.From 67 frequently used texture features, 20 better features were selected, resulting in a classification accuracy of 99.07% after being added to 9 other features. A predictive model was then built and trained. After 50 random tests, the average accuracy, sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value for the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer were 97.98 ± 1.23%, 94.32 ± 0.03%, 99.45 ± 0.01%, 98.65 ± 0.02%, and 97.77 ± 0.01%, respectively.The limitations of this study include the small sample size and that the support vector machine was not performed in real time.The classification of EUS images for differentiating pancreatic cancer from normal tissue by DIP is quite useful. Further refinements of such a model could increase the accuracy of EUS diagnosis of tumors.A prospective diagnostic accuracy study of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography, multidetector row computed tomography, and magnetic resonance imaging in primary diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer.To prospectively compare the accuracy of combined positron emission tomography/computed tomography using F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG-PET/CT), multidetector row computed tomography (MDCT), and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the evaluation of patients with suspected pancreatic malignancy.FDG-PET/CT imaging is increasingly used for staging of pancreatic cancer. Preliminary data suggest a significant influence of FDG-PET/CT on treatment planning, although its role is still evolving.Thirty-eight consecutive patients with suspicion of pancreatic malignancy were enrolled. Patients underwent a protocol including FDG-PET/CT, MDCT, and MRI combined with magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography, all of which were blindly evaluated. The findings were confirmed macroscopically at operation and/or by histopathologic analysis (n = 29) or follow-up (n = 9). Results of TNM classification of different imaging methods were compared with clinical TNM classification.Pancreatic adenocarcinoma was diagnosed in 17 patients, neuroendocrine tumor in 3, mass-forming pancreatitis in 4, cystic lesion in 6, and fibrosis in 2. Six patients had a finding of a normal pancreas. The diagnostic accuracy of FDG-PET/CT for pancreatic malignancy was 89%, compared with 76% and 79% for MDCT and MRI, respectively. In the differential diagnosis of suspected malignant biliary stricture at endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreaticography (n = 21), FDG-PET/CT had a positive predictive value of 92%. In 17 patients with advanced pancreatic adenocarcinoma, FDG-PET/CT had a sensitivity of 30% for N- and 88% for M-staging. Both MDCT and MRI had sensitivities of 30% for N- and 38% for M-staging. Furthermore, the clinical management of 10 patients (26%) was altered after FDG-PET/CT.FDG-PET/CT was more sensitive than conventional imaging in the diagnosis of both primary pancreatic adenocarcinoma and associated distant metastases. In contrast, the sensitivity of FDG-PET/CT was poor in detecting local lymph node metastasis, which would have been important for an assessment of resectability. We recommend the use of FDG-PET/CT in the evaluation of diagnostically challenging cases, especially in patients with biliary strictures without evidence of malignancy in conventional imaging.[Assessment of neoplastic pancreatic focal injury by multidetector computed tomography].pancreatic focal neoplastic lesions (PFNL) should be characterized through image methods to differentiate from no neoplastic lesions, suggesting one or more probable diagnosis, and staging of malignant lesions, in order to help define the estrategy of medial or surgical management. The multidetector computed tomography (MDCT) offers multiple properties and advantages that enable adequate characterization of the PFNL. The objective of this study is to evaluate de usefulness of MDCT in characterizing PFNL.a descriptive, retrospective caseseries study has been conducted. It consisted of reviewing MDCT studies in which PFNL were found, over a period of 4 years 11 months from January 2006 to November 2010.we obtained 54 cases of PFNL which were characterized by MDCT; 75.9% for a specific diagnosis, and were categorized as indeterminate 24.1%, considering more than one possible diagnosis. The most frequent PFNL type was pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma in 51.9%. Pancreatic cystic neoplasms accounted for 16.7%.MDCT is useful for identifying and characterizing LFNP, this means the possibility of establishing one or more diagnostic possibilities and guide medical management.[Intraductal papillary-mucinous tumor of the pancreas: difficulties and mistakes of diagnostics and treatment].15 patients with intraductal papillary-mucinous tumors (IPMT) of the pancreas were observed. Clinical manifestation corresponded with chronic pancreatitis. Ultrasound study, including endosonography, contrast-enhanced computer and magnetic resonance tomography were used in complex observation of the patients. Dilation of main or lateral pancreatic ducts, connection of tumor with pancreatic duct system and absence of septal calcinosis are typical signs in radiodiagnostics of IPMT. Visualization of parietal papillary proliferations and their contrast enhancement are undeniable signs f or neoplastic character of pancreatic duct dilation. Sensitivity of CT, MRТ and endoUS amounted accordingly 66, 83 and 88%. All patients were operated. Extent of operation was determined by morphological character, localization and size of the tumor (pylorus-preserving pancreaticoduodenal resection was carried out to 6 patients, distal resection including robot-assisted - to 7 patients, midline resection - to 1 patient, duodenum-preserving resection of head and body of pancreas - to 1 patient). Intraoperative urgent histologic study of pancreatic section was carried out by all means. Tumors with borderline degree of malignancy were detected in 4 cases.Value of contrast-enhanced 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography in detection and presurgical assessment of pancreatic cancer: a prospective study.Positron Emission Tomography (PET) using (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) associated with computed tomography (CT) is increasingly used for the detection and the staging of pancreatic cancer, but data regarding its clinical added value in pre-surgical planning is still lacking. The aim of this study is to investigate the performance of FDG PET associated with contrast-enhanced CT in detection of pancreatic cancer.We prospectively evaluated FDG PET/CT studies obtained in patients with suspicion of operable pancreatic cancer between May 2006 and January 2008. Staging was conducted according to a standardized protocol, and findings were confirmed in all patients by surgical resection or biopsy examination.Forty-five patients with a median age of 69 (range 22-82) were included in this study. Thirty-six had malignant tumors and nine had benign lesions (20%). The sensitivity of enhanced versus unenhanced PET/CT in the detection of pancreatic cancer was 96% versus 72% (P=0.076), the specificity 66.6% versus 33.3% (P=0.52), the positive predictive value 92.3% versus 80% (P=0.3), the negative predictive value 80% versus 25% (P=0.2), and the accuracy 90.3% versus 64% (P=0.085).Our preliminary data obtained in a limited number of patients shows that contrast-enhanced FDG PET/CT offers good sensitivity in the detection and assessment of pancreatic cancer, but at the price of a relatively low specificity. Enhanced PET/CT seems to be superior to unenhanced PET/CT. Further larger prospective studies are needed to establish its value for pre-surgical diagnosis and staging in pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided real-time fine-needle aspiration biopsy of the pancreas in cancer patients with pancreatic lesions.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is an important new tool in the staging of pancreatic malignancies. Using new curved linear-array instruments, real-time fine-needle aspiration biopsy (RTFNA) of pancreatic lesions can be performed.Forty-five patients with pancreatic lesions (22 males and 23 females) underwent staging with the Olympus EUM-20 (Olympus America Corp, Melville, NY) followed by EUS-RTFNA with the Pentax FG-32PUA (Pentax-Precision Instrument Corp, Orangeburg, NY) and the 22-gauge GIP needle (GIP Medizin Technik, Grassau, Germany).EUS tumor stages were as follows: TO, n = 1; T1, n = 8; T2, n = 9; and T3 n = 27. Aspiration attempts were unsuccessful in four patients (two technical failures and two inadequate specimens). The remaining 41 lesions (mean size, 3.3 cm) were aspirated under EUS guidance (median passes, three) and the cytologic diagnoses were 25 definite adenocarcinoma, five suspicious for adenocarcinoma (three subsequently confirmed and two clinical course consistent with adenocarcinoma), and 11 negative for malignancy. Of 11 negatives, two were found to have adenocarcinoma, seven were confirmed benign at surgery (four cystadenomas and three inflammatory), one had a benign pseudocyst, and one had abundant inflammatory cells on RTFNA and follow-up time greater than 12 months with computed tomographic (CT) scans consistent with resolving inflammation. There were no false-positive RTFNAs. There were no procedure-related complications. Among those with diagnostic EUS-RTFNA (91%), the sensitivity for malignancy (confirmed plus suspicious) was 94% and negative predictive value 82%.EUS-guided RTFNA is a safe and accurate method for performing pancreatic biopsy. It should be considered in patients with suspected pancreatic malignancies in whom a tissue diagnosis is required or when other modalities have failed. EUS-RTFNA allows for local staging and tissue diagnosis in one procedure.Kras mutation analysis of fine needle aspirate under EUS guidance facilitates risk stratification of patients with pancreatic mass.The accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-fine needle aspiration cytology (EUS-FNAC) for the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer is suboptimal. Mutational activation of the kras oncogene is almost universally present in pancreatic cancer tissue. We, therefore, investigated if analysis for mutant kras gene in the EUS-FNAC aspirates supplements cytopathology for the diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma (PAC).EUS-FNAC specimens obtained from 74 patients with pancreatic masses were analyzed for the presence of kras mutation on codon 12 using polymerase chain reaction-restriction fragment length polymorphism and MvaI restriction enzyme. Definitive diagnosis was based on surgical pathology or long-term follow-up (median 27.8 mo); 57 patients had PAC, 11 patient's chronic pancreatitis, and 9 patient's nonfunctioning neuroendocrine tumors.Analysis of mutant kras gene in addition to cytopathology allowed the detection of PAC in 4 additional patients as compared with cytopathology alone. Cytopathology and kras mutant analysis were negative for PAC in 17 patients of whom 6 patients (35%) had PAC. The respective sensitivity (90.9% vs. 82.5%), specificity (47.6% vs. 97.9%), positive predictive value (89.5% vs. 83.8%), negative predictive value (98.1% vs. 94.1%), accuracy (89.2% vs. 58.8%) of cytopathology plus kras mutation versus cytopathology were numerically superior but did not reach statistical significance.Analysis for the presence of mutant kras gene supplements conventional cytopathology for the diagnosis of PAC even without a cytopathologist in attendance and using only 3 needle passes. Among patients with negative cytopathology, the presence of kras mutation represents pancreatic cancer while the absence of kras mutation increases the possibility of benign lesion.Diagnostic impact of 18F-FDG PET-CT evaluating solid pancreatic lesions versus endosonography, endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography with intraductal ultrasonography and abdominal ultrasound.This prospective single-centre phase II trial assessed the diagnostic impact of (18)F-FDG PET-CT in the evaluation of solid pancreatic lesions (phi >or= 10 mm) compared to endosonography (EUS), endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography (ERCP) with intraductal ultrasound (IDUS), abdominal ultrasound (US) and histopathological reference.Forty-six patients (32 men/14 women, phi 61.7 years) with suspected pancreatic neoplasms underwent PET-CT with contrast-enhanced biphasic multi-detector CT of the upper abdomen followed by a diagnostic work-up with EUS, ERCP with IDUS and US within 3 weeks. PET-CT data sets were analysed by two expert readers in a consensus reading. Histology from surgery, biopsy/fine-needle aspiration and/or clinical follow-up >or=12 months served as standard of reference.Twenty-seven pancreatic malignancies were histopathologically proven; 19 patients had benign diseases: 36/46 lesions (78%) were detected in the head of the pancreas, 7/46 and 3/46 in the body and tail region, respectively. Sensitivity and specificity of PET-CT were 89% and 74%, respectively; positive predictive value (PPV) and negative predictive value (NPV) were 83% and 82%, respectively. Sensitivity (81-89%), specificity (74-88%), PPV (83-90%) and NPV (77-82%) achieved by EUS, ERCP and US were not significantly different. PET analysis revealed significantly higher maximum mean standardised uptake values (SUV(max) 6.5+/-4.6) in patients with pancreatic malignancy (benign lesions: SUV(max) 4.2+/-1.5; p<0.05). PET-CT revealed cervical lymphonodal metastasis from occult bronchogenic carcinoma and a tubular colon adenoma with intermediate dysplasia on polypectomy, respectively.(18)F-FDG PET-CT achieves a comparably high diagnostic impact evaluating small solid pancreatic lesions versus conventional reference imaging modalities. Additional clinical diagnoses are derived from concomitant whole-body PET-CT imaging.Can endosonographers evaluate on-site cytologic adequacy? A comparison with cytotechnologists.On-site determination of cytologic adequacy increases the accuracy of EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA); however, on-site cytotechnologists are not available to all endosonographers. We hypothesize that experienced endosonographers can accurately assess whether an on-site FNA specimen is adequate.To determine the accuracy of on-site cytopathology interpretation of EUS-FNA specimens by comparing endosonographers with a cytotechnologist.Prospective double-blind controlled trial.Academic medical center with a high-volume EUS practice.Consecutive patients undergoing EUS-FNA of lymph nodes or pancreas tumors.Accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity of 3 endosonographers and 1 cytotechnologist for interpretation of cytologic specimen adequacy and diagnosis compared with a criterion standard of a board-certified cytopathologist.There were 59 lymph node, 49 pancreas, and 9 liver specimens (117 total). For determination of adequacy, none of the endosonographers were statistically equivalent to the cytotechnologist (P=.004). For determination of suspicious/malignant versus benign specimens, all 3 endosonographers were inferior (P<.001) to the cytotechnologist.This study represents a small group of trained endosonographers in a high-volume practice and may not be applicable to other settings. The sample size does not allow an accurate evaluation of different biopsy sites (eg, pancreas vs lymph node).Even trained endosonographers have variable and, in some cases, inferior abilities to interpret on-site cytologic adequacy compared with cytotechnologists.[Clinicopathological and CT features of mucinous cystic neoplasms of the pancreas].To evaluate the clinicopathological and CT features of mucinous cystic neoplasms (MCNs) of the pancreas and analyze the correlative risk factors for malignant pancreatic mucinous cystic neoplasms.Ninety-eight patients who underwent curative resection for mucinous cystic neoplasms of the pancreas at PLA General Hospital from April 1994 to January 2013 were included in this study. All clinicopathological data available were retrospectively analyzed. All patients were divided into benign tumors + premalignant lesion group (70 patients) and malignant tumor group (28 patients). Clinicopathological and CT features of the mucinous cystic neoplasms of the pancreas and risk factors of malignant pancreatic mucinous cystic neoplasms were analyzed.Mucinous cystic neoplasms were seen mostly in perimenopausal women (71.4%, 70/98 cases,), and 51.0% (50/98 cases) of the patients had obvious clinical signs, mostly non-specific abdominal pain, but jaundice was present only in cases of malignant mucinous cystic neoplasms. Benign mucinous cystic neoplasms were mostly located in the distal pancreas (74.3%) and characterized with septa and thin cystic wall, while more malignant mucinous cystic neoplasms were located at the proximal pancreas (57.1%) and characterized with thick cystic wall and solid components. Univariate analysis showed that findings associated with malignancy gender, age ≥ 60, presence of symptoms, jaundice, weight loss, tumor location, margin, wall thickness, solid components and dilation of the main pancreatic duct were significantly correlated with malignant tumor development (P < 0.05 for all). The results of multiple logistic regression analysis showed that thick wall and solid components were independent prognostic factors for malignancy (OR = 31.417 and 34.976, P < 0.05 for both).Gender, age ≥ 60, presence of symptoms, jaundice, weight loss, tumor location, margin, wall thickness, solid components and dilation of the main pancreatic duct are important diagnostic indices of malignant mucinous cystic tumors of the pancreas, while thick wall and solid components are independent risk factors of malignant pancreatic mucinous cystic neoplasms.Pancreatic cancer: FDG-PET is not useful in early pancreatic cancer diagnosis.Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy of suspected pancreatic cancer.In many institutions, computed tomography (CT)-guided percutaneous fine-needle aspiration (FNA) has become the procedure of choice for biopsies of pancreatic mass lesions. This method of biopsy and others, such as endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) cytology, are problematic because of a substantial false-negative rate.To investigate the yield of endoscopic ultrasonography-guided FNA biopsies in patients who had negative results on CT-guided biopsy or negative cytologic findings on ERCP sampling.Prospective cohort study.Tertiary care university medical center.102 patients (median age, 65 years; 58 men and 44 women) with suspected pancreatic cancer who fulfilled the above criteria were prospectively identified and underwent endoscopic ultrasonography-guided FNA biopsy.The operating characteristics of endoscopic ultrasonography-guided FNA for diagnosing pancreatic masses were determined. Surgical pathology or long-term follow-up (median, 24 months) was used to identify false-positive or false-negative results.Median mass size was 3.5 cm x 2.7 cm. A median of 3.4 passes were performed. Cytologic results on endoscopic ultrasonography-guided FNA biopsy were positive in 57 patients, negative in 37, and inconclusive or nondiagnostic in 8. No false-positive results were observed. A diagnosis of pancreatic cancer was subsequently confirmed in 3 patients who had tested negative (false-negative results) and 1 of the 8 patients with nondiagnostic results. Of these 4 patients, 3 had cytologic evidence of chronic pancreatitis on endoscopic ultrasonography-guided FNA biopsy. The 95% CI for the likelihood ratio for a positive test result contained all values greater than or equal to 9.7. The likelihood ratio for a negative test result was 0.05 (CI, 0.02 to 0.15). The posterior probability of pancreatic cancer after a definitely positive result was at least 93.5% by a conservative lower 95% confidence limit; after a definitely negative test result, it was 6.9%. The prevalence of pancreatic cancer was 59.8% (61 of 102 patients). Self-limited complications occurred in 3 of the 102 patients (2.9% [CI, 0.6% to 8.4%]).Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided FNA biopsy may play a valuable role in the evaluation of a pancreatic mass when results on other biopsy methods are negative but pancreatic cancer is suspected.Endoscopic ultrasound in pancreatic tumor diagnosis.In a prospective study from 1988 to 1990, 132 patients with suspected pancreatic tumor were examined with endoscopic ultrasound (EUS), transabdominal ultrasound (US), computed tomography (CT), and ERCP. The final diagnosis of 102 pancreatic tumors of different origin (76 malignant and 26 inflammatory tumors) and the exclusion of a pancreatic tumor in 30 patients was made by operation (N = 47), puncture (N = 36), autopsy (N = 3), or follow-up of a mean of 51 weeks (N = 46). Sensitivity and specificity in pancreatic tumor diagnosis were significantly higher for EUS (99% and 100%) than for US (67%/40%) and CT (77%/53%) and equal to ERCP (sensitivity 90%). This was even more obvious in small pancreatic tumors of 3 cm and less. However, as with the other imaging procedures, EUS was not able to differentiate reliably malignant from inflammatory pancreatic masses (accuracy 76% for malignancy and 46% for focal inflammation). From analysis of the endosonographic pattern of pancreatic tumors, no consistent morphologic features were identified which could have been specifically attributed to malignant or inflammatory masses. Our results show that EUS is superior to US and CT and equal to ERCP in pancreatic tumor diagnosis. In contrast to the indirect evidence obtained by ERCP, EUS provides direct visualization of tumor size and shape in almost all patients examined. Thus, EUS should be considered early in the evaluation of patients with suspected pancreatic tumors.Impact of endoscopic ultrasound with fine-needle aspiration on the surgical management of pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) with EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) enables one to visualize the pancreas and surrounding structures and can provide access for FNA of those structures that appear suspicious for tumor.From 1993 to 1995, 50 patients suspected of having pancreatic cancer underwent EUS/EUS-FNA and abdominal computed tomography (CT). Malignancy was found in 30 (60%) cases, which included 24 (48%) pancreatic adenocarcinomas.Endoscopic ultrasound/EUS-FNA identified 26 of the 30 malignancies (85%) and 21 of the 24 pancreatic adenocarcinomas (88%), with no false positives. Thirteen of the 24 pancreatic cancer patients had lymph nodes that were sampled with EUS/EUS-FNA. Seven of these 13 patients (62%) were found to have metastatic spread to lymph nodes. Operations were performed on 11 of the pancreatic cancer patients. Of these 11, the 5 that were predicted to be resectable by EUS/EUS-FNA underwent successful resection. Of the 6 predicted to be unresectable, 5 had palliative biliary bypasses, and 1 had a grossly positive margin of resection.Endoscopic ultrasound/EUS-FNA can identify patients for curative surgical resection. It can also preoperatively identify patients with regional nodal disease for inclusion in appropriately designed clinical trials.Pancreatic cystic lesions: discrimination accuracy based on clinical data and high resolution CT features.To determine the accuracy of high-resolution computed tomography in discriminating among pancreatic cystic lesions with and without clinical history.Multiphasic high-resolution computed tomographic scans of 100 proven cystic pancreatic lesions were retrospectively reviewed by 2 blinded imagers. Before and after a history of pancreatitis was revealed, readers classified lesions as either nontumor-related or tumor-related. Reviewers also classified lesions as benign or malignant and finally categorized each lesion as serous, mucinous, or other lesion. Diagnostic performance parameters for classification were calculated for each reader with and without history.Sixty-two lesions were tumor-related and 38 were not. Accuracy for classifying tumor-related from unrelated cysts for both reviewers increased (83%-92%, 85%-91%) when unblinded to pancreatitis history. Specificity also significantly increased (66%-88% and 84%) for both reviewers.Pancreatic-phase computed tomography enabled more than 80% accuracy in discriminating between tumor-related and unrelated lesions and increased with information of pancreatitis history.Cystic lesions of the pancreas: more reliable differentiation with in situ high-resolution optical imaging?[Endoscopic ultrasonography in diagnosis of surgical treatment of pancreas].Results of endoscopic ultrasonography at 137 patients suspected for pancreas pathology are analyzed. Methodology of endoscopic ultrasonography, semiotics of pancreas surgical diseases, advantages over other diagnostic methods are described. Endosonography is informative method for final diagnosis of different disease of pancreas. Diagnostic value of method and area of its clinical application are described.Prospective evaluation of new 22 gauge endoscopic ultrasound core needle using capillary sampling with stylet slow-pull technique for intra-abdominal solid masses.The aim of this study was to evaluate the adequacy and diagnostic yield of the histologic core obtained with a 22 G endoscopic ultrasound histology needle using capillary sampling with stylet slow-pull technique without on-site cytopathologist.No standard technique for new EUS histology needle has been established.A total of 125 consecutive patients with intra-abdominal solid masses were enrolled prospectively between October 2011 and March 2013. EUS-guided fine needle biopsy (EUS-FNB) with a 22 G histology needle using capillary sampling with stylet slow-pull technique was performed.A total of 133 EUS-FNB procedures targeting the pancreas, lymph node, retroperitoneal mass, ampulla of Vater, gallbladder, common bile duct, duodenum, and liver were performed in 125 patients. EUS-FNB was technically feasible in all cases, and a visible core was obtained in 128 cases (96%). Histologic core specimens suitable for pathologic assessment were reported in 111 cases (83%). There were no procedure-related adverse events. According to the determinants of malignancy with EUS-FNB, the sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy were 85%, 98%, 99%, 77%, and 89%, respectively. In addition, histologic architecture with or without immunohistochemical staining of the core biopsy specimens was useful for pathologic confirmation in 101 cases (76%).A 22 G EUS-FNB using capillary sampling with stylet slow-pull technique showed a high diagnostic yield and histologic core acquisition for the histologic diagnosis of various intra-abdominal masses without an on-site cytopathologist. Furthermore, a histologic core with or without immunohistochemical staining was helpful for clinical decision making in 76% of the intra-abdominal solid masses.Does preoperative cross-sectional imaging accurately predict main duct involvement in intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm?Main pancreatic duct (MPD) involvement is a well-demonstrated risk factor for malignancy in intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN). Preoperative radiographic determination of IPMN type is heavily relied upon in oncologic risk stratification. We hypothesized that radiographic assessment of MPD involvement in IPMN is an accurate predictor of pathological MPD involvement. Data regarding all patients undergoing resection for IPMN at a single academic institution between 1992 and 2012 were gathered prospectively. Retrospective analysis of imaging and pathologic data was undertaken. Preoperative classification of IPMN type was based on cross-sectional imaging (MRI/magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and/or CT). Three hundred sixty-two patients underwent resection for IPMN. Of these, 334 had complete data for analysis. Of 164 suspected branch duct (BD) IPMN, 34 (20.7%) demonstrated MPD involvement on final pathology. Of 170 patients with suspicion of MPD involvement, 50 (29.4%) demonstrated no MPD involvement. Of 34 patients with suspected BD-IPMN who were found to have MPD involvement on pathology, 10 (29.4%) had invasive carcinoma. Alternatively, 2/50 (4%) of the patients with suspected MPD involvement who ultimately had isolated BD-IPMN demonstrated invasive carcinoma. Preoperative radiographic IPMN type did not correlate with final pathology in 25% of the patients. In addition, risk of invasive carcinoma correlates with pathologic presence of MPD involvement.Dynamic fast-gradient echo MR imaging of pancreatic tumours.The purpose of this study was to determine the diagnostic utility of dynamic magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) of the pancreas. Twenty-eight adult patients with known or suspected pancreatic tumours were examined. Pre- and post-gadolinium (GdDTPA-BMA) scans were obtained in combination with an oral negative contrast medium (ferristene) to mark the gastrointestinal tract. In 6 cases a more precise diagnosis could be made by dynamic MRI compared to unenhanced MRI. Surgery could confirm the MR diagnosis based on contrast enhancement in 83% compared to 78% for CT. The results of signal intensity (SI) measurements show that a combination of differences in baseline values before enhancement and the slope of enhancement within the first 20 s is a reliable criterion to distinguish between normal pancreas and hypovascular tumours. These tumours already show lower SI values before as well as lower slopes after early enhancement. Mainly two effects facilitate the final MRI diagnosis: (1) the delineation of the pancreas from the duodenum by the negative contrast medium, and (2) the enhancement pattern of pancreatic tumours by gadolinium-enhanced dynamic MRI compared to normal tissue within the early enhancement after contrast injection.Improving the diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration using microRNAs.Solid pancreatic lesions: characterization by using timing bolus dynamic contrast-enhanced MR imaging assessment--a preliminary study.To assess the feasibility of postprocessing dynamic contrast material-enhanced (DCE) magnetic resonance (MR) imaging timing bolus data by using a three-dimensional radial gradient-echo technique with k-space-weighted image contrast (KWIC) for the characterization of solid pancreatic diseases.This retrospective study was approved by the institutional review board, and informed consent was waived. A total of 45 patients suspected of having biliary or pancreatic disease underwent pancreatic MR examination with a 3.0-T imager with a low-dose (2 mL gadopentetate dimeglumine) timing bolus by using the radial KWIC technique. There were 24 patients with pancreatic cancers, eight with pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (PNETs), three with chronic pancreatitis, and 10 with a normal pancreas. By using a dedicated postprocessing software program for DCE MR imaging, the following perfusion parameters were measured for tumor and nontumorous parenchyma: volume transfer coefficient (K(trans)) and extracellular extravascular volume fraction; the rate constant (k(ep)) and initial area under the concentration curve in 60 seconds (iAUC) were then generated. The perfusion parameters acquired on DCE MR images were compared among the groups by using the analysis of variance test.K(trans), k(ep), and iAUC values in patients with pancreatic cancer (0.042 min(-1) ± 0.023 [standard deviation], 0.761 min(-1) ± 0.529, and 2.841 mmol/sec ± 1.811, respectively) were significantly lower than in patients with a normal pancreas (0.387 min(-1) ± 0.176, 6.376 min(-1) ± 2.529, and 7.156 mmol/sec ± 3.414, respectively) (P < .05 for all). In addition, k(ep) values of PNETs and normal pancreas also differed (P < .0001), and K(trans), k(ep), and iAUC values of pancreatic cancers and PNETs differed significantly (P < .0001, P = .038, and P < .0001, respectively).Results of timing bolus DCE MR imaging with the radial KWIC sequence from routine examinations can be postprocessed to yield potentially useful perfusion parameters for the characterization of pancreatic diseases.Prospective comparison of endoscopic ultrasound and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the preoperative assessment of masses in the pancreatic head.To compare the diagnostic value of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the differentiation of malignant from benign masses in the pancreatic head.Within 14 months 95 prospective patients with masses in the pancreatic head were assigned for preoperative EUS and ERCP. Both procedures were performed and recorded according to a standardized protocol. Based on intraoperative findings and histology, 50 patients (53%) suffered from malignant and 45 patients (47%) from benign (inflammatory) tumors.Success rates were 96% for EUS and 95% for ERCP. The overall results for EUS and ERCP to predict malignant masses were, respectively: sensitivity 78 and 81%, specificity 93 and 88%, positive predictive value 93 and 89%, negative predictive value 78 and 80%, and diagnostic accuracy 85 and 84%. When EUS and ERCP were taken together, the sensitivity was 92% (specificity 85%), but the diagnostic accuracy (89%) was not significantly enhanced. The results for EUS to diagnose lymph node metastases preoperatively were: sensitivity 55%, specificity 91%, positive predictive value 69%, negative predictive value 84%, and accuracy 81%.EUS and ERCP have similar diagnostic accuracies to separate malignant from benign masses in the pancreatic head. Combination of both procedures is not superior to the use of one modality alone. Abnormal lymph nodes visualized on EUS in patients with inflammatory masses in the pancreatic head due to chronic pancreatitis should be interpreted cautiously.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of pancreas: multi-detector row CT with 2D curved reformations--correlation with MRCP.To retrospectively compare accuracy of multi-detector row computed tomography (CT), combined with two-dimensional (2D) curved reformations, and that of magnetic resonance (MR) cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) for characterization of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) as malignant, with pathologic examination as reference standard.Institutional review board approval was obtained, informed consent was waived, and study was HIPAA compliant. Twenty-five patients (12 women, 13 men; age range, 44-88 years) with pathologically proved IPMN were examined with dual-phase CT with 1.25-mm-thick sections for pancreatic phase; 2D curved reformations along main pancreatic duct (MPD) were generated. T2-weighted MRCP included thick- and thin-slab single-shot fast spin-echo imaging and transverse fast spin-echo imaging. Two radiologists, blinded to surgical and pathologic findings, evaluated images for lesion location, septa, mural nodules, communication with MPD, extent and diameter of MPD dilatation, calcifications, and vascular encasement. Malignancy was suspected when one of the following was present: MPD diameter larger than 10 mm, mural nodules, vascular encasement, peripancreatic lymphadenopathy, or metastases. Sensitivity and specificity values for prediction of malignancy were calculated for CT and MRCP. Interobserver variability was determined (kappa analysis).Excellent correlation between modalities was observed. Cyst communication was seen in 20 and 21 of 24 branch pancreatic duct (BPD) IPMNs with CT and MRCP, respectively. Sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy for detection of malignancy were 70%, 87%, and 76% (CT) and 70%, 92%, and 80% (MRCP), respectively. Interobserver agreement was good to perfect for both readers in all comparisons (overall, kappa = 0.70-1.00).CT combined with 2D curved reformation can provide imaging details of IPMN, including communication of BPD IPMN with MPD, that are almost equivalent to those provided at MRCP. Presence of mural nodules, dilated MPD (>10-mm diameter), or thick septa at CT or MRCP may be used as independent predictors of malignancy.Preoperative GNAS and KRAS testing in the diagnosis of pancreatic mucinous cysts.Management guidelines for pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMN) and mucinous cystic neoplasms (MCN) are based on the assumption that mucinous cysts can be accurately distinguished from other pancreatic cystic lesions. Previous studies using surgical material have identified recurrent mutations in GNAS and KRAS in pancreatic mucinous neoplasms. Yet, the diagnostic utility of testing for both genes in pancreatic cyst fluid obtained by endoscopic ultrasound-fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) remains unclear.GNAS and KRAS testing was performed on EUS-FNA pancreatic cyst fluid from 91 pancreatic cysts: 41 IPMNs, 9 IPMNs with adenocarcinoma, 16 MCNs, 10 cystic pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (PanNET), 9 serous cystadenomas (SCA), 3 retention cysts, 2 pseudocysts, and 1 lymphoepithelial cyst.Mutations in GNAS were detected in 16 (39%) IPMNs and 2 (22%) IPMNs with adenocarcinoma. KRAS mutations were identified in 28 (68%) IPMNs, 7 (78%) IPMNs with adenocarcinoma, and 1 (6%) MCN. Mutations in either gene were present in 34 (83%) IPMNs, 8 (89%) IPMNs with adenocarcinoma, and 1 (6%) MCN. No mutations were found in cystic PanNETs, SCAs, retention cysts, pseudocysts, and a lymphoepithelial cyst. GNAS and KRAS mutations had 100% specificity [95% confidence interval (CI), 0.83-1.00] but 65% sensitivity (95% CI, 0.52-0.76) for mucinous differentiation. Among IPMNs, mutations in either gene had 98% specificity (95% CI, 0.86-1.00) and 84% sensitivity (95% CI, 0.70-0.92).The combination of GNAS and KRAS testing was highly specific and sensitive for IPMNs; however, the lack of sensitivity for MCNs highlights the need for additional markers to improve the detection of pancreatic mucinous neoplasms.The role of endoscopic ultrasound and endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration in distinguishing pancreatic cystic lesions.Distinguishing mucinous from nonmucinous cystic lesions of the pancreas often constitutes a diagnostic dilemma. The clinical management differs between such lesions; therefore it is important to make an accurate preoperative diagnosis. Various centers have reported conflicting results regarding their ability to detect mucin-producing neoplastic cells and appropriately reach a diagnosis based on endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) guided FNA. The aim of this study is to assess the ability of EUS-FNA cytology to diagnose and differentiate mucinous from nonmucinous pancreatic cystic lesions. We reviewed records of patients who underwent EUS of pancreatic cystic lesions. If FNA was performed and mucinous neoplasm was suspected, aspirate was evaluated for cytomorphology and presence of mucin. FNA results were compared to final histologic diagnosis if surgery was performed. Cytologic diagnosis was provided for 28/30 (93%). By comparing EUS-FNA diagnoses with final surgical pathology, FNA accurately diagnosed in 10/11 cases with sensitivity and specificity for detection of malignancy of 100 and 89, respectively, while the accuracy for identification of mucinous cystic neoplasms was 100%. Our results indicate that in the appropriate clinical and imaging setting, EUS-FNA cytology with analysis for mucin production by tumor cells is an important test in distinguishing pancreatic cystic lesions and guiding further management.Usefulness of contrast-enhanced transabdominal ultrasonography in the diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas.The differentiation of benign from malignant intraductal papillary mucinous tumors (IPMT) is often difficult even by various examination methods. We evaluated the qualitative and quantitative diagnostic ability of contrast-enhanced transabdominal ultrasonography (CE-US), mainly in differentiating benign from malignant tumors in patients with IPMT.There were 21 patients with IPMT who underwent CE-US and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS). Surgery was performed in all 21 patients. Pathological findings were 4 with carcinoma and 17 with adenoma. CE-US was performed using a contrast agent (Levovist; Tanabe, Osaka, Japan) consisting of galactose microbubbles and a small (0.1%) admixture of palmitic acid, and the following items were evaluated by the following procedure. (1) Two reviewers with experienced sonographic and endosonographic ability evaluated CE-US images before and after contrast enhancement and classified the enhancement effects into three grades. In addition, the presence or absence of enhancement effects by CE-US was compared with that of mural nodules visualized by EUS. (2) In all 21 patients, changes in intensity after contrast enhancement were quantitatively measured using an HDI Lab. HDI Lab was provided by ATL (Philips; Bothell, WA) and these software tools rapidly quantify image characteristics within multiple ROI (regions of interest) and make comparisons between several areas or images. In both the early and late phases, the post-enhancement intensity, difference between pre- and post-enhancement intensity, and the percentage change ((post-enhancement value-pre-enhancement value)/pre-enhancement value) were compared between malignant and benign lesions, and the ability of CE-US to differentiate between benign and malignant lesions was evaluated in comparison with the ability of EUS to diagnose the degree of malignancy.(1) In both the early and the late phases, both reviewers observed enhancement effects in all 21 patients. And both reviewers observed mural nodules by EUS in all 21 patients. (2) In all 21 patients who underwent resection of IPMT, the intensity increased in both the early and late phases. When the patients with carcinoma were compared with those with adenoma, the post-enhancement intensity was significantly higher, and the difference between pre- and post-enhancement intensity and the percentage change in the early phase and the late phase was significantly more marked in the carcinoma group (p= 0.019, p= 0.002, p= 0.015, p= 0.012, and p= 0.039, respectively).CE-US was useful for qualitatively diagnosing tumor lesions in patients with IPMT. Moreover, quantitative changes in intensity can be a parameter for the differential diagnosis of benign and malignant tumors.[Value of CT enhancement degree in differential diagnosis between pancreatic carcinoma and inflammatory pancreatic mass].To compare the CT enhancement degree in pancreatic carcinoma (PC) and inflammatory pancreatic mass (IPM), and to study the diagnostic value of CT to these two diseases.Eighty-five patients with PC or IPM, 47 males and 38 females, aged 62 (37-79), underwent plain CT scanning and enhanced CT scanning in pancreatic phase and delay phase. The CT values of the pancreatic mass and relative normal pancreatic tissue were measured. The diagnosis of PC and IPM was verified by operation, biopsy, etc. Sixty persons without pancreatic diseases were used as controls.Among the 85 patients, 66 were proved to be with PC, and 19 patients were proved to be with IPM. In plain CT scanning, pancreatic-phase CT enhancement, and delay-phase CT enhancement, the CT values of PC were (34+/-7) HU, (54+/-10) HU, and (61+/-14) HU respectively; and the CT values of the relatively normal pancreatic tissue were (42+/-6) HU, (105+/-12) HU, and (77+/-10) HU respectively. In plain CT scanning, pancreatic-phase CT enhancement, and delay-phase CT enhancement, the CT values of IPM were (37+/-6) HU, (58+/-17) HU, and (64+/-10) HU respectively; and the CT values of the relatively normal pancreatic tissue were (40+/-8) HU, (85+/-10) HU, and (72+/-9) HU respectively. The pancreatic-phase enhanced CT values of the mass in the PC group and the IPM group showed no remarkable differences (P>0.05). The pancreatic-phase enhancement intensity of the relatively normal pancreatic tissue is greater in PC than in IPM (P<0.01).There is a certain limit for CT enhancement in differentiating between PC and IPM. Comprehensive analysis is necessary in diagnosis of PC and IPM.Mucinous cystic neoplasm of the pancreas: is surgical resection recommended for all surgically fit patients?Surgical removal of mucinous cystic neoplasms (MCNs) is usually recommended because of the risk of malignancy. However, increased experience of MCNs suggests that the incidence of invasion is lower than had been thought. This study was designed to establish more reasonable surgical indications for MCN through re-assessment using strict pathologic diagnostic criteria.Ninety-four patients who underwent surgical removal of MCNs at Seoul National University Hospital from 1991 to 2012 were retrospectively analyzed. Pathologic results were re-evaluated by an experienced pathologist. Medical records and radiologic images were reviewed to determine factors predicting malignancy.Of the 94 patients, 4 were found to have intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs). Of the 90 MCNs, 60 (66.7%) were low-grade, 21 (23.3%) were intermediate-grade, and 5 (5.5%) were high-grade dysplasias; and 4 (4.4%) were invasive carcinoma. Mural nodules on CT scan (p = 0.005) and abnormal serum CA19-9 concentration (p = 0.029) were significant predictors of malignancy. All MCNs less than 3 cm in size with normal serum tumor markers were benign and all malignant MCNs had cyst fluid CA19-9 over 10,000 units/ml. The five year disease specific survival rates were 98.8% for all patients and 75.0% for those with invasive MCNs.MCNs had a low prevalence of malignancy. Regardless of the histological grade, long-term outcome was excellent. Therefore, in the absence of specific symptoms, surgery may not be indicated for MCNs <3 cm without mural nodules or elevated serum tumor markers. Validation by a prospective study with very careful design is needed.Dynamic MDCT of the pancreas: is time-density curve morphology useful for the differential diagnosis of solid lesions? A preliminary report.CT perfusion has been proposed for pancreatic lesion characterization. However, scan and analysis protocols influence numerical data. To overcome this, the purpose of our study is to evaluate the use of time-density curves obtained from MDCT perfusion of the pancreas for the characterization of normal parenchyma, adenocarcinoma, chronic pancreatitis and endocrine tumors.31 patients with solid pancreatic lesions and 21 patients with renal cell carcinoma underwent 64-row MDCT perfusion of the pancreas after injection of 50 cc of a 370 mg I/ml solution at 5 cc/s. 63 time-density curves were obtained from normal parenchyma (21 patients), adenocarcinoma (25), endocrine tumors (4) and atrophic parenchyma (13). Two readers independently categorized the 63 time-density curves into 4 different morphologies: normal wash-in and wash-out (A), low wash-in followed by plateau (B), low wash-in followed by faint wash-out (C) and high wash-in and wash-out (D). Interobserver agreement was calculated with kappa statistics. Fisher test was used to calculate sensitivity, specificity, positive (PPV) and negative (NPV) predictive values for each type of curve.Interobserver agreement was very good (Kappa=0.849). Curve A had 94.4% sensitivity, 91.1% specificity, 80.95% PPV, 97.6% NPV for 'normal parenchyma'. Curve B had 74.19% sensitivity, 93.75% specificity, 92% PPV, 78.95% NPV in diagnosing 'adenocarcinoma'. Curve C had 45.45% sensitivity, 84.62% specificity, 38.46% PPV, 88% NPV for 'chronic pancreatitis'. Curve D had 100% sensitivity, 98.33% specificity, 75% PPV, 100% NPV for 'endocrine tumor'.The morphology of MDCT perfusion time-density curves appears to be useful in characterizing pancreatic lesions, and might help overcome the differences in scan and postprocessing techniques.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided real-time fine-needle aspiration: clinicopathologic features of 60 patients.Diagnosis of lesions of the gastrointestinal tract and adjacent structures is possible using an imaging modality, endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS). Fine-needle aspiration (FNA) is a suitable and cost-effective technique for obtaining cytohistologic material to confirm the diagnosis. EUS is capable of both characterizing the lesion and then guiding the FNA under real-time (RT) ultrasound guidance using a through-the-scope needle aspiration system. The goal of this study was to determine the diagnostic accuracy of this technique and to describe the clinicopathologic features. Sixty patients underwent EUS-guided RTFNA of 64 lesions, including pancreas (n = 45), periluminal lymph nodes (n = 12), mediastinal and retroperitoneal masses (n = 4), and hepatobiliary masses (n = 3). Follow-up data were obtained by surgery, histopathology, or clinical course. Thirty-one lesions were malignant, eight were atypical/suspicious, 16 were non-neoplastic, and nine were non-diagnostic. Of the 55 lesions with sufficient material for interpretation, 54 had follow-up confirmation of the RTFNA diagnosis. The calculated sensitivity and specificity for malignancy was 90% and 100%, respectively. Diagnostic accuracy for malignancy was excellent for gastrointestinal associated lymph nodes (100%), mediastinal and retroperitoneal masses (100%), somewhat less so for pancreatic tumors (94%), and poor for hepatobiliary lesions (33%). EUS-guided RTFNA is accurate for sampling small gastrointestinal tract-associated lesions. EUS-guided RTFNA should be considered as a procedure of choice in selected patients when the results will influence management decisions.Detection of B7-H4 and p53 in pancreatic cancer: potential role as a cytological diagnostic adjunct.This study compared p53 expression with B7-H4, a novel cancer biomarker, in pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma (PDA) resection specimens and in a pilot series of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspirations (EUS-FNAs).B7-H4 and p53 expression were evaluated by immunoperoxidase methods in 36 PDA and 15 EUS-FNA specimens and were scored for intensity and proportion of positive cells; cases were then assigned a final sum score.B7-H4 was detected in 33 (92%) of 36 PDA sections, 8 (89%) of 9 cytologically positive EUS-FNAs, and 1 (20%) of 5 cytologically negative EUS-FNAs. p53 was detected in 30 (83%) of 36 PDA sections, 4 (44%) of 9 cytologically positive EUS-FNAs, and 1 (20%) of 5 cytologically negative cases. One EUS-FNA case that was cytologically atypical but not diagnostic of malignancy expressed B7-H4 and p53. Some benign tissue components (intercalated cells/ducts, main pancreatic ducts, and acinar cells) were also positive for B7-H4 and/or p53. Overall expression of B7-H4 in benign tissues, however, was relatively low compared with that seen in most carcinoma cases.B7-H4 was expressed more often in PDA than was p53. Despite potentially problematic expression in benign/normal cells, the 2 markers target different cellular components and demonstrate potential diagnostic use for detection of PDA in resected and EUS-FNA specimens.A prospective, comparative trial to optimize sampling techniques in EUS-guided FNA of solid pancreatic masses.There is no standardization of the use of suction during puncturing of a target in pancreatic EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA). It is also debatable whether expressing aspirates from the needle by the traditional method of reinserting the stylet is more effective than by air flushing, which is easier and safer.To optimize sampling techniques in pancreatic EUS-FNA.Prospective, comparative trial.Tertiary-care referral center.Eighty-one consecutive patients with solid pancreatic masses.Four punctures were performed for each mass in random order by a 2 × 2 factorial design. Sample quality and diagnostic yield were compared between samples with suction (S+) versus no suction (S-) and expressed by reinserting the stylet (RS) versus air flushing (AF).Sample quality by the number of diagnostic samples, cellularity, bloodiness, and air-drying artifact; diagnostic yield by accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity.The number of diagnostic samples (72.8% vs 58.6%; P = .001), cellularity (odds ratio [OR] 2.12; 95% confidence interval [CI], 1.37-3.30; P < .001), bloodiness (OR 1.46; CI, 1.28-1.68; P < .001), accuracy (85.2% vs 75.9%; P = .004), and sensitivity (82.4% vs 72.1%; P = .005) were higher in S+ than in S-. Bloodiness was lower in AF than in RS (OR 1.16; CI, 1.03-1.30; P = .017).Single-center trial, 2 kinds of needle gauges, and no immediate cytopathology evaluation.Puncturing with suction and expressing by air flushing may be used preferentially in pancreatic EUS-FNA because they were more effective and convenient techniques. (NCT01354795.).Specialized DNA arrays for the differentiation of pancreatic tumors.Malignant tumors of the pancreas are frequently indistinguishable from inflammatory tumors arising in the context of a chronic pancreatitis with the use of conventional imaging techniques. Thus, cytologic analysis of cells obtained by abdominal ultrasound, computed tomography, or endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy is required for diagnosis. However, the reliability of cytologic analyses of pancreatic fine needle aspirates remains unsatisfactory, with a diagnostic accuracy of < or =80%. The purpose of the current study was therefore to develop a novel diagnostic approach based on expression profiling of biopsy material using a specialized diagnostic cDNA array.Previous gene expression profiling studies were reevaluated to design a 558-feature diagnostic array. Minimal amounts of residual material from pancreatic cytology samples as well as surgically resected tumor and control tissue specimens were analyzed using the diagnostic array and a newly developed statistical classification system.Our diagnostic approach resulted in 95% accurate differentiation between ductal adenocarcinomas and nonmalignant tumors of the pancreas. The diagnostic array, in conjunction with conventional diagnostic procedures, is thus suitable to significantly improve the reliability of pancreatic cancer diagnostics and can be expected to become a valuable new tool in the routine workup of suspect masses in the pancreas.Characteristic magnetic resonance features of focal autoimmune pancreatitis useful for differentiation from pancreatic cancer.To identify characteristic magnetic resonance (MR) features of focal autoimmune pancreatitis (f-AIP) useful for differentiation from pancreatic cancer (PC).We retrospectively analyzed MR imaging findings of 20 f-AIP lesions and 40 PC lesions smaller than 40 mm in diameter. On fat-suppressed T2-weighted images and dynamic contrast-enhanced fat-suppressed T1-weighted images (DCE-T1WI), we classified MR features of internal signal intensity for each lesion into homogeneous, speckled, or target type. We assessed the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of these findings in the diagnosis of f-AIP. We also investigated the incidence of previously reported findings for differentiation between f-AIP and PC.Speckled enhancement within a hypointense or isointense lesion on pancreatic phase DCE-T1WI (speckled type) was observed more frequently in f-AIP than in PC, with high sensitivity, high specificity, and high accuracy. Hypointensity to hyperintensity surrounding a less enhanced focal area on DCE-T1WIs (target type) and upper stream main pancreatic duct dilatation were observed more frequently in PC than in f-AIP.Speckled enhancement inside an f-AIP lesion on pancreatic phase DCE-T1WI was useful for differentiation from PC.MDCT of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas: evaluation of features predictive of invasive carcinoma.The purpose of our study was to evaluate factors predictive of the presence of invasive carcinoma associated with intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) of the pancreas on MDCT.Preoperative MDCT of 36 consecutive patients (23 men, 13 women; mean age, 66.6 years) who had undergone surgical resection and had a pathologic diagnosis of IPMN were retrospectively assessed. CT was performed with a 4-MDCT scanner with 120 mL of IV contrast material at an injection rate of 3 mL/sec. Arterial and venous phase images were acquired at 25 and 50-60 sec from the start of IV contrast administration. Type of ductal involvement, location, tumor size in branch duct type and combined type lesions, caliber of the main pancreatic duct, caliber of the common bile duct or common hepatic duct, and solid appearance of the lesion were assessed on CT and correlated with pathologic findings for invasive carcinoma.Pathologic analysis revealed carcinoma in situ in seven patients (19%) and invasive carcinoma in 15 patients (42%) arising from the IPMN. With invasive carcinoma, the size of the tumor in branch duct type and combined type, and the caliber of the main pancreatic duct were significantly larger compared with the lesions without invasive carcinoma (4.7 +/- 1.7 cm vs 2.6 +/- 1.4 cm [p = 0.0007] and 9.3 +/- 5.5 mm vs 4.6 +/- 4.1 mm [p = 0.006], respectively). A solid mass (p < 0.001), dilatation of the common bile duct or common hepatic duct (> or = 15 mm), and the presence of a stent (p = 0.0004) were correlated with the presence of associated invasive carcinoma.MDCT helped to predict invasive carcinoma associated with IPMN.The role of fluorodeoxyglucose and positron emission tomography in the evaluation of pancreatic disease.The difficulties involved in the timely and accurate diagnosis of pancreatic disease are well known. The usual imaging modalities usually identify abnormalities but may not always differentiate malignancy from other condition such as scar tissue or chronic inflammation. The purpose of our study was to determine if fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (FDG PET) can accurately diagnose pancreatic disease.The records of 15 patients presenting with pancreatic disease were retrospectively reviewed. The diagnosis suspected by imaging modalities was compared with the final tissue diagnosis. Two patients were excluded because no tissue was obtained.Adenocarcinoma was diagnosed in 9 patients. A mass consistent with this diagnosis was seen in 8 of 9, 6 of 9, 6 of 8, and 5 of 5 patients by PET, computed tomography (CT), endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS), respectively. Chronic pancreatitis (CP) was diagnosed in 2 patients. The unique appearance on FDG PET made the diagnosis in both these patients. Both patients with CP were thought to have a malignancy by CT and EUS and 1 of 2 by ERCP. Neuroendocrine tumors were diagnosed in 2 other patients. One of 2 was seen by FDG PET and both by CT.FDG PET can accurately differentiate a pancreatic adenocarcinoma from chronic pancreatitis in a patient with a suspicious pancreatic mass. Thus, FDG PET may help in establishing a diagnosis and subsequently managing a patient with pancreatic disease.Macrocystic pancreatic cystadenoma: The role of EUS and cyst fluid analysis in distinguishing mucinous and serous lesions.Benign pancreatic serous cystadenoma usually is morphologically distinguishable from mucinous cystadenomas, which require resection because of their malignant potential. A macrocystic variant of serous cystadenoma recently has been described, rendering this important distinction more difficult. The aim of this study was to determine the EUS and tumor marker characteristics of mucinous cystadenoma compared with macrocystic serous cystadenomas.Medical records for consecutive patients seen between 1995 and 2002, with a histopathologic diagnosis of mucinous cystadenoma or macrocystic serous cystadenoma after surgery, who had undergone a detailed EUS examination, including EUS-guided FNA, were retrospectively reviewed.A resection specimen was available for 32 mucinous cystadenomas and 9 macrocystic serous cystadenomas. No significant differences were observed with regard to clinical data (age, gender, presence of symptoms), lesion size, and location within the pancreas. All mucinous cystadenomas had a discernible cyst wall (thickened, 66%; focal parietal nodules, 25%) compared with 56% of macrocystic serous cystadenomas (p<0.0001). A thick echo content also was more frequent in mucinous cystadenoma (56% vs. 11%; p=0.04; statistical significance removed by the Bonferroni correction). Microcysts were only observed in macrocystic serous cystadenomas (44%; p=0.0008). The combination of a cyst wall that is thickened and the absence of microcysts had a sensitivity of 100% and specificity of 78% for the diagnosis of mucinous cystadenoma compared with macrocystic serous cystadenoma. Although intracystic carbohydrate-associated antigen 72-4 and mucins M1 were non-discriminatory, low carcinoembryonic antigen (<5 ng/mL) and carbohydrate-associated antigen 19-9 (<50,000 U/mL) values were found in macrocystic serous lesions (respectively, 100% and 100%; p=0.0002 and p=0.0002).Although there is considerable overlap, helpful EUS characteristics that differentiate mucinous cystadenoma from macrocystic serous cystadenoma include a thick cyst wall and microcysts. These features, coupled with analysis of aspirated fluid for tumor markers (especially carcinoembryonic antigen), should help to confirm the diagnosis.Role of (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography in the characterization of pancreatic masses: experience from tropics.Early detection and differentiation of malignant from benign pancreatic tumors is very essential as mass-forming pancreatitis is a frequently encountered problem. Positron emission tomography (PET) has a role in establishing the diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma when the conventional imaging modalities or biopsies are nondiagnostic. In this prospective study, the utility of fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG)-PET/computed tomography (CT) in the characterization of mass-forming lesions of the pancreas was reported.(18)F-FDG-PET/CT was prospectively performed in 87 patients diagnosed to have periampullary or pancreatic mass. Lesions with focally increased FDG uptake in PET/CT were considered malignant, whereas those with diffuse or no FDG uptake were considered benign. Semiquantitative analysis with maximum standardized uptake value (SUVmax) was also calculated. The PET/CT results were compared with histopathological results in all patients.Based on the FDG uptake pattern, sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy for FDG-PET/CT in characterizing the periampullary and pancreatic masses into benign and malignant lesions were 93%, 90%, 95%, 87%, and 92% respectively. Receiver operating characteristics curve analysis of the SUVmax of the lesions yielded a cut-off value of 2.8, with a sensitivity and specificity of 87.5% and 45% respectively.The FDG uptake pattern in PET/CT can differentiate malignant from benign mass-forming lesions of the pancreas with high accuracy and a discrete cut-off value of SUVmax could not be defined for the same as even lesions with pancreatic tuberculosis showed very high FDG uptake. Hence, in patients with a suspicion of malignancy in the pancreas, a focally increase FDG uptake in PET/CT suggests the diagnosis of malignancy.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas: performance of pancreatic fluid analysis for positive diagnosis and the prediction of malignancy.The preoperative diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMN) of the pancreas must be as reliable as possible because large or even total pancreatectomy may be necessary. Early diagnosis of malignant forms is important to improve prognosis. The diagnostic accuracy of fluid analysis using endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) has been confirmed in cystic lesions of the pancreas. It is not known if these results can be applied to IPMN.To determine the levels of biochemical and tumor markers in fluid from EUS-FNA in patients with IPMN and to assess the impact on the diagnosis of IPMN.In total, 41 patients (14 men, median age 64 yr) underwent EUS-FNA before surgical resection of IPMN in our center. Levels of amylase, lipase, carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), carbohydrate antigen (CA) 19.9, and CA 72.4 were measured in the cyst fluid. The performance of the markers was retrospectively evaluated for: (a) a positive diagnosis of IPMN, using cutoffs validated in the literature for mucinous pancreatic lesions and (b) an assessment of malignancy (i.e., high-grade dysplasia or invasive carcinoma) compared with the final pathological examination of the surgical specimen.EUS-FNA was performed in dilated branch ducts (BD) in 39 cases and in the main pancreatic duct in 2 cases. No serious complications occurred. The median fluid levels of amylase, lipase, CEA, CA 19.9, and CA 72.4 were 20,155 U/mL, 59,500 U/mL, 173 ng/mL, 6,400 U/mL, and 11.5 U/mL, respectively. A CEA level >200 ng/mL and a CA 72.4 >40 U/mL had a 44% and a 39% sensitivity, respectively, for the diagnosis of IPMN. The levels of CEA, CA 19.9, and CA 72.4 were significantly different between benign and malignant IPMN. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive (PPV) and negative predictive values (NPV) of a CEA level >200 ng/mL for the diagnosis of malignant IPMN were 90%, 71%, 50%, and 96%, respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, PPV, and NPV of a CA 72.4 level >40 U/mL for this purpose were 87.5%, 73%, 47%, and 96%, respectively.CEA and CA 72.4 in pancreatic cyst fluid have excellent NPVs in the preoperative differential diagnosis of benign versus malignant IPMN, and might reinforce the decision of not to operate on patients with BD-type without predictive factors of malignancy.Effect of dedicated and supervised training on achieving competence in EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic lesions.The diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) has been suggested as a benchmark of quality performance in EUS. However, there is paucity of data on the training requirement for competency in EUS-FNA of the pancreas. KO commenced the service without prior formal training in EUS-FNA. A formally trained colleague (MN) who underwent a fellowship in the same unit was appointed to a substantive post in 2007. The aims of the study were to assess if a dedicated training program in pancreaticobiliary (PB) EUS-FNA of solid lesions: (1) produced better results at the outset of independent practice than produced at the initiation of service without formal training and (2) produced results comparable with those of an experienced endosonographer.This is a retrospective review comparing the first 80 consecutive cases at the onset of practice of operator KO1 (2003/2004) and MN (2007/2008) as well as consecutive cases of operator KO2 (2007/2008) in the same time frame as the initial cases of operator MN.There was a significant difference in EUS-FNA sensitivity for pancreatic malignancy between operator KO1 (56%) and operator MN (77%) p < 0.05. There was no significant difference in test performance between operator KO2 (82%) and MN (77%) (p > 0.05).Our data show that formal training in PB EUS produces test performance at the outset of independent practice that is comparable with an experienced endosonographer, in line with the published standards for EUS-FNA of the pancreas and significantly better than that achieved without training.K-ras oncogene mutations indicate malignancy in cystic tumors of the pancreas.To evaluate clinical parameters, presurgical diagnostic tests, histologic findings, and the presence of K-ras oncogene mutations in cystic tumors of the pancreas to determine which best predict malignancy.Because presurgical, intraoperative, and final pathologic differentiation is difficult in cystic tumors of the pancreas, it would be a major benefit to identify markers that accurately predict malignancy in these rare tumors. The role of K-ras oncogene mutations as an indicator of malignancy has not been determined in these tumors.Nineteen patients with cystic tumors of the pancreas were evaluated, including K-ras mutation analysis based on polymerase chain reaction and restriction digestion assays and direct DNA sequencing, to screen for parameters that accurately predict malignancy.All malignant cystic pancreatic tumors (five cystadenocarcinomas and three mucin-producing adenocarcinomas) harbored K-ras mutations at codon 12 or 13. K-ras mutations were also detected in the percutaneous fine-needle aspirates of two of these patients. In contrast, none of nine benign cystadenomas or the solid-papillary neoplasm had K-ras mutations. None of the patients with a benign tumor carrying K-ras wild-type sequences developed recurrent disease after a mean follow-up of 50 months. Seven of the 8 malignant cystic pancreatic tumors, but none of the 11 benign tumors, showed dilatation of the main pancreatic duct on computed tomography or endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.K-ras mutation analysis seems to be a powerful tool to determine the malignant potential of cystic pancreatic tumors before and after surgery. Dilatation of the main pancreatic duct on computed tomography or endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography is highly suggestive for malignancy in these rare tumors.Dynamic quantitative evaluation of contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasonography in the diagnosis of pancreatic diseases.This study aimed to investigate the usefulness of contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) with time-intensity curve (TIC) in differentiating pancreatic diseases.Patients who underwent contrast-enhanced EUS between January 2007 and June 2009 were analyzed retrospectively, including 48 with pancreatic ductal cancer (PC), 14 with autoimmune pancreatitis (AIP), 13 with mass-forming pancreatitis (MFP), and 16 with pancreatic endocrine tumor (PET). After intravenous injection of contrast agent, contrast imaging pattern, TIC-based quantitative evaluation, and diagnostic ability of EUS in combination with TIC to diagnose benignancy or malignancy were assessed.Hypovascular and heterogeneous pattern (42/48) in PC, isovascular and homogenous (21/27) in AIP and MFP, and hypervascular and rapid stained (16/16) in PET were observed. The echo intensity reduction rate from the peak at 1 minute was the greatest in PC followed by MFP, AIP, and PET (P < 0.05). The diagnostic accuracies based on contrast imaging pattern (84.0%) and TIC (88.0%) were higher than those based on B-mode imaging (82.6%) and dynamic computed tomography (81.3%). In EUS in combination with TIC, sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy rose up to 95.8%, 92.6%, and 94.7%, respectively.Contrast-enhanced EUS with the dynamic quantitative analysis preparing TIC increased the diagnostic accuracy for pancreatic diseases.Use of multidetector-row computed tomography to evaluate branch duct type intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas: influence on surgical decision-making.The purpose of this study was to evaluate factors predictive of the malignant grade associated with branch duct type intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (BD-IPMN) using multidetectorrow computed tomography (MDCT).We reviewed the morphological features of 26 BDIPMNs using MDCT. Tumor size, caliber of the main pancreatic duct, number of mural nodules, diameter of the largest mural nodule and volume of the largest mural nodule were assessed and correlated with the pathological findings.By multiple- and single-regression analyses and Mann-Whitney U test, significant differences in the caliber of the main pancreatic duct and number of mural nodules were observed between adenoma and non-invasive carcinoma and in the number of mural nodules between adenoma and invasive carcinoma. No significant differences were observed between non-invasive carcinoma and invasive carcinoma. Based on the differential diagnostic criterion of 1 or more mural nodules for distinguishing adenoma from non-invasive carcinoma and invasive carcinoma, the sensitivities were 60% and 100%, respectively, and the specificity was 93% for both.Although it was impossible to distinguish non-invasive carcinoma from invasive carcinoma, MDCT was reliable for distinguishing adenoma from non-invasive carcinoma and invasive carcinoma.Endoscopic ultrasound may be unnecessary in the preoperative evaluation of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm.Several imaging modalities are commonly performed during work-up of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN), but guidelines do not suggest any one technique. The aim of this study was to evaluate tumour and duct measurements by computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and their ability to predict high-grade dysplasia (HGD) and cancer within pancreatic IPMN.Patients with IPMN who underwent preoperative CT and EUS between 2001 and 2009 were selected. Data were gathered retrospectively from medical records.The study group was comprised of 52 patients, 33% (17/52) of whom had HGD or cancer. On fine needle aspirate (FNA), neither carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) >200 nor cytological analysis correlated with malignancy. In multivariate analysis, duct size ≥ 1.0 cm (P= 0.034) was a significant predictor of HGD or cancer, and diameter on CT scan (P= 0.056) approached significance. Lesion diameter of ≥ 2.5 cm on CT scan identified malignancy in 71% (12/17) of patients (P= 0.037). When analysed, all patients with HGD or cancer had a lesion diameter ≥ 2.5 cm and/or a duct diameter ≥ 1.0 cm by CT scan.The use of radiographic criteria on CT including lesion size ≥ 2.5 cm and/or pancreatic duct diameter ≥ 1.0 cm appears to reliably identify patients with either HGD or invasive cancer. High-resolution CT scanning may obviate the need for EUS and FNA in patients with suspected IPMN.The utility of F-18 fluorodeoxyglucose whole body PET imaging for determining malignancy in cystic lesions of the pancreas.Previous studies have suggested that whole body positron-emission tomography (PET) can distinguish between benign and malignant cysts of the pancreas. Patients were identified (n = 68) who had undergone whole body PET imaging for a cystic lesion of the pancreas between Jan. 1997 and May 2005. Cross-sectional imaging studies were reviewed by a single blinded radiologist, and positive PET studies were reviewed by a blinded nuclear medicine physician. Operative resection was performed in 21 patients (31%), and 47 patients were managed with radiographic follow-up. F-18 Fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG)-avid lesions were identified in eight of the 68 patients (12%). Within the resected group of patients (n=21), four of the seven patients (57%) with either in situ or invasive malignancy (adenocarcinoma: 3 of 5, papillary mucinous carcinoma: 1 of 2) had positive PET imaging (mean SUV, 5.9; range 2.5-8.0), and 2 of the 14 patients (14%) with benign lesions had positive PET imaging (serous cystadenoma, n=1, SUV=3.3; pseudocyst n=1, SUV=2.7). All lesions proven to be malignant with increased FDG uptake had highly suspicious findings on cross-sectional imaging. Within the group of resected patients, the sensitivity of PET for identifying malignant pathology was 57%, and the specificity was 85%. The sensitivity and specificity of PET for malignancy in this study was lower than previously reported, and PET findings did not identify otherwise occult malignant cysts. We do not believe whole body FDG-PET to be essential in the evaluation of cystic lesions of the pancreas.Atypical cytologic diagnostic category in EUS-FNA of the pancreas: follow-up, outcomes, and predictive models.The objective of this study was to assess how atypical diagnostic category (ADC) is followed up, its outcomes, and the predictors that are associated with subsequent diagnosis of neoplasm/malignancy.We reviewed pancreatic endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) with ADC and compared the rate of detection of neoplasms after a repeat FNA, a biopsy/resection, or a clinical follow-up following ADC. Logistic regression was used to determine the factors associated with the diagnosis of a neoplastic or a malignant lesion following ADC. Predictive probability for each case was calculated on the basis of the significant predictors, and whether it improved diagnostic performance was assessed.Of 3832 cases that received pancreatic EUS-FNAs, 187 (4.9%) were ADC. A total of 93 neoplasms (55%), including 61 carcinomas (36%), were detected after an atypical cytologic diagnosis. Similar rates of detecting neoplasms were observed after repeat FNA or biopsy/resection but higher than after clinical follow-up. The presence of a mass, history of alcohol use, and absence of a history of pancreatitis were significant predictors of a higher rate of diagnosis of neoplasm. Weight loss and bile flow obstruction were more likely to be associated with higher rates of carcinoma. Predictive probability demonstrated a wide range of risk and changed the ambiguous diagnosis to informative in 30% of cases.ADC of pancreas is associated with a high risk of benign and malignant neoplasms regardless of the method of follow-up. The presences of a mass, alcohol use, and absence of a history of pancreatitis are significant predictors of a diagnosis of neoplasm, whereas weight loss and bile duct obstruction are significant predictors of ductal carcinoma following an ADC.Gene expression signature of advanced pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma using low density array on endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration samples.The purpose of this study was to investigate the clinical feasibility and utility of low-density array analysis on samples obtained from endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy in locally advanced and/or metastatic pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma and chronic pancreatitis.In this prospective multicenter study, we quantified candidate gene expression in biopsies sampled from 44 locally advanced and/or metastatic pancreatic carcinoma and from 17 pseudotumoural chronic pancreatitis using dedicated low-density array microfluidic plates.We first demonstrated that 18S gene expression is stable and comparable in normal pancreas and pancreatic cancer tissues. Next, we found that eight genes (S100P, PLAT, PLAU, MSLN, MMP-11, MMP-7, KRT7, KRT17) were significantly over expressed in pancreatic cancer samples when compared to pseudotumoural chronic pancreatitis (p value ranging from 0.0007 to 0.0215): Linear discriminative analysis identified S100P, PLAT, MSLN, MMP-7, KRT7 as highly explicative variables. The area under receiver operating curve establishes the clinical validity of the potential diagnostic markers identified in this study (values ranging from 0.69 to 0.76). In addition, combination of S100P and KRT7 gave better diagnosis performances (Area Under Receiver Operating Curve 0.81, sensitivity 81%, specificity 77%).We demonstrate that molecular studies on EUS-guided FNA material are feasible for the identification and quantification of markers in PDAC patients diagnosed with non-resectable tumours. Using low-density array, we isolated a molecular signature of advanced pancreatic carcinoma including mostly cancer invasion-related genes. This work stems for the use of novel biomarkers for the molecular diagnosis of patient with solid pancreatic masses.Evaluation of the diagnostic accuracy of the endoscopic ultrasonography results in the patients examined in a period of three years.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is a well-established method of evaluating patients with gastrointestinal diseases, especially malignancies. EUS is like other similar endoscopy techniques, based on high frequency ultrasonography. This high level technology allows examination of tissue to almost microscopic level, not only in digestive system but its surrounding structures.The aim of this study was to determine the contribution of endoscopic experience, based on the number of endosopic ultrasonography examination performed in the three years period, to obtain 80% diagnostic accuracy with staging of the disease in order to achieve a 30-60% change rate in treatment decisions which is accepted standard.First group with 210 patients was examined in the first year of work; 325 examined in the second year of work and 295 in the third year.Accuracy in the first year of work, were 45% (p<0.001 for the choledocholithiasis; p=0.197 for the pancreatic cancer; p=0.195 for LN detection in the gastric cancer). In the second year of work diagnostic accuracy were 78%/p=0.550 for the choledocholithiasis; p=0.228 for the pancreatic cancer; p=0.503 for LN detection in the gastric cancer/. Diagnostic accuracy in the third year of work were 81%/p<0.001 for the choledocholithiasis; p=0.018 for the pancreatic carcinoma; p=0.042 LN detection in the gastric cancer/.Application of Endoscopic ultrasonography in diagnostics, based on number of EUS examination performed, after three years of work, achieved 80% diagnostic accuracy, compared to standard imaging methods and results of surgery in staging of the disease. EUS results made a change in treatment decisions in 30-60% of patients which is world standard and completely justify use of endoscopic ultrasonography in clinical practice.Does onsite cytotechnology evaluation improve the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy?Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is the preferred modality for the cytological diagnosis of various cancers. Onsite cytopathology interpretation is not available in most centres.To assess whether the the adequacy of tissue sampling assessed by an onsite cytotechnologist improves the diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA.The present study is a retrospective review of all patients undergoing solid mass EUS-FNA between September 2005 and August 2007. Patients in group I (September 2005 to August 2006) had cytology slides prepared by an endoscopy nurse. Patients in group II (September 2006 to August 2007) had cytology slides prepared, stained and assessed for adequacy of tissue sampling by a cytotechnologist in the endoscopy suite. The final cytopathological diagnosis (definitely positive, definitely negative or inconclusive) was compared between the two groups.A total of 49 EUS-FNA procedures were performed in 47 patients in group I and 60 EUS-FNA procedures in 55 patients in group II. Pancreatic masses were the most common target site in both groups. The total number of needle passes was 105 in group I (mean 2.14 passes per patient; range one to five needle passes) and 158 in group II (mean 2.63 passes per patient; range one to four needle passes). The difference in the number of needle passes was not statistically significant between groups. The final diagnosis was definite in 53% in group I compared with 77% in group II (P=0.01). The percentage of inconclusive diagnoses was 47% in group I and 23% in group II (P=0.001).Onsite cytotechnologist interpretation of adequacy of tissue sampling significantly improves the diagnostic yield of EUS-FNA. This appears to be independent of the total number of needle passes undertaken for tissue sampling.Pancreatic carcinoma versus chronic pancreatitis: dynamic MR imaging.To determine if dynamic gadolinium-enhanced magnetic resonance (MR) imaging can distinguish chronic pancreatitis from pancreatic carcinoma.A retrospective review of MR and pathology examination findings was performed for 24 patients with pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma and seven with chronic pancreatitis who underwent dynamic gadolinium-enhanced breath-hold spoiled gradient-echo imaging. Arterial, portal, and delayed phase images were obtained after injection of gadopentatate dimeglumine. The MR images of 14 patients without clinical evidence of pancreatic disease were also reviewed as controls. Signal intensity (SI) was measured on the precontrast (pre) and gadolinium-enhanced (post) images of the area of the pancreas sampled at biopsy and of the nontumorous pancreas. Percentage enhancement was defined as SIpre/SIpost x 100.Normal pancreas showed rapid enhancement that peaked in the arterial or portal phase. For both diseases, T1-weighted images showed hypointense masses with progressive enhancement (differences were significant [P < .05] on only delayed fat-saturated images). Differences in enhancement between either disease state and normal pancreas were significant for at least one phase. Nontumorous pancreas in patients with carcinoma showed gradual enhancement that was significantly different from that of normal pancreas.Chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma show abnormal pancreatic enhancement, but the two were not distinguished on the basis of degree and time of enhancement.Comparison between multislice CT and MR imaging in the diagnostic evaluation of patients with pancreatic masses.This study compared the results of multislice computed tomography (MSCT) and high-field magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the diagnostic evaluation of pancreatic masses.Forty patients with clinical and ultrasonographic evidence of pancreatic masses underwent MSCT and MRI. The majority of patients (31/40, 78%) had proven malignant pancreatic tumours (24 ductal adenocarcinoma, six mucinous cystadenocarcinoma, one intraductal papillary mucinous carcinoma), whereas the remaining patients (9/40, 22%) were found to have benign lesions (eight chronic pancreatitis, one serous cystadenoma). Results of the imaging studies were compared with biopsy (n=33) and/or histology (n=7) findings to calculate sensitivity, specificity, accuracy and positive (PPV) and negative (NPV) predictive value for correct identification of tumours and evaluation of resectability of malignancies.Both for tumour identification and resectability, MSCT and MRI had comparable diagnostic accuracy, with no statistically significant differences between them. Tumour identification CT/MRI: accuracy 98/98%, sensitivity 100/100%, specificity 88/88%, PPV 97/97%, NPV 100/100%; tumour resectability CT/MRI: accuracy 94/90%, sensitivity 92/88%, specificity 100/100%, PPV 100/100%, NPV 78/70%.MRI represents a valid diagnostic alternative to CT in the evaluation of patients with pancreatic masses, both for correct identification and characterisation of primary lesions and to establish resectability in the case of malignancies. New high-field MRI equipment allows optimal imaging quality with good contrast resolution in evaluating the upper abdomen.Differential diagnosis of benign or malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas by multidetector row helical computed tomography: evaluation of predictive factors by logistic regression analysis.The purpose of this study is to evaluate predictive factors for discriminating benign from malignant intraductal mucin-producing neoplasm (IPMN) of the pancreas on multidetector row computed tomography (MDCT).Fifty-three patients with IPMN underwent MDCT, and the imaging and pathological findings were evaluated. In patients with branch duct-type tumors, sex and age of the patient, location, shape, size and multiplicity of the cystic lesion, presence of mural nodule, and maximum diameter of main pancreatic duct (MPD) dilatation were evaluated by logistic regression analysis.Tumors were classified as main duct-type (n = 7) and branch duct-type (n = 46). Among main duct-type tumors, all 7 lesions were diagnosed as malignant. Among 46 lesions of branch-type IPMN, 8 lesions were malignant, and 38 lesions were benign. On adjusted logistic regression analysis, combination factor of main duct dilatation and mural nodule or large cystic size had statistical significance for the risk of malignancy in branch duct-type IPMN.Main duct-type IPMN is highly suggestive for malignancy. Combination factors of main ductal dilation and mural nodule, and main ductal dilation, and large cystic tumor size are thought to be predictive factors for malignant branch-type IPMN.Intraductal papillary mucinous tumor of the pancreas demonstrated by MR cholangiopancreatography.The role of EUS and EUS-FNA in the management of pancreatic masses: five-year experience.The efficacy of endoscopic ultrasound with fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic malignancy is quite well established. The aim of this study is to describe a single-centre's experience.Data were collected retrospectively on all patients with solid pancreatic masses undergoing EUS-FNA from January 2006 to March 2011. In tumor cases, TNM staging using EUS was compared with the results of histopathological staging.EUS-FNA of pancreatic lesions was performed in 125 patients. Of these patients, data of 75 were available (69% men, mean age 59.97±11.12 (SD) years); 58 (76%) of the lesions were ductal adenocarcinoma, 11 (14.5%) were chronic pancreatitis, 4 (%5) were intraductal papillary mucinous carcinoma (IPMN) and 2 (%3) were insulinoma. Diagnostic yield of the EUS-FNA procedure was 74.7% (56/75). Specimens from six patients were inadequate. In multivariate analysis, lesion diameter below 2cm was an independent predictor for the inadequacy of material (p=0.04).In patients with pancreatic mass with suspected malignancy, EUS-FNA provided a diagnosis with accuracy rate of 75%. Inadequate material with EUS-FNA was significantly more frequent in lesions below 2cm.Negative predictive value of positron emission tomography/computed tomography in patients with a clinical suspicion of pancreatic cancer.The aim of this study was to determine the negative predictive value of positron emission tomography (PET)/computed tomography (CT) in patients with lesions suggestive of pancreatic cancer.A retrospective review from January 2005 to August 2008 of all patients who underwent a PET/CT to evaluate a lesion suggestive of pancreatic cancer based on prior imaging. One hundred eighty-four patients underwent PET/CT, of which 60 patients had a negative PET scan. Of these 60 patients, 56 patients (30 women, 26 men) had endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration or surgical pathology for clinical correlation. The Fisher exact test was used for statistical analysis.The negative predictive value of PET/CT was 75%. Eighteen patients had a benign lesion, 24 patients had a premalignant lesion, and 14 patients had a malignant lesion. In the cystic group, 72.4% of the PET/CT-negative lesions were premalignant compared with the solid group that was only 5.9%. This was in contrast to the solid group, where 64.7% was malignant versus 6.9% in the cystic group. Two of 14 patients with malignancy had metastatic disease.The negative predictive value of PET/CT in pancreatic lesions suggestive of pancreatic cancer was 75%. A negative PET/CT does not exclude pancreatic cancer, and further workup of these PET-negative lesions is warranted.Accuracy of preoperative imaging methods in a retrospective series of 14 patients with operated intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas.Accuracy of preoperative imaging methods for the diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous tumor of the pancreas (IPMT) is not well known.To compare diagnostic accuracy of various preoperative imaging methods with pathology data following surgical resection.Fourteen consecutive patients underwent pancreatic surgical resection for IPMT between January 1988 and May 2002. Imaging methods included endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and/or magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and/or endoscopic ultrasonography. Results of preoperative morphological examinations were compared with histopathological findings from surgical specimens.IPMT was located to the pancreatic head or body in 72% of patients and involved the main pancreatic duct (MPD) in 79% of cases Carcinoma was diagnosed in 35% of the cases. Sensitivity of imaging methods varied from 64 to 80% to accurately locate the tumor and from 73 to 80% in distinguishing between types involving the MPD or the accessory ducts. Planned surgical resection based on preoperative imagery correlated with final surgery in 57% of the patients. Histological study of whole pancreas specimens revealed lesions in undilated ducts, and also dilated ducts without histological lesions.The sensitivity of preoperative imaging methods is moderate in defining intraductal extension of IPMT. Duct dilatation is not predictive of histological involvement by tumors and ducts may be pathological without dilatation.Clinical implication of serum carcinoembryonic antigen and carbohydrate antigen 19-9 for the prediction of malignancy in intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of pancreas.Little is known about the prognostic significance of serum carbohydrate antigen (CA) 19-9 and carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) concentrations for predicting malignancy in patients with intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) of pancreas.The study cohort consisted of 367 patients with surgical biopsy proven IPMN at Seoul National University Hospital. Preoperative serum tumor markers were evaluated and compared with other clinical variables.Malignant pathology (high grade dysplasia [HGD] and invasive IPMN) was identified in 117 (31.9%) patients. Elevated serum CA19-9 was more frequent in patients with malignant (34.2%, P < 0.001; invasive IPMN vs. HGD 47.9% vs. 11.4%, P < 0.001) and main duct type (40.0%, P = 0.003) IPMN. Multivariate analysis showed main pancreatic duct (MPD) >5 mm (P < 0.001), mural nodules (P < 0.001), and elevated serum CA19-9 (P < 0.001) were independent predictors of malignancy. The sensitivity, specificity and accuracy were 34.2%, 92.4%, and 73.8%, respectively, for elevated serum CA19-9; 63.3%, 78.0%, and 73.3%, for MPD >5 mm; and 59.0%, 86.4%, and 77.7%, for mural nodules.Serum CA19-9 is significantly higher in patients with malignant IPMN, especially in patients with invasive and main duct type IPMN. The diagnostic power of serum CA19-9 in predicting malignancy is comparable to that of MPD >5 mm and mural nodules.Accuracy of EUS for detection of intraductal papillary mucinous tumor of the pancreas.Patients with intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas (IPMT) present with symptoms similar to those of chronic pancreatitis. This study assessed the accuracy of EUS for detection of IPMT and identified features that discriminate IPMT from chronic pancreatitis.EUS accuracy for detecting IPMT was determined with characteristic findings by endoscopic retrograde pancreatography as the reference standard. To determine EUS features characteristic of IPMT, EUS images from patients with IPMT were compared with those from patients (similar age, gender) with chronic pancreatitis.Thirty-eight patients (23 men, 15 women; age range 40-90 years) with IPMT were identified between 1994 and 2001. For EUS, the sensitivity was 86%, specificity 99%, positive predictive value 78%, and negative predictive value 99% for detection of IPMT. When compared with patients with chronic pancreatitis, the EUS features of dilation of pancreatic duct (89% vs. 42%, p < 0.0001), cysts (45% vs. 11%, p = 0.002), and pancreatic atrophy (32% vs. 3%, p = 0.002) were more common, whereas parenchymal features of chronic pancreatitis were less common with IPMT (21% vs. 97%, p < 0.0001). By multivariate analysis, the presence of no more than one parenchymal feature of chronic pancreatitis suggested the diagnosis of IPMT (odds ratio 43.84; 95% CI [4.13, 465.74]).EUS may be useful in the initial evaluation of patients suspected to have IPMT. Paucity of parenchymal features of chronic pancreatitis is important in differentiating IPMT from other causes of chronic pancreatitis.Searching for indicators of malignancy in pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms: the value of 18FDG-PET confirmed.Malignancy in intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMN) of the pancreas may be predicted on the basis of a number of clinical and radiologic features, which have raised sensitivity but result in a specificity as low as 20-50%. We sought to confirm the additional value of (18)F-18-fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography ((18)FDG-PET) in diagnostic accuracy of imaging-based IPMN malignancy assessment.This prospective uncontrolled case series contained 44 patients with IPMN undergoing comprehensive diagnostic evaluation, including magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and (18)FDG-PET. Average follow-up time was 39.3 months (range 3-97 months). Diagnostic performance regarding the diagnosis of malignancy was evaluated for the classic preoperative assessment, including clinical signs, CA 19-9, imaging (computed tomography and magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography), and International Consensus Guidelines criteria, as well as (18)FDG-PET scan.Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy were 100, 22, 32, 100, and 43%, and 83, 100, 100, 94, and 96%, respectively, for comprehensive assessment without and with (18)FDG-PET [maximum standardized uptake value (SUV(max)) cutoff of 2.5 MBq]. Elevated CA 19-9 values and positive PET scan were the only independent prognostic factors for malignancy (odds ratio 2.11, 95% confidence interval 1.15-2.74 and 5.49, 95% confidence interval 3.98-21.44, respectively).(18)FDG-PET is useful for detection of malignancy in IPMN, improving the differential diagnosis with benign cases by functional data. The choice of SUV(max) cutoff should maximize specificity.[The value of computer tomography and sonography in the investigation of the pancreas (author's transl)].Three hundred and five patients were examined by computer tomography and sonography. In 117 patients no abnormalities were found in the pancreas. The accuracy of computer tomography was 87%, of sonography 85%. In 41 patients the presence of a carcinoma of the pancreas was confirmed histologically. In this group the sensitivity of computer tomography was 83%, of sonography 85%. Thirty-four patients suffered from acute pancreatitis. In this group sensitivity of the two methods was equal at 79%. 113 patients had changes of chronic pancreatitis. Sensitivity of computer tomography was 84%, of sonography 70%. Computer tomography is better at demonstrating calcification in the pancreas. Atrophy of the pancreas cannot be diagnosed by sonography.18F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography in management of pancreatic cystic tumors.To evaluate the effectiveness of PET in differentiating malignant from benign pancreatic cystic tumors.Between 2009 and 2010, all patients with pancreatic cystic tumors who had PET, triple phase contrast computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) were reviewed. Clinicopathological characteristics and final histology were correlated with preoperative PET, CT and EUS to assess the value of each modality in detecting malignant from benign lesions for clinical decision-making.Twenty of a total of 116 patients with pancreatic cystic tumors had 18F-FDG PET because of diagnostic difficulties after evaluation with conventional modalities. Sensitivity and specificity of PET in differentiating malignant from benign pancreatic cystic tumors were 100% and 93.75%, with an accuracy of 95%. PET had the best sensitivity, specificity and accuracy for detecting malignant cystic tumors compared with CT and EUS. In 5 cases, the PET results altered the treatment options completely to follow-up instead of surgery (n=2), limited resection instead of Whipple's resection (n=1), and surgery instead of follow-up (n=2).PET is an accurate, non-invasive method to distinguish malignant from benign pancreatic cystic tumors and can be used as an adjunct to facilitate clinical decision making.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas: assessment of the likelihood of invasiveness with multisection CT.To evaluate the capabilities of multisection computed tomography (CT) in determining the likelihood of invasiveness of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN).The institutional review board approved this research and waived informed consent from the patients. Two radiologists blinded to the pathologic assessment of malignancy or parenchymal invasion of IPMN retrospectively evaluated CT images of 61 consecutive surgically resected tumors (26 adenomas, 15 noninvasive carcinomas, and 20 invasive carcinomas) in patients who underwent multiphase contrast material-enhanced CT with 0.5- or 1-mm collimation. The findings were statistically analyzed by using univariate and multivariate analyses, with the optimal cutoff levels of each continuous parameter determined by generating receiver operating characteristic curves.The following findings showed significant differences among the three groups: maximum diameter of the main pancreatic duct (MPD), size (length of major axis) of the largest mural nodule in the MPD or in any associated cystic lesion, abnormal attenuating area in the surrounding parenchyma, calcification in the lesion, protrusion of the MPD into the ampulla of Vater, and bile duct dilatation. An MPD diameter of 6 mm or larger, a mural nodule of 3 mm or larger, and an abnormal attenuating area were independently predictive of malignancy. A mural nodule of 6.3 mm or larger in the MPD and an abnormal attenuating area were independently predictive of parenchymal invasion. According to these criteria, the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy for identifying malignancy were 83%, 81%, and 82% and for identifying parenchymal invasion were 90%, 88%, and 89%, respectively.Multisection CT is useful for distinguishing among adenoma, noninvasive carcinoma, and invasive carcinoma in patients with IPMN.Three-dimensional contrast-enhanced ultrasonography of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas: a comparison with magnetic resonance imaging.The objective of this study was to prospectively compare the diagnostic accuracy of 3-dimensional contrast-enhanced ultrasonography (3D-CEUS) with that of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the study of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) of the pancreas.Thirty consecutive patients with IPMN were studied.Three patients (10.0%) did not undergo diagnostic 3D-CEUS because of technical problems. Three dimensional CEUS identified 12 (44.4%) main-duct IPMNs versus no cases by MRI (P < 0.001). Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm localization showed poor agreement between 3D-CEUS and MRI (κ = 0.058), whereas good agreement was found in detecting the pancreatic calcifications (κ = 1.000). Significant differences between 3D-CEUS and MRI were found regarding the number of lesions detected (1.4 ± 0.8 vs 3.8 ± 3.6; P < 0.001), the detection of mucinous plugs (3.7% vs 50.0%; P < 0.001), chronic pancreatitis (7.4% vs 26.7%; P = 0.031), pancreatic atrophy (0% vs 50.0%; P < 0.001), thick septa (22.2% vs 53.3%; P = 0.004), and mural nodules (25.9% vs 3.3%; P = 0.016). Three dimensional CEUS showed similar results as compared with MRI in evaluating IPMNs smaller than 1 cm of diameter or greater than 2 cm.Even if MRI remains the criterion standard technique for the diagnosis of IPMNs, 3D-CEUS can be safely used to follow patients with IPMNs of less than 1 cm.Role of repeated endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration in small solid pancreatic masses with previous indeterminate and negative cytological findings.Despite advances in imaging techniques, the differentiation between pancreatic cancer and benign lesions remains difficult. Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is an effective method for providing tissue diagnosis, but problems occur when lesions are small or the cytological diagnosis is indeterminate.To prospectively evaluate the utility of EUS-FNA in patients with small solid pancreatic lesions and those with initial indeterminate or negative cytological diagnosis.During the study period we performed a total of 119 EUS-FNA procedures on 46 patients (mean age 56.3 years) for 47 small solid pancreatic lesions (range 7-30 mm, mean 17.2 mm in diameter). FNAs were performed in the presence of a cytopathologist. If cytological diagnoses were indeterminate, EUS-FNA was repeated within 3 weeks. Diagnoses were confirmed histologically or by follow-up (clinical and imaging: EUS +/- FNA and CT).Localization of the lesions: head 28 (60%), uncinate process 4 (9%), body 11 (23%) and tail 4 (9%). On average, 3.7 passes were performed. We observed no complications. Initial cytological findings were: malignant 17 (36%), benign 21 (45%), and indeterminate 9 (19%). 8 (78%) of the indeterminate findings were confirmed to be malignant on repeated procedures. A diagnosis of pancreatic cancer was subsequently confirmed in 1 patient who had a benign cytological finding. 19 patients underwent surgery. Histology confirmed a neoplasm in all cases. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and diagnostic accuracy were 68, 100, 100, 73 and 83%, respectively. After repeated EUS-FNAs of indeterminate findings sensitivity, negative predictive value and diagnostic accuracy rose to 92, 77 and 96%, respectively.EUS-FNA is a highly effective method for providing tissue diagnosis in patients with small solid pancreatic masses. Repeated procedures enhanced diagnostic accuracy in indeterminate findings, among which was high percentage of malignancies. EUS-FNA reduced the number of operations in patients with pancreatic solid masses.Evaluation of positron emission tomography with 2-[18F]fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose for the differentiation of chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic cancer.The clinical presentation of patients with pancreatic cancer may resemble the clinical picture of chronic pancreatitis. A definitive preoperative diagnosis is not always obtained in patients with a history of chronic pancreatitis despite the use of modern imaging techniques. Operative strategy therefore remains unclear before operation in these patients.Positron emission tomography (PET) with 2-[18F]fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG) was introduced recently into clinical oncology because of its ability to demonstrate metabolic changes associated with various disease processes. The impact of FDG-PET on the differentiation of chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic cancer was investigated. FDG-PET was performed in 48 patients with chronic pancreatitis (n = 12), acute pancreatitis (n = 3) and pancreatic cancer (n = 27), and in controls (n = 6). Histological examination was undertaken in all cases except controls. The FDG-PET results were obtained without knowledge of results of other imaging procedures. The results were then compared with those of computed tomography, ultrasonography, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreaticography, operative findings and histology. PET images were analysed semiquantitatively by calculating a standard uptake value (SUV) 90-120 min after application of the tracer.Cut-off values were validated as follows: SUV greater than 4.0 for pancreatic cancer, SUV of 3.0-4.0 for chronic pancreatitis, and SUV of less than 3.0 for controls. Sensitivity and specificity of PET imaging were 0.96 and 1.0 for pancreatic cancer, and 1.0 and 0.97 for chronic pancreatitis. In five cases only FDG-PET led to the correct preoperative diagnosis.The results give further evidence that FDG-PET is an important non-invasive method for the differentiation of chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic cancer. Delayed image acquisition in the glycolysis plateau phase permits improved diagnostic performance. This imaging technique is extremely helpful before operation in patients with an otherwise unclear pancreatic mass, despite its costs.Correlation between spiral computed tomography, endoscopic ultrasonography and findings at operation in pancreatic and ampullary tumours.Spiral computed tomography (CT) allows high-resolution examination of the pancreas, surrounding vascular structures, lymph nodes and liver. Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) also allows high-resolution imaging of the pancreas and adjacent structures but is an invasive procedure. With the availability of spiral CT, the role of EUS in the investigation of patients with suspected pancreatic or ampullary tumours is unclear.Forty-eight patients with clinical suspicion of a pancreatic or ampullary tumour underwent both spiral CT and EUS. Thirty-four patients had surgical exploration, of whom 17 underwent pancreatic resection and 17 had biliary and gastric bypass. The results of spiral CT and EUS were compared with the operative findings.The final histological diagnosis was ductal adenocarcinoma (24 patients), ampullary carcinoma (six), serous cystadenoma (two) and chronic pancreatitis (two). EUS demonstrated 33 and spiral CT 26 of the 34 primary lesions. EUS was particularly useful in the assessment of small resectable tumours missed by spiral CT. The sensitivity and specificity of EUS and spiral CT for detecting involvement by the tumour of the superior mesenteric vein, portal vein and lymph nodes were similar, but EUS was less effective at evaluating the superior mesenteric artery.EUS is an important additional investigation after spiral CT in patients with a suspected pancreatic or ampullary tumour.Utility of EUS in the evaluation of cystic pancreatic lesions.Preoperative differentiation of benign and malignant/potentially malignant pancreatic cystic lesions is problematic. Data to support the role of EUS and EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) are limited. This study assessed the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of EUS, cytopathology, and analysis of cyst fluid for pancreatic cystic lesions.Retrospectively, 111 consecutive patients were identified (54 men, 57 women; mean age 59 years, range 18-79 years) who underwent EUS from July 1997 to September 2000 because of known or suspected pancreatic cystic lesions based on CT or transabdominal US. Thirty-four patients (16 men, 18 women; mean age 55 years, 25-79 years) who underwent surgery formed the basis for this analysis. EUS diagnosis was compared with surgical pathology. Selected patients underwent EUS-FNA to obtain specimens for cytopathologic analysis and for determination of carcinoembryonic antigen levels. Based on surgical pathology, cysts were classified as benign (simple cyst, pseudocyst, serous cystadenoma) or malignant/potentially malignant (mucinous cystadenoma, intraductal papillary mucinous tumor, cystic islet cell tumor, cystic adenocarcinoma).EUS-FNA with cytopathologic assessment of cyst fluid was performed for 18 of the 34 patients; carcinoembryonic antigen level was determined in 11 cases. For EUS, cytopathology, and carcinoembryonic antigen, sensitivity was, respectively, 91%, (p = 0.01 vs. cytology), 27%, and 28%; specificity was, respectively, 60%, 100%, and 25%; and, accuracy was, respectively, 82%, 55%, and 27%. The sensitivity of EUS in all 13 patients with cystic islet cell tumor, intraductal papillary mucinous tumor, or cystic adenocarcinoma was 100%. Combining EUS, cytopathology, and carcinoembryonic antigen results did not improve accuracy. There were no complications related to the EUS or EUS-FNA.EUS alone is sensitive and accurate in identifying malignant/potentially malignant pancreatic cystic lesions. EUS-FNA to obtain specimens for cytopathologic analysis and determination of carcinoembryonic antigen levels, although safe, does not enhance diagnostic yield.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration of solid pancreatic masses with rapid on-site cytological evaluation by endosonographers without attendance of cytopathologists.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) with rapid on-site evaluation (ROSE) has been reported to provide a more accurate diagnosis than EUS-FNA without such evaluation. However, even endosonographers can evaluate ROSE regarding sample adequacy. The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA with ROSE by endosonographers compared to ROSE by cytopathologists in patients with solid pancreatic masses.Between September 2001 and October 2005, of the 73 EUS-FNA procedures with the final diagnoses, 38 procedures after the introduction of ROSE by endosonographers (September 2001-September 2003, period 1), and 35 procedures after the introduction of ROSE by cytopathologists (October 2003-October 2005, period 2) were included. The specimens were stained with Diff-Quik stain and assessed. When the on-site assessors (endosonographers or cytopathologists) indicated that the amounts of cell samples were adequate, the procedure was stopped.Results are presented with 95% confidence limits. The average numbers of needle passes were 4.0 +/- 1.6 and 3.4 +/- 1.5 in periods 1 and 2, respectively (P = 0.06). The specimen collection rates were 97.4 and 97.1% in periods 1 and 2, respectively (P = 0.51). Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy for malignancy and benign were 92.9, 100, 100, 83.3, and 94.7%, respectively, in period 1, and 93.1, 100, 100, 75.0, and 94.3%, respectively, in period 2 (P = 0.97, P = 1.0, P = 1.0, P = 0.65, P = 0.93, respectively). No complications were seen.For accurate diagnosis, ROSE should be performed during EUS-FNA by the endosonographer, if no cytopathologist is available.Endoscopic ultrasound-fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) for pancreatic lesions: effectiveness in clinical practice.Diagnosis of pancreatic masses is often difficult. Endoscopic ultrasound-fine needle aspiration has been proposed as the best single-step strategy.To prospectively evaluate feasibility, effectiveness and safety of endoscopic ultrasound-fine needle aspiration of pancreatic masses in a consecutive study of unselected patients.Two hundred ninety-three patients were enrolled in two referral Hospitals in Northern Italy. All patients were referred either due to the presence of imaging test abnormalities (suspected or evident masses, or features indirectly suggesting the presence of a mass) or due to clinical or biochemical findings suggesting pancreatic cancer in the absence of positive imaging. All patients underwent linear array endoscopic ultrasound and, when indicated, fine needle aspiration. All procedures were recorded prospectively. The final diagnosis was established at the end of follow-up or when the patients underwent surgery or died.Fine needle aspiration was indicated in 246 of 293 cases (84%), considered technically feasible in 232 of 246 cases (94%) and gave adequate samples for histopathological diagnosis in 204 of 232 cases (88%). Endoscopic ultrasound sensitivity, specificity and accuracy were 79, 60 and 72%, respectively; the corresponding figures for endoscopic ultrasound-fine needle aspiration were 80, 86 and 82%. There was good agreement with final diagnosis for endoscopic ultrasound-fine needle aspiration (kappa 0.673, 95%CI 0.592-0.753), greater than that for endoscopic ultrasound alone (kappa 0.515, 95%CI 0.425-0.605). There was one case of intracystic haemorrhage and one case of transient hyperthermia (0.3%).Endoscopic ultrasound-fine needle aspiration of pancreatic masses seems to be feasible, effective and safe in this consecutive study of patients.Diagnostic efficacy of endoscopic ultrasound tomography in pancreatic cancer and cholestasis.By direct access to the target organs and by improved detail resolution, endoscopic ultrasound tomography (EUT) broadens the range of sonographic diagnostics. In this preliminary study, the accuracy of EUT was tested in 34 patients with suspected pancreatic carcinoma and/or painfree jaundice. In all 10 patients with pancreatic carcinoma and in all 6 patients with chronic pancreatitis, the diagnosis made by EUT was correct. Three patients with benign tumors of the pancreas were also diagnosed correctly. The diagnostic sensitivity of EUT in pancreatic cysts was in 4 of 5 cases 80%, in dilatations of the main pancreatic duct in 10 of 11 cases 91%, and in cholestasis in 14 of 15 cases 93%. All 5 common bile duct concrements and all 3 tumors of the papilla Vateri were diagnosed by EUT. The differential diagnosis between pancreatic tumor and pancreatitis was improved by EUT in 1 of 18 cases. In the region of the papilla Vateri, EUT was superior to conventional UT in the diagnosis of ampullary concrements and papillary tumors in 6 of 8 cases (4/5 and 2/3, respectively). EUT could become an important complementary diagnostic method for disorders of the pancreas and the common bile duct with a particular sensitivity for the region of the papilla Vateri.Predictors of cancer in patients with suspected pancreatic malignancy without a tissue diagnosis.The aim of this study was to identify predictive factors for malignancy in patients undergoing surgery for suspected pancreatic cancer without a preoperative tissue diagnosis.Patients were identified by International Classification of Diseases Ninth Revision and current procedural terminology codes, respectively, for pancreatic cancer and pancreaticoduodenectomy at a single tertiary referral center between January 1998 and May 2004. Data were collected retrospectively by chart review. Multivariate analysis of potential predictive factors was performed.A total of 150 patients underwent surgery for documented or suspected pancreatic malignancy; 102 did not have a preoperative tissue diagnosis of cancer. Of these, 75 had neoplastic disease at surgery. Average weight loss was greater for those with malignancy (13.5 vs. 4.8 lbs; P = .014) as was mean bilirubin (6.1 vs. 3.3 mg/dL; P = .006). In multivariate analysis, a combination of weight loss >20 lbs, bilirubin >3 mg/dL, and CA 19-9 >37 U/mL had both a specificity and positive predictive value of 100% for predicting malignancy regardless of bile duct abnormalities or mass lesions on endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography or endoscopic ultrasound, respectively. The positive predictive value decreased to 89.5% when any 2 of these findings were present. The presence of a mass on CT or EUS alone had a sensitivity of 84%; however, no other single finding had a sensitivity >65%.In patients suspected of having a pancreatic malignancy, weight loss, hyperbilirubinemia, and increased CA 19-9 level may be predictive of a final cancer diagnosis. Surgical exploration should be considered in these patients even in the absence of a preoperative tissue diagnosis.Performance characteristics of molecular (DNA) analysis for the diagnosis of mucinous pancreatic cysts.Diagnosis of mucinous pancreatic cysts (MPCs) is challenging due to the poor sensitivity of cytology provided by EUS-guided-FNA (EUS-FNA).To quantify the test characteristics of molecular (DNA) analysis in suspected low-risk MPCs.A prospective cohort study performed in between 2008 and 2011.Academic referral center.Consecutive patients who underwent EUS-FNA of suspected MPCs.EUS-FNA and molecular (DNA) analysis of cyst fluid.The sensitivity and specificity of molecular analysis in the diagnosis of MPCs using the criterion standard of surgical pathology in resected cysts.Patients with suspected MPCs underwent EUS-FNA and cyst fluid DNA analysis. Surgical resection was performed in 48 patients (17%), confirming a mucinous pathology in 38 (79%). In this group, molecular analysis had a sensitivity of 50% and a specificity of 80% in identifying MPCs (accuracy of 56.3%). The combination of molecular analysis with cyst fluid carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and cytology resulted in higher MPC diagnostic performance than either one of its individual components, with a sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of 73.7%, 70%, and 72.9%, respectively. There was no significant difference in accuracy between molecular analysis and CEA/cytology in this group.Single-center experience.Molecular analysis aids in the diagnosis of MPCs when cytology is nondiagnostic or cyst fluid is insufficient for CEA or its level is indeterminate. Our results do not support the routine use of molecular analysis, which should be used selectively after review of imaging findings and cyst fluid studies. Further studies are needed to assess DNA's performance in malignant cysts.Management of branch duct-type intraductal papillary mucinous tumor of the pancreas based on magnetic resonance imaging.We assessed the usefulness of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in identifying nonmalignant intraductal papillary mucinous tumors (IPMTs) of the pancreas.Thirty-three patients with branch duct-type IPMT diagnosed by endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography were prospectively examined with magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography followed by dynamic gadolinium-enhanced MRI examinations, and patients with no findings suggestive of malignancy, including a solid mass, mural nodules, a main pancreatic duct wider than 5 mm in diameter, and stenosis of the main pancreatic duct, were prospectively followed up with sequential MRI examinations once or twice a year.Twenty-six (79%) patients showed no findings suggestive of malignancy in the initial MRI examination. The diameter (mean +/- standard error) of the main pancreatic duct was 3.9 +/- 0.7 mm and that of the ectatic branch pancreatic duct was 36.0 +/- 9.1 mm. Twenty-three patients were prospectively followed for more than 36 months and 22 of them showed no findings suggestive of malignancy during follow-up periods ranging from 39 to 77 months (mean = 55 months).MRI was useful to identify nonmalignant IPMTs of the branch duct type, and close follow-up observation with serial MRI examinations may be appropriate in the management of such patients.Endoscopic ultrasound guided fine-needle aspiration cytology of pancreatic carcinoma: a 3-year experience and review of the literature.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy (EUS-FNAB) of small pancreatic lesions that are undetectable by computed tomography has gained wide acceptance for the procurement of cells for diagnostic purposes. However, this technique is not without difficulty. The authors examined the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values (PPV and NPV, respectively) of this technique in the evaluation of patients with pancreatic biliary duct strictures/masses. The authors were interested in reviewing their cases of pancreatic adenocarcinoma of ductal type and finding the sources of their false-negative cases.A computer search was performed between January 1998 and July 2001. For the last 3 years, a total of 80 cases of suspected ductal adenocarcinoma of the pancreas was identified. Thirty-four patients (42%) underwent a subsequent Whipple procedure or biopsy. Cytologic and histologic correlation was performed in these cases. The rest of the 23 patients (29%) considered to be positive and the 23 patients (29%) considered to be negative underwent no subsequent biopsy and were followed clinically. Cases termed "suspicious" on cytology were considered positive and those termed "atypical cytology" were considered negative in the authors' final calculation. The causes of the false-negative diagnoses were evaluated carefully.Of the 34 cases followed with subsequent tissue biopsy or surgery; 12 were confirmed to be positive, 12 were confirmed to be negative, and 10 were considered to be false-negative. Previously identified cytomorphologic features of malignancy were used to review all cases. These features were: loss of the honeycomb pattern (100%), anisonucleosis (100%), nuclear contour irregularity (100%), a high nuclear/cytoplasmic ratio (100%), paranuclear chromatin clearing (77%), and the presence of prominent nucleoli in the absence of inflammatory cells (77%). The causes of the 10 false-negative cases were technical difficulty of procuring material in 6 cases, the nature of the lesion in 2 cases, and the scarcity of lesional tissue in 2 cases.Using strict cytoarchitectural and cytomorphologic criteria of malignancy for ductal pancreatic lesions previously described in the literature, the sensitivity of this technique at the study institution was 78% with a specificity of 100%. The PPV and NPV of this technique were 100% and 78%, respectively. The most common causes of the false-negative results in descending order were the technical aspect of the procedure, the size and nature of the lesion, and the scarcity of lesional tissue.[Significance of ultrasound examination and computed tomography in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer].The diagnostic sensitivity of USI for localization of a tumor of the pancreatic head was 89.3%, specificity--69.7%, exactness--84.4%. When the tumor was localized in the body-tail these indices were 85.7%, 73.4% and 78.7% respectively. The sensitivity of CT in cases when the localization of the tumor was in the head of the pancreas was 84.9%, specificity--72.2%, exactness--76.5%. When the tumors were localized in the body-tail these indices were 89.5%, 75.4% and 80.9% respectively. An associated analysis of information of the ultrasound and CT concerning the structure of the pancreas made the exactness of the diagnosis of malignization as high as 87.6%, specificity as high as 81.3%, sensitivity as high as 93.7%. The informative value of USI and CT depended on the tumor size, the presence of an inflammatory reaction of the pancreas, the character of a complication, if any, or of their combinations, localization and size of the pathological focus. In the investigation no alterations in the pancreas characteristic only of cancer were found. Thus, a comparison of diagnostic potentials of USI and CT has shown that one method does not exclude, but only supplements the other. CT gives more reliable results in the assessment of the process spread to the surrounding tissues and regional lymph nodes, especially when the tumor is localized in the area of the pancreas tail. USI helps to make more exact assessment of the involvement in the process of the common bile duct, pancreatic duct, and of the visceral vessels by the Doppler examination.EUS-guided pancreatic cyst brushing: a comparative study in a tertiary referral centre.Fluid analysis obtained by EUS guided FNA is used to aid in diagnosis and management of cystic lesions in the pancreas. Complementing fluid aspiration with brushing of cyst wall may increase the cellular yield.To compare cellular yield of pancreatic cyst FNA with and without wall brushing.Comparative study.Tertiary referral centre.Fifty-one patients with cystic pancreatic lesions referred for EUS-guided aspiration/sampling were included (median age 69 years; interquartile range: 49-77 years).Comparing adequacy of cellular yield between EUS-guided aspiration alone vs. EUS-guided aspiration and cyst wall brushing.EUS-guided FNA and/or wall brushing (aspiration only: No. 27; brushing: No. 24).There was no significant difference in age (P=0.496) cyst size (P=0.084) or cyst location (P=0.227) between groups. Overall 29.5%; (15/51) of samples were acellular/insufficient with no significant difference between the two groups (22.2% in the aspiration only group vs. 37.5% in the brushing group; P=0.356). The remaining samples were adequate for cytological evaluation (77.8% vs. 62.5%; aspiration only vs. brushing groups). Seventeen cases were neoplastic (8 benign, 9 malignant). The diagnostic accuracy was 61.9% and 55.0% in aspiration only and brushing groups, respectively. Two out of 4 (50.0%) patents were diagnosed as having cancer in the brushings group compared to 1/5 (20.0%) in the FNA only group (P=0.524).Non-randomised series.The cellular yield was similar in FNA and brushing group. Greater proportion of patients with malignant cystic pancreatic lesions diagnosed by EUS sampling was in the brushing group, but this did not reach statistical significance.Appropriate indications of initial endoscopic ultrasound evaluation for detecting mural nodules in branch duct intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas.The presence of mural nodules is a strong predictor of malignancy in patients with branch-duct intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (BD-IPMNs). Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is the most sensitive imaging for the detection of mural nodules. The aim was to evaluate whether initial EUS evaluation is necessary to detect mural nodules in all patients with BD-IPMNs.We reviewed retrospectively the medical records of all 104 patients with BD-IPMNs diagnosed by EUS from January 2008 to December 2011. Of the 104 patients, 13 (12.5%) had mural nodules (MN-positive group) and 91 (87.5%) did not (MN-negative group).Patients in the MN-positive group were significantly older (69 years vs. 61 years, p = 0.013), had larger-sized cysts on EUS (24.1 ± 8.3 mm vs. 16.2 ± 8.0 mm, p = 0.001), a higher rate of main pancreatic duct dilatation (30.8% vs. 3.3%, p = 0.004), and higher serum CA 19-9 concentrations (67.8 ± 109.4 U/mL vs. 17.5 ± 27.0 U/mL, p = 0.012), than patients in the MN-negative group. Cyst sizes measured by EUS, CT, and MRCP did not differ significantly. Multivariate logistic regression analysis showed that cysts ≥16 mm in size on CT (odds ratio [OR], 9.84; 95% confidential interval [CI], 1.08-89.93; p = 0.043) and main pancreatic duct dilatation (OR, 12.65; 95% CI, 1.62-98.99; p = 0.016) were independent predictors of mural nodules.Patients with BD-IPMNs, cyst size ≥16 mm, and main pancreatic duct dilatation should be further evaluated by EUS for the presence of mural nodules.Expression of glucose transporters in human pancreatic tumors compared with increased FDG accumulation in PET study.Although overexpression of GLUT-1 glucose transporter has already been reported in human cancers, the mechanism of glucose entry into pancreatic cancers remains unknown. To evaluate the relationship between GLUT glucose transporters and FDG uptake, FDG-PET was performed in 34 preoperative patients (mean age, 60.9 yr) with suspected pancreatic tumors, including 28 malignant and 6 benign tumors.FDG uptake at 50 min after injection of 185 MBq of [18F]FDG with >5 hr of fasting was semiquantitatively analyzed as standardized uptake values (SUVs). The GLUT expression was studied by immunohistochemistry of paraffin sections from these tumors after operation using anti-GLUT-1, -2, -3, -4 and -5 antibodies to obtain immunohistochemical grading ("strong," "weak" and "negative") by three experienced physicians.Of 26 malignant tumors proved by histological examination, 23 (88%) tumors were positive for the expression of GLUT-1 glucose transporter, and 17 (61%) showed strong expression. On the other hand, 13 (46%), 0 (0%), 9 (36%) and 13 (46%) malignant tumors were positive for the expression of GLUT-2, -3, -4 and -5 glucose transporters, respectively. Three of six benign tumors showed strong GLUT-1 expression. Concerning GLUT-2, -3, -4 and -5, only one benign tumor showed positive GLUT-5 expression. Thus, GLUT-1 showed relatively high sensitivity but low specificity (50%) for detecting malignant tumors, whereas GLUT-2, -3, -4 and -5 had lower sensitivities but higher specificities. Correlations between SUVs and grading of GLUT immunoreactivity were significant in GLUT-1 (strong, 4.49 +/- 2.95; weak, 3.42 +/- 1.21; negative, 2.52 +/- 0.84) (p < 0.05) but not in the remaining four GLUT transporters.These data indicate that GLUT-1 has a significant role in the malignant glucose metabolism and may contribute to the increased uptake of FDG in PET imaging in patients with pancreatic tumor.[Accuracy of imaging techniques and tumor markers in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer].The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of: a) three imaging techniques: ultrasonography (US), computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), and b) the serum tumor markers CEA, CA 19-9 and CA 125, in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.A total of 137 patients were prospectively evaluated. Pancreatic cancer was diagnosed in 25 patients; chronic pancreatitis in 24; acute pancreatitis in 22; extrapancreatic malignancies in 24, and benign digestive disease in 42. The reference interval for each marker was determined in 36 healthy volunteers. Diagnostic accuracy was determined using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves. Each diagnostic test was used in order: a) to diagnose pancreatic cancer when the disease was clinically suspected, and b) to differentiate between pancreatic cancer and chronic pancreatitis.CT (0.976-0.888) and US (0.857) diagnostic accuracy resulted greater than the best serum tumor marker CA 19-9 (0.755-0.786) (p = NS), in both diagnostic conditions. To obtain a diagnostic specificity of 90% in pancreatic cancer, the CA 19-9 cutoff level should increase up to 3 and 7.5 folds being in this case better than CEA and CA 125 (p < 0.05).CT scan offers the greatest accuracy in the diagnosis of PC. Among the tumor markers, CA 19-9 offers the best accuracy in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.Differentiation of chronic focal pancreatitis from pancreatic carcinoma by in vivo proton magnetic resonance spectroscopy.To determine the differences between the in vivo proton magnetic resonance spectroscopy (H-MRS) features of chronic focal pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma and to evaluate the possibility of discriminating chronic focal pancreatitis from pancreatic carcinoma by analysis of in vivo H-MR spectra.The H-MR spectra from 36 human pancreases were evaluated in vivo. This series included 15 cases of chronic focal pancreatitis and 21 cases of pancreatic carcinoma. All cases were confirmed histopathologically after surgical resection. The ratios of the peak area (P) of all peaks at 1.6-4.1 ppm to lipid (0.9-1.6 ppm) (P [1.6-4.1 ppm]/P [0.9-1.6 ppm]) in the chronic focal pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma groups were evaluated, and the results were compared. The sensitivity and specificity of the analysis were also evaluated by in vivo H-MR spectra for discriminating between chronic focal pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma.In vivo H-MR spectra showed significantly less lipid in chronic focal pancreatitis than in pancreatic carcinoma. The ratio of P (1.6-4.1 ppm)/P (0.9-1.6 ppm) in chronic focal pancreatitis was significantly higher than that in pancreatic carcinoma (P < 0.05) because of a decreased peak area of lipids. The means +/- SDs of P (1.6-4.1 ppm)/P (0.9-1.6 ppm) in the chronic focal pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma groups were 2.78 +/- 1.67 and 0.51 +/- 0.49, respectively. Using a value of <2.5 as positive for pancreatic cancer, the sensitivity and the specificity for pancreatic cancer were 100% and 53.3%, respectively.Chronic focal pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma can be distinguished from each other by analysis of in vivo H-MR spectra, and in vivo H-MRS can be a useful method for making a differential diagnosis between chronic focal pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma.Values of CA 19-9 in the serum, pure pancreatic juice, and aspirated pancreatic material in the diagnosis of malignant pancreatic tumor.The diagnostic accuracy of the measurement of CA 19-9 in the serum, pure pancreatic juice, and aspirated pancreatic fluid in the diagnosis of pancreatic tumors was assessed in 32 patients with malignant pancreatic tumors and 19 patients with pancreatitis. Pure pancreatic juice was collected from the pancreatic duct by endoscopic cannulation with a duodenofiberscope after intravenous administration of secretin. Pancreatic material was obtained by percutaneous fine-needle aspiration biopsy under ultrasonic guidance. Abnormally high CA 19-9 levels in the serum were significantly more frequent in patients with malignant pancreatic tumors than in those with pancreatitis: they were elevated in 71.9% of the patients with pancreatic tumors. High CA 19-9 levels were found primarily in patients with a tumor of the head of the pancreas, in those with a tumor greater than 3 cm in its greatest diameter, and in those with an unresectable cancer. Only 57.1% of seven patients with a tumor of less than 3 cm in its greatest diameter showed an increase in CA 19-9 level. The CA 19-9 levels in pure pancreatic juice were significantly higher in patients with pancreatic tumors than in patients with pancreatitis without pancreatic stone. However, it was not useful for differentiating pancreatic tumors from pancreatitis with pancreatolithiasis. The CA 19-9 level in pancreatic materials obtained by aspiration biopsy was significantly higher in patients with malignant pancreatic tumors than in those with pancreatitis. Eight patients (80%) with pancreatic tumors had values above 1000 U/ml, whereas all five patients with pancreatitis had values of less than 30 U/ml. Although CA 19-9 levels in pancreatic materials was useful only when cytologic examination did not provide any evidence of malignancy, the combination of the CA 19-9 assay and the cytologic study of specimens obtained by percutaneous fine-needle aspiration biopsy of the pancreas increased the diagnostic rate to 100%.Clinical factors associated with accuracy of EUS-FNA for pancreatic or peripancreatic solid mass without on-site cytopathologists.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUSFNA) is a safe and effective technique for tissue diagnosis in patients with pancreatic or peripancreatic solid masses. However, the procedure is difficult to accomplish without an on-site cytopathologist. The aims of this study were to examine the outcomes of EUS-FNA for pancreatic or peripancreatic solid masses without an on-site cytopathologist and to determine the factors associated with diagnostic accuracy.From December 2005 to November 2011, 230 patients with pancreatic or peripancreatic solid masses had 240 EUS-FNAs performed without an on-site cytopathologist. The medical records of the 230 patients from a single tertiary center were retrospectively reviewed.Among the 230 patients who underwent EUS-FNA, 201 patients (88%) had malignancy, which included 171 adenocarcinomas (74%). Assuming that the cytopathological malignancy was positive or suspicious for malignant cells with cytology, the accuracy without an on-site cytopathologist was 67.9%. However, the accuracy increased from 40.0% for the first 30 cases (from 2006 to 2008) to 83.3% for the last 30 cases (in 2011) and was constantly over 80.0% starting from the sixth octile onwards for every 30 cases (in 2011). From the analysis of factors associated with the accuracy of the diagnosis using logistic regression analysis, the number of needle passes and the experience of endosonographer were statistically associated with the diagnostic accuracy.In the case of performing EUS-FNA for pancreatic or peripancreatic solid masses without an on-site cytopathologist, the experience of the endosonographer, and the number of needle passes were associated with the diagnostic accuracy.Endoscopic ultrasonography in suspected pancreatic malignancy and indecisive CT.In the assessment of patients with a clinical suspicion of malignant pancreatic disease, computed tomography (CT) findings are sometimes negative or inconclusive.To determine whether endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) with or without fine needle aspiration (EUS÷FNA) was conclusive in patients with a clinical suspicion of pancreatic malignancy, in whom CT scan was negative or inconclusive.Retrospective case series in a tertiary referral centre. From February 2006 to December 2007, EUS÷FNA was performed in all patients suspected of having malignant pancreatic disease with negative or inconclusive CT findings. Main outcome measurement was the diagnostic yield of EUS in these patients.34 patients had a negative (n=11) or inconclusive (n=23) CT scan. EUS÷FNA established a correct diagnosis in 30÷34 cases (88%). Malignancy was diagnosed in 19÷34 patients and nonmalignant disease in 8÷34 cases. In 3÷34 patients no lesions were found and no malignant disease developed during follow-up (mean=728 days). EUS÷FNA was inconclusive in 4÷34 patients.In patients with a clinical suspicion of pancreatic malignancy with negative or inconclusive CT findings, EUS÷FNA was able to establish a diagnosis in 88% of cases. EUS should therefore be considered a diagnostic modality in this complex group of patients.Differential diagnosis of benign and malignant intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas: MR cholangiopancreatography and MR angiography.To compare the usefulness of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and MR angiography (MRA) in differentiating malignant from benign intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas (IPMTs), and to determine the findings which suggest malignancy.During a 6-year period, 46 patients with IPMT underwent MRCP. Morphologically, tumor type was classified as main duct, branch duct, or combined. The diameter of the main pancreatic duct (MPD), the extent of the dilated MPD, and the location and size of the cystic lesion, septum, and communicating channel were assessed. For all types of IPMTs, enhanced mural nodules and portal vein narrowing were evaluated at MRA.Combined-type IPMTs were more frequently malignant (78%) than benign (42%) (p < 0.05). Compared with benign lesions, malignant lesions were larger, and the caliber of the communicating channel was also larger (p < 0.05). Their dilated MPD was more extensive and of greater diameter (p < 0.05), and the presence of mural nodules was more frequent (p < 0.001).Combined MRCP and MRA might be useful for the differential diagnosis of malignant and benign IPMTs of the pancreas.Comparative diagnostic evaluation with MR cholangiopancreatography, ultrasonography and CT in patients with pancreatobiliary disease.The aim of this study was to directly compare the results of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) with those of ultrasonography (US) and multislice computed tomography (MSCT) in the diagnosis of pancreaticobiliary diseases.A total of 70 patients (41 men, 29 women) aged 22-89 years were studied either before (n=59) or after cholecystectomy (n=11) for biliary lithiasis. Clinical signs and symptoms were jaundice (n=15), abdominal pain (n=37) and proven biliary lithiasis (n=18). MRCP was performed in all patients, whereas abdominal US was performed in 55 (group 1) and MSCT in 37 (group 2) patients. A regional evaluation of the main structures of the pancreaticobiliary system was performed: gallbladder and cystic duct, intra- and extrahepatic bile ducts and main pancreatic duct. Histology (n=27), biopsy (n=5), endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) (n=28) and/or clinical-imaging follow-up (n=10) were considered standards of reference. In particular, patients were classified as showing benign (n=47) or malignant (n=12) lesions or normal biliary anatomy (n=11).In group 1, the results of MRCP and US were concordant in the majority (92%) of cases; however, statistically significant discordance (p<0.01) was found in the evaluation of the extrahepatic ducts, with nine cases (16%) of middle-distal common bile duct stones being detected on MRCP only. In group 2, the results of MRCP and MSCT were also concordant in most cases (87%). However, findings were significantly discordant when the intra- and extrahepatic ducts were analysed, with seven (19%) and six (16%) cases, respectively, of lithiasis being detected on MRCP only (p<0.01 for both).The results of our study confirm the diagnostic potential of MRCP in the study of the pancreaticobiliary duct system. In particular, the comparison between MRCP and US and MSCT indicates the superiority of MRCP in evaluating bile ducts and detecting stones in the common bile duct.Cystic tumours of the pancreas: a diagnostic dilemma.Cystic neoplasm of the pancreas is an uncommon entity that encompasses a range of tumours with varying potential for malignancy. These tumours are frequently misdiagnosed as pseudocysts and are inappropriately managed.A retrospective review was undertaken of 18 cases of cystic tumours of the pancreas over an 8-year period in two large hospitals in Singapore.All patients were Asian, with a younger age group (mean 43.5 years) and a lesser degree of female predominance (3.5:1 ratio) compared to other series. Pain was the most common symptom. Pre-operative diagnosis using ultrasound and computed tomography was not diagnostic in half of the cases and misdiagnosed as pseudocyst in a sixth. There were five serous cystadenomas, four mucinous cystadenomas, two mucinous cystadenocarcinomas, one mucinous cystadenocarcinoma with cystic degeneration in a ductal adenocarcinoma, three Frantz tumours, one acinar cell tumour, one glucagonoma, and one benign epithelial cyst. Two-thirds of tumours were malignant or had the potential to become malignant. Resection was curative in all cases, and no recurrence was noted at a mean follow-up of 34.5 months.The difficulties with pre-operative diagnosis, the high incidence of tumours with potential malignancy, and the good outcome with resection, suggest that all suspected cystic tumours of the pancreas should be resected.Incidence and clinical significance of hyperamylasemia after endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) of pancreatic lesions: a prospective and controlled study.Acute pancreatitis as a complication of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) of pancreatic lesions is rarely observed. However, there is little information on the incidence of hyperamylasemia after EUS-FNA of the pancreas and its clinical significance. This study aimed to supply this lack of information.Patients who underwent EUS-FNA of a pancreatic lesion between October 2004 and October 2005 were studied prospectively. Exclusion criteria were: (i) platelet count under 50,000/mm (3) and/or prothrombin time < 50 %; (ii) performance of surgery, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), a percutaneous biopsy attempt, or another invasive procedure within 7 days before EUS-FNA; (iii) lack of informed consent. Serum amylase levels were determined before and 8 and 24 h after the procedure. Hyperamylasemia was defined by amylase levels above 104 UI/L (and higher than baseline levels) 8 h after the procedure. Acute pancreatitis was defined by upper abdominal pain (with or without nausea and/or vomiting) accompanied by elevation of serum amylase or lipase to at least twice baseline levels.A total of 100 patients underwent EUS-FNA of a pancreatic lesion (58 men, 42 women; mean age 60 +/- 13 years). Eleven patients (11 %) showed hyperamylasemia 8 h after the puncture (298 +/- 293 UI/L, range 105 - 1044 UI/L), but only two of them developed acute mild pancreatitis after EUS-FNA. Hyperamylasemia was not related either to the type of lesion (cystic or solid) or to its location, the duration of the procedure, or the number of passes performed.Pancreatitis after pancreatic EUS-FNA occurs in 2 % of patients, with some more cases of silent hyperamylasemia. This complication may have to be included in the information given to patients for their informed consent.Application of Contrast-Enhanced Ultrasound in Cystic Pancreatic Lesions Using a Simplified Classification Diagnostic Criterion.Objective. Classification diagnosis was performed for cystic pancreatic lesions using ultrasound (US) and contrast-enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) to explore the diagnostic value of CEUS by comparison with enhanced CT. Methods. Sixty-four cases with cystic pancreatic lesions were included in this study. The cystic lesions of pancreas were classified into four types by US, CEUS, and CT: type I unilocular cysts; type II microcystic lesions; type III macrocystic lesions; and type IV cystic lesions with solid components or irregular thickening of the cystic wall or septa. Results. Eighteen type I, 7 type II, 10 type III, and 29 type IV cases were diagnosed by CT. The classification results by US were as follows: 6 type I; 5 type II; 4 type III; and 49 type IV cases. Compared with the results by enhanced CT, the kappa value was 0.36. Using CEUS, 15, 6, 12, and 31 cases were diagnosed as types I-IV, respectively. The kappa value was 0.77. Conclusion. CEUS has obvious superiority over US in the classification diagnostic accuracy in cystic pancreatic lesions and CEUS results showed substantial agreement with enhanced CT. CEUS could contribute to the differential diagnosis of cystic pancreatic diseases. Conventional versus contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration for diagnosis of solid pancreatic lesions: A prospective randomized trial.Contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasonography (CEH-EUS) has been used to diagnose solid pancreatic lesions (SPLs). The aim of this study was to investigate the efficacy of CEH-EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration (CEH-EUS-FNA) compared with that of conventional EUS-FNA for the diagnosis of SPLs.Forty patients with solid pancreatic lesions who visited Fukushima Medical University between September 2013 and June 2014 were recruited for this prospective study. Twenty patients underwent CEH-EUS-FNA, and 20 patients underwent conventional EUS-FNA. The sampling rate, sensitivity, accuracy, and number of needle passes required to obtain sufficient samples were compared between the two groups.Patient characteristics, sampling rate, accuracy, and sensitivity were not significantly different between the two groups. The final diagnosis of patients who underwent CEH-EUS-FNA was pancreatic cancer in 19 and intraductal papillary mucinous carcinoma in one. Nineteen patients who underwent conventional EUS-FNA were finally diagnosed with pancreatic cancer and one was diagnosed as cancer of the common bile duct. There was a significant difference in the number of needle passes required. A sufficient sample was obtained on one needle pass in 60% (12/20) of CEH-EUS-FNA group compared with 25% (5/20) of the conventional EUS-FNA group.Fewer needle passes were required to obtain samples from solid pancreatic lesions using CEH-EUS-FNA than those required using conventional EUS-FNA. Therefore, CEH-EUS-FNA may be more efficient and safer than conventional EUS-FNA for the diagnosis of solid pancreatic lesions.Impact of biliary stents on EUS-guided FNA of pancreatic mass lesions.Few studies have evaluated the impact of biliary stents on EUS-guided FNA.To compare diagnostic yield of EUS-FNA in patients with or without biliary stents.Retrospective study.Tertiary referral center.Patients with obstructive jaundice secondary to solid pancreatic mass lesions who underwent EUS-FNA over 5 years.The primary objective was to compare the diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA in patients with or without biliary stents and between patients with plastic stents or self-expandable metal stents (SEMSs). Secondary objectives were to assess the technical difficulty of EUS-FNA by comparing the number of passes required to establish diagnosis and to identify predictors of a false-negative diagnosis.Of 214 patients who underwent EUS-FNA, 150 (70%) had biliary stents and 64 (30%) had no stents in place. Of 150 patients with biliary stents, 105 (70%) were plastic and 45 (30%) were SEMSs. At EUS-FNA, the diagnosis was pancreatic cancer in 155 (72%), chronic pancreatitis in 17 (8%), other cancer in 31 (14%), and indeterminate in 11 (5%). There was no difference in rates of diagnostic accuracy between patients with or without stents (93.7% vs 95.3%; P = .73) and between plastic or SEMSs (95.2% vs 95.5%, P = .99), respectively. Median number of passes to diagnosis was not significantly different between patients with or without stents (2 [interquartile ratio range (IQR) = 1-3] vs 2 [IQR = 1-4]; P = .066) and between plastic or SEMS (2.5 [IQR = 1-4] vs 2 [IQR = 1-4], P = .69), respectively. On univariate analysis, EUS-FNA results were false-negative in patients with large pancreatic masses (>3 cm vs <3 cm, 9.35% vs 0.93%, P = .005) that required more FNA passes (<2 vs >2 passes, 0% vs 11.8%, P < .0001).Retrospective study.The presence or absence of a biliary stent, whether plastic or metal, does not have an impact on the diagnostic yield or technical difficulty of EUS-FNA.Next generation sequencing improves the accuracy of KRAS mutation analysis in endoscopic ultrasound fine needle aspiration pancreatic lesions.The use of endoscopic ultrasonography has allowed for improved detection and pathologic analysis of fine needle aspirate material for pancreatic lesion diagnosis. The molecular analysis of KRAS has further improved the clinical sensitivity of preoperative analysis. For this reason, the use of highly analytical sensitive and specific molecular tests in the analysis of material from fine needle aspirate specimens has become of great importance. In the present study, 60 specimens from endoscopic ultrasonography fine needle aspirate were analyzed for KRAS exon 2 and exon 3 mutations, using three different techniques: Sanger sequencing, allele specific locked nucleic acid PCR and Next Generation sequencing (454 GS-Junior, Roche). Moreover, KRAS was also tested in wild-type samples, starting from DNA obtained from cytological smears after pathological evaluation. Sanger sequencing showed a clinical sensitivity for the detection of the KRAS mutation of 42.1%, allele specific locked nucleic acid of 52.8% and Next Generation of 73.7%. In two wild-type cases the re-sequencing starting from selected material allowed to detect a KRAS mutation, increasing the clinical sensitivity of next generation sequencing to 78.95%. The present study demonstrated that the performance of molecular analysis could be improved by using highly analytical sensitive techniques. The Next Generation Sequencing allowed to increase the clinical sensitivity of the test without decreasing the specificity of the analysis. Moreover we observed that it could be useful to repeat the analysis starting from selectable material, such as cytological smears to avoid false negative results. A comparison of electronic radial and curvilinear endoscopic ultrasonography in the detection of pancreatic malignant tumor.There is no comparative study of electronic radial endoscopic ultrasonography (ER-EUS) and electronic curvilinear EUS (EC-EUS). The aim of this study was to compare the accuracy of ER-EUS and EC-EUS for detecting pancreatic malignancies.This was a retrospective review of the patients who had EUS assessment from September 2008 to December 2011 for suspicious pancreatic tumors. Sensitivity, specificity, and area under the ROC curve to detect pancreatic malignancies were calculated and compared between the ER-EUS and EC-EUS cohort. The final diagnosis of pancreatic malignancy was based on pathology, or the consensus of patient's clinical course and multimodal imaging tests.Two hundred twenty-one patients were included and divided into two cohorts: ER-EUS (n = 139) and EC-EUS (n = 82) cohorts. With propensity score matching method, 70 cases in each cohort were selected for the comparison. There was no significant difference in sensitivity, specificity, and area under the ROC curve to detect pancreatic malignancy between ER-EUS and EC-EUS cohort (88.5 vs. 100%, 88.6 vs. 90.9%, 0.8855 vs. 0.9545).ER-EUS and EC-EUS provided similar accuracy for the detection of pancreatic malignancies. In view of similar diagnostic results of ER-EUS and EC-EUS for the detection of pancreatic malignancy, and the advantage of being able to perform FNA with EC-EUS, EC-EUS may be the preferred choice.Fine-needle aspiration of cystic pancreatic mucinous tumor: oncotic cell as an aiding diagnostic feature in paucicellular specimens.In juxtaposition with imaging studies, endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration has gained popularity in the initial evaluation of pancreatic masses, especially cystic lesions of pancreas. Cystic pancreatic mucinous tumors include mucinous cystic neoplasm and intraductal papillary mucinous tumor, both of which have been known to have a low malignant potential and a high rate of association with invasive adenocarcinoma. As such, preoperative diagnosis is of great significance in guiding patient management. Although fine-needle aspiration cytological diagnosis of pancreatic tumor in cellular specimens has been well described, as with other cystic lesions, the yield of diagnostic cells from needle aspiration of cystic pancreatic mucinous tumors is typically low. Cytological diagnosis from these paucicellular specimens remains challenging. An additional compounding problem is the high frequency of gastrointestinal mucin and epithelial contamination. The diagnostic morphology and criteria in these paucicellular specimens have not been well addressed in the literature. The cytopathologists' ongoing efforts tend to improve the diagnostic accuracy. In this current study, oncotic cells, characterized by cytoplasmic swelling and karyolysis, were analyzed from 17 cases of cystic pancreatic mucinous tumor, of which the diagnosis was either confirmed by surgical resection or supported by cell block and/or increased CEA. Oncotic cells were found in variable amounts in almost all the cystic pancreatic mucinous tumors in this series. None of the five fine-needle aspirations intended for aspirations of hypoechoic nonlesional pancreas, which yielded either gastrointestinal tract material only or admixture of gastrointestinal and normal pancreatic components, was found to contain oncotic cells, evidencing the utility of oncotic cell as a surrogate morphologic marker in aiding the diagnosis of cystic pancreatic mucinous tumor as well as its differentiation from gastrointestinal contaminant, particularly in paucicellular specimens.Improved differentiation of pancreatic tumors using contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasound.Endoscopic ultrasound is a widely accepted imaging method for staging of ductal adenocarcinoma and the localization of neuroendocrine tumors of the pancreas. We prospectively evaluated conventional color Doppler imaging and contrast-enhanced endoscopic Doppler ultrasound (CE-EDUS) as a new imaging technique for further characterization and differentiation of solid pancreatic tumors.From 300 patients with pancreatic lesions investigated using contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasound we could finally include 93 patients with an undetermined, solitary, predominantly solid, lesion 40 mm or less, and a definite histologically proven diagnosis. After bolus injection of the contrast agent SHU 508A 4 g (400 mg/dL) the vascular pattern of the lesion during the arterial phase was compared with the vascularity of the residual pancreatic parenchyma.Color Doppler imaging did not reveal vascularity of the pancreatic parenchyma in any of the patients, and therefore tumor hypovascularity could not be determined in contrast to all CE-EDUS-examined patients revealing at least some degree of parenchymal vascularity. Fifty-seven of 62 patients with ductal adenocarcinoma of the pancreas showed a hypovascularity of the tumor using CE-EDUS. All other pancreatic lesions revealed an isovascular or hypervascular pattern using contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasound (20 neuroendocrine tumors, 10 serous microcystic adenomas, and 1 teratoma). Hypovascularity as a sign of malignancy in contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasound obtained 92% (82%-97%) sensitivity and 100% specificity (89%-100%).Contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasound is effective in differentiating small solid pancreatic tumors of different origin in most cases. Hypovascularity indicates malignancy of pancreatic tumors.Clinical impact of K-ras mutation analysis in EUS-guided FNA specimens from pancreatic masses.EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) is considered optimal for differentially diagnosing pancreatic masses. However, the sensitivity of EUS-FNA ranges from 65% to 95%, respectively, which requires improvement.To evaluate clinical impact of K-ras mutation analysis in EUS-FNA specimens from pancreatic masses.Prospective registration, single-center study.Tertiary referral center.This study involved 394 consecutive patients with pancreatic masses (307 pancreatic ductal adenocarcinomas [PDACs], 47 pancreatic inflammatory lesions, and 40 other types of tumors) who underwent EUS-FNA and analysis of K-ras mutations.EUS-FNA, Cycleave polymerase chain reaction.Improvement of the diagnostic accuracy by K-ras mutation analysis; absence of K-ras mutations in non-PDAC masses.K-ras mutations were detected in 266 of 307 PDAC aspirates (87%) and in 3 of 87 non-PDAC masses (3%). K-ras mutations were detected in 18 of 39 patients (46%) who remained cytohistopathologically undiagnosed. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy of cytohistopathological and K-ras mutation analyses alone were 87%, 100%, 100%, 54%, and 89%, respectively, and, when combined, were 93%, 100%, 100%, 68%, and 94%, respectively. Adding K-ras mutation analysis to standard cytohistopathological assessment increased the sensitivity and accuracy of EUS-FNA by 6% (P < .001) and 5% (P < .001), respectively.Single-center study.K-ras mutation analysis may be helpful in patients with suspected PDAC yet inconclusive EUS-FNA findings. K-ras mutations were extremely rare in pancreatic inflammation and other pancreatic tumors.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration cytology in the diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas. A study of 8 cases.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) is an increasingly recognized neoplasm of the pancreas, accounting for 5% of pancreatic neoplasms, it is considered difficult to diagnose by fine-needle aspiration (FNA) cytology.The aim of this study was to investigate the role of EUS-guided FNA cytology in the diagnosis of IPMN of the pancreas.Eight cases of surgically proven IPMN with pre-operative endoscopic ultrasound-guided (EUS-guided) FNA cytology were collected for retrospective analysis.EUS-FNA cytology was performed with the on-site attendance of a cytopathologist in all cases. EUS/clinical findings, macroscopic/microscopic features of cell blocks and smears, and immunocytochemical stains accompanied by histopathologic diagnosis were recorded and studied.EUS revealed hypoechoic masses in the head of pancreas (n=6) and in the body/tail (n=2), measuring from 16.6 to 35.8 mm. In all cases, the hypoechoic mass had a distinctive distribution, involving the main pancreatic duct and/or the associated large branch ducts while intraductal nodules or multiple cysts were detected. Cytological specimens were characterized by a background containing abundant mucin in all cases and rarely by inflammation (neutrophils and histiocytes) (n=4). Neoplastic cells were entrapped in a mucinous background either single or loosely cohesive, and forming papillae in 7 cases. Mucinous epithelium was observed in all cases. Single atypical and irregular clusters were found in 3 cases (which were cytologically described as highly suggestive malignant IPMNs, and were histologically confirmed). Two cases were diagnosed as benign IPMN and, in 3 cases, the biological behavior was not easy to determine by cytology alone (histologically diagnosed as borderline). The histological diagnosis confirmed the FNA cytology diagnosis: 3 malignant IPMNs, 2 benign IPMNs and 3 borderline IPMNs. Immunostains were available in 5 out of 8 cases. Mucin 1 (MUC-1) was positive in 2 cases of malignant IPMN (histologically classified as null type ad intestinal type), mucin 2 (MUC-2) was positive in 3 cases (2 malignant both of the intestinal type, and 1 benign of the intestinal type I) and c-erbB2 was positive in 3 cases (2 benign - null and intestinal type - and 1 malignant null type).The characteristic pre-operative EUS findings and cytomorphologic features, in addition to the immunocytochemical profile, were accurate indications and coincided with the final/post-operative histological diagnosis of IPMN.Detection and tumor staging of malignancy in cystic, intraductal, and solid tumors of the pancreas by EUS.EUS can provide detailed imaging of pancreatic malignancies and direct fine needle aspiration (FNA) of pancreatic masses. The ability of EUS to detect and stage malignancy in cystic and intraductal lesions has not been investigated. Our aim was to determine the sensitivity and specificity of EUS imaging and FNA in detecting and staging of malignancy in solid, cystic, and intraductal lesions of the pancreas.The records of 96 patients (46 solid, 26 cystic, 24 intraductal lesions) who underwent EUS followed by surgical exploration over a 3-year period were reviewed. The accuracy of EUS for detecting and staging malignancy was calculated based on the results of surgery and histology.EUS-guided FNA provided evidence of malignancy in solid, cystic, and ductal lesions with sensitivities of 59.5%, 50%, and 60%, respectively. The accuracy of staging by EUS was significantly less for intraductal lesions (47%), compared with cystic (100%) and solid lesions (85%) (p < 0. 05).EUS can be used to detect malignancy in cystic and intraductal tumors of the pancreas.Characterization of small solid tumors in the pancreas: the value of contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasonography.Contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasonography (CH-EUS), a novel technology, visualizes parenchymal perfusion in the pancreas. This study prospectively evaluated how accurately CH-EUS characterizes pancreatic lesions and compared its diagnostic ability with that of contrast-enhanced multidetector-row computed tomography (MDCT) and endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA).A total of 277 consecutive patients with pancreatic solid lesions that were detected by conventional EUS underwent CH-EUS for evaluation of vascularity. After infusing an ultrasound contrast, CH-EUS was performed by using an echoendoscope and a specific mode for contrast harmonic imaging. On the basis of the intensity of enhancement, the lesions were categorized into four patterns: nonenhancement, hypoenhancement, isoenhancement, and hyperenhancement. For comparison, all patients underwent MDCT. The ability of CH-EUS to differentiate ductal carcinomas from the other solid tumors, particularly small lesions (≤2 cm in diameter) was assessed, and compared with the differentiating abilities of MDCT and EUS-FNA.In terms of reading the CH-EUS images, the κ-coefficient of the interobserver agreement test was 0.94 (P<0.001). CH-EUS-depicted hypoenhancement diagnosed ductal carcinomas with a sensitivity and specificity of 95.1% (95% confidence interval (CI) 92.7-96.7%) and 89.0% (95% CI 83.0-93.1%), respectively. For diagnosing small carcinomas by CH-EUS, the sensitivity and specificity were 91.2 % (95% CI 82.5-95.1%) and 94.4% (95% CI 86.2-98.1%), respectively. CH-EUS-depicted hypervascular enhancement diagnosed neuroendocrine tumors with a sensitivity and specificity of 78.9% (95% CI 61.4-89.7%) and 98.7% (95% CI 96.7-98.8%), respectively. Although CH-EUS and MDCT did not differ significantly in diagnostic ability with regard to all lesions, CH-EUS was superior to MDCT in diagnosing small (≤2 cm) carcinomas (P<0.05). In 12 neoplasms that MDCT failed to detect, 7 ductal carcinomas and 2 neuroendocrine tumors had hypoenhancement and hyperenhancement on CH-EUS, respectively. When CH-EUS was combined with EUS-FNA, the sensitivity of EUS-FNA increased from 92.2 to 100%.CH-EUS is useful for characterizing conventional EUS-detected solid pancreatic lesions. EUS equipped with contrast harmonic imaging may play an important role in the characterization of small tumors that other imaging methods fail to depict and may improve the diagnostic yield of EUS-FNA.Efficacy of computed tomography of the abdomen--early results.Our experience with 153 CT scans of the abdomen and pelvis over the first eight months of availability at our institution has been analyzed. The efficacy in terms of contribution to the diagnosis in each patient was assessed and accuracy determined. CT was found to have made a significant contribution to the diagnosis in patients with diseases of the pancreas, aorta, retroperitoneal structures, and in cases of abdominal and pelvic masses and abcesses. It has been somewhat less helpful in evaluation of liver and renal diseases. Overall, CT scanning appears to be a significant new diagnostic modality in the evaluation of patients with abdominal and pelvic diseases.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas: correlation of helical CT features with pathologic findings.To evaluate the CT features of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas (IPMNs), and to compare with pathological findings in order to identify CT features that can be helpful in differentiating benign IPMNs from malignant IPMNs.The CT findings in 25 patients were reviewed for tumor location, tumor type, dilatation of the main pancreatic duct (MPD), MPD involvement, mural node or solid attenuating component, tumor size in branch duct or mixed duct type, dilatation of common bile duct (CBD) and invasion of surrounding structures. The data was subjected to Chi-Square Tests or Fisher's Exact Test using SPSS13.0 software with p value<0.05 indicating significant statistical difference.Presence of mural node or solid enhancing component, size of mural node or solid enhancing component ≥7mm, dilatation of CBD was more common in malignant IPMNs (p<0.05). None of tumor location, tumor type, dilatation of MPD, MPD involvement, tumor size, and invasion of surrounding structures was statistically significant in differentiating benign from malignant IPMNs.CT features suggestive of malignant or invasive IPMNs include presence of mural node or solid enhancing component, size of mural node or solid enhancing component ≥7mm, and dilatation of CBD.Yield of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy in patients with suspected pancreatic carcinoma.Although atypical or suspicious cytology may support a clinical diagnosis of a malignancy, it is often not sufficient for the implementation of therapy in patients with pancreatic carcinoma. Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy (EUS-FNAB) is a relatively new method for obtaining cytology samples, and one that may decrease the number of atypical/suspicious diagnoses. The goals of the current study were to prospectively evaluate the yield of EUS-FNAB in the diagnosis of patients presenting with solid pancreatic lesions and to evaluate the significance of atypical, suspicious, and false-negative aspirates.All patients who presented with a solid pancreatic lesion and underwent EUS-FNAB over a 13-month period were included in the current study. One endoscopist performed all EUS-FNABs. On-site evaluation of specimen adequacy by a cytopathologist was available for each case. Follow-up included histologic correlation (n = 21) and clinical and/or imaging follow-up (n = 80), including 38 patients who died of the disease.EUS-FNABs were obtained from 101 patients (mean age, 62 +/- 11.8 years; age range, 34-89 years). The male-to-female ratio was 2:1. Sixty-five percent of the lesions were located in the head of the pancreas, 12% were located in the uncinate, 17% were located in the body, and 6% were located in the tail. The mean size of the tumors was 3.3 cm (range, 1.3-7 cm). A median of 4 needle passes were performed (range, 1-11 needle passes). Sixty-two biopsies (61.4%) were interpreted as malignant on cytologic evaluation, 5 (5%) as suspicious for a malignancy, 6 (5.9%) as atypical/indeterminate, and 26 (25.7%) as benign processes. Of the 76 malignant lesions, 71 were adenocarcinomas, 3 were neuroendocrine tumors, 1 was a lymphoma, and 1 was a metastatic renal cell carcinoma. All except one of the suspicious/atypical aspirates were subsequently confirmed to be malignant. Agreement was complete for the atypical cases. Among the suspicious cases, 2 of the 5 were identified as carcinoma by one cytopathologist and as suspicious lesions by the other, yielding a 40% disagreement rate between the 2 cytopathologists. Therefore, for the 10 atypical or suspicious cases that later were confirmed to be malignant, the final diagnosis of malignant disease was not made due to scant cellularity that could be attributed to sampling error in 8 cases and to interpretative disagreement in 2 cases (20%). All four false-negative diagnoses were attributed to sampling error. Two percent of all biopsies were inadequate for interpretation. Of the 99 adequate specimens, 72 yielded true-positive results, 23 yielded true-negative results, and 4 yielded false-negative results. No false-positives were encountered. Therefore, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of EUS-FNAB for solid pancreatic masses were 94.7% (95% confidence interval [CI], 89.7-99.8%), 100%, 100%, and 85.2% (95% CI, 71.8-98.6%), respectively.EUS-FNAB is a safe and highly accurate method for tissue diagnosis of patients with solid pancreatic lesions. Patients with suspicious and atypical EUS-FNAB aspirates deserve further clinical evaluation.Advanced endosonographic diagnostic tools for discrimination of focal chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma--elastography, contrast enhanced high mechanical index (CEHMI) and low mechanical index (CELMI) endosonography in direct comparison.New tools have recently emerged that further improve the diagnostic performance of high-end endosonography. Whilst elastography has been available for a while, contrast-enhancing techniques are still very young with little experience existing in this field. The latest development is contrast enhanced low mechanical index endosonography (CELMI-EUS) which became commercially available at the beginning of 2010. This technique requires contrast-specific software whereas the pre-existing technique of contrast-enhanced high mechanical index endosonography (CEHMI-EUS) does not. The aim of this study was to compare these techniques in discriminating between focal chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma. Included in the study were 58 patients with a pancreatic lesion (19 pancreatic cancer and 39 chronic pancreatitis) with a mean age of 60±15 years. All patients were examined by one investigator (MH). All methods were performed within one examination and the result of each technique was noted before using the next. The gold standard was pathology following surgery, endoscopic fine-needle puncture, or one-year follow-up when chronic pancreatitis was suspected. The consecutive results of specificity and sensitivity were 73.7% and 61.5% for B-mode endosonography; 94.7% and 33.4% for elastography; 84.2% and 76.9% for CELMI-EUS; and 89.5% and 92.3% for CEHMI-EUS. A combination of 3 of those methods could not improve on the result of CEHMI-EUS alone. This study shows that, despite the availability of new technologies, CEHMI-EUS is still the most reliable method for the differentiation of focal chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma. However, understanding the advantages of the different methods might help to find the optimal indications for the use of the new techniques.Mucinous cystic neoplasm of the pancreas. Estimation of grade of malignancy with imaging techniques and its surgical implications.The results of diagnostic imaging procedures, macroscopic and microscopic findings and clinical follow up data of 20 mucinous cystic neoplasms of the pancreas were retrospectively reviewed to determine the grade of malignancy and its surgical implications. The largest mean diameter was 8.9 cm for 10 malignant cases, 5.0 cm for two premalignant cases, and 3.1 cm for eight benign tumours. Ultrasonography or computed tomography or both, corresponded well with macroscopy. The 10 malignant and two premalignant lesions had intracystic mural nodules or extracystic solid components, while the eight benign specimens had neither nodules nor solid portions. Structural complexity seen on ultrasonography or computed tomography, which reflected the irregularity in size and shape of the cysts, internal septa, walls, and solid components, was severe in the 10 malignant and two borderline tumours and mild or moderate in the eight benign lesions. Angiography showed that five of the nine malignant tumours were hypervascular, while the two premalignant and four benign lesions were all avascular. Five of 10 patients with malignant tumours died of local recurrence or remote hematogenous metastases, and one with malignant disease was still alive with liver metastases at the time of writing. We propose that a careful preoperative estimate of the malignant potential of such cysts should be made based on the size of the tumour, the presence of mural nodules and solid areas, and the structural complexity on ultrasonography or computed tomography, as well as the amount of vascularity seen on angiography. Attention should be paid at follow up to the presence of local recurrence and haematogenous metastases in cases of malignant disease.Targeted cyst wall puncture and aspiration during EUS-FNA increases the diagnostic yield of premalignant and malignant pancreatic cysts.Characterization of pancreatic cysts by using EUS-FNA includes chemical and cytologic analysis.To evaluate whether material obtained from FNA of the cyst wall increases diagnostic yield.Prospective series.Tertiary referral center.Consecutive patients with pancreatic cysts referred for EUS-FNA between March 2010 and March 2011.FNA was performed with aspiration of cyst fluid for carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and cytology, followed by cyst wall puncture (CWP). CWP is defined as puncturing the far wall of the cyst and moving the needle back and forth through the wall to sample the wall epithelium.The diagnostic yield for mucinous cystic pancreatic neoplasms by CEA and cytology obtained from cyst fluid compared with cytology obtained from CWP. CEA ≥192 ng/mL was considered mucinous.A total of 69 pancreatic cysts from 66 patients were included. Adequate amounts of fluid were aspirated for CEA, amylase, and cytology in 60 cysts (81%). Cellular material adequate for cytologic assessment from CWP was obtained in 56 cysts (81%). Ten (30%) of 33 cysts with CEA <192 ng/mL and negative results of cyst fluid cytology had a mucinous diagnosis from CWP; 6 of 9 (67%) cysts with an insufficient amount of fluid for CEA analysis and cyst fluid cytology had a mucinous diagnosis from CWP. Furthermore, 4 malignant cysts were independently diagnosed by CWP cytology. The incremental diagnostic yield of CWP for mucinous or malignant cysts was therefore 29% (20 of 69 cysts, P = .0001). An episode of pancreatitis (1.45%) occurred.Lack of surgical criterion standard.CWP during EUS-FNA is a safe and effective technique for improving the diagnostic yield for premalignant and malignant pancreatic cysts.Diagnosis of pancreatic cysts: EUS-guided, through-the-needle confocal laser-induced endomicroscopy and cystoscopy trial: DETECT study.The diagnosis of pancreatic cystic neoplasms (PCNs), which now depends on morphology, cytology, and fluid analysis, is still challenging. A novel confocal laser endomicroscopy probe that can be inserted through a 19-gauge FNA needle allows needle-based confocal laser endomicroscopy (nCLE), and the feasibility of nCLE has been reported in PCNs. The combination of cystoscopy by using a through-the-needle fiberoptic probe in combination with nCLE under EUS guidance may improve the diagnosis of PCNs.To assess the feasibility, safety, and diagnostic yield of the combination of cystoscopy and nCLE in the clinical diagnosis of PCNs.A prospective feasibility study.An academic tertiary referral center.Thirty patients with PCNs.EUS-guided dual through-the-needle imaging (cystoscopy and nCLE) for PCNs.Technical feasibility and safety. Associations of cystoscopy and nCLE findings with clinical diagnosis of PCNs.The procedure was technically successful with the exception of 1 probe exchange failure. In 2 patients (7%), postprocedure pancreatitis developed. Specific features associated with the clinical diagnosis of mucinous cysts were identified: mucin on cystoscopy and papillary projections and dark rings on nCLE. The sensitivity of cystoscopy was 90% (9/10), and that of nCLE was 80% (8/10), and the combination was 100% (10/10) in 18 high-certainty patients.A single-center study and lack of complete pathologic correlation.The combination of dual through-the-needle imaging (cystoscopy and nCLE) of pancreatic cysts appears to have strong concordance with the clinical diagnosis of PCN. (NCT01447238.).[Utility of rapid on-site cytology in endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine needle aspiration of pancreatic masses].Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is a safe and effective method for obtaining samples for cytological diagnosis. Pancreatic cancer is extremely serious and often extremely aggressive, so early detection and diagnosis is important. Therefore, we actively perform EUS FNA for pathological diagnosis of cancer of digestive organs, especially the pancreas.EUS-FNA was performed in 67 patients (39 male, 28 female, median age 63.3 years) from January 2007 to December 2010 in Kyoto University Hospital. To eliminate both quantitatively and qualitatively inadequate samples, we performed EUS-FNA with rapid on-site cytology. Two squash preparations of the collected cells from biopsy were retrieved. One was stained on-site with Giemsa for rapid cytology to evaluate the quantity and quality of the cell collection. If necessary, second or third trials were carried out to obtain appropriate samples for final cytology diagnosis. The other was wet-fixed and used for Papanicolaou staining.All 11 cases of inflammatory disease were diagnosed as negative on cytology. Solid-pseudopapillary neoplasm (1 case) and Endocrine neoplasms (3 cases) were correctly diagnosed on cytology. In pancreatic cancer, 49 of 52 cases (94%) were diagnosed as positive, but 3 cases (6%) were false-negative on cytology. The number of centesis for sampling was once in 21 cases, twice in 26 cases and more than twice in 20 cases. In this study of EUS-FNA, sensitivity was 94% and specificity was 100%.Results of our examination suggest that the combination of EUS-FNA and rapid on-site cytology is a highly specific and sensitive test for detection of pancreatic cancer, and may contribute to reduce excessive centesis.Does cytotechnician training influence the accuracy of EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration of pancreatic masses?The presence of on-site cytopathologists improves the diagnostic yield of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) of pancreatic masses; however, on-site cytopathologists are not available to all endoscopic units. We hypothesized that experienced cytotechnicians can accurately assess whether an on-site pancreatic mass fine needle aspiration specimen is adequate. The aim of this study was to evaluate the effect of formal cytotechnician training on the diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA of pancreatic masses.Single-centre, prospective study. The cytotechnician made an on-site assessment of specimen adequacy with immediate evaluation of smears over a 12-month period (pre-training period) then over another 12-month period (post-training period), with a year's intermediate training when the cytopathologist and the cytotechnician worked together in the room. The gold standard used to establish the final diagnosis was based on a non-equivocal fine needle aspiration biopsy reviewed by the same expert cytopathologist. The main outcome measurements were the cytotechnician diagnostic accuracy before and after the training period.A total of 107 patients were enrolled in the pre-training period. Cytotechnician in-room adequacy was 68.2% (73/107). The diagnostic accuracy was 74.8%. The adequacy for the blind-review pathologist was 93.4% (100/107), significantly higher (p=0.008) than the cytotechnician's results. During the post-training period, 95 EUS-FNA were performed and reviewed. Cytotechnician in-room adequacy was 87.4% (83/95). The diagnostic accuracy was 90.5%. The adequacy for the blinded pathologist was 95.8% (91/95), not significantly different from the cytotechnician (p=0.23).An adequate training period with an expert pathologist significantly improves the cytotechnician skill in terms of judging adequacy and diagnostic accuracy.Onsite cytopathology evaluation and ancillary studies beneficial in EUS-FNA of pancreatic, mediastinal, intra-abdominal, and submucosal lesions.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration cytology (EUS-FNA) is considered to be a minimally invasive and safe technique, with low complication rates, for obtaining tissue samples from pancreatic lesions, and mediastinal and intra-abdominal nodes. We retrospectively reviewed the diagnostic accuracy of this method at a tertiary care hospital in Pakistan.The medical records of 393 consecutive patients referred to the gastroenterology service from August 2008 to September 2013 were reviewed in this retrospective study. The mean age of the patients at presentation was 51.2 years (range 6-89; 56.7% males). Major indications for referral were to establish a diagnosis in patients with a pancreatic mass or lymphadenopathy of unknown origin detected on CT scan or PET-CT (n = 235), to exclude lymph node metastasis in those with a known primary tumor (n = 114), and to rule out relapse of lymphoma after treatment or during follow up (n = 44). Of 393 patients, 181 had mediastinal lymphadenopathy, 115 had pancreatic lesions; 79 had intra-abdominal lymphadenopathy and 18 patients had miscellaneous lesions (gastric mass, splenic, retroperitoneal, esophageal, or adrenal lesions).A mean of 2.2 passes per patient were made; 85% of patients had ≤ 3 passes. The initial rapid onsite evaluation (ROSE) was positive in 363 of 393 (92.3%) patients, but on final cytopathological interpretation, 369 of 393 (93.9%) patients had an adequate specimen for diagnosis. Sufficient material for cytopathology was obtained in 369 patients (93.9%), whereas 24 patients (6.1%) had inadequate aspirate on EUS-FNA as assessed by final cytopathological interpretation. The concordance between final cytopathological diagnoses and ROSE was 98.2%. Follow-up data were available for 296 (75.3%) patients, whereas 97 patients were lost to follow up. Of these 296 patients, 283 of 296 patients were true positive, 9 of 296 were true negative, and 4 of 296 patients were false negative. The overall calculated sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 98.6, 100, 100, and 69.2%, respectively. The major diagnoses that we obtained were granulomata (n = 114), adenocarcinoma (n = 104), reactive nodes (n = 35), metastatic carcinoma (n = 35), Hodgkin's lymphoma (HL; n = 19) and non-Hodgkin's lymphoma (NHL; n = 11), neuroendocrine tumors (n = 11), spindle cell lesions (n = 7), benign lesions (n = 9), cystic neoplasms (n = 6), solid pseudopapillary neoplasm (n = 3), and miscellaneous (n = 15). Only 3 of 393 patients (0.7%) suffered a complication as a result of EUS-FNA, and all three were successfully managed conservatively.EUS-FNA, combined with ROSE, is a safe and highly effective technique in experienced hands with excellent diagnostic accuracy and low complication rates.Rapid Growth Rates of Suspected Pancreatic Cyst Branch Duct Intraductal Papillary Mucinous Neoplasms Predict Malignancy.The majority of branch duct intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (BD-IPMNs) are recommended for surveillance imaging based on consensus guidelines. However, growth rates that should prompt concern for malignant transformation of BD-IPMN are unknown.To determine whether BD-IPMN growth can predict an increased risk of malignancy and define growth rates concerning for malignant BD-IPMN.The study is a retrospective, multicenter study of suspected BD-IPMN patients undergoing imaging surveillance. All patients underwent EUS evaluation followed by surveillance imaging.Two hundred and eighty-four patients with suspected BD-IPMN without worrisome features or high-risk stigmata were followed for a median 56 months and underwent a median of four imaging studies. Nine patients (3.2 %) developed malignant BD-IPMN. Malignant BD-IPMN grew at a faster rate (18.6 vs. 0.8 mm/year; P = 0.05) compared to benign BD-IPMN. BD-IPMN growth rate between 2 and 5 mm/year was associated with an increased risk of malignancy with hazard ratio (HR) of 11.4 (95 % CI 2.2-58.6) when compared to subjects with BD-IPMN growth rate <2 mm/year (P = 0.004). BD-IPMN growth rate ≥5 mm/year had a hazard ratio of 19.5 (95 % CI 2.4-157.8) (P = 0.005). BD-IPMN growth rate of 2 mm/year had a sensitivity of 78 %, specificity of 90 %, and accuracy of 88 % to identify malignancy. Total BD-IPMN growth was also associated with increased risk of malignancy (P = 0.003) with all malignant IPMNs growing at least 10 mm prior to cancer diagnosis.BD-IPMN growth rates ≥2 mm/year and total growth of ≥10 mm should be considered worrisome features for BD-IPMN at increased risk of malignancy.Assessment of dynamic contrast-enhanced magnetic resonance imaging in the differentiation of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma from other pancreatic solid lesions.The purpose of this study was to investigate the diagnostic value of quantitative dynamic contrast-enhanced magnetic resonance imaging (QDCE-MRI) of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma (PDA) on a 3.0-T magnetic resonance.The study was approved by the local institutional review board, and all subjects provided written informed consent. Seventy-five patients with suspected pancreatic tumors underwent QDCE-MRI, in which 33 patients with cases of pancreatic solid lesions (23 patients with PDA, 3 patients with solid pseudopapillary tumor, 3 patients with neuroendocrine tumor, 2 patients with mass-forming pancreatitis, 2 patients with ampullary adenocarcinoma) proven through histopathologic diagnosis were included in this study. The parameters of QDCE-MRI were recorded and compared.The parameters of QDCE-MRI of PDA tissue and non-cancer tissue did not show significant difference between 2-compartment model (2C) and 3-compartment model (3C). The contrast enhancement ratio of non-cancer tissue with dilatation of pancreatic duct was significantly higher than that of non-cancer tissue without dilatation of pancreatic duct, whereas the rate constant (Kep) of 2C was significantly lower. The maximun slope of signal intensity ascent (MxSIp), the volume transfer constant (Ktrans), and the Kep of PDA tissue were significantly lower than those of the non-cancer tissue, but the time of peaking of contrast agent (PeakT) was significantly longer. Receiver operating characteristic curves showed that the areas under the curve of differentiating PDA tissue from the non-cancer tissue were 0.82, 0.79, 0.91, 0.94, 0.88, and 0.89 for PeakT, MxSIp, Ktrans-2C, Kep-2C, Ktrans-3C, and Kep-3C, respectively. The PDA tissue showed lower MxSIp and Kep as well as longer PeakT than those of the non-PDA lesions. The receiver operating characteristic curves showed that the areas under the curve of differentiating the PDA from the non-PDA tumor were 0.73, 0.72, 0.79, and 0.72 for PeakT, MxSIp, Kep-2C, and Kep-3C, respectivelyThe parameters of QDCE-MRI are useful for the diagnosis of PDA.18-Fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography does not aid in diagnosis of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma.There are no accurate and reliable tools for diagnosis of early stage pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma (PDA) or small metastatic lesions. It is also a challenge to differentiate PDA from focal mass-forming pancreatitis (FMP). There is controversy regarding the efficacy of 18-fluorodeoxyglucose positron-emission tomography (FDG-PET) in the diagnosis of PDA. We investigated whether FDG-PET provides information that, combined with data from other imaging techniques, can aid in decision making for patients with suspected PDA.We performed a retrospective analysis of data collected from 232 consecutive patients with suspected PDA at Kobe University Hospital from January 2006 through June 2012. All patients underwent a diagnostic imaging protocol that included multidetector row computed tomography, superparamagnetic iron oxide-enhanced magnetic resonance imaging, and FDG-PET. Based on endoscopic ultrasonography, fine-needle aspiration biopsy, or endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography analyses, 218 patients had PDA (89 underwent resection and 129 did not) and 14 patients had FMP (8 had focal mass-forming chronic pancreatitis and 6 had focal mass-forming autoimmune pancreatitis).FDG-PET detected 50% of stages 0 and I, 91.9% of stage II, 100% of stage III, and 96.8% of stage IV tumors. Detection was affected significantly by tumor size (P = .024) and T stage (P = .023) in resected tumors. Multidetector row computed tomography detected significantly more liver metastases than FDG-PET. Few para-aortic lymph node or peritoneal metastases were detected by FDG-PET. FDG-PET correctly identified 11 of the 14 patients with FMP (5 of 8 with focal mass-forming chronic pancreatitis and 6 of 6 with focal mass-forming autoimmune pancreatitis).FDG-PET is not effective in detecting early stage PDA and small metastases, or in differentiating PDA from FMP. Combining FDG-PET with current diagnostic techniques for PDA did not provide any decisive information, therefore it should not be included in this analysis.Endoscopic ultrasonography is a valuable diagnostic tool in patients with incidental findings in the pancreas or bile ducts.Incidental findings are often seen at computed tomographies (CT). This study describes patients who had an endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) because of an incidental finding in the pancreas/bile duct.Patients referred for EUS between September 2012 and September 2013 because of an incidental finding in the pancreas/bile duct at a CT were prospectively enrolled. After EUS, the findings of this procedure were noted together with the plan for further diagnostic work-up or therapy. A follow-up was made after 6 months and 1 year after EUS was performed.A total of 47 patients (24 women, 23 men) were registered with an incidental finding. The median age was 69 years (range: 45-83 years). Diagnoses after performing EUS were: normal findings (n = 16), cystic lesion (n = 16), mass lesion (n = 6), inconclusive (n = 6) and other specified (n = 3). The plan after EUS was: no further evaluation (n = 27), referred for new EUS or other imaging procedures (n = 14) and referred for surgery/endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (n = 6). In total, 6 patients proved to have neoplastic diseases in the pancreas. None of the patients who were stopped from further evaluation following EUS later proved to have a malignant disease in the pancreas.EUS is a valuable diagnostic tool in patients with incidental findings in the pancreas/bile duct noted at a CT. Many patients can be stopped from further diagnostic work-up after EUS with a minimal risk of overlooking a malignant disease.not relevant.The study was approved by the Danish Data Protection Agency via Region of Southern Denmark (case no. 13/27,321).The possible role of F-18 FDG positron emission tomography in the differential diagnosis of focal pancreatic lesions.To compare the diagnostic values of different methods for the differentiation of malignant from benign pancreatic lesions.In 22 patients with focal pancreatic lesions, the carbohydrate antigen (CA) 19-9 level was measured; abdominal ultrasound (US), computed tomography (CT), endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), and F-18 fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) positron emission tomography (PET) were performed; and the value of these methods were analyzed for their use in cancer diagnosis.Malignant lesions were identified in six patients and verified by surgery or clinical follow-up. The CA 19-9 level was elevated in four of the five patients examined (sensitivity, 80%). In all six cases, US and CT revealed hypoechogenic and hypodense areas (sensitivity, 100%). In one patient, ERCP was unsuccessful but yielded true-positive results in three others (sensitivity, 60%). The sensitivity of FDG PET was 100%. Sixteen focal cases of pancreatic disease proved to be benign. The CA 19-9 level was elevated in four of them (specificity, 73%). Hypoechogenic and hypodense areas were evident on US and CT in eight patients. The specificity of CT was 50% (8 of 16 cases). The specificity of US was 47% (7 of 15 cases). The specificity of successful ERCP was 92%. Fourteen negative FDG-PET results were truly negative. In two patients, however, the PET findings proved to be falsely positive (specificity, 88%).FDG-PET is an effective tool to differentiate malignant from benign focal pancreatic lesions. In persons with focal pancreatic hypoechogenic or hypodense lesions detected by CT or US and an elevated CA 19-9 level, FDG PET should be the next step in the diagnostic strategy.Prospective evaluation of pancreatic tumors: accuracy of MR imaging with MR cholangiopancreatography and MR angiography.To prospectively assess accuracy of magnetic resonance (MR) imaging, MR cholangiopancreatography (MRCP), and MR angiography in patients suspected of having pancreatic tumors.Sixty-six patients suspected of having pancreatic tumors underwent MR imaging (unenhanced and contrast material-enhanced MR, MRCP, and contrast-enhanced MR angiography). Two blinded readers prospectively analyzed the images by consensus, and results were correlated with surgery, biopsy, or follow-up findings. Results were tabulated in two-by-two tables.MR assessment of pancreatic lesion status (differentiation of benign vs malignant) resulted in 60 correct diagnoses (accuracy, 91%), and six (10%) false diagnoses. Among histologically proved malignant tumors, MR imaging yielded correct diagnoses in 42 of 44 patients (sensitivity, 95%; 95% CI: 85%, 99%), whereas 18 of 22 patients with benign findings were classified correctly. At MR imaging, findings in four patients with chronic pancreatitis were wrongly categorized as malignant tumors (specificity, 82%; 95% CI: 60%, 95%), and in one patient, a distal common bile duct carcinoma was not detected. In no patient with pancreatic adenocarcinoma was this tumor misdiagnosed as benign. In patients with malignant tumors who underwent resection, local-regional tumor growth and vascular infiltration were accurately classified in 89% and 94%, respectively. MR imaging depicted histologically proved synchronous hepatic metastases in 82%. The positive and negative predictive values for cancer nonresectability were 90% and 83%, respectively, and the accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity were 85%, 69%, and 95%, respectively.Unenhanced and contrast-enhanced MR imaging with MRCP and MR angiography offers potential as a noninvasive tool for assessment of patients suspected of having pancreatic tumors.Differentiation of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms from other pancreatic cystic masses: comparison of multirow-detector CT and MR imaging using ROC analysis.To compare the diagnostic performance of multirow-detector computed tomography (MDCT) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the differentiation of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) from other pancreatic cystic masses.A total of 53 patients with pathologically proven pancreatic cystic lesions who had undergone MDCT and MRI were included in this study. Two radiologists analyzed the morphologic features of the lesions and graded the lesion conspicuity on each examination. The readers assigned their confidence level regarding the differentiation of IPMN from other lesions and predicting ductal communication of the lesion. The radiologists' diagnostic confidence was compared using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis.The Az values for each observer for predicting ductal communication of the lesion and differentiating IPMN from other lesions were as follows: For MRI they were respectively 0.949 and 0.995 for reader 1, and 0.916 and 0.932 for reader 2. For MDCT they were respectively 0.790 and 0.875 for reader 1, and 0.774 and 0.850 for reader 2. In addition, for differentiating IPMNs from other lesions, MRI was significantly more accurate than MDCT (P < 0.05) for one observer, but for the other observer there was no significant difference between the two examinations (P = 0.059). For predicting ductal communication of the cystic lesions for both observers, MRI was significantly more accurate than MDCT (P < 0.05). The weighted kappa values indicate good agreement (kappa = 0.61) between observers for MDCT, and excellent agreement (kappa = 0.82) for MRI.Pancreatic MRI shows better diagnostic performance than MDCT for differentiating IPMNs from other cystic lesions of the pancreas.[Endoscopic ultrasound in small pancreatic tumors].32 of 89 pancreatic tumors examined by endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) from January 1986 to February 1990 had a diameter of 3 cm or less. The final diagnosis of a malignant (n = 28) or benign (n = 4) pancreatic neoplasma was achieved by operation, puncture or autopsy. The accuracy of EUS (100%) was higher than for ultrasound (61%), computed tomography (64%) or endoscopic-retrograde cholangiopancreatography (84%). The echopattern of the small pancreatic carcinomas showed, compared to larger neoplasms, less often regressive changes (21 vs. 77%) and a well demarcated or smooth tumor margin (25 vs. 2%). However, it is not possible to differentiate reliably a small malignant from a benign pancreatic tumor by the echofeatures alone. Since most pancreatic tumors are large at the time of clinical presentation, they can be visualized by conventional imaging methods in most cases. EUS adds clinically important information to the diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma especially in small tumors.EUS and EUS-FNA diagnosis of suspected pancreatic cystic neoplasms: Is the sum of the parts greater than the CEA?Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) is suggested as the single most useful EUS/EUS-FNA derived test for the diagnosis of mucinous pancreatic cysts.To investigate the yield and diagnostic performance of EUS/EUS-FNA on an intention to diagnose basis and to determine the utility of the recommended CEA and amylase cut-off values.A retrospective study of a prospectively maintained database of 433 procedures performed in a 10 year period. Diagnostic performance of EUS-FNA was determined in 133 procedures with a definite diagnosis.CEA value was determined in significantly fewer procedures (58.6%) than EUS diagnosis was stated (83.4%; p < 0.0001), cyst fluid appearance recorded (89.4%) or adequate sample for cytology obtained (76.7%; p < 0.005). Median CEA was significantly higher in mucinous cysts than non-mucinous (175 ng/ml vs 3 ng/ml, p < 0.0001) and in malignant cysts compared to benign (8945 ng/ml vs 93 ng/ml, p < 0.001). On an intention-to-diagnose analysis, a CEA cut-off of 110 ng/ml was significantly less accurate (42.8%) than EUS diagnosis (67.7%), cytology (58.6%) or aspirate appearance (66.9%; p < 0.05 for all comparisons). However, the combination of EUS diagnosis, cytology and CEA provided higher sensitivity (91%), specificity (75%) and accuracy (85.7%) than each component test alone (p < 0.05 for all comparisons). Median amylase was significantly higher in benign compared to high-risk mucinous cysts ((11,429IU/L vs. 113IU/L; p < 0.05.The combination of EUS, cytology and CEA performed well. Malignant cysts had a higher CEA value than benign cysts. On an intention to diagnose basis a CEA cut-off of 110 ng/ml performed poorly.The differences in imaging features of malignant and benign branch duct type of Intraductal Papillary Mucinous Tumor.To investigate the difference in the radiological features of malignant and benign branch duct type of IPMT (Intraductal Papillary Mucinous Tumor) of the pancreas.Thirty-six patients who were referred for operation with branch duct type of IPMT of the pancreas were included in this study. All cases underwent both CT and MRI with contrast enhancement. The size of the cystic lesions, the presence and size of mural nodules, and the amount of dilatation of the MPD were assessed by two independent radiologists, and the results were compared with pathological findings.Histological examination revealed adenoma in 8 cases, AH (atypical hyperplasia) in 8 cases, CIS (carcinoma in situ) in 8 cases and invasive carcinoma in 12 cases. Patients of the malignant group were older than those in the benign group (mean age: 67 yrs vs 60 yrs, respectively), but no statistically significant (p=0.05). Males (16/4 vs 10/6) more often complained weight loss and jaundice. The malignant tumor was more frequently located in the head-body and body. Compared with the benign group, the mean sizes of the cyst, mural nodules, MPD of the malignant group were 44 mm, 13 mm, 7.5 mm and benign group were 31 mm, 5 mm, 3.5 mm respectively. All these difference are statistically significant (p<0.05). In 4 cases of the 20 in the malignant group, soft tissue suggesting spread of disease into the adjacent viscera and peritoneum was detected.Cyst size over 30 mm and mural nodule over 8 mm, irregular thick septa, dilatation of the MPD, and accompany with soft tissue mass may be helpful factors in determining malignancy.Utility of contrast-enhanced FDG-PET/CT in the clinical management of pancreatic cancer: impact on diagnosis, staging, evaluation of treatment response, and detection of recurrence.Fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG)-positron emission tomography/contrast-enhanced computed tomography (PET/CE-CT) involving whole-body scanning first by non-CE-CT and FDG-PET followed by CE-CT has been used for detailed examination of pancreatic lesions. We evaluated PET/CE-CT images with regard to differential diagnosis, staging, treatment response, and postoperative recurrence in pancreatic cancer.Positron emission tomography/CE-CT was conducted in 108 patients with pancreatic cancer and in 41 patients with other pancreatic tumor diseases.The maximum standardized uptake value (SUV(max)) overlapped in benign and malignant cases, suggesting that differential diagnosis of pancreatic tumors based on the SUV(max) is difficult. In the evaluation of staging in 31 resectable pancreatic cancer by PET/CE-CT, the diagnostic accuracy rate was more than 80% for most factors concerning local invasion and 94% for distant metastasis but only 42% for lymph node metastasis. Significant positive correlations were found between the SUV(max) and tumor size/markers, suggesting that SUV(max) may be a useful indicator for the treatment response. Regarding the diagnosis of the postoperative recurrence, PET/CE-CT correctly detected local recurrence in all the 11 cases of recurrence, whereas abdominal CE-CT detected only 7 of 11 cases, suggesting that PET/CE-CT is superior in this context.Positron emission tomography/CE-CT is useful for the clinical management of pancreatic cancer.The role of endoscopic ultrasound and cyst fluid analysis in the initial evaluation and follow-up of incidental pancreatic cystic lesions.To assess the role of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) in the initial evaluation and follow-up of incidental pancreatic cystic lesions (PCL).Retrospective analysis of patients with incidental PCL on imaging who were evaluated by EUS and had a minimal follow-up of 1 year.There were 62 patients (40 females and 22 males). The mean patient age was 67.7 years (range, 30-89). The Median follow-up was 24 months (range, 12-72). The mean PCL size was 21.6 mm. In all, 13 patients underwent surgery (20.9%). Diagnosis included a mucinous cystic tumour (7), mucinous adenocarcinoma (2), intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (1) and a cystic neuroendocrine tumour (1). The overall malignancy rate among patients who underwent surgery was 15.3% (two patients). The mean carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) level from PCL fluid analysis was also significantly higher in surgically treated group (7760) vs. the stable group (184.7) vs. the enlarging PCL group (361.1). A CEA level above 192 ng/ml predicted mucinous PCL with a sensitivity of 90%.EUS with cystic fluid analysis can be successfully used to rule out pancreatic neoplasms and to follow-up incidentally discovered PCL.Clinical utility of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration.To assess our institution's initial experience with the clinical utility of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine needle aspiration.Prospective analysis of the clinical utility of EUS-guided FNA.Fifty-three patients underwent EUS-guided FNA of 64 sites, 28 for pancreatic masses, 15 for lymph nodes, 10 for solid lesions, 7 for cystic masses, 2 for submucosal masses and 2 for perigastrointestinal fluid. A cytopathologist was present during all procedures. An average of four passes (range, one to nine) was required to make a diagnosis in the 22 patients with pancreatic malignancies. There was one possible complication among the 53 patients. In 36 of the 53 patients, the combination of diagnostic EUS findings and cytologic diagnosis made a major change in the patient's management.Because of its ability to affect patient management, EUS-guided FNA will become a more commonly used procedure, especially at oncologic centers. Since the number of fine needle passes needed for diagnosis is quite variable, it is important to have a cytopathologist participate in these procedures.FDG-PET evaluation of indeterminate pancreatic masses.The purpose of this study was to assess the ability of PET with 2-[18F]fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG) to differentiate benign from malignant pancreatic masses in patients with indeterminate findings on CT.We performed FDG-PET on 12 patients with indeterminate mass lesions and 2 patients with CT findings typical for malignancy. Eight were found to have pancreatic carcinoma and six had benign lesions. The final diagnosis was histopathologically confirmed in all patients but two with a presumed diagnosis of focal pancreatitis based on stable clinical follow-up for at least 12 months. Lesion uptake of FDG was evaluated qualitatively and semiquantitatively by determination of the standardized uptake value (SUV) RESULTS: With use of a 2.5 cutoff value for SUV, all eight malignant and four of six benign lesions were correctly categorized. Qualitative evaluation gave the same results. The two false-positive lesions had elevated SUV values of 3.4 and 3.8, respectively.Our results indicate that FDG-PET has potential value for assessing patients with CT findings that are indeterminate for pancreatic carcinoma. FDG-PET may obviate invasive diagnostic procedures in many patients with benign disease.Fluorescence cytology with 5-aminolevulinic acid in EUS-guided FNA as a method for differentiating between malignant and benign lesions (with video).EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) has been increasingly performed to obtain specimens for the pathological evaluation of patients with GI and pancreaticobiliary masses as well as lymphadenopathies of unknown origin. Photodynamic diagnosis by using 5-aminolebulinic acid (ALA) has been reported to be useful for enabling the visual differentiation between malignant and normal tissue in various cancers.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of fluorescence cytology with ALA in EUS-FNA.A prospective study.A single center.A total of 28 consecutive patients who underwent EUS-FNA for the pathological diagnosis of a pancreaticobiliary mass lesion or intra-abdominal lymphadenopathy of unknown origin.Patients were orally administered ALA 3 to 6 hours before EUS-FNA. The sample was obtained via EUS-FNA for fluorescence cytology and conventional cytology. A single gastroenterologist performed the fluorescence cytology by using fluorescence microscopy after the procedure, independently of the conventional cytology by pathologists.The accuracy of fluorescence cytology with ALA in the differentiation between benign and malignant lesions by comparing the results of fluorescence cytology with the final diagnosis.Of the 28 patients included in the study, 22 were considered as having malignant lesions and 6 patients as having benign lesions. Fluorescence cytology could correctly discriminate between benign and malignant lesions in all patients. Therefore, both the sensitivity and specificity of fluorescence cytology were 100% in our study.Fluorescence cytology was performed by only 1 gastroenterologist with a small number of patients.Fluorescence cytology with ALA in EUS-FNA may be an effective and simple method for differentiating between benign and malignant lesions.The clinical utility of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic carcinoma.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) guided fine-needle aspiration (FNA) of pancreatic lesions is being increasingly used. Our aim was to determine the safety, accuracy, and clinical utility of EUS-guided FNA in both the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer.Forty-four patients (24 men/20 women) had EUS-guided FNA of pancreatic lesions (39 head/neck, 5 body, 3 tail) and/or associated lymph nodes. The mean age was 61 (range, 28 to 88 years). The indication for EUS-guided FNA was a pancreatic lesion seen initially on CT (39%), ERCP (43%), or EUS (18%). Follow-up data were collected on all patients for mean of 14.5 months (range 1 to 33 months).CT detected only 15 of 61 (25%) focal lesions seen by EUS, Adequate specimens were obtained by EUS-guided FNA in 44 of 47 (94%) pancreatic lesions and 14 of 14 (100%) associated lymph nodes (overall adequacy was 95%). Of the 46 lesions in which specimens were adequate and a final diagnosis was available (32 malignant, 14 benign), EUS-guided FNA had a sensitivity of 92%, specificity of 100%, and diagnostic accuracy of 95% for pancreatic lesions and 83%, 100%, and 88% for lymph nodes, respectively. Six percent of pancreatic cases had inadequate specimens and, if included, lowered the sensitivity to 83%, specificity to 80%, and diagnostic accuracy to 88% for pancreatic lesions. In 3 patients with enlarged celiac nodes on EUS, EUS-guided FNA was able to make a tissue diagnosis of metastasis, which changed the preoperative staging and precluded surgery. EUS in combination with EUS-guided FNA precluded surgery in 12 of 44 (27%) and may have precluded surgery in an additional 6 of 44 (14%). EUS-guided FNA avoided the need for further diagnostic tests, thus expediting therapy in a total of 25 (57%) patients and influenced clinical decisions in 30 of 44 (68%) patients. The estimated cost savings based on surgeries avoided was approximately $3300 per patient. There was only one complication (2%), a post-FNA fever.EUS-guided FNA of the pancreas appears to be a safe and effective method that increases both the diagnostic and staging capability of EUS in pancreatic cancer. The clinical impact of EUS-guided FNA includes avoiding surgery and additional imaging studies with a substantial cost savings.Mucinous cystic neoplasms of the pancreas: imaging features and diagnostic difficulties.To review the imaging features of mucinous cystic neoplasms (MCNs) of the pancreas and to highlight difficulties in differentiating these lesions from pancreatic pseudocysts.The imaging investigations, case notes and histopathology of 13 patients who underwent surgery for an MCN of the pancreas, were reviewed.An erroneous diagnosis of a pancreatic pseudocyst had been made in five of the 13 cases and in two patients cystenterostomy had been performed. Only one patient had a documented history of acute pancreatitis although mildly elevated serum amylase levels were identified in a further five cases. CT and US correctly diagnosed a cystic pancreatic mass in all 13 patients, however cross-sectional imaging features of neoplasia, such as septae, cyst wall calcification, focal thickening of the cyst wall and papillary projections, were absent in five (38%) cases. Coexistent imaging features of chronic pancreatitis were present in five of the 13 patients and in six resected specimens. Cyst wall calcification occurred only in malignant lesions and there was no relationship between cyst size and the degree of malignancy. While ERCP, angiography, and percutaneous needle aspiration may provide additional information, the majority of these examinations were either unhelpful or even misleading.MCNs of the pancreas are frequently diagnosed and mismanaged as pancreatic pseudocysts with an associated increase in patient morbidity and mortality. Diagnostic imaging can help to distinguish MCNs from pseudocysts when there are features of neoplasia present, however, no imaging investigation can reliably differentiate the two conditions in all cases. If clinical doubt remains, it is preferable to err on the side of safety and either employ a 'wait and watch' strategy or to resect a cystic pancreatic lesion rather than drain a potentially malignant MCN.Diagnostic clues and subsequent examinations that detected small pancreatic cancer.Our aim was to investigate how 2cm or smaller pancreatic cancers were detected successfully in recent years.Diagnostic clues and subsequent examinations that detected 15 histologically confirmed 2 cm or smaller pancreatic cancers were reviewed.Diagnostic clues were imaging findings in 6 patients, symptoms in 5 and laboratory data in 4. Six of 8 patients who had risk factors of pancreatic cancer such as pancreatic cyst, dilated main pancreatic duct, pancreatitis, or diabetes had been followed-up by imaging and laboratory examinations. Five patients with extrapancreatic disease had been followed-up chiefly by laboratory examinations. The remaining 2 had neither of them. Detectabilities of pancreatic mass in US, CT and EUS were 89%, 67% and 100%, respectively; those of pancreatic mass and/or dilated main pancreatic duct were 100% in all three modalities. Cytological examination revealed adenocarcinoma preoperatively in 14 patients (93%).Small pancreatic cancer of 2 cm or smaller were suggested by symptoms, laboratory data, or imaging examinations. They were confirmed by further examinations including cytology.Puncture of solid pancreatic tumors guided by endoscopic ultrasonography: a pilot study series comparing Trucut and 19-gauge and 22-gauge aspiration needles.The aim of this prospective study was to compare endoscopic ultrasonography-guided Trucut needle biopsy (EUS-TNB) with EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy (EUS-FNAB) using 19- and 22-gauge needles for biopsy from different sites in patients with solid pancreatic cancers.Sixteen consecutive patients with masses in the uncinate process (n = 3), the head (n = 5), or the body and tail (n = 8) of the pancreas underwent both EUS-TNB and EUS-FNAB. The specimens obtained were evaluated by histopathological analysis aloneTissue specimens were obtained by Trucut needle, and by 19-gauge and 22-gauge aspiration needles in 69 %, 69 %, and 100 % of patients respectively. Sensitivity for malignancy was 69 % for all needles. Tissue sampling by Trucut and by 19-gauge aspiration needle from masses in the uncinate process was impossible. The sensitivity of the Trucut and 19-gauge aspiration needles was 100 % in the 11 patients with successful procedures. If Trucut or 19-gauge aspiration needles had been used for body and tail masses, and the 22-gauge aspiration needle for masses in the uncinate process and head, the sensitivity for malignancy would have been 81 %.EUS-TNB allows reliable tissue sampling for the diagnosis of pancreatic masses, but its use is limited to lesions in the body and tail of the pancreas. EUS-FNAB using a 22-gauge needle may be useful for accurate diagnosis in some patients with masses in the uncinate process or the head of the pancreas.A novel approach to the diagnosis of pancreatic serous cystadenoma: needle-based confocal laser endomicroscopy.The differential diagnosis of solitary pancreatic cystic lesions is frequently difficult. Needle-based confocal laser endomicroscopy (nCLE) performed during endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is a new technology enabling real-time imaging of the internal structure of such cysts. The aim of this pilot study was to identify and validate new diagnostic criteria on nCLE for pancreatic cystic lesions.A total of 31 patients with a solitary pancreatic cystic lesion of unknown diagnosis were prospectively included at three centers. EUS-FNA was combined with nCLE. The final diagnosis was based on either a stringent gold standard (surgical specimen and/or positive cytopathology) or a committee consensus. Six nonblinded investigators reviewed nCLE sequences from patients with the most stringent final diagnosis, and identified a single feature that was only present in serous cystadenoma (SCA). The findings were correlated with the pathology of archived specimens. After a training session, four blinded independent observers reviewed a separate independent video set, and the yield and interobserver agreement for the criterion were assessed.A superficial vascular network pattern visualized on nCLE was identified as the criterion. It corresponded on pathological specimen to a dense and subepithelial capillary vascularization only seen in SCA. The accuracy, sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of this sign for the diagnosis of SCA were 87 %, 69 %, 100 %, 100 %, and 82 %, respectively. Interobserver agreement was substantial (κ = 0.77).This new nCLE criterion seems highly specific for the diagnosis of SCA. The visualization of this criterion could have a direct impact on the management of patients by avoiding unnecessary surgery or follow-up.Clinicaltrials.gov NCT01563133.Comparison of EUS-guided 19-gauge Trucut needle biopsy with EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration.The accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) depends on immediate specimen review by a cytopathologist. Stromal tumors, lymphoma, and well-differentiated pancreatic cancer are difficult to diagnose on the basis of cytology alone. To overcome these limitations, a 19-gauge Trucut needle has been developed to obtain histological samples at EUS. This pilot study compares the specimen adequacy and diagnostic accuracy of EUS-guided Trucut needle biopsy (EUS-TNB) with EUS-FNA.A total of 18 patients underwent EUS-TNB and EUS-FNA. The specimen adequacy and diagnostic accuracy of the two techniques was compared. The technical performance and safety profile of the Trucut needle were also evaluated.The EUS-TNB specimen was adequate for evaluation in 15/18 patients compared with 18/18 with EUS-FNA (83 % vs. 100 %, not significant). The diagnostic accuracy of EUS-TNB was not significantly different from EUS-FNA (78 % vs. 89 %). Two complications were encountered: one patient developed mediastinitis and required surgery; another had immediate bleeding that was managed conservatively. One technical problem was encountered: the Trucut needle failed to deploy after two passes when a gastric stromal cell tumor was being biopsied.The diagnostic accuracy of the new EUS-TNB is comparable to that of EUS-FNA. In our experience, the overall efficacy and safety profile of the Trucut needle appears modest.Comparative study of diagnostic value of cytologic sampling by endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration and that by endoscopic retrograde pancreatography for the management of pancreatic mass without biliary stricture.Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) can now provide a cytopathological diagnosis of underlying pancreatic malignancy with higher success rates than endoscopic retrograde pancreatography (ERP). To determine the significance of EUS-FNA for the diagnosis of pancreatic mass without biliary stricture, the value of cytopathological diagnosis obtained by EUS-FNA was retrospectively compared with that by ERP, and the complications associated with these procedures evaluated.Eighty-three patients who were suspected to have a pancreatic mass (excluding a cystic mass), without biliary stricture on conventional ultrasound and/or computed tomography were enrolled. The EUS-FNA biopsy was performed in 53 patients and cytology utilizing ERP was performed in 30 patients.The sampling rate of adequate specimen was 100% in both groups. In the EUS-FNA group, the overall results for the available samples were sensitivity 92.9% and accuracy 94.3%. In contrast, in the ERCP group, the overall results were sensitivity 33.3% and accuracy 46.7%. There was a significant difference between the two groups (P < 0.01). With regard to complications, there was a significant difference (P < 0.01) in the frequency of post-procedure pancreatitis between the EUS-FNA group and ERP group (0%, 0/53 vs 33.3%, 10/30, respectively).Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration is safer and more accurate for the cytopathological diagnosis of suspected pancreatic masses without a biliary stricture as compared with cytology during ERP. Endoscopic ultrasonography with FNA should be considered a preferred test (prior to attempting endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography) when a cytological diagnosis of a pancreatic mass is required, especially when there is no biliary obstruction, or when emergent decompression of an obstructed biliary tree is not considered clinically necessary due to lack of signs and symptoms of cholangitis.Diagnostic value of EUS-FNA in patients suspected of having pancreatic cancer with a focal lesion on CT scan/MRI but without obstructive jaundice.Patients frequently present with suspected pancreatic neoplasm based on a focal pancreatic lesion on computed tomographic (CT) scan/magnetic resonance image (MRI) but without obstructive jaundice. We evaluated the performance characteristics of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in this patient subset.This is a retrospective analysis of a prospective database and included patients who underwent EUS-FNA at a university hospital for a focal pancreatic lesion noted on CT/MRI. Patients were excluded if (1) they had obstructive jaundice or (2) the lesion appear (seem)ed cystic on CT/MRI. The main outcome measurements were (1) prevalence of pancreatic cancer and (2) performance characteristics of EUS-FNA for identifying malignancy.In the 213 study patients, a focal pancreatic lesion was identified in 173 patients by EUS. The final diagnosis included adenocarcinoma (n=89), neuroendocrine tumor (n=14), mucinous cystadenocarcinoma (n=1), solid pseudopapillary tumor (n=2), metastases (n=4), benign cyst (n=19), pseudocyst (n=9), abscess (n=4), chronic pancreatitis (n=32), and normal pancreas (n=39). Endoscopic ultrasound-guided FNA had an accuracy of 97.6% for diagnosing malignant neoplasm, with 96.6% sensitivity, 99.0% specificity, 96.2% negative predictive value, and 99.1% positive predictive value.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided FNA is highly accurate for diagnosing malignancy in patients with a focal pancreatic lesion on CT scan/MRI but without obstructive jaundice. Endoscopic ultrasound-guided FNA can potentially be used as a definitive diagnostic test in the management of these patients.The 25-gauge EUS-FNA needle: Good for on-site but poor for off-site evaluation? Results of a randomized trial.When on-site cytopathology support is not available, EUS-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is performed for cell-block preparation to allow off-site interpretation.To identify the number of passes required to obtain a diagnostic cell block by using a 25-gauge needle for sampling pancreatic masses.Randomized trial.Tertiary care hospital.Sixty-two patients with solid pancreatic mass lesions.EUS-FNA was performed by using a 25-gauge needle. After establishing a preliminary on-site diagnosis, patients were randomized to 2 or 4 FNA passes for a cell block. A cell block was evaluated by a pathologist blinded to on-site interpretation for the presence of a tissue pellet, histological core tissue size, and diagnostic accuracy.To determine the number of passes required to obtain a diagnostic cell block with a 25-gauge FNA needle.Sixty-two patients were randomized to undergo either 2 (n = 31) or 4 (n = 31) FNA passes for a cell block. Before randomization, an on-site diagnosis was established in all 62 patients (100%). The final diagnosis was adenocarcinoma in 45 (72.6%), neuroendocrine/other tumor in 7 (11.3%), and chronic pancreatitis in 10 (16.1%). There was no difference in the presence of a tissue pellet (93.5 vs 96.8%; P = .99), the median size of the histological core (0.006 vs 0.05 mm(2); P = .12), or the presence of a diagnostic cell block (80.6 vs 80.6%; P = .99) between patients randomized to 2 or 4 FNA passes, respectively.Only pancreatic masses were evaluated.The 25-gauge FNA needle yielded a diagnostic cell block in only 81% of patients, irrespective of whether 2 or 4 FNA passes were performed. These findings have important implications for centers without on-site cytopathology services. (Clinical trial registration number NCT01809028.).EUS-guided, fine-needle aspiration biopsy using a new mechanical scanning puncture echoendoscope.A new mechanical sector scanning echoendoscope designed for EUS-guided, fine-needle aspiration biopsy (FNAB) was prospectively evaluated. The technical feasibility, safety, and histocytologic FNAB results are reported.Eighty-six patients underwent 106 FNAB procedures. The new echoendoscope has a 2.8 mm accessory channel and an elevator. Target sites: pancreas 58, lymph nodes 43, and miscellaneous lesions 5. Lesions were punctured with a 0.7 mm needle and submitted for cytologic and histologic examination. Definitive diagnosis was by surgery or clinical follow-up.The wide scanning field (250 degrees) enabled easy sonographic orientation for FNAB. Longitudinal needle visibility was "good" in 93% and 71% of transesophageal and transgastric procedures, respectively, but were compromised during most transduodenal procedures. Needle penetration of indurated pancreatic lesions failed in two patients, and in four additional patients pancreatic sampling succeeded only after a second attempt using an automated spring-loaded device. The mean number of passes was three. Ten percent of FNAB specimens were "inadequate"; excluding these, the diagnostic accuracy rate was 97%; sensitivity for malignancy was 88.5% and specificity was 100%.EUS-guided FNAB is feasible, safe, and accurate using the new mechanical puncture echoendoscope. Needle visibility needs to be improved, particularly for transduodenal FNAB.Randomized trial comparing fanning with standard technique for endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration of solid pancreatic mass lesions.The fanning technique for endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS - FNA) involves sampling multiple areas within a lesion with each pass. The aim of this study was to compare the fanning and standard techniques for EUS - FNA of solid pancreatic masses.Consecutive patients with solid pancreatic mass lesions were randomized to undergo EUS - FNA using either the standard or the fanning technique. The main outcome measure was the median number of passes required to establish diagnosis. The secondary outcome measures were the diagnostic accuracy, technical failure, and complication rate of the two techniques.Of 54 patients, 26 were randomized to the standard technique and 28 to the fanning technique. There was no difference in diagnostic accuracy (76.9 % vs. 96.4 %; P = 0.05), technical failure or complication rates (none in either cohort). There was a significant difference in both the number of passes required to establish diagnosis (median 1 [interquartile range 1 - 3] vs. 1 [1 - 1]; P = 0.02) and the percentage of patients in whom a diagnosis was achieved on pass one (57.7 % vs. 85.7 %; P = 0.02) between the standard and fanning groups, respectively.The fanning technique of FNA was superior to the standard approach because fewer passes were required to establish the diagnosis. If these promising data are confirmed by other investigators, consideration should be given to incorporating the fanning technique into routine practice of EUS - FNA. Registered at Clinical Trials.gov (NCT 01501903).Power Doppler endoscopic ultrasonography for the differential diagnosis between pancreatic cancer and pseudotumoral chronic pancreatitis.The accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration for the differential diagnosis of pancreatic masses is variable in the literature, being as low as 75% in some studies. The aim of the study was to assess the accuracy of power Doppler EUS for the differential diagnosis between pancreatic cancer and pseudotumoral chronic pancreatitis.We included 42 consecutive patients with pancreatic tumor masses (27 men and 15 women) examined by EUS between January 2002 and August 2004. Endoscopic ultrasonographic procedures included power Doppler EUS as well as EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration in all patients. Final diagnosis of pancreatic cancer was confirmed in 29 patients on the basis of a combination of information provided by imaging tests, follow-up of at least 6 months, and laparotomy in 18 patients for diagnostic or palliative reasons.Sensitivity and specificity of the absence of power Doppler signals inside the suggestive pancreatic mass were 93% and 77%, respectively, with accuracy of 88%. Moreover, the addition of the information provided by the presence of peripancreatic collaterals improved the sensitivity and specificity to 97% and 92%, with accuracy of 95%.Power Doppler EUS provides useful information for the differential diagnosis of pancreatic masses. The results were in concordance with previous studies that showed a hypovascular pattern of pancreatic carcinoma, as well as the formation of collaterals in advanced cases due to the invasion of the splenic or portal veins. Further studies of dynamic EUS with contrast agents are necessary to better characterize pancreatic masses.Endosonography-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy in the evaluation of pancreatic masses.Diagnosis of pancreatic tumors can be problematic. This study aimed to determine the performance of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy (EUS FNA) in pancreatic malignancy when prior biopsies performed by CT guidance or ERCP were negative.A total of 185 patients with known or suspected pancreatic masses were prospectively evaluated with EUS FNA. Before EUS FNA, all patients were evaluated with abdominal CT (61 with CT-guided biopsy) and 91 with ERCP (41 had brushings or biopsy).EUS had greater sensitivity than CT in detecting a mass (99% vs 57%, p < 0.0001). In 58 patients with negative CT-guided biopsies, EUS FNA had 90% sensitivity for malignancy, 50% specificity for benign disease and 84% accuracy. Similarly, in 36 patients with negative ERCP tissue sampling, results for EUS FNA were 94%, 67% and 92%, respectively. Complications were mild and infrequent (0.5%).EUS FNA of pancreatic masses safely and accurately diagnoses pancreatic malignancy when prior biopsy techniques have been unsuccessful.The utility of F-18 FDG PET/CT in the evaluation of pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm.To assess the utility of F-18 fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography (FDG PET/CT) in evaluating pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN).We included 31 patients with pancreatic IPMN who underwent F-18 FDG PET/CT and multidetector CT (MDCT). Each pancreatic lesion was classified as benign or malignant. On PET, the maximal standardized uptake value was measured in each pancreatic lesion.PET/CT was superior to MDCT in diagnosing malignant IPMN. All 22 concordant results gave accurate diagnoses. Of 9 discordant results, MDCT misdiagnosed 7 IPMNs, whereas PET/CT misinterpreted 2. Malignant IPMNs showed significantly higher maximal standardized uptake values (mean ± standard deviation, 6.7 ± 3.6) than benign IPMNs (mean ± standard deviation, 2.1 ± 1.0) (P < 0.001).F-18 FDG PET/CT outperformed MDCT in detecting malignant IPMN.Differential diagnosis of pancreatic cancer and focal pancreatitis by using EUS-guided FNA.Despite advances in diagnostic imaging techniques, the differentiation between pancreatic cancer and focal pancreatitis remains difficult. This study evaluated the effectiveness of EUS-guided FNA in the differential diagnosis between pancreatic cancer and focal pancreatitis, with particular reference to detection of the K-ras point mutation.The study included 62 consecutive patients with pancreatic ductal cancer and 15 patients with focal pancreatitis demonstrated as a pancreatic mass lesion by EUS.Sensitivity, specificity, overall accuracy, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of cytopathologic diagnosis were 82%, 100%, 86%, 100%, and 58%, respectively. Sensitivity, specificity, overall accuracy, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of histopathologic diagnosis were 44%, 100%, 55%, 100%, and 32%, respectively. The K-ras point mutation was found in 74% of pancreatic cancers and 0% of focal pancreatitis lesions. No complication of EUS-guided FNA was observed.EUS-guided FNA is useful for the differential diagnosis of pancreatic mass lesions caused by pancreatic cancer and focal pancreatitis. Analysis for the K-ras point mutation in specimens obtained by EUS-guided FNA may enhance diagnostic accuracy in indeterminate cases.Ultrasound, computed tomography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the morphologic diagnosis of pancreatic disease.From February to November 1981 the diagnostic relevance of ultrasound (US), computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) was compared prospectively in 75 patients with suspected pancreatic disease. Final diagnosis was confirmed by autopsy, surgery, clinical course, and further laboratory data. Thus it was possible to exclude pancreatic disorders in 32 patients. By ERCP we diagnosed all tumors; sensitivity was 100%. Sensitivity of US and CT were 63% each. In five cases US made the false positive diagnosis" pancreatic malignant tumor" (specificity 93%), CT and ERCP in two cases (specificity 97% each). In chronic pancreatitis specificity of US and ERCP were 100% and specificity of CT was 98%. Sensitivity of ERCP amounted to 93%, CT and US revealed 74% and 52%, respectively. We conclude that ERCP is the best morphologic diagnostic tool in differentiating chronic pancreatitis from pancreatic carcinoma. US is a good screening method and CT reveals good diagnostic results in acute pancreatitis.Mucinous cystic neoplasms of the pancreas: how much preoperative evaluation is needed?Cystic lesions of the pancreas are identified with increasing frequency by modern imaging. The mucinous cystic neoplasm (MCN) is treated with resection for its malignant potential. How much preoperative evaluation is needed before undertaking operation is frequently a diagnostic dilemma. A retrospective review of 32 patients who underwent resection of a MCN between 1994 and 2007 was performed to define the preoperative evaluation and operative treatment of MCN patients. Thirty-two patients (30 women; mean age 49) had histology-proven MCN. Twenty-seven patients had symptomatic cysts (84%). Five had a history of gallstones and/or acute pancreatitis. All patients were worked up with CT and/or MRI. Endoscopic ultrasound was performed in 14 (44%) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in six (18%). Cytology was obtained in 13 (40%). Pathology revealed 22 benign MCNs (68%), five malignant MCNs (16%), and five MCNs with borderline pathology. Preoperative workup including CT or MRI imaging and cytology suggested MCN as the lesion in 15 patients (46%). CT features by itself predicted MCN in three patients (9%). Cytology revealed another six patients (19%) with possible MCN. In this series, preoperative workup did not identify three of five patients with MCN malignancy. A preoperative diagnosis cannot be made in most patients with MCN. Operative treatment can be based on clinical presentation and CT imaging because endoscopic ultrasound and fine needle aspiration for evaluation may be misleading. Middle-aged women with cystic lesions in the tail of the pancreas without prior gallstone or pancreatitis history most typically fit the profile of the MCN patient.Use of IMP3 in identification of carcinoma in fine needle aspiration biopsies of pancreas.To evaluate insulin-like growth factor-II mRNA binding protein 3 (IMP3), which is an oncofetal RNA-binding protein expressed in pancreatic carcinomas and detectable by immunohistochemistry, in diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.We retrospectively identified 25 consecutive pancreatic endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration biopsies with available cell blocks, including 12 invasive pancreatic ductal carcinomas and 13 cases of chronic pancreatitis. Immunostains were performed on 4-microm tissue sections using standard techniques. Cytoplasmic staining of the lesional cells and nonneoplastic pancreatic tissue was evaluated, and the intensity of staining was recorded as absent, weak, moderate or strong.Eleven (92%) adenocarcinomas demonstrated staining of tumor cells with IMP3. The staining reaction was weak in 2 of 11 (18%), moderate in 5 of 11 (45%) and strong in 4 of 11 (36%) of the cases. Nonneoplastic pancreatic tissues, present in 8 of 12 carcinomas and 13 cases of chronic pancreatitis, were negative for IMP3.IMP3 is a promising new marker with high specificity and sensitivity for pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Should we do EUS/FNA on patients with pancreatic cysts? The incremental diagnostic yield of EUS over CT/MRI for prediction of cystic neoplasms.To evaluate the performance characteristics of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) compared with computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and determine the incremental diagnostic yield and accuracy of EUS with or without fine needle aspiration (FNA) over CT and MRI for prediction of neoplastic pancreatic cysts.The EUS database was queried for procedures performed for pancreatic cysts between March 2006 and January 2010. Cystic pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma, cystic pancreatic neuroendocrine tumor, mucinous cystic neoplasm, intraductal papillary neoplasm, and solid pseudopapillary neoplasm were categorized as neoplastic; pseudocysts and serous cysts were designated as nonneoplastic/low risk.Final diagnoses were established by surgery in 154 patients (mucinous cystic neoplasm/intraductal papillary neoplasm [69.4%], pancreatic neuroendocrine tumor [10%], pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma [6.4%], solid pseudopapillary neoplasm [0.6%], nonneoplastic/low risk [13.6%]). Endoscopic ultrasonography with or without FNA was superior to CT and MRI in accurately classifying a cyst as neoplastic (P < 0.0001). After CT and MRI, EUS increased the rate of correctly predicting neoplastic cysts in 43 (36%) and 27 (54%) additional cases, respectively.The incremental increase in diagnostic yield of EUS and fluid analysis over CT and MRI for prediction of a neoplastic cyst is 36% and 54%, respectively. The addition of EUS-FNA to abdominal imaging significantly increases overall accuracy for diagnosis of neoplastic pancreatic cysts.Endosonography for differentiating benign from malignant intraductal mucinous tumors of the pancreas: is the jury out?Immunostaining as an adjunct to cytology for diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Serial analysis of gene expression has helped identify several proteins that are expressed differentially in pancreatic cancer and are highly sensitive and specific for pancreatic adenocarcinoma. We evaluated if the diagnostic accuracy of pancreatic cancer from endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-fine-needle aspiration (FNA) can be improved by combined evaluation of cytology and immunostaining with these markers.This study involved the use of archived specimens from patients treated at Saint Louis University Hospital from 2002 to 2006. We identified 5 protein markers that appeared most promising from published literature. We sequentially evaluated immunostaining with these markers in (1) surgical resection specimens, (2) cell blocks from EUS-FNA, and (3) direct smears of EUS-FN aspirates. Finally, we performed a combined evaluation of cytology and immunostaining in direct smears that were difficult to interpret and required a second consultative cytologic opinion.In resection specimens, the majority of pancreatic adenocarcinomas expressed all 5 markers but fascin, maspin, and carcinoembryonic antigen-related cell adhesion molecule 6 also were expressed abnormally in normal pancreata and in chronic pancreatitis. Further evaluation therefore was limited to the other 2 markers: mesothelin and 14-3-3sigma. It was feasible and useful to perform immunostaining in cell blocks and direct smear for diagnosing pancreatic cancer. In cases requiring a second cytologic consultation, a combined evaluation of cytologic morphology and immunostaining had 90% accuracy for a pancreatic adenocarcinoma diagnosis.In conclusion, immunostaining with newer protein markers is feasible in EUS-FNA specimens and can assist cytopathologists in diagnosing pancreatic cancer. Among the currently available protein immunomarkers, a combination of mesothelin and 14-3-3sigma seems most promising, but needs to be validated in prospective studies before routine clinical use.The morphological classification of a serous cystic tumor (SCT) of the pancreas and evaluation of the preoperative diagnostic accuracy of computed tomography.Although the honeycomb microcystic type is common and typical for a serous cystic tumor (SCT), clinical and radiological features are diverse. Systematic classification of SCT subtypes is not well established. The purpose of this study was to classify the subtypes of SCT and to clarify its clinical and pathological characteristics.Clinical data from 52 patients with a pathologically confirmed SCT were prospectively collected using a standard data form. According to cyst size and multiplicity, on gross and radiological evaluation, the cysts were classified as microcystic when they were smaller than 2 cm, and macrocystic when larger than 2 cm. The microcystic tumors were subdivided into honeycomb and solid types, while the macrocystic tumors into unilocular and multilocular types based on the number of cysts.There were 22 cases with microcystic SCTs that were subclassified into the honeycomb (n = 21) and solid types (n = 1), while 30 cases were macrocystic type and were subclassified into multilocular (n = 16) and unilocular types (n = 14). There were no differences between four subtypes with regard to gender, tumor location, and size. The preoperative diagnostic accuracy of the unilocular macrocystic SCT was only 35.7%, while that of honeycomb microcystic SCT and multilocular macrocystic SCT were 81% and 87.5%, respectively (P = 0.005).Microcystic SCTs and multilocular macrocystic SCTs can be accurately diagnosed preoperatively; therefore conservative treatment and observation are possible in some cases. However, the unilocular macrocystic SCT is difficult to differentiate from the other pancreatic cystic tumors with malignant potential, therefore resection must be considered.Cystic pancreatic tumors: should we resect all of them?Pancreatic cystic tumors are relatively rare tumors and only 1% of them are malignant. They are often asymptomatic and detected as incidental findings through diagnostic imaging. Currently there are no universal guide lines for the correct clinical approach to pancreatic cystic lesions. Cross-sectional imaging demonstrates some typical morphological features that determine the pre-operative diagnosis of the pancreatic cystic lesions (serous or mucinous cystadenoma, intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms). In addition, endoscopic ultrasonography permits the collection and analysis of the fluid content. The aim of this paper is to describe our case load in the management of pancreatic cystic neoplasms and propose some criteria for choosing between surgical or conservative approaches.12 patients with pancreatic cystic neoplasms were retrospectively evaluated. They were studied using cross-sectional imaging modalities (computed tomography and magnetic resonance); endoscopic ultrasonography was performed in 7 patients.In each patient a careful evaluation of several factors (age, comorbidity, imaging features, symptoms, life expectancy) conditioned our clinical decision. Among our 12 patients, surgical resection was performed in 7 cases.The treatment of pancreatic cystic lesions is still a dilemma because even in the presence of malignant potential, pancreatic surgery remains very complicated and demolitive. Many factors need to be considered in the management of cystic pancreatic tumors. The most important include histological type, location, size, age and clinical condition of the patient.A correct multidisciplinary pre-operative diagnosis is mandatory. Surgery should only be performed in selected cases.Effect of pancreatic juice cytology and/or endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy for pancreatic tumor.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy (EUS-FNA) can now provide a cytopathological diagnosis of pancreatic malignancy with higher success rates. However, EUS-FNA cannot be carried out for lesions of minimally invasive carcinoma because they cannot be detected by endoscopic ultrasonography, and in cases of intraductal papillary mucinous carcinoma (IPMC) because of the potential for needle tract seeding. A recent study has shown that pancreatic juice cytology (PJC) is useful for diagnosing pancreatic cancer. This study's aim was to evaluate whether PJC strengthens the diagnostic power of EUS-FNA for pancreatic masses.A total of 161 patients, who were suspected to have a pancreatic mass on conventional ultrasound and/or computed tomography, was enrolled.EUS-FNA was carried out in 121 cases, and PJC was performed in 83 cases. An adequate specimen was obtained for EUS-FNA in 96.0% and for PJC in 98.9%. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy were 86.0%, 100%, 100%, 70.5%, and 89.5% for EUS-FNA, and 71.4%, 100%, 100%, 84.4%, and 88.8% for PJC, respectively. EUS-FNA and/or PJC for the diagnosis of pancreatic tumor had a sensitivity of 92.5%, specificity of 100%, positive predictive value of 100%, negative predictive value of 91.7%, and accuracy of 95.9%. The diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA and/or PJC was significantly higher than that of EUS-FNA alone or PJC alone.PJC improved the diagnostic utility of EUS-FNA for pancreatic tumor.Relationship of pancreatic mass size and diagnostic yield of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is central to discerning the diagnosis of solid pancreatic tumors through tissue acquisition. Test performance is affected by a number of factors including location of mass within the pancreas, presence of onsite cytology technologist, and number of passes with the needle. The influence of tumor size has not been well studied.The objective of the current study was to determine whether the size of mass affects the diagnostic accuracy for solid pancreatic lesions aspirated under EUS guidance.Data were collected retrospectively on all patients with solid pancreatic masses undergoing EUS-FNA from June 2003 to August 2010. The cytology samples were reported as positive, suspicious for malignancy, atypical, negative, or nondiagnostic. The gold standard for a cytological diagnosis was histological confirmation or clinical follow-up of more than 6 months with repeat imaging. Patients were divided into five groups based upon lesion size as follows: (a) less than 1 cm, (b) 1-2 cm, (c) 2-3 cm, (d) 3-4 cm, and (e) greater than 4 cm. Performance characteristics of EUS-FNA including sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were compared for each group. Accuracy was defined as the ratio of the sum of true-positive and true-negative values divided by the number of lesions.We identified 583 patients with solid pancreatic lesions in which EUS-FNA was performed and adequate cellularity was obtained (47% men, mean age 65 ± 1.4 (SE) years). Overall, 486 (83%) of lesions were pancreatic adenocarcinoma, 18 (3%) were neuroendocrine tumors, 12 (2%) were lymphomas, and 67 (12%) were benign lesions. The median size of the mass was 3 cm (range, 0.5-7 cm). A mean of 4.9 passes (range, 1-9 passes) was needed to obtain adequate samples from lesions. The overall yield of obtaining adequate samples for diagnosis was 85%. When stratified by size, the EUS-FNA sensitivity for lesions with size <1, 1-2, 2-3, 3-4, and >4 cm was 40, 75.9, 86.9, 93.2, and 91.6%, respectively; EUS-FNA sensitivity strongly correlate with tumor size (p < 0.001). Similarly, the accuracy of EUS-FNA increased as lesion size increased, ranging from 47% for tumors less than 1 cm to 88% for tumors greater than 4 cm (p < 0.05). Location of tumor and number of needle passes did not significantly influence EUS-FNA performance characteristics.The sensitivity and diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA for solid pancreatic lesions is strongly correlated with tumor size. Sensitivity and accuracy decrease significantly for tumors that are smaller than 1 cm.[Role of 18F-FDG PET scan in the differential diagnosis of large pancreatic masses].Results of standard 18FDG PET and double-phase scanning were compared in the course of differential diagnosis of pancreatic cancer and chronic pseudotumorous pancreatitis, particularly, during exacerbation. PET diagnosis of cancer was confirmed in 6.5% while that of double-phase scanning--100%.Prospective comparative study of the EUS guided 25-gauge FNA needle with the 19-gauge Trucut needle and 22-gauge FNA needle in patients with solid pancreatic masses.The aim of this prospective study was to compare fine-needle aspiration guided by endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS-FNA) using 25-gauge and 22-gauge needles with the EUS-guided 19-gauge Trucut needle biopsy (EUS-TNB) in patients with solid pancreatic mass.Twenty-four consecutive patients with pancreatic mass underwent biopsies by both EUS-FNA and EUS-TNB. Three needles were compared with respect to technical success rate, tissue size obtained, overall diagnostic accuracy and accuracy for histological and cytological diagnosis.The 25-gauge EUS-FNA was technically easier and obtained superior overall diagnostic accuracy than the 22-gauge and Trucut needles, especially in lesions of the pancreas head and uncinate process. Overall accuracy for the 25-gauge, 22-gauge and Trucut needle was 91.7%, 79.7% and 54.1%, respectively. Accuracy for cytological diagnosis irrespective the site of lesions with 25-gauge, 22-gauge and Trucut needles was 91.7%, 75.0%, and 45.8%, respectively. For uncinate masses, it was 100%, 33.3%, and 0.0%, respectively. These differences were significant. Among technically successful patients, the accuracy for histological diagnosis using the 25-gauge was significantly inferior (P < 0.05) to 22-gauge and Trucut needles and the rates were 45.8%, 78.9% and 83.3%.The 25-gauge FNA needle was significantly superior in terms of technical success rate and overall diagnostic accuracy, especially for the head and uncinate lesions, compared to the 22-gauge and Trucut needles and could be considered 'the best choice needle for cytological diagnosis' of solid pancreatic lesions. If histological diagnosis is required, the 22-gauge FNA needle and Trucut needle may be advantageous for use in head/uncinate and body/tail lesions, respectively.Endoscopic ultrasound and fine needle aspiration in chronic pancreatitis: differential diagnosis between pseudotumoral masses and pancreatic cancer.Pseudotumoral chronic pancreatitis can be difficult to differentiate from pancreatic carcinoma.To evaluate the role of endoscopic ultrasound and fine needle aspiration in differentiating between inflammatory masses and malignancies in chronic pancreatitis.Retrospective study.Tertiary care endoscopy unit.Between February 1997 and December 2006, 69 pancreatic head masses from patients with alcoholic chronic pancreatitis underwent EUS-FNA using a linear echoendoscope and 22-gauge needles. Final diagnoses were obtained from surgery or clinical follow-up. The patients were subdivided into two groups: pseudotumoral chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic cancer.Pseudotumoral masses and adenocarcinoma were found in 58 and 11 patients, respectively. The size of the lesions and the clinical presentation were similar in both groups, but the cancer patients were older than the patients with pseudotumoral masses (P=0.020). Fourteen of the 58 (24.1%) pseudotumoral masses were misdiagnosed as cancers, and 4 of the 11 (36.4%) cancers were erroneously diagnosed as pseudotumoral masses when evaluated by EUS alone. EUS-FNA confirmed the final diagnosis in 66 of the 69 (95.7%) cases. Cytopathology correctly classified 8 of the 11 (72.7%) malignancies and all benign cases. Three of the 11 (27.3%) cancers were misdiagnosed as pseudotumoral masses, and no pseudotumoral mass was diagnosed as a cancer. In two cases, the specimens were inadequate for cytopathological assessment. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and the diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA were 72.7%, 100%, 100%, 95.1% and 95.7%, respectively.The diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound alone for differentiating between pseudotumoral masses and pancreatic cancer arising from chronic pancreatitis is unsatisfactory. Fine needle aspiration of these tumors significantly improves diagnostic capability.Contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasound in discrimination between focal pancreatitis and pancreatic cancer.To evaluate the contrast-enhanced endosonography as a method of differentiating inflammation from pancreatic carcinoma based on perfusion characteristics of microvessels.In 86 patients with suspected chronic pancreatitis (age: 62+/-12 years; sex: f/m 38/48), pancreatic lesions were examined by conventional endoscopic B-mode, power Doppler ultrasound and contrast-enhanced power mode (Hitachi EUB 525, SonoVue, 2.4 mL, Bracco) using the following criteria for malignant lesions: no detectable vascularisation using conventional power Doppler scanning, irregular appearance of arterial vessels over a short distance using SonoVue contrast-enhanced technique and no detectable venous vessels inside the lesion. A malignant lesion was assumed if all criteria were detectable [gold standard endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine needle aspiration cytology, operation]. The criteria of chronic pancreatitis without neoplasia were defined as no detectable vascularisation before injection of SonoVue, regular appearance of vessels over a distance of at least 20 mm after injection of SonoVue and detection of arterial and venous vessels.The sensitivity and specificity of conventional EUS were 73.2% and 83.3% respectively for pancreatic cancer. The sensitivity of contrast-enhanced EUS increased to 91.1% in 51 of 56 patients with malignant pancreatic lesion and the specificity increased to 93.3% in 28 of 30 patients with chronic inflammatory pancreatic disease.Contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasound improves the differentiation between chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided sampling of solid pancreatic masses: 22-gauge aspiration versus 25-gauge biopsy needles.Biopsy needles have recently been developed to obtain both cytological and histological specimens during endoscopic ultrasound (EUS). We conducted this study to compare 22-gauge (G) fine needle aspiration (FNA) needles, which have been the most frequently used, and new 25G fine needle biopsy (FNB) needles for EUS-guided sampling of solid pancreatic masses.We conducted a retrospective cohort study of all EUS-guided sampling performed between June 2010 and October 2013. During the study period, 76 patients with pancreatic masses underwent EUS-guided sampling with a 22G FNA needle (n = 38) or a 25G FNB needle (n = 38) for diagnosis. An on-site cytopathologist was not present during the procedure. Technical success, the number of needle passes, cytological diagnostic accuracy, cytological sample quality (conventional smear and liquid-based preparation), histological diagnostic accuracy, and complications were reviewed and compared.There were no significant differences in technical success (100% for both), the mean number of needle passes (5.05 vs. 5.55, P = 0.132), or complications (0% for both) between the 22G FNA group and the 25G FNB group. The 22G FNA and 25G FNB groups exhibited comparable outcomes with respect to cytological diagnostic accuracy (97.4% vs. 89.5%, P = 0.358) and histological diagnostic accuracy (34.2% vs. 52.6%, P = 0.105). In the cytological sample quality analysis, the 25G FNB group exhibited higher scores for the amount of diagnostic cellular material present (22G FNA: 0.92 vs. 25G FNB: 1.32, P = 0.030) and the retention of appropriate architecture (22G FNA: 0.97 vs. 25G FNB: 1.42, P = 0.010) in the liquid-based preparation. The 25G FNB group showed a better histological diagnostic yield for specific tumor discrimination compared with the 22G FNA group (60 % vs. 32.4%, P = 0.018).Use of the 25G FNB needle was technically feasible, safe, efficient, and comparable to use of the standard 22G FNA needle in patients with solid pancreatic masses in the absence of an on-site cytopathologist. The cytological sample quality in the liquid-based preparation and the histological diagnostic yield for specific tumor discrimination of EUS-guided sampling using a 25G FNB needle were significantly higher than those using a 22G FNA needle.High and low negative pressure suction techniques in EUS-guided fine-needle tissue acquisition by using 25-gauge needles: a multicenter, prospective, randomized, controlled trial.EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) has a high diagnostic accuracy for pancreatic diseases. However, although most reports have typically focused on cytology, histological tissue quality has rarely been investigated. The effectiveness of EUS-FNA combined with high negative pressure (HNP) suction was recently indicated for tissue acquisition, but has not thus far been tested in a prospective, randomized clinical trial.To evaluate the adequacy of EUS-FNA with HNP for the histological diagnosis of pancreatic lesions by using 25-gauge needles.Prospective, single-blind, randomized, controlled crossover trial.Seven tertiary referral centers.Patients referred for EUS-FNA of pancreatic solid lesions. From July 2011 to April 2012, 90 patients underwent EUS-FNA of pancreatic solid masses by using normal negative pressure (NNP) and HNP with 2 respective passes. The order of the passes was randomized, and the sample adequacy, quality, and histology were evaluated by a single expert pathologist.EUS-FNA by using NNP and HNP.The adequacy of tissue acquisition and the accuracy of histological diagnoses made by using the EUS-FNA technique with HNP.We found that 72.2% (65/90) and 90% (81/90) of the specimens obtained using NNP and HNP, respectively, were adequate for histological diagnosis (P = .0003, McNemar test). For 73.3% (66/90) and 82.2% (74/90) of the specimens obtained by using NNP and HNP, respectively, an accurate diagnosis was achieved (P = .06, McNemar test). Pancreatitis developed in 1 patient after this procedure, which subsided with conservative therapy.This was a single-blinded, crossover study.Biopsy procedures that combine the EUS-FNA with HNP techniques are superior to EUS-FNA with NNP procedures for tissue acquisition. (UMIN000005939.).Factors affecting the diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) for upper gastrointestinal submucosal or extraluminal solid mass lesions.A number of potential variables are associated with the diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA). The aim of this study was to evaluate factors affecting the diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA for upper gastrointestinal submucosal or extraluminal solid lesions.Patients with such lesions who underwent EUS-FNA between January 2009 and December 2010 were studied retrospectively. Needles of 22, 25 and 19 gauge were used. The associations between the EUS-FNA results and factors such as mass location, mass size, needle size, number of needle passes, combined histologic-cytologic analysis and final diagnosis were analyzed.A total of 170 EUS-FNA procedures were performed in 158 patients with upper gastrointestinal submucosal or extraluminal solid lesions. The overall accuracy of EUS-FNA was 86.5% (147/170). The diagnostic accuracy with three or more needle passes was higher than with less than 3.0 needle passes (90.0%, 108/120 vs 78.0%, 39/50; P < 0.05). Mass location, mass size, and final diagnosis were not associated with EUS-FNA accuracy. Combined cytologic-histologic analysis had significantly higher diagnostic accuracy than either cytologic or histologic analysis alone (P < 0.001). In a subgroup of 90 patients, both 22 and 25 gauge needles were used for EUS-FNA. The overall diagnostic accuracy was similar for 25 gauge needles and 22 gauge needles (80.0% vs 78.9% P = 1.000) in this subgroup.Overall, 25 and 22 gauge needles have a similar diagnostic accuracy. Our results suggest that 3.0 or more needle passes and combined cytologic-histologic analysis enhance the diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA.Validation of a nomogram for predicting the probability of carcinoma in patients with intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm in 180 pancreatic resection patients at 3 high-volume centers.We previously published a nomogram for prediction of carcinoma in patients with intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN). The objective of the current study was to validate this nomogram in an external cohort of patients at multiple institutions.The clinical details of 180 patients with IPMN who underwent a pancreatic resection at 3 hospitals were collected. Four significant predictive factors (sex, lesion type, nodule height, and pancreatic juice cytology) were analyzed.Of the 180 patients, 66 (36.7%) had a main pancreatic duct-type IPMN and 114 (63.3%) had a branch pancreatic duct-type IPMN. The final pathological diagnosis was benign IPMN in 95 (52.8%) patients and malignant IPMN in 85 (47.2%) patients. The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve for the model was 0.760. The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve of the IPMN nomogram for prediction of malignancy was 0.747 in main pancreatic duct-type IPMN and 0.752 in branch pancreatic duct-type IPMN. The sensitivity and specificity of the model were 80.0% and 57.9%, respectively, when the predictive probability of more than 10% was used to indicate the presence of carcinoma.This nomogram for predicting the probability of carcinoma in patients with IPMN was accurate in an external validation patient cohort.Preoperative predictors of malignancy in pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms.Malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) can be predicted before surgery.Retrospective review of a prospectively collected database.Academic, urban, tertiary care hospital.Sixty-four consecutive patients with a pathological diagnosis of IPMN.All 64 patients underwent surgical intervention for IPMN between December 8, 1988, and October 16, 2002.Reliable predictors of malignancy.The 64 patients underwent 69 operations: 39 pancreaticoduodenectomies, 18 distal pancreatectomies, 7 total pancreatectomies, 4 neck and/or body pancreatectomies, and 1 cystgastrostomy with pancreatic biopsy. Twenty-three of 69 specimens were malignant-12 in situ (high-grade dysplasia) and 11 invasive. In a univariate analysis of 12 clinical signs or symptoms recorded, diabetes mellitus and jaundice showed a significant association with malignancy of IPMN. Of 24 serum chemistry studies, hematologic studies, and tumor marker analyses (in serum, bile, and pancreatic fluid), elevation of serum alkaline phosphatase and glucose levels showed correlation with malignancy. Computed tomography, ultrasound, and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography findings did not distinguish between benign and malignant tumors. Atypia on preoperative cytologic analysis was specific for malignancy (93%) but lacked the same degree of sensitivity (40% in situ, 91% invasive, and 67% overall).Malignancy of IPMNs is suggested by new-onset diabetes mellitus, jaundice, and elevations in serum glucose or alkaline phosphatase levels. Atypia on preoperative cytologic testing is the finding most predictive of malignancy. The absence of these features does not predict benign disease. These findings may help guide patient and physician decision making.Complications of endoscopic ultrasound fine needle aspiration on pancreatic cystic lesions: final results from a large prospective multicenter study.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration of pancreatic cystic lesions has been reported to have a higher complication rate than that of solid lesions, but the real complication rate is unknown. Aim of the study was to identify the complication rate of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration and related risk factors.Prospective multicenter study at four referral centres. Data were collected from January 2010 to July 2012, searching for all adverse events related to guided fine needle aspiration. All complications occurring up to day 90 were recorded.298 patients (43.9% male, mean age 63.2 ± 15.4 years) underwent endoscopic ultrasound-guided needle aspiration of pancreatic cystic lesions. Mean size was 34.1 ± 9 mm. Adverse events occurred in 18 patients (6%): mild complications in 12/18 (66.6%), and moderate complications in 6/18 (33.3%). Seven were immediate, 6 early, and 5 late. All resolved with medical therapy.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration of pancreatic cystic lesions has been found to be associated with a higher complication rate than for solid lesions; however, the risk rate is acceptable considering the complication grade and the important diagnostic role of the technique in the management of pancreatic cystic lesions.[Diagnosis of cystadenomas and cystadenocarcinomas of the pancreas. Study of 35 cases].The aims of this study were to assess the circumstances of diagnosis and accuracy of imaging procedures in patients with cystic pancreatic tumours.Thirty-five consecutive patients with cystic pancreatic tumours (serous cystadenomas: n = 19, mucinous cystadenomas: n = 9, cystadenocarcinomas: n = 7) were studied from 1988 to 1993. Respective diagnostic values of ultrasonography, endoscopic ultrasonography, CT scan and analysis of cyst fluid were evaluated.The circumstances of diagnosis were abdominal pain (74%), weight loss (23%), jaundice (8%), abdominal mass (6%), asymptomatic (6%). Initial diagnosis of cystadenoma was correctly made by ultrasonography, CT scan and endoscopic ultrasonography in 63%, 77% and 84%, and the type of cystadenoma was correctly diagnosed in 20%, 51% and 55%. A pseudocyst was falsely diagnosed in 28%, 12% and 3%, respectively. After blind review of CT scans and endoscopic ultrasonography records, the type of cystadenoma was correctly diagnosed in 82% by both procedures. Cytological examination of cyst fluid of 18 cystic tumours gave correct diagnosis in 10 cases with sufficient material. A low CEA (P < 0.002), Ca 19.9 (P < 0.003) and absence of mucins (P < 0.002) in cyst fluid was evocative of serous cystadenoma.Abdominal pain was the main circumstance of diagnosis in cases of pancreatic cystadenomas. The type of cystadenoma was correctly diagnosed in 82% by CT scan and endoscopic ultrasonography. Cytological examination, tumoural marker and mucin levels in cyst fluid were helpful for an accurate diagnosis of cystic tumours.Diagnostic utility of endoscopic ultrasound guided aspiration cytology in evaluation of pancreatic masses.To determine the sensitivity and specificity of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) guided fine needle aspiration cytology (FNAC) in the evaluation of pancreatic masses.Analytical study.Department of Pathology, Shaukat Khanum Cancer Hospital and Research Centre, from January 2006 to June 2011.Patients of either gender aged above 18 years who underwent EUS guided FNAC of pancreatic masses detected on abdominal CT, were included in the study. Biphasic abdominal CT scans were carried out for all the patients, followed by EUS guided FNAC. All material aspirated for cytologic evaluation was assessed for sample adequacy on-site, followed by formal examination for diagnostic purposes.The mean age of patients tested was 58.94 ± 12.84 years with age ranging from 23 to 78 years. Regarding gender 23/42 (54.76%) patients were male and 19/42 (45.24%) were female. Out of 42 cases, 27 (64%) cases were diagnosed as adenocarcinoma, 4 (9.5%) as benign, 4 (9.5%) as mucinous cystic neoplasm, 2 (4.7%) as chronic pancreatitis, 2 (4.7%) as non-diagnostic, 2 (4.7%) as atypical cells seen and 1 (2.38%) as non-Hodgkin's lymphoma. The results were in full concordance with radiologic findings.EUS guided FNA is an excellent procedure for evaluation of pancreatic masses. The overall sensitivity of this procedure is 89% and the specificity is 67%.Diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses by endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) with fine-needle aspiration (FNA) is increasingly being used in the staging algorithm for pancreatic carcinoma. This allows for a tissue diagnosis, which was previously difficult to obtain. The aim of this study is to assess the utility of EUS-FNA in establishing the diagnosis of solid pancreatic mass lesions in an Australian population.A retrospective review of the EUS databases of St Vincent's Hospital Melbourne and Western Hospital, Melbourne from November 2002 to May 2006 was undertaken. The focus was on patients with a solid pancreatic mass who underwent EUS-FNA. Surgical pathology or long-term follow up was used to identify false-positive or false-negative results.EUS was undertaken to investigate a solid pancreatic or distal common bile duct mass lesion in 155 patients. Seventy-two of these underwent EUS-guided FNA. Mean age was 68 years. A positive tissue diagnosis of malignancy could be made in 55 (76%). Nine (13%) had benign histology, with 8 (11%) having inadequate tissue obtained from FNA. A later tissue diagnosis of carcinoma was made in eight of those with either benign or inadequate histology, although in all cases there were EUS features diagnostic of malignancy, with FNA limited by technical difficulties. The overall utility of EUS-FNA showed a sensitivity of 87%, specificity 100%, positive predictive value 100%, negative predictive value 52% and overall accuracy 89%.EUS-FNA gives a high return for histological diagnosis of solid pancreatic mass lesions and should be part of the standard management algorithm for pancreatic carcinoma.[Benefit of PET/CT in the preoperative staging in pancreatic carcinomas].Prognosis of patients with pancreatic cancer is poor. Median survival from diagnosis without determining surgical treatment is 3-11 months, after surgical treatment between 13-20 months according to various studies. 5-year survival rate is below 5%. The only chance of cure remains a radical surgical resection. Early diagnosis and determining resectability of tumour is the most important objective in patients with pancreatic cancer. Aim of this work is to evaluate the benefits and define the role of 18F-FDG PET/CT in preoperative staging.195 patients (103 men, 92 women, mean age 66.7 year, range 32-88 years) with suspected pancreatic lesions underwent enhanced 18F-FDG PET/CT in the preoperative staging in addition to standard investigative methods (ultrasonography, contrast enhanced CT, EUS, EUS FNA). All PET/CT findings were compared with standard methods (CT, EUS, EUS FNA), with peroperative findings and definitive histology in surgical patients as the reference standards. Interpretation of the extent of the tumor defined by TNM classification. Limitations of the local resectability was advanced local stage (T4) and presence of distant metastases (M1).In 195 patients with suspected pancreatic lesions was pre-operatively performed PET/CT in the period 1/2007-3/2009. 153 patients with pancreatic cancer, of which 72 was not suitable for radical surgery because of local inoperability or a generalization of the disease. The sensitivity of PET/CT in the capture of primary lesions was 92.2%, specificity 90.5%. False negative findings in 12 patients, false-positive results occurred in 4 cases, positive predictive value (PPV) 97.2%, negative predictive value (NPV) 76.0%. In the assessment of regional lymph nodes sensitivity was 51.9%, specificity 58.3%, PPV 58.3%,NPV 51.9%. In detection of distant metastases PET/CT reached sensitivity 82.8%, specificity 97.8%, PPV 96.9%, NPV 87.0%. PET/CT found distant metastases in 12 patients, which standard methods failed to detect. Surgery was cancelled in 15 patients (15.6%) with potentially resectable tumour based on the performance of PET/CT findings and the management of treatment was changed.PET/CT is highly sensitive and specific method suitable for preoperative staging of pancreatic cancer. It improves the selection of patients for surgery, who can benefit from and reduces the number of incorrectly indicated operations.Pancreatic cancer versus chronic pancreatitis: diagnosis with CA 19-9 assessment, US, CT, and CT-guided fine-needle biopsy.The authors prospectively performed serum CA 19-9 assessment, ultrasound (US), computed tomography (CT), and CT-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy (FNAB) of the pancreas in 81 consecutive patients with suspected chronic pancreatitis or pancreatic neoplasm. The final diagnosis was pancreatic cancer in 54 patients and chronic pancreatitis in 27 patients. CA 19-9 assessment, US, CT, and FNAB were considered nondiagnostic, respectively, in 0%, 25%, 19%, and 6% of cases. When a definite diagnosis was rendered, the positive predictive value was 90% for CA 19-9 assessment, 95% for US, 98% for CT, and 100% for FNAB; the negative predictive value was, respectively, 69%, 95%, 86%, and 100%. The accuracy of all diagnostic and nondiagnostic studies was 81% for CA 19-9 assessment, 72% for US, 77% for CT, and 94% for FNAB. It is concluded that CT-guided pancreatic FNAB is the most reliable examination for enabling differential diagnosis of pancreatic cancer and chronic pancreatitis. When the pancreas is well visualized at US, the negative predictive value for pancreatic cancer is more accurate than that of CA 19-9 assessment and CT.Diagnostic accuracy of ultrasound, computed tomography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the detection of pancreatic cancer in patients with jaundice or cholestasis.A prospective study of jaundiced and/or cholestatic patients (N = 220) was carried out to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of ultrasound (US), computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the detection of pancreatic cancer. Thirty-one patients had the final diagnosis of pancreatic cancer and two patients had a cancer of the papilla of Vater. The sensitivities of US, CT and ERCP were 60%, 97%, 89% and specificities were 92%, 92%, 94%, respectively. The differences in sensitivity between US and other methods were statistically significant (US vs. CT p less than 0.01, US vs. ERCP p less than 0.05). In US studies, most false negative results were caused by unsatisfying visualization. On the basis of this study, we recommend CT as a diagnostic test of pancreatic cancer, if pancreatic cancer is suspected as a cause of jaundice and/or cholestasis.How useful are clinical, biochemical, and cross-sectional imaging features in predicting potentially malignant or malignant cystic lesions of the pancreas? Results from a single institution experience with 220 surgically treated patients.This study aims to determine the use of preoperative clinical, biochemical, and cross-sectional imaging features for predicting malignancy in cystic lesions of the pancreas (CLP).Two hundred twenty patients who underwent operations for CLP or suspected CLP were reviewed. Patients were divided into two groups, patients undergoing operations for pseudocysts and patients undergoing operations for suspected cystic neoplasms. The predictive effect of various preoperative factors on the malignant potential of CLP was evaluated.Forty-four patients with a preoperative diagnosis of pseudocysts underwent operations for complications of pseudocyst. Forty-two were confirmed pathologically to have pseudocysts, but two were found, unexpectedly, to harbor malignant lesions. One hundred seventy-six patients underwent operations for suspected pancreatic cystic neoplasms. There were 70 benign, 51 potentially malignant, and 55 malignant CLP. On multivariate analysis, three factors, ie, elevated serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) or carbohydrate antigen 19-9; cyst size > 3 cm; and presence of one or more of three morphologic features, such as solid component; peripheral calcification; and main duct dilation on cross-sectional imaging were independent predictors of malignancy. Presence of two or three of these factors had a positive predictive value of 88% in predicting a premalignant or malignant CLP.Most pancreatic pseudocysts can be accurately diagnosed preoperatively. In patients with suspected pancreatic cystic neoplasms, elevated serum CEA or carbohydrate antigen 19-9, cyst size > 3 cm, and presence of suspicious morphologic features on imaging are predictors of potentially malignant or malignant CLP. Patients with a high likelihood of a potentially malignant or malignant lesion based on these three factors should undergo operation without additional investigations.Improving cytological diagnosis of pancreatic cysts: Is it clinically necessary or just the latest fashion?Preoperative classification of pancreatic cystic neoplasms: the clinical significance of diagnostic inaccuracy.The potential for malignant transformation varies among pancreatic cystic neoplasms (PCN) subtypes. Imaging and cyst fluid analysis are used to identify premalignant or malignant cases that should undergo operative resection, but the accuracy of operative decision-making process is unclear. The objective of this study was to characterize misdiagnoses of PCN and determine how often operations are undertaken for benign, non-premalignant disease.A retrospective analysis of patients undergoing pancreatic resection for the preoperative diagnosis of PCN was undertaken. Preoperative and pathological diagnoses were compared to measure diagnostic accuracy.Between 1999 and 2011, 74 patients underwent pancreatic resection for the preoperative diagnosis of PCN. Preoperative classification of mucinous vs. non-mucinous PCN was correct in 74%. The specific preoperative PCN diagnosis was correct in 47%, but half of incorrect preoperative diagnoses were clinically equivalent to the pathological diagnoses. The likelihood that the pathological diagnosis was of higher malignant potential than the preoperative diagnosis was 7%. In 20% of cases, the preoperative diagnosis was premalignant or malignant, but the pathological diagnosis was benign. Diagnostic accuracy and the rate of undercall diagnoses and overcall operations did not change with the use of EUS or during the time period of this analysis.Precise, preoperative classification of PCN is frequently incorrect but results in appropriate clinical decision-making in three-quarters of cases. However, one in five pancreatic resections performed for PCN was for benign disease with no malignant potential. An appreciation for the rate of diagnostic inaccuracies should inform our operative management of PCN.Does on-site adequacy evaluation reduce the nondiagnostic rate in endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration of pancreatic lesions?This retrospective study compared the nondiagnostic rate for endoscopic ultrasound-guided (EUS) fine-needle aspiration (FNA) of pancreatic lesions in 2 settings: 1 with and 1 without on-site evaluation.The authors reviewed 381 consecutive cases and divided them into groups with and without on-site adequacy evaluation. For the group with on-site evaluation, cytopathology personnel prepared and evaluated Diff-Quik-stained direct smears and rinsed the remaining material in CytoLyt solution (Cytyc Corporation, Marlborough, Mass). The group without on-site evaluation was divided into 2 subgroups: the clinical team either prepared an air-dried smear for each FNA pass and then rinsed the remaining material in CytoLyt, or the entire sample was rinsed in CytoLyt. The cytologic diagnoses were reviewed and the nondiagnostic rates for each group were calculated.On-site evaluation was provided for 167 cases with a nondiagnostic rate of 25.8% (43 of 167 cases). On-site evaluation was not provided for 214 cases with a nondiagnostic rate of 24.3% (52 of 214 cases). The nondiagnostic rate for the subgroup with air-dried smears prepared by the clinical team was 25.6% (43 of 168 cases) and that for the subgroup with the entire sample rinsed in CytoLyt was 19.6% (9 of 46 cases). There were no significant statistical differences in nondiagnostic rates noted among the different groups or subgroups.The results of the current study indicate that when experienced operators perform EUS FNA of pancreatic lesions, on-site adequacy evaluation offers no benefit in reducing the nondiagnostic rate. Optimizing visualization of the sampled material by omitting the preparation of direct smears and rinsing the entire sample in liquid-based media demonstrated a trend toward improving the diagnostic rate.[CT diagnosis of pancreatic or periampullary cancer].Seventy-seven patients had abdominal computed tomography (CT) performed as part of the diagnostic work-up for suspicion of pancreatic cancer. The CT-images were reviewed by two radiologists who did not know the clinical course, the surgical procedure, or the final diagnosis. The positive predictive value of CT for the diagnosis of pancreatic or periampullary cancer was 92% (82-97%) and the negative predictive value 69% (41-89%). The 95% confidence limits of the positive predictive value of CT in staging the extent of periampullary cancer in 52 patients varied between 21-79% and 59-100%, with the lowest values in diagnosis of liver metastases. The confidence limits for the negative predictive values in staging varied between 17-56% and 67-94%, with the highest values concerning liver metastases. We conclude that CT cannot be used as the only diagnostic procedure for confirming or excluding the diagnosis of pancreatic or periampullary cancer, and that the staging of periampullary cancer by CT alone is too inaccurate for the evaluation of resectability.A microRNA-based test improves endoscopic ultrasound-guided cytologic diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in combination with cytopathology is the optimal method for diagnosis and staging of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma (PDAC) and other pancreatic lesions. Its clinical utility, however, can be limited by high rates of indeterminate or false-negative results. We aimed to develop and validate a microRNA (miRNA)-based test to improve preoperative detection of PDAC.Levels of miRNAs were analyzed in a centralized clinical laboratory by relative quantitative polymerase chain reaction in 95 formalin-fixed paraffin-embedded specimens and 228 samples collected by EUS-FNA during routine evaluations of patients with solid pancreatic masses at 4 institutions in the United States, 1 in Canada, and 1 in Poland.We developed a 5-miRNA expression classifier, consisting of MIR24, MIR130B, MIR135B, MIR148A, and MIR196, that could identify PDAC in well-characterized, formalin-fixed, paraffin-embedded specimens. Detection of PDAC in EUS-FNA samples increased from 78.8% by cytology analysis alone (95% confidence interval, 72.2%-84.5%) to 90.8% when combined with miRNA analysis (95% confidence interval, 85.6%-94.5%). The miRNA classifier correctly identified 22 additional true PDAC cases among 39 samples initially classified as benign, indeterminate, or nondiagnostic by cytology. Cytology and miRNA test results each were associated significantly with PDAC (P < .001), with positive predictive values greater than 99% (95% confidence interval, 96%-100%).We developed and validated a 5-miRNA classifier that can accurately predict which preoperative pancreatic EUS-FNA specimens contain PDAC. This test might aid in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer by reducing the number of FNAs without a definitive adenocarcinoma diagnosis, thereby reducing the number of repeat EUS-FNA procedures.Endoscopic ultrasound and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography for obstructing pancreas head masses: combined or separate procedures?Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) are complementary procedures in the evaluation of obstructive jaundice.To determine the feasibility, accuracy, and safety of the combined performance of EUS-guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) and ERCP with biliary stenting in patients with obstructive jaundice.Retrospectively reviewed data from consecutive patients presenting with obstructive jaundice due to a pancreas mass at a tertiary referral hospital between April 2002 and November 2007 who underwent combined (under the same sedation and in the same room) or separate EUS and ERCP. Procedure duration, amount of sedative medication administered, ability to achieve biliary stent placement, and the diagnostic yield of EUS-FNA were evaluated.A total of 47 patients were evaluated: 29 patients underwent combined EUS and ERCP and 18 had separate procedures (median of 5 d between procedures). Stent placement at ERCP was successful in 72% combined procedures versus 88% separate ERCP. EUS-FNA diagnosis of malignancy was positive in 91.6% combined versus 87.5% separate. The only complication was self-limited melena after a combined procedure in 1 patient. The median time for combined procedures was 75 minutes versus 50 minutes for separate EUS and 50 minutes for ERCP.Combined EUS and ERCP can be performed under the same sedation with a median 25 minute greater procedure length and similarly high yields for diagnostic EUS-FNA. A nonsignificant trend toward lower biliary stent placement success rates with combined ERCP procedures merits further study. Benefits of a combined procedure may include expedited patient evaluation and the avoidance of repeated sedation.Diagnostic evaluation of CT and ERCP based on a retrospective analysis of hepato-biliary and pancreatic diseases.A retrospective analysis was performed in order to evaluate diagnostic accuracies by computed tomography (CT) and by endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP). Materials studied were 67 lesions out of 56 cases with hepato-biliary and pancreatic diseases confirmed mainly at surgery. Diagnostic accuracy of the CT & ERCP for the hepato-biliary lesions was 59.5% & 86.5% and that of CT & ERCP for the pancreatic lesions was 60% & 80% respectively. CT scan is useful for diagnosing abscess, cyst or tumors. On the contrary, lesions which invade the hepato-biliary tract or pancreatic duct can be readily diagnosed by ERCP examination. ERCP is less useful for the diagnosis of parenchymatous lesions or infiltration of lesions into the surrounding organs. Therefore, the combined use of both CT and ERCP is important for the diagnosis of hepato-biliary or pancreatic disease.Factors determining diagnostic yield of endoscopic ultrasound guided fine-needle aspiration for pancreatic cystic lesions: a multicentre Asian study.The purpose of this study was to determine (1) the diagnostic yield for endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in patients with pancreatic cystic lesions, (2) additional value of EUS-FNA over EUS alone in the diagnosis of pancreatic cysts, and (3) diagnostic sensitivity and specificity of EUS and EUS-FNA in the subset of patients where histopathology of surgical specimens were available.All patients who underwent EUS examination for the evaluation of pancreatic cystic lesions in six Asian centres were included in the study.Of 298 patients with pancreatic cysts who underwent EUS, 132 (44.3 %) underwent FNA. In the entire cohort, pseudocysts and intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) were the predominant cystic lesions. The cytologic yield of EUS-FNA was 47 %. On univariate analysis, factors associated with higher cytologic yield included vascular involvement on EUS, presence of solid cystic component, and increased number of needle passes during EUS-FNA. On multivariate analysis, presence of solid cystic components and increased number of needle passes during EUS-FNA were associated with higher diagnostic yield of EUS-FNA. For pancreatic cysts with a solid component, the diagnostic yield of EUS-FNA increased significantly from 44 % with one pass to 78 % with more than one pass (p = 0.016). In the absence of a solid component, the diagnostic yield was 29 % with one pass and was not significantly different from the diagnostic yield of 50 % with more than one pass, p = 0.081.The cytologic yield of EUS-FNA was 47 %. When a solid component was present in the cyst, doing more than one pass during EUS-FNA increased its diagnostic yield.Volumetric and morphological analysis of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas using computed tomography and magnetic resonance imaging.The purpose of this study was to predict the malignancy of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) based on data obtained by computed tomography and magnetic resonance imaging.Sixty-nine patients with IPMN underwent computed tomography, magnetic resonance imaging, and surgery. The tumors were classified pathologically as IPMN (adenoma), IPMN (in situ carcinoma), and invasive carcinoma derived from IPMN, and analyzed morphologically for the following characteristics: tumor size, main pancreatic duct (MPD) diameter, tumor area, MPD area, tumor volume, MPD volume, and intraductal volume (tumors volume + MPD volume).Main pancreatic duct diameter (P = 0.017) and intraductal volume (P = 0.0013) showed significant differences among IPMN (adenoma), IPMN (in situ carcinoma), and invasive carcinoma derived from IPMN. When IPMN (in situ carcinoma) and invasive carcinoma derived from IPMN were classified as malignant IPMN, an MPD diameter of 6 mm or more and an intraductal volume of 10 cm or more were set as cutoff levels predictive of malignancy using receiver operating characteristic curve analysis. On the basis of these criteria, the sensitivity and specificity for identifying malignancy in MPD were 83% and 59%, and those for intraductal volume were 70% and 73%, respectively.Intraductal volume (≥10 cm) determined by volumetric analysis is useful for diagnosis of malignant IPMN.Fluid CEA in IPMNs: A useful test or the flip of a coin?Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography in cystic lesions of the pancreas.There are few reports about magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) in cystic lesions of the pancreas (KLP). For this reason, we have undertaken a prospective study evaluating the diagnostic efficiency of MRCP as compared with ultrasonography. Twenty-four patients with KLP were examined with magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), and standard and cholangiopancreatography. There were seven cases of cysts associated with acute pancreatitis, 11 patients with KLP and chronic calcifying pancreatitis, five cases of cystic neoplasms of the pancreas, and one polycystic disease of the gland. All cases were first submitted to ultrasonography, which failed to diagnose only a case of cyst associated with chronic pancreatitis depicted by MRCP. We used a GE Signa Horizon 1.5-T system (20 examinations) and a Siemens Magneton Plus 1.5-T machine (four examinations). Eleven patients were operated on. In all cases, it was possible to identify the cysts, the main pancreatic duct and the biliary tree, and verify the relationship of the cyst with neighboring organs. Communication of the cyst with the main pancreatic duct was described in five instances, but we cannot be sure that MRCP would have depicted all cyst-duct communications. The MRI and MRCP images were confirmed by surgery in the 11 operated-on cases. The diagnosis of duct alterations and small pancreatic stones in initial cases of chronic calcifying pancreatitis may be problematic. Clinical findings are very important data to be considered in the differential diagnosis of KLP. Together with the clinical data, MRCP is a very important technique in the diagnostic and therapeutic decision making of KLP. Standard magnetic resonance is advisable as part of the examination in all cases. MRCP is not invasive, is reliable if one knows its limitations, and the patient can return at once to his activities. It allows the analysis of many variables in one examination, contributing to better therapy.Diagnosis of pancreatic cancer using fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (FDG PET) --usefulness and limitations in "clinical reality".The present review will provide an overview of the literature concerning the FDG PET diagnosis of pancreatic cancer and a summary from our experience of 231 cases of pancreatic lesions. FDG PET can effectively differentiate pancreatic cancer from benign lesion with high accuracy. Newly-developed PET scanners can detect small pancreatic cancers, up to 7 mm in diameter, by their high resolution, which could make a great contribution to the early detection of resectable and potentially curable pancreatic cancers. FDG PET is useful and cost-beneficial in the pre-operative staging of pancreatic cancer because an unexpected distant metastasis can be detected by whole-body PET in about 40% of the cases, which results in avoidance of unnecessary surgical procedures. FDG PET is also useful in evaluation of the treatment effect, monitoring after the operation and detection of recurrent pancreatic cancers. However, there are some drawbacks in PET diagnosis. A relatively wide overlap has been reported between semiquantitative uptake values obtained in cancers and those in inflammatory lesions. As for false-positive cases, active and chronic pancreatitis and autoimmune pancreatitis sometimes show high FDG accumulation and mimic pancreatic cancer with a shape of focal uptake. There were 8 false negative cases in the detection of pancreatic cancer by FDG PET, up to 33 mm in diameter, mainly because of their poor cellularity in cancer tissues. In addition, there are 19% of cancer cases with a decline in FDG uptake from 1 hr to 2 hr scan. FDG PET was recently applied to and was shown to be feasible in the differential diagnosis of cystic pancreatic lesions, such as intraductal papillary mucinous tumor of the pancreas. Further investigations are required to clarify the clinical value of FDG PET in predicting prognosis of the pancreatic patients.Diagnostic ability of EUS-FNA for pancreatic solid lesions with conventional 22-gauge needle using the slow pull technique: a prospective study.Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) using the slow pull technique (SP-FNA) has recently attracted attention as an effective tissue acquisition technique. However, efficacy of SP-FNA with a 22-gauge conventional needle remains unclear. The aim of this study is to evaluate the diagnostic ability of SP-FNA with a 22-gauge needle.Patients with a pancreatic solid lesion were prospectively enrolled in this study. SP-FNA was performed at two needle passes with a 22-gauge needle. One dedicated pathologist evaluated the obtained samples in terms of quantity (Grade 0: scant; Grade 1: inadequate; Grade 2: adequate), quality (Grade 0: poor; Grade 1: moderate; Grade 2: good), and blood contamination (Grade 0: significant; Grade 1: moderate; Grade 2: low), and provided a pathological diagnosis. Additional EUS-FNA was performed by applying suction (SA-FNA). The evaluation points were as follows: diagnostic accuracy of SP-FNA compared with that of SA-FNA, and the quantity, quality, and blood contamination level of SP-FNA-obtained samples.We enrolled 40 cases. The diagnostic accuracy of SP-FNA was 90% (36/40). There was no significant difference in the accuracy between SP-FNA and SA-FNA (90% vs. 90%, p = 1.000). The samples obtained using SP-FNA were assessed as Grade 2 for quantity in 29 cases (73%), quality in 31 (78%), and blood contamination in 25 (63%).Adequate, high-quality, and unsubstantially blood-contaminated samples could be obtained using SP-FNA. The diagnostic ability of SP-FNA was 90%, which appeared to be similar to that of SA-FNA.Branch duct IPMTs: value of cross-sectional imaging in the assessment of biological behavior and follow-up.Branch duct intraductal papillary mucinous tumors (IPMTs) are increasingly being described and represent a challenge for the physician. Recent imaging modalities, especially computed tomography and magnetic resonance, allow for a correct diagnosis, but IPMTs can manifest with different degrees of cellular atypia so it is very important to be able to establish the biological behavior of the lesion. Sixty-five patients were included in this study: 29 of them underwent surgery, and the other 36 were followed with cross-sectional imaging. Among patients who underwent surgery, 11 had benign lesions and 18 had malignant lesions. Overall sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy in the diagnosis of malignancy for all the cross-sectional imaging techniques were 61%, 81%, and 69%, respectively. Among patients who were followed and had a magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatographic diagnosis of branch duct IPMT with imaging features indicative of benignity, only two showed modifications over the follow-up period. Even considering some important biases (small number of patients and relatively short follow-up), interesting conclusions can be drawn: the imaging diagnosis of malignancy can be trusted, whereas that of benignity cannot be relied upon, but if the signs of malignancy are absent, the slow growth of the lesions justifies watchful follow-up in the correct clinical setting.Endoscopic ultrasound for diagnosis and staging of pancreatic tumors.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is proving to be a useful tool for evaluation of clinically suspected pancreatic masses unsatisfactorily evaluated by other means of imaging. We reviewed the records of 19 patients who had CT and EUS performed for clinically suspected pancreatic masses. Each patient had subsequent surgical exploration. Nineteen patients (11 females and 8 males) presenting with symptoms (11 with obstructive jaundice, 6 with abdominal pain and weight loss) or incidental CT findings suspicious for pancreatic carcinoma underwent EUS for further pancreatic evaluation. All of these patients had exploratory laparotomies, with 13 pancreaticoduodenectomies, 3 distal pancreatectomies and splenectomies, 1 bypass procedure, 1 open pancreatic and hepatic biopsy showing metastatic disease, and 1 open exploration with negative fine-needle aspiration biopsy. EUS correctly identified pancreatic neoplasms in 17 of 19 cases, with two false positives. The tumors included 15 adenocarcinomas, 1 microcystic adenoma, and 1 lymphoma. Node status was correctly predicted in 9 of 12 specimens. Nine of 12 tumors had accurate tumor staging by EUS. Absence of vascular invasion was accurately predicted in 13 of 14 cases. Two patients had metastatic disease discovered at laparotomy. All 19 patients had preoperative abdominal CT scans, with six of these negative for pancreatic masses. EUS is more sensitive than CT in detecting pancreatic masses and is more accurate than CT in locally staging pancreatic tumors. This higher sensitivity is important because those patients with earlier stage tumors are the most likely to benefit from resection.The prospective randomized, controlled trial of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration using 22G and 19G aspiration needles for solid pancreatic or peripancreatic masses.A large-caliber needle such as a 19-gauge needle may help overcome the limitations of a 22-gauge needle by acquiring a larger amount of tissue sample. However, there has been no well-designed comparative study for endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) with a 19-gauge aspiration needle. We conducted this study to compare the diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA using a 19-gauge aspiration needle with that using a 22-gauge aspiration needle in patients with solid pancreatic/peripancreatic mass.From March 2007 to April 2008, a total of 117 patients (60 in a 19-gauge needle group and 57 in a 22-gauge needle group) with solid pancreatic/peripancreatic mass were included. EUS-FNA was performed using the standard technique without an on-site cytopathologist. A single, blinded cytopathologist retrospectively evaluated each set of slides.The diagnostic accuracy by intention-to-treat analysis was not significantly different (19G: 86.7% vs. 22G: 78.9%, P=0.268). However, the diagnostic accuracy by per-protocol analysis, excluding technical failures, was significantly higher in the 19-gauge needle group (94.5% vs. 78.9%, P=0.015). In the treatment-received group that included crossover cases, although the diagnostic accuracy in all cases was not significantly different (86.1% vs. 76.9%, P=0.164), that of body/tail lesion (95.0% vs. 76.7%, P=0.031) and technically successful cases (93.9% vs. 78.1%, P=0.006) were significantly higher in the 19-gauge needle group. On sample quality analysis, the amount of cellular material obtained was significantly higher in the 19-gauge needle group (P=0.033).EUS-FNA with a 19-gauge aspiration needle may be a valuable method for the diagnosis of pancreatic/peripancreatic masses when an on-site cytopathologist is not available.Incremental value of cell block preparations over conventional smears alone in the evaluation of EUS-FNA for pancreatic masses.The effectiveness of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) has been established for a definite pathological diagnosis of pancreatic solid masses. We investigated the usefulness of cell block preparations in EUS-FNA, by evaluating the added value of cell block preparations over conventional smears alone.Between March 2011 and June 2013, 61 patients were retrospectively evaluated who underwent EUS-FNA for pancreatic solid masses. Diagnostic values for diagnosing pancreatic malignancy were compared for a combination of the conventional smear and cell block (CSCB) and the conventional smear alone (CS).The addition of the cell block technique increased the sensitivity of conventional smear for diagnosing the pancreatic malignancy from 79% (CS) to 90% (CSCB, p=0.0313) and the accuracy from 81% to 91% (p=0.0313). The specificity and positive predictive value were 100% in both methods. The negative predictive value was increased from 33% (CS) to 50% (CSCB), but this difference was not statistically significant (p=0.0833).The addition of the cell block method after a conventional smear may increase the sensitivity and negative predictive value for diagnosing the pancreatic malignancy in patients with pancreatic masses who undergo EUS-FNA. Further study may be warranted to determine whether the cell block method can replace the conventional smear.Pancreatic cystic lesions: discrimination accuracy based on clinical data and high-resolution computed tomographic features.To determine the frequency of typical features of pancreatic cystic lesions on high-resolution computed tomography and the combination of features that best influences discrimination.Ten computed tomography features of 100 proven pancreatic cystic lesions were retrospectively tabulated by 2 blinded imagers. After final diagnosis was revealed, each lesion was categorized as typical or atypical. Stepwise multivariable logistic regression was used to determine which of 10 imaging and 4 clinical features significantly distinguished between benign and malignant lesions.There were 38 benign cysts and 62 cystic tumors. Serous lesions presented with greater than 6 cysts (83%) and cysts of less than 2 cm (44%). Mucinous lesions presented with cysts of 2 cm or greater (82%) and less than 6 cysts (64%). Pseudocysts, serous, and mucinous lesions presented typically in 77%, 67%, and 64% of cases, respectively. The significant variables in classifying malignant lesions are pancreatitis history, cyst size, symptoms, and calcification pattern (area under the curve, 0.837).Four specific imaging and clinical features in combination best predict a malignant lesion.Quantitative endoscopic ultrasound elastography: an accurate method for the differentiation of solid pancreatic masses.Qualitative endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) elastography is an accurate but subjective tool for the differential diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses. Second-generation EUS elastography allows quantitative analysis of tissue stiffness. We evaluated the accuracy of quantitative, second-generation EUS elastography in the differential diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses.The study included 86 consecutive patients who underwent EUS for the evaluation of solid pancreatic masses. EUS elastography was performed with the linear Pentax EUS and the Hitachi EUB900. Representative areas from the mass (A) and soft reference areas (B) were analyzed. The result of the elastographic evaluation was defined by the quotient B/A (strain ratio). Final diagnosis was based on histology of surgical specimens and cytology of EUS-fine-needle aspiration samples. The diagnostic accuracy of EUS elastography in detecting malignancy was calculated using receiver operating curve analysis.The mean size of the pancreatic masses was 31.4 ± 12.3 mm. The final diagnoses were pancreatic adenocarcinoma (n = 49), inflammatory mass (n = 27), malignant neuroendocrine tumor (n = 6), metastatic oat-cell lung cancer (n = 2), pancreatic lymphoma (n = 1), and pancreatic solid pseudopapillary tumor (n = 1). The strain ratio was significantly higher among patients with pancreatic malignant tumors compared with those with inflammatory masses. The sensitivity and specificity of strain ratio for detecting pancreatic malignancies were 100% and 92.9%, respectively (area under the receiver operating curve, 0.983).Quantitative, second-generation EUS elastography is useful for differential diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses. It allows for a quantitative and objective evaluation of tissue stiffness, which indicates the malignant or benign nature of the pancreatic lesion.[18 F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography for characterization and initial staging of pancreatic tumors].To evaluate positron emission tomography (PET) with (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) for characterizing and initial staging of pancreatic tumors and to determine its impact on therapeutic strategy.This study included 24 patients with pancreatic tumor who underwent PET before treatment. Twenty-two patients had a malignant tumor and two had a benign tumor. The PET scan was performed after intravenous injection of FDG with a gamma camera. PET findings were compared with histology of the pancreatic tumor (n=24), liver metastases (n=5), peritoneal metastases (n=5), and lymph node metastases (n=5). Absence of metastasis or lymph node involvement was determined by surgery or by CT scan, ultrasonography, magnetic resonance imaging and at least two months follow-up.The sensitivity of the PET scans to identify pancreatic carcinoma was 64% (95% confidence interval 44-84%). PET scans could not be interpreted for lymph node involvement adjacent to the tumor. For liver metastases, the PET scan was positive in 3 out of 5 patients. For peritoneal metastases, the PET scan was positive in 4 out of 5 patients but was doubtful in one. There were two false positives. Among the 4 cystic tumors, the PET scan was positive for 2 malignant tumors and negative for 2 benign tumors. Surgical strategy was modified in only one of the 24 patients on the basis of PET findings.The sensitivity of PET for the diagnosis of primary malignant pancreatic tumor was found to be low. The contribution of FDG-PET to the surgical decision appears to be limited to the detection of metastases or lymph node involvement distant from the tumor, contraindicating surgery. Nevertheless, the sensitivity of FDG-PET is lower than that of laparoscopy for peritoneal metastases. Indications for PET should be included in an evaluation of therapeutic decision making and cost analysis.Small solid tumors (< or = 2 cm) of the pancreas: relative accuracy and differentiation of CT and MR imaging.To determine the relative accuracy of CT and MRI in characterization of solid pancreatic masses (< or = 2cm) and useful imaging appearance for differentiating small pancreatic duct adenocarcinoma (PDAC) from other small solid pancreatic neoplasms.CT and MRI scans of 46 patients with evidence of small pancreatic solid tumor were retrospectively evaluated, who underwent CT (n=30), MRI (n=4), or both (n=12). Two gastrointestinal radiologists independently recorded specific morphological features of tumors and the most likely diagnosis.With respect to specific histopathological characterization, CT and MRI were equally accurate. The mean number of correct diagnoses made by the two reviewers was 37.5 (88.4%) of 42 cases for CT compared to 12 (75%) of 16 cases for MRI (p=0.388). Location in the pancreatic head (p=0.000), presence of dilatation of MPD (p=0.000), presence of dilatation of CBD (p=0.001) and enhancement pattern (p=0.000) were statistically significant for differentiating PDAC from the other small solid pancreatic tumors, while pancreatic atrophy (p=0.069) was statistically inadequate for differentiation, although it gave a 96.4% specificity for the diagnosis of PDAC.CT and MRI are similarly accurate in the characterization of small solid pancreatic tumors. Small PDAC has characteristic CT and MRI findings that differentiate it from other small solid tumors.Pancreatic tissue sampling guided by EUS, CT/US, and surgery: a comparison of sensitivity and specificity.Needle aspiration of the pancreas is performed to differentiate pancreatic malignancy, focal chronic pancreatitis, and metastasis to the pancreas. Biopsies may be directed by using EUS, CT, US, or surgery. This study retrospectively compared the accuracy of EUS-guided, CT/US-guided, and surgical tissue sampling of the pancreas over a 5-year period.The records of patients undergoing pancreatic tissue sampling were reviewed for a final clinical diagnosis based on the results of cytology, histology, and clinical history. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of each technique were calculated.One hundred forty-nine tissue samples (68 EUS-guided, 70 CT/US-guided, 11 surgical) from 128 patients were compared. There was no significant difference in accuracy rates for EUS (76.4%), CT/US (81.4%), and surgically guided (81.8%) specimens. EUS was used when masses were smaller (2.6 +/- 0.1 cm) as compared with CT/US (3.4 +/- 0.2 cm, p < 0.001) and surgery (2.9 +/- 0.4 cm, p = 0.49). In univariate analyses, factors associated with greater accuracy regardless of technique were as follows: (1) older age, (2) larger size of the mass, and (3) participation by a cytologist during the procedure. A subsequent multivariate logistic regression analysis, in which the examination of the effect of each factor controls for the effect of each of the other factors, found that only older age was a significant predictor of accuracy.EUS-guided tissue sampling of pancreatic masses is as accurate as CT/US-guided sampling and surgical biopsies.Does on-site adequacy assessment by cytotechnologists improve results of EUS guided FNA of solid pancreaticobiliary lesions?Rapid onsite adequacy assessment is stated to improve the diagnostic performance of EUS-FNA.The aim of this study was to establish if the introduction of adequacy assessment performed by a biomedical scientist (cytotechnologist) to an established EUS service improved the diagnostic accuracy of EUS guided FNA of solid pancreaticobiliary lesions.This retrospective study includes all patients with solid pancreaticobiliary lesions who underwent EUS-FNA from April 2009 to September 2010. An in room cytotechnologist was present for 2 out of the 4 weekly EUS lists and therefore there were two groups identified: Group 1, cytotechnologist absent; and Group 2, cytotechnologist present.There were 82 patients in Group 1 and 97 patients in Group 2. There was no statistically significant difference in the number of passes (4.1 vs. 4.3), the inadequate aspirate rate (7.3% vs. 5.1%) or the mean size of the lesions (34.7 vs. 32.6 mm) between the groups. The accuracy, sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value in Group 1 were 89%, 88%, 100%, 100% and 50% respectively. The results in Group 2 were 91%, 90%, 100%, 100% and 69% respectively. There was no statistically significant difference between the two groups.In this study the adequacy assessment performed by a cytotechnologist did not improve the diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA. In an established EUS-FNA service with low inadequate aspirate rates, onsite adequacy assessment may not improve results of the test.Strategy for differentiating autoimmune pancreatitis from pancreatic cancer.It is of utmost importance that autoimmune pancreatitis (AIP) be differentiated from pancreatic cancer (PC) because some AIP cases undergo unnecessary laparotomy or pancreatic resection on suspicion of PC. This study aimed to develop an appropriate strategy for differentiating between AIP and PC.Clinical, serological, and radiological features of 17 AIP patients forming a masslike lesion on pancreas head and 70 patients with pancreatic head cancer were compared.Numerous findings can be used to distinguish between AIP and PC, and the following are more likely in AIP: fluctuating jaundice; elevated serum IgG4 levels; delayed enhancement of the enlarged pancreas and a capsule-like low-density rim on computed tomography; long or skipped narrowed portion with side branches of the main pancreatic duct without upstream dilatation on endoscopic retrograde pancreatography, extrapancreatic lesions, such as stenosis of the intrahepatic bile duct, salivary gland swelling, and retroperitoneal mass; and responsiveness to steroid therapy.In elderly male patients presenting with obstructive jaundice and a pancreatic mass, AIP should be considered in the differential diagnosis. Based on a combination of clinical, serological, and radiological findings, AIP can be differentiated from PC. An algorithm for management of patients with a masslike lesion on pancreas head is presented.Evaluation of pancreatic tumors with positron emission tomography and F-18 fluorodeoxyglucose: comparison with CT and US.To assess the clinical value of positron emission tomography (PET) with fluorine-18-labeled fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) for identification of pancreatic carcinoma.Forty-six patients suspected of having a pancreatic neoplasm and who were to undergo surgery prospectively underwent FDG PET, computed tomography (CT), and transabdominal ultrasound (US). Endoscopic US was performed in 40 patients. Images were independently interpreted and compared with the histopathologic findings at surgery (41 patients) or with clinical follow-up findings (five patients).In 33 of 35 patients, foci of pancreatic carcinomas (10-100 mm in diameter) were identified as an increase in FDG uptake, whereas CT, transabdominal US, and endoscopic US depicted the foci in 31, 31, and 28, cases, respectively. Among 11 benign lesions, nine showed no increased FDG uptake (specificity = 82%). Specificities of the other modalities were lower. False-positive findings were obtained in a case of chronic active pancreatitis and in a serous cystadenoma.FDG PET, which provides "biochemical" information, is accurate in identifying pancreatic carcinoma and may be a method of choice when imaging equivocal masses detected with other "anatomic" imaging studies.Fine-needle aspiration biopsy of solid pancreatic masses: comparison of CT and endoscopic sonography guidance.Imaging-guided biopsies of solid pancreatic masses are performed with either CT or endoscopic sonography at our institution. We compared test characteristics of fine-needle aspiration biopsies guided using CT with those guided using endoscopic sonography and secondarily evaluated for an effect of mass size.Of 70 solid pancreatic masses, 43 (mean size, 4.4 cm; range, 1.5-10.3 cm) underwent fine-needle (20- to 22-gauge) aspiration biopsy with CT guidance and 27 (mean size, 2.3 cm; range, 1.0-5.0 cm) underwent fine-needle (22-gauge) aspiration biopsy with endoscopic sonography guidance. The diagnostic rate, sensitivity, and negative predictive value (NPV) for each technique were compared using Fisher's exact test before and after stratifying masses by size as small (< or = 3 cm) or large (> 3 cm).The overall diagnostic rate, sensitivity, and NPV of fine-needle aspiration biopsies guided using CT (97.7%, 94.9%, and 60%, respectively) were not significantly different from those guided using endoscopic sonography (88.9%, 85%, and 57.1%, respectively). Among small masses, the diagnostic rate and sensitivity for biopsies guided using CT (100% and 100%, respectively) were not significantly different from those for biopsies guided using endoscopic sonography (90.9% and 93.8%, respectively). Among large masses, the diagnostic rate and sensitivity (96.6% and 92.3%, respectively) for biopsies guided using CT were not significantly different from those for biopsies guided using endoscopic sonography (83.3% and 50%, respectively).When biopsying solid pancreatic masses with fine needles, procedures guided with CT and those guided with endoscopic sonography have similar test characteristics regardless of mass size.Diagnosis of pancreatic cancer-EUS/FNA to the rescue?Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy of patients with suspected pancreatic cancer: diagnostic accuracy and acute and 30-day complications.The aims of this study were to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in patients with suspected pancreatic cancer, and to assess immediate, acute, and 30-day complications related to EUS-FNA.All patients with suspected pancreatic cancer were prospectively evaluated. A single gastroenterologist performed all EUS-FNAs in the presence of a cytopathologist. Immediate complications were evaluated in all patients. An experienced nurse called patients 24-72 h and 30 days after the procedure. Reference standard for the classification of the final diagnosis included: surgery (n = 48), clinical or imaging follow-up (n = 63), or death from the disease (n = 47).A total of 158 patients (mean age 62.3 yr) underwent EUS-FNA during the study period. The mean tumor size was 32 x 26 mm. The median number of passes was three (range one to 10). Of these patients, 44% had at least one failed attempt at tissue diagnosis before EUS-FNA. The sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV, and accuracy of EUS-FNA in solid pancreatic masses were 84.3%, 97%, 99%, 64%, and 84%, respectively. Immediate self-limited complications occurred in 10 of the 158 EUS-FNAs (6.3%). Of 90 patients contacted at 24-72 h, 78 patients (87%) responded. Of the 90 patients, 20 (22%) reported at least one symptom, all of which were minor except in three cases (one self-limited acute pancreatitis and two emergency room visits, one of which led to admission). In all, 83 patients were contacted at 30 days, and 82% responded. No additional or continued complications were reported.EUS-FNA is highly accurate in identifying patients with suspected pancreatic cancer, especially when other modalities have failed. Major complications after EUS-FNA are rare, and minor complications are similar to those reported for upper endoscopy. It seems that follow-up at 1 wk might capture all of the adverse events related to EUS-FNA.Preoperative local MRI-staging of patients with a suspected pancreatic mass.The aim of this study was to define the value of MRI of the pancreas for preoperative local staging of patients with a suspected pancreatic mass. Ninety-four patients (41 women, 53 men; age range 32-87 years) with a suspected pancreatic tumor underwent preoperative staging with MRI on a 1.5-T system. The MRI protocol included breath-hold MR cholangiopancreatography in turbo spin-echo technique, biphasic contrast-enhanced 3D MR angiography, and MRI of the upper abdomen with breath-hold T2-weighted half-Fourier acquired single-shot turbo spin-echo and T1-weighted fast-low-angle-shot (pre- and postcontrast) sequences. Data were collected prospectively and analyzed by two radiologists in agreement modality. Evaluation criteria were vascular involvement, resectability, and a characterization benign vs malignant. Results were compared to histopathology in 78 patients. Sixteen patients were followed-up. In 74 of 94 patients a solid tumor or an inflammation of the pancreas ( n=62) or the papilla ( n=12) was detected. In this group, MRI had a sensitivity of 98%, a specificity of 92%, and an accuracy of 96% in the characterization of malignant tumors. Regarding only the solid tumors, the positive predictive value of MRI was 87% with respect to resectability. Other pathologic findings included adenoma or inflammation of the duodenum ( n=5), carcinoma or benign stenosis of the choledochus duct ( n=7) and carcinoma of the gall bladder ( n=2). In 6 patients MRI did not depict any pathologic findings, and follow-up confirmed this interpretation. Magnetic resonance imaging allows a local preoperative staging in patients with suspected pancreatic tumor. Limitations, however, concern to the diagnostics of peritoneal and/or liver metastases.Neural network analysis of dynamic sequences of EUS elastography used for the differential diagnosis of chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic cancer.EUS elastography is a newly developed imaging procedure that characterizes the differences of hardness and strain between diseased and normal tissue.To assess the accuracy of real-time EUS elastography in pancreatic lesions.Cross-sectional feasibility study.The study group included, in total, 68 patients with normal pancreas (N = 22), chronic pancreatitis (N = 11), pancreatic adenocarcinoma (N = 32), and pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (N = 3). A subgroup analysis of 43 cases with focal pancreatic masses was also performed.A postprocessing software analysis was used to examine the EUS elastography movies by calculating hue histograms of each individual image, data that were further subjected to an extended neural network analysis to differentiate benign from malignant patterns.To differentiate normal pancreas, chronic pancreatitis, pancreatic cancer, and neuroendocrine tumors.Based on a cutoff of 175 for the mean hue histogram values recorded on the region of interest, the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of differentiation of benign and malignant masses were 91.4%, 87.9%, and 89.7%, respectively. The positive and negative predictive values were 88.9% and 90.6%, respectively. Multilayer perceptron neural networks with both one and two hidden layers of neurons (3-layer perceptron and 4-layer perceptron) were trained to learn how to classify cases as benign or malignant, and yielded an excellent testing performance of 95% on average, together with a high training performance that equaled 97% on average.A lack of the surgical standard in all cases.EUS elastography is a promising method that allows characterization and differentiation of normal pancreas, chronic pancreatitis, and pancreatic cancer. The currently developed methodology, based on artificial neural network processing of EUS elastography digitalized movies, enabled an optimal prediction of the types of pancreatic lesions. Future multicentric, randomized studies with adequate power will have to establish the clinical impact of this procedure for the differential diagnosis of focal pancreatic masses.EUS elastography for the characterization of solid pancreatic masses.Differential diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses remains a challenge. EUS elastography, by analyzing tissue stiffness of the mass, may be of help in this setting.To evaluate the different elastographic patterns of solid pancreatic masses and the diagnostic accuracy of EUS elastography for malignancy.Prospective, consecutive, descriptive study with a second blind evaluation of elastographic patterns for concordance analysis and use of a well-defined reference method for calculation of diagnostic accuracy.This study involved 130 consecutive patients with solid pancreatic masses and 20 controls with normal pancreases.EUS elastography was performed by using a linear Pentax echoendoscope and Hitachi EUB-8500 US.Elastographic patterns of solid pancreatic masses and accuracy of the technique for malignancy.Mean (SD) size of the masses was 30.9 (12.5) mm. The final diagnosis was malignant tumor in 78 patients, inflammatory mass in 42 patients, and neuroendocrine tumor in 10 patients. Four elastographic patterns were described, with a high concordance among 2 blinded investigators. A green-predominant pattern, either homogeneous or heterogeneous, excluded malignancy with a high accuracy. On the contrary, a blue-predominant pattern, either homogeneous or heterogeneous, supported the diagnosis of malignant tumor. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and overall accuracy of EUS elastography for diagnosis of malignancy were 100%, 85.5%, 90.7%, 100%, and 94.0%, respectively.Single-center study.EUS elastography is a useful tool for differential diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses. It provides specific patterns supporting the benign or malignant nature of the disease.Cytologic criteria for well differentiated adenocarcinoma of the pancreas in fine-needle aspiration biopsy specimens.Fine-needle aspiration biopsy (FNAB) of pancreatic lesions has become popular to establish a tissue diagnosis before chemotherapy and/or surgery. The diagnostic sensitivity and specificity of FNAB have improved as a result of several articles regarding cytologic criteria for pancreatic adenocarcinoma. However, false-negative and "suspicious for malignancy" rates remain relatively high, in part because of the underdiagnosis of well differentiated adenocarcinoma (WDA). Existing cytologic criteria do not specifically focus on WDA. In this study, the authors attempt to add to, redefine, and test cytologic criteria for WDA of the pancreas in FNAB specimens.The authors retrospectively reviewed the specimens of 291 consecutive computed tomography-guided FNABs of pancreatic lesions performed at the study institution between 1995 and 1999. The original cytologic diagnoses were confirmed by cell blocks (131), surgical tissue (84), or clinical follow-up. The FNAB specimens were evaluated for the presence of 10 cytologic criteria: 1) anisonucleosis, 2) nuclear membrane irregularity, 3) nuclear crowding/overlapping/three-dimensionality, 4) nuclear enlargement (if there are more than two red blood cells), 5) gap versus confluent cell spacing, 6) hyperchromasia, 7) macronucleoli, 8) mitosis, 9) chromatin clearing, and 10) necrosis.The original cytologic diagnoses were nondiagnostic in 24 cases, benign in 27, suspicious for malignancy in 15, and malignant in 225. Among the 225 malignant lesions, 74 cases were diagnosed as WDA. Cytologic criteria 1-4 were observed in 92-99% of WDA cases, whereas criteria 5-10 were present in only 7-38% of WDA cases. Six of 15 suspicious and 4 of 27 negative cases were of low cellularity but retrospectively met the cytologic criteria 1-4 for WDA (the diagnosis was confirmed on clinical follow-up).The diagnosis of pancreatic WDA can be made in FNAB specimens by the observance of anisonucleosis, nuclear membrane irregularity, nuclear crowding/overlapping/three-dimensionality, and nuclear enlargement. Necrosis, chromatin clearing, mitosis, macronucleoli, and hyperchromasia are of limited diagnostic significance because they are commonly absent in pancreatic WDA.Tumoral and nontumoral pancreas: correlation between quantitative dynamic contrast-enhanced MR imaging and histopathologic parameters.To prospectively determine whether dynamic contrast material-enhanced (DCE) magnetic resonance (MR) quantitative parameters correlate with fibrosis and microvascular density (MVD) in malignant and benign solid pancreatic focal lesions and nontumoral pancreatic tissue.The institutional review board approved the study; written informed consent was obtained. DCE MR was performed in 28 patients with surgically resectable focal pancreatic lesions. DCE MR quantitative parameters derived from one-compartment (OC) (transfer rate constant [K(trans)] and distribution fraction [ƒ]) and two-compartment (TC) (K(trans), tissue volume fraction occupied by extravascular extracellular space [v(i)], and tissue volume fraction occupied by vascular space [v(p)]) pharmacokinetic models were correlated with fibrosis content and MVD counts in focal lesions and nontumoral tissue (Spearman correlation coefficient [SCC]). Pharmacokinetic parameters were compared (Mann-Whitney test) between tumoral and nontumoral tissue. Diagnostic performance of DCE MR fibrosis detection was assessed (receiver operator characteristic curve analysis).K(trans) OC and K(trans) TC were significantly lower in primary malignant tumors compared with benign lesions (P = .023) and nontumoral pancreatic tissue downstream (P < .001) and upstream (P = .006); ƒ and v(i) were significantly higher in primary malignant tumors compared with nontumoral pancreatic tissue downstream (P = .012 and .018, respectively). Fibrosis was correlated negatively with K(trans) OC (SCC, -0.600) and K(trans) TC (SCC, -0.564) and positively with ƒ (SCC, 0.514) and v(i) (SCC, 0.464), with P < .001 (all comparisons). MVD was positively correlated with ƒ (SCC, 0.355; P = .019) and v(i) (SCC, 0.297; P = .038) but not with K(trans) OC (SCC, -0.140; P = .33) and K(trans) TC (SCC, -0.194; P = .181). Sensitivity and specificity for fibrosis detection were 65% (24 of 37) and 83% (10 of 12) for K(trans) OC (cutoff value, 0.35 min(-1)) and 76% (28 of 37) and 83% (10 of 12) for K(trans) TC (cutoff value, 0.29 min(-1)), respectively.Quantitative DCE MR parameters, derived from pharmacokinetic models in malignant and benign pancreatic solid lesions and nontumoral pancreatic tissue, were significantly correlated with fibrosis and MVD.http://radiology.rsna.org/lookup/suppl/doi:10.1148/radiol.11103515/-/DC1.Can EUS alone differentiate between malignant and benign cystic lesions of the pancreas?Differentiation of pancreatic cancer and chronic pancreatitis using computer-aided diagnosis of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) images: a diagnostic test.Differentiating pancreatic cancer (PC) from normal tissue by computer-aided diagnosis of EUS images were quite useful. The current study was designed to investigate the feasibility of using computer-aided diagnostic (CAD) techniques to extract EUS image parameters for the differential diagnosis of PC and chronic pancreatitis (CP).This study recruited 262 patients with PC and 126 patients with CP. Typical EUS images were selected from the sample sets. Texture features were extracted from the region of interest using computer-based techniques. Then the distance between class algorithm and sequential forward selection (SFS) algorithm were used for a better combination of features; and, later, a support vector machine (SVM) predictive model was built, trained, and validated. Overall, 105 features of 9 categories were extracted from the EUS images for pattern classification. Of these features, the 16 were selected as a better combination of features. Then, SVM predictive model was built and trained. The total cases were randomly divided into a training set and a testing set. The training set was used to train the SVM, and the testing set was used to evaluate the performance of the SVM. After 200 trials of randomised experiments, the average accuracy, sensitivity, specificity, the positive and negative predictive values of pancreatic cancer were 94.2±0.1749%,96.25±0.4460%, 93.38±0.2076%, 92.21±0.4249% and 96.68±0.1471%, respectively.Digital image processing and computer-aided EUS image differentiation technologies are highly accurate and non-invasive. This technology provides a kind of new and valuable diagnostic tool for the clinical determination of PC.A comparative study of endoscopic ultrasound guided fine needle aspiration with and without a stylet.Despite lack of evidence, use of a stylet during endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is assumed to improve the quality and diagnostic yield of specimens.The purpose of this study was to compare EUS-FNA specimens obtained with stylet (S+) and without stylet (S-) for: (i) cellularity, contamination, adequacy, and amount of blood and (ii) diagnostic yield of malignancy.Patients who underwent EUS-FNA of solid lesions by two experienced endosonographers at a tertiary referral center using a 22-gauge FNA needle with suction were included. Stylet was used for all EUS-FNA procedures performed between January 2006 and September 2007 and no stylet was used between October 2007 and April 2009 allowing comparison between the two techniques. Cytology slides were retrieved, de-identified and evaluated by two experienced cytopathologists blinded to FNA technique. Slides were evaluated for cellularity, degree of contamination, adequacy, amount of blood and cytologic diagnosis. Fisher's exact and unpaired t-test were used for comparative analysis.A total of 162 patients with 228 lesions were included. FNA of 106 and 122 lesions each was performed in the S+ and S- groups, respectively. FNA sites included pancreas [41 (18%)], lymph node [125 (55%)], liver [20 (9%)], adrenal [21 (9%)] and others [21 (9%)]. No significant differences in the cellularity (P=0.37), contamination (P=0.18), significant blood (P=0.42) and adequacy of specimen (P=0.45) were found between S+ and S- specimens. There was no statistically significant difference in the diagnostic yield of malignant lesions (P=0.48).The use of stylet during FNA does not appear to confer any advantage with regards to the adequacy of specimen or diagnostic yield of malignancy.EUS FNA in intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas.There is little information concerning the potential role of fine-needle aspiration guided by endoscopic ultrasonography in the pathologic diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas.Patients with an intraductal papillary mucinous tumor of the pancreas suggested by endoscopic ultrasonography underwent fine-needle aspiration guided by endoscopic ultrasonography in order to investigate the presence of mucin and/or cytologic changes consistent with this diagnosis. A group of 111 patients with other pancreatic lesions explored during the same period of time was used as a control group.Fine-needle aspiration guided by endoscopic ultrasonography was safely performed in 19 patients and supported the diagnosis in 17 of them. Nine out of the 17 patients with suspicion of intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas went to surgery and this diagnosis was confirmed in the resected specimen in all of them. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and accuracy of EUS FNA in the diagnosis of IPMT were 82%, 100%, 100%, 92% and 94% respectively.Fine-needle aspiration guided by endoscopic ultrasonography is a good technique to support the diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas and should be considered in this group of patients if pathologic confirmation is judged to be necessary.Accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration cytology on the differentiation of malignant and benign pancreatic cystic lesions: a single-center experience.The aim was to compare the use of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in cytology and the biochemical analysis of cyst fluid, together with the size of the lesion in the differentiation between benign and malignant pancreatic cystic lesions.Data of patients who underwent EUS-FNA for pancreatic cystic lesions in our center from January 2006 to October 2010 were retrospectively analyzed. The diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA was determined.Of the 56 patients, 37 (66.1%) had evaluable cytology for diagnosis and sufficient cyst fluid was available for biochemical analysis in 58.9% (33/56) of the patients. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of EUS-FNA for detecting malignancy were 63%, 100%, 100% and 85%, respectively. EUS-FNA was the most accurate diagnostic method for differentiating malignant and benign pancreatic cystic lesions (88%). Cyst fluid carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) > 365 ng/mL had a sensitivity of 100% for the detection of malignant cystic lesions.Although the rate of insufficient cyst fluid aspiration is high, the combination of cytological evaluation and CEA analysis of cyst fluid obtained by EUS-FNA is accurate in differentiating malignant cystic lesions from benign ones. Safe techniques are essential to improve the yield of cyst fluid aspiration by EUS.Differential diagnosis between chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic cancer: a prospective study of 156 patients.The aim of this study was to evaluate prospectively the efficacy of different imaging methods in differentiating between chronic pancreatitis and cancer in focal pancreatic lesions and staging of adenocarcinoma. MATERIAL AND METHODS. Between June 2005 and October 2007, 156 consecutive patients were enrolled into the prospective clinical trial. The patients were randomized into two groups. Ultrasonoscopy and endoscopic ultrasound were performed in both the groups. Group A patients were additionally examined by computed tomography and tumor marker assay, while in the group B, intraoperative ultrasonoscopy with biopsy and urgent histological examination were done. Results of each imaging technique regarding differential diagnosis and cancer stage were compared with the findings of surgical and histological examination. RESULTS. Chronic pancreatitis and adenocarcinoma were documented in 58 (37.2%) and 78 (50%) patients, respectively. The size of the lesions and clinical presentation were similar in both the groups, but cancer patients were older than patients with pancreatitis (P<0.001). Preoperatively endosonoscopy had the highest accuracy in assessing differential diagnosis (92.1%) and adenocarcinoma (91.8%), whereas computed tomography had the highest accuracy in assessing tumor size (84.5%) and transabdominal ultrasonography in assessing lymph node involvement (78.9%) and distant metastases (88.6%). Intraoperative ultrasound was the most accurate imaging technique in the assessment of differential diagnosis (100%), adenocarcinoma (98.5%), extent of primary tumor (84.8%), lymph node involvement (87.9%), and distant metastases (100%). CONCLUSIONS. In the differential diagnosis between chronic pancreatitis and adenocarcinoma, preoperative ultrasonography and intraoperative ultrasound are the best imaging methods. When ultrasonography is nondiagnostic, computed tomography and endoscopic ultrasound are alternative techniques.Core needle versus standard needle for endoscopic ultrasound-guided biopsy of solid pancreatic masses: a randomized crossover study.A new core biopsy needle for endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided sampling has recently been developed. The aim of this prospective multicenter study was to compare this needle with a standard needle in patients with solid pancreatic masses.Consecutive patients with solid pancreatic masses referred to 17 centers for EUS-guided sampling were included. Each patient had two passes with a standard 22G needle and a single pass with a 22G core needle performed in a randomized order. Samples from both needles were separately processed for liquid-based cytology and cell-block preparation and were assessed independently by two blinded expert pathologists. The primary endpoint was the accuracy of the detection of malignancy. The reference standard was based on further cytohistological analysis obtained under ultrasound or computed tomography scanning, endoscopic or surgical guidance, and/or by clinical follow-up with repeated imaging examinations for at least 12 months. The secondary endpoints were the rate of technical failure and the quality of the cytohistological samples obtained.Of the 80 patients included (49 men; mean age 67.1 ± 11.1), 87.5 % had final malignant diagnoses (adenocarcinoma n = 62, 77.5 %). There was no difference between the needles in diagnostic accuracy (standard needle 92.5 % vs. core needle 90 %; P = 0.68) or technical failure. Both pathologists found the overall sample quality significantly better for the standard needle (expert 1, P = 0.009; expert 2, P = 0.002).The diagnostic accuracy of EUS sampling for solid pancreatic masses using standard and core needles seems comparable but with a better overall histological sample quality for the former. ClinicalTrial.gov identifier: NCT01479803.Core biopsy needle versus standard aspiration needle for endoscopic ultrasound-guided sampling of solid pancreatic masses: a randomized parallel-group study.An endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine needle biopsy (EUS-FNB) device using a core biopsy needle was developed to improve diagnostic accuracy by simultaneously obtaining cytological aspirates and histological core samples. We prospectively compared the diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNB with standard EUS-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in patients with solid pancreatic masses.Between January 2012 and May 2013, consecutive patients with solid pancreatic masses were prospectively enrolled and randomized to undergo EUS-FNB using a core biopsy needle or EUS-FNA using a standard aspiration needle at a single tertiary center. The specimen was analyzed by onsite cytology, Papanicolaou-stain cytology, and histology. The main outcome measure was diagnostic accuracy for malignancy. The secondary outcome measures were: the median number of passes required to establish a diagnosis, the proportion of patients in whom the diagnosis was established with each pass, and complication rates.The overall accuracy of combining onsite cytology with Papanicolaou-stain cytology and histology was not significantly different for the FNB (n = 58) and FNA (n = 58) groups (98.3 % [95 %CI 94.9 % - 100 %] vs. 94.8 % [95 %CI 91.9 % - 100 %]; P = 0.671). Compared with FNA, FNB required a significantly lower median number of needle passes to establish a diagnosis (1.0 vs. 2.0; P < 0.001). On subgroup analysis of 111 patients with malignant lesions, the proportion of patients in whom malignancy was diagnosed on the first pass was significantly greater in the FNB group (72.7 % vs. 37.5 %; P < 0.001).The overall accuracy of FNB and FNA in patients with solid pancreatic masses was comparable; however, fewer passes were required to establish the diagnosis of malignancy using FNB.This study was registered on the UMIN Clinical Trial Registry (UMIN000014057).Differentiation of benign and malignant solid pseudopapillary neoplasms of the pancreas.The aim of this study was to investigate differential imaging features between benign and malignant solid pseudopapillary neoplasms (SPN) of the pancreas on computed tomographic and magnetic resonance imagings.Between January 2001 and January 2007, we identified 30 patients with confirmed SPN by surgery. The computed tomographic and magnetic resonance images were reviewed by 3 radiologists in consensus. Each tumor was analyzed for the following categories: location of tumor, tumor margin, proportion of solid component, morphology of capsule, growth pattern, calcification, and presence of upstream pancreatic ductal dilatation.Benign SPN usually had oval/round or smoothly lobulated margins, and malignant SPN more commonly had focal lobulated margins (P = 0.027). Presence of complete encapsulation was more frequently seen in benign SPN, whereas focal discontinuity of capsule was more commonly seen in malignant SPN (P = 0.005). There was no statistical difference between benign and malignant tumors in other imaging findings.A focal lobulated margin and a focal discontinuity of the capsule may suggest malignant SPN, whereas a round or smoothly lobulated margin and a complete encapsulation were more commonly seen in benign SPN.EUS/EUS-FNA for suspected pancreatic cancer: influence of chronic pancreatitis and clinical presentation with or without obstructive jaundice on performance characteristics.The clinical utility of EUS-FNA is debated in patients with obstructive jaundice (ObJ) because of a very high pretest probability of pancreatobiliary malignancy (PBM) and biliary stent-induced inflammation that can potentially confound EUS-FNA diagnosis. EUS-FNA also has lower accuracy in patients with underlying chronic pancreatitis (CP).Our purpose was to determine the clinical value of EUS-FNA for PBM diagnosis based on clinical presentation and presence of CP.Retrospective analysis of prospective database.University hospital.Patients who underwent EUS-FNA from 2002 to 2006 for suspected PBM based on (1) ObJ with biliary stricture or a mass lesion or (2) abnormal pancreatic imaging by CT/MRI: a focal pancreatic "mass" lesion; dilated pancreatic duct +/- common bile duct; or an enlarged head of pancreas.EUS was performed with a radial echoendoscope followed by a linear echoendoscope if a focal pancreatic lesion was identified. Fine-needle aspirates were assessed immediately by an attending cytopathologist.(1) Prevalence of cancer and (2) performance characteristics of EUS-FNA.PBM was diagnosed in 73.9% of patients with ObJ and biliary stricture or pancreatic mass, in 49.6% of patients with pancreatic mass, and in 7.0% of patients with an enlarged head of pancreas or dilated pancreatic duct +/- common bile duct. The prevalence of PBM was lower in all 3 presentations with associated CP. Both CP and presentation with ObJ lowered performance characteristics of EUS-FNA, but CP did so only in the subset of patients with ObJ. All except 1 false-negative diagnoses were due to cytologic misinterpretation.Retrospective design.Among patients with suspected PBM, the accuracy of EUS-FNA is significantly lower only in a subset of patients with ObJ with underlying CP, largely as a result of difficulty in cytologic interpretation.Characterization of malignant pancreatic cystic lesions in the background of chronic pancreatitis.Cystic lesions of the pancreas in association with chronic pancreatitis are a diagnostic and therapeutic challenge.The aim of the study was to study clinical and radiological features that may differentiate between benign and malignant cystic lesions of the pancreas and examine the indications for surgery in these patients.Retrospective case note study.Patients with concomitant cystic lesions of the pancreas and chronic pancreatitis stated in radiology reports between 1995 and 2005.Thirty-one patients were identified with alcohol-related chronic pancreatitis with a median age of 53 years (range: 27-82 years). Eight patients (26%) had deranged liver function tests and four (13%) presented a raised CA 19.9. Radiological features of cystic lesions of the pancreas included median cyst size of 3 cm (range: 0.8-10 cm), solitary cyst in 28 patients (90%) and multi-loculated in 3 patients (10%). Dilatation of the main pancreatic duct was seen in seven cases (23%). Overall, 12 patients (39%) underwent surgery, 13 patients (42%) were managed with radiological follow-up, five patients (16%) were managed conservatively and one patient (3%) was treated with chemotherapy for advanced malignancy. Overall, three cases (10%) of this series had malignant cystic lesions of the pancreas. Malignant cystic lesions of the pancreas are associated with deranged liver function tests, elevated CA 19.9, and are larger solitary cysts on imaging.The differentiation between benign and malignant cystic lesions of the pancreas remains a diagnostic challenge, although malignant cysts tend to be solitary and larger. The high prevalence of malignancy merits an aggressive approach to follow-up and early surgical intervention.The impact of prior biliary stenting on the accuracy and complication rate of endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspiration for diagnosing pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Our aim was to determine whether the presence of a biliary stent during endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) affects diagnosis and complication rates.Retrospective analysis was performed of 268 patients with pancreatic head or neck adenocarcinoma who underwent EUS-FNA at our academic medical center between 2000 and 2009. Endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspiration and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography reports, cytology results, and physicians' notes were reviewed.A total of 170 patients without stents, 87 patients with stents placed more than 1 day before EUS, and 11 patients with stents placed less than 1 day before EUS were identified. In patients without stents, the tissue diagnosis rate via EUS-FNA was 92.4% compared with a rate of 88.5% for those with stents placed more than 1 day before EUS-FNA (P=0.36). However, the patients with stents placed immediately before EUS-FNA were more likely to have indeterminate results from the EUS-FNA than the other patients were (P=0.008). Complication rates were the same among the groups.Pre-EUS stenting of biliary obstruction due to pancreatic adenocarcinoma does not influence the rate of tissue diagnosis if performed more than 1 day before EUS-FNA. Lack of immediate EUS access should not preclude stent placement in appropriate patients with malignant biliary obstruction who will undergo EUS-FNA.Proteomic mucin profiling for the identification of cystic precursors of pancreatic cancer.Pancreatic cystic lesions (PCLs) are increasingly frequent radiological incidentalomas, with a considerable proportion representing precursors of pancreatic cancer. Better diagnostic tools are required for patients to benefit from this development.To evaluate whether cyst fluid mucin expression could predict malignant potential and/or transformation in PCLs, a proteomic method was devised and prospectively evaluated in consecutive patients referred to our tertiary center for endoscopic ultrasound-guided aspiration of cystic lesions from May 2007 through November 2008 (discovery cohort) and from December 2008 through October 2012 (validation cohort). Cytology and cyst fluid carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA; premalignancy > 192 ng/mL, malignancy > 1000 ng/mL) were routinely analyzed, and samples were further processed as follows: one-dimensional gel electrophoresis, excision of high-mass areas, tryptic digestion and nano-liquid chromatography-tandem mass spectrometry, with peptide identification by Mascot software and an in-house mucin database. All diagnostic evaluations were blinded to proteomics results. Histology was required to confirm the presence/absence of malignant transformation. All statistical tests were two-sided.Proteomic mucin profiling proved statistically significantly more accurate (97.5%; 95% confidence interval [CI] = 90.3% to 99.6%) than cytology (71.4%; 95% CI = 59.8% to 80.9%; P < .001) and cyst fluid CEA (78.0%; 95% CI = 65.0% to 87.3%; P < .001) in identifying the 37 (out of 79; 46.8%) lesions with malignant potential (ie, premalignant or malignant tumors). The accuracy of proteomics was nearly identical (96.6% vs 98.0%) between the discovery (n = 29) and validation (n = 50) cohorts. Furthermore, mucin profiling predicted malignant transformation, present in 16 out of 29 (discovery cohort: 9, validation cohort: 20) lesions with available histology, with 89.7% accuracy (95% CI = 71.5% to 97.3%) (for the validation cohort only: 95.0%; 95% CI = 73.1% to 99.7%). This markedly exceeded corresponding results for cytology (51.7%; 95% CI = 32.9% to 70.1%; P = .003) and CEA (57.1%; 95% CI = 34.4% to 77.4%; P = .02).Proteomic cyst fluid mucin profiling robustly discriminates benign, premalignant, and malignant PCLs. Consequently, it may improve pancreatic cancer prevention and reduce the morbidity burden of unwarranted pancreatic surgery.Clinical utility of endoscopic ultrasound in solid pancreatic mass lesions deemed resectable by computer tomography.Appropriate surgical exploration and resection of pancreatic carcinoma depends on accurate preoperative evaluation.Determine the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound in predicting the need for surgical exploration in patients with solid pancreatic masses deemed by computer tomography to be resectable without venous grafting (absence of distant metastatic disease or major vascular involvement).All patients between March 2000 and November 2003 with focal pancreatic mass lesions deemed to be surgically resectable by computer tomography. Forty-nine patients participated (29 males, 20 females; age range: 40-86 years).Preoperative linear-array endoscopic ultrasound.Surgical pathology compared to computer tomography and endoscopic ultrasound results.Out of the 49 patients, 33 (67.3%) had pancreatic neoplasms and 16 (32.7%) had chronic pancreatitis. Endoscopic ultrasound correctly diagnosed all 16 patients with chronic pancreatitis. Endoscopic ultrasound correctly identified 18 (54.5%) of those with neoplasms as having unresectable disease while 6 (18.2%) patients were appropriately identified as resectable by endoscopic ultrasound. The remaining 9 patients (27.3%) were deemed resectable by endoscopic ultrasound, but were unresectable at the time of surgery. None of the patients were falsely designated as unresectable by endoscopic ultrasound.Endoscopic ultrasound is an important compliment to computed tomography in predicting resectability and in avoiding nontherapeutic laparotomy of solid pancreatic neoplasms. Moreover, endoscopic ultrasound classification did not discourage surgery of resectable pancreatic masses.[Diagnostic evaluation of CT and ERCP based on the retrospective analysis of operated cases with hepato-biliary and pancreatic diseases (author's transl)].Is there any clinical or radiologic feature as a preoperative marker for differentiating mass-forming pancreatitis from early-stage pancreatic adenocarcinoma?The differential diagnosis of early-stage pancreatic cancer and mass-forming pancreatitis is still unsettled. The purpose of the present study was to define the differential feature of focal mass-forming pancreatitis and malignant mass using aspects of clinical, laboratory and imaging features on pancreatogram or computed tomography (CT).Between April 1995 and May 2003, 15 patients confirmed as inflammatory mass after surgical resection for pancreatic mass and 21 patients with early-stage pancreatic adenocarcinoma among the patients diagnosed as pancreatic malignancy were included in our study. Hospital records, laboratory results, findings of imaging studies and pathological findings were reviewed retrospectively.Regarding the clinical characteristics, the history of previous pancreatitis was distinguished in group with mass-forming pancreatitis. Incidence of jaundice was higher in the group with adenocarcinoma than in the mass-forming pancreatitis group. For laboratory results, CA19-9 level and alkaline phosphatase level were significantly elevated in the malignant group. Findings such as hyperattenuation on portal venous phase of CT scans and gradual tapering stricture on pancreatogram were differential diagnostic markers between the two groups. A portion of patients with mass-forming pancreatitis demonstrated the pathologic characteristics of autoimmune pancreatitis.Our 9-year experience suggests that imaging findings such as attenuation pattern on the delayed phase of CT scan and tapering pattern of pancreatic ductal stricture on pancreatogram can help to differentiate mass-forming pancreatitis from early-stage pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Endoscopic ultrasonographic findings predict the risk of carcinoma in branch duct intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas.The preoperative diagnosis of branch duct intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) of the pancreas can be very difficult, since low-risk and high-risk lesions can be difficult to differentiate even after cytological analysis. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the preoperative diagnostic value of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in differentiating low-risk and high-risk IPMNs.We retrospectively identified 36 patients who underwent preoperative EUS for branch duct IPMNs. The pathological diagnosis after surgical resection was low-grade dysplasia (n = 26), moderate dysplasia (n = 1), high-grade dysplasia or carcinoma in situ (n = 5), and invasive carcinoma (n = 4). We divided the patients into two groups: low risk (low-grade dysplasia or moderate dysplasia) and high risk (high-grade dysplasia or carcinoma). We focused on the diameter of the cystic dilated branch duct, the main pancreatic duct, and the mural nodule as measured using the EUS findings.The cystic dilated branch duct diameter (31.5 mm vs. 41.9 mm, P = 0.0225) was significantly correlated with low-risk and high-risk IPMNs, but the main pancreatic duct diameter (5.37 mm vs. 5.44 mm, P = 0.9418) was not significantly correlated with the low-risk and high-risk IPMNs. The mural nodule diameter of the papillary protrusions (4.3 mm vs. 16.4 mm, P < 0.0001) and the width diameter of the mural nodule (5.7 mm vs. 23.2 mm, P < 0.0001) were significantly correlated with low-risk and high-risk IPMNs.The mural nodule of papillary protrusions diameter and width diameter observed using EUS was a reliable preoperative diagnostic finding capable of distinguishing low-risk and high-risk IPMNs.Dynamic telecytopathology for on-site preliminary diagnosis of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration of pancreatic masses.We evaluated dynamic telecytopathology for on-site-evaluation of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) samples of the pancreas. Realtime images of stained cytology smears were assessed by a cytopathologist while communicating with the on-site operator by telephone. A total of 55 consecutive cases was assessed; preliminary diagnoses of benign, atypical/suspicious and positive for malignancy were 69%, 7% and 24%. We also reviewed 55 consecutive cases of EUS-guided FNA of pancreas which had had conventional microscopic on-site evaluation prior to the introduction of telecytopathology. Preliminary diagnoses of benign, atypical/suspicious and positive for malignancy were 60%, 9% and 31%. The overall concordance between the preliminary and final diagnosis was 84% for telecytopathology and 87% for conventional microscopy. Neuroendocrine neoplasms and well-differentiated adenocarcinoma were diagnostically challenging for both telecytopathology and conventional microscopy. Telecytopathology was similar in accuracy of preliminary diagnosis to conventional microscopy during EUS-FNA of pancreas.Role of endoscopic ultrasound in the diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms: correlation with surgical histopathology.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) are precancerous tumors characterized by dilation of the main pancreatic duct, its side branches, or both. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the role of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) in differentiating benign and malignant IPMNs.We identified all patients between July 1996-November 2005 who underwent preoperative EUS for IPMNs. Malignancy was defined as the presence of invasive carcinoma; all other neoplasms were considered benign. The results of EUS and EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) were compared with corresponding histopathology.Seventy-four patients (38 male; mean age, 65 years) with 21 (28%) malignant and 53 (72%) benign IPMNs were identified. Sixty-five (88%) underwent EUS-FNA. Compared with benign tumors, patients with malignant IPMNs were more likely to be older (P = .011), present with jaundice (P = .03) or weight loss (P = .03), and have EUS features of a dilated main pancreatic duct (P = .0001), solid lesion (P = .0001), pancreatic ductal filling defects (P = .03), or thickened septa within any cyst (P = .02). The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of EUS-FNA for the diagnosis of malignancy were 75% (95% confidence interval [CI], 53%-89%), 91% (95% CI, 79%-97%), and 86% (95% CI, 76%-93%), respectively. Cyst or pancreatic duct fluid carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and carbohydrate antigen (CA) 19-9 did not differ between groups.Older age, jaundice and weight loss, and EUS features of a solid lesion, dilated main pancreatic duct, ductal filling defects, and thickened septa are predictive of malignancy in patients with IPMNs. EUS-FNA cytology is helpful, but cyst fluid CEA and CA 19-9 are of limited value to differentiate malignant from benign IPMNs.Comparison of endoscopic ultrasonography and multidetector computed tomography for detecting and staging pancreatic cancer.Accurate preoperative detection and staging of pancreatic cancer may identify patients with locoregional disease that is amenable to surgical resection.To compare endoscopic ultrasonography and multidetector computed tomography (CT) for the detection, staging, and resectability of known or suspected locoregional pancreatic cancer.Prospective, observational, cohort study.Single, tertiary referral hospital in Indianapolis, Indiana.120 participants with known or suspected locoregional pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasonography followed by multidetector CT was performed in all patients. Patients with known or suspected pancreatic cancer deemed potentially resectable by 1 or both tests were considered for surgery.Detection, staging, and resectability of pancreatic cancer. Surgically resected pancreatic cancer with negative microscopic histologic margins was considered resectable.Of 120 patients enrolled, 104 (87%) underwent endoscopic ultrasonography and CT. Of the 80 patients with pancreatic cancer, 27 (34%) were managed nonoperatively, and 53 (66%) treated surgically had resectable (n = 25) or unresectable (n = 28) cancer. For the 80 patients with cancer, the sensitivity of endoscopic ultrasonography (98% [95% CI, 91% to 100%]) for detecting a pancreatic mass was greater than that of CT (86% [CI, 77% to 93%]; P = 0.012). For the 53 surgical patients, endoscopic ultrasonography was superior to CT for tumor staging accuracy (67% vs. 41%; P < 0.001) but equivalent for nodal staging accuracy (44% vs. 47%; P > 0.2). Of the 25 resectable pancreatic tumors in patients recommended for surgery, endoscopic ultrasonography and CT correctly identified 88% and 92%, respectively, as resectable. Of the 28 unresectable pancreatic tumors in patients recommended for surgery, endoscopic ultrasonography and CT correctly identified 68% and 64%, respectively, as unresectable.Radiologists who read the scans and endosonographers were not blinded to previous radiographic information. Because of the modest sample size, CIs of the sensitivity estimates were sometimes wide.Compared with multidetector CT, endoscopic ultrasonography is superior for tumor detection and staging but similar for nodal staging and resectability of preoperatively suspected nonmetastatic pancreatic cancer.Role of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and EUS-guided fine needle aspiration in the diagnosis and treatment of cystic lesions of the pancreas.Cystic neoplasms of the pancreas may be inadvertently treated as benign pseudocysts in clinical practice, often without the use of cytology, cyst tumor markers, or histopathology. We assessed the utility of EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) to assist in the diagnosis and management of pancreatic cysts.All patients who had pancreatic cysts detected by EUS over a 24-month period were analyzed. Preoperative diagnosis was derived from an algorithm combining clinical history and endosonographic features. In selected cases, EUS-FNA was performed and cyst fluid aspirates were analyzed. Surgical specimens served as diagnostic standard.A total of 43 patients with pancreatic cysts underwent 45 EUS examinations. Surgical specimens were obtained from 9 patients (mucinous cystadenocarcinoma, 3; adenocarcinoma, 3; pancreatic endocrine tumor, 2; and benign cyst, 1); diagnostic EUS correctly predicted malignant cysts in 8/9 (88.9%). One case inaccurately interpreted by EUS as cystic neoplasm turned out to be a benign cyst on resection. Twenty-one patients underwent EUS-FNA. The cytologic interpretation was adenocarcinoma in 9.5% (2/21); suspicious for malignancy or atypical cells in 19.0% (4/21); benign in 66.6% (14/21); and insufficient cells in 4.8% (1/21).The information gathered from clinical history and EUS, complemented by fluid analysis after EUS-guided FNA, predicts neoplastic pancreatic cysts and assists in decision-making for medical or surgical approach.Paraduodenal pancreatitis: clinical performance of MR imaging in distinguishing from carcinoma.To evaluate the diagnostic performance of contrast material-enhanced magnetic resonance (MR) imaging for distinguishing paraduodenal pancreatitis (PDP) from pancreatic head duct adenocarcinoma (CA) in patients with diagnoses confirmed by histopathologic analysis.This retrospective study was approved by the institutional review board and is HIPAA compliant. Between July 2007 and July 2010, 47 patients who underwent Whipple procedure and MR imaging less than 60 days before surgery were identified retrospectively. Two relatively inexperienced fellowship trainees with 9 months of body fellowship training were asked to record the presence or absence of three MR imaging features: focal thickening of the second portion of the duodenum; abnormal enhancement of the second portion of the duodenum; and cystic focus in the expected region of the accessory pancreatic duct. Strict criteria for diagnosis of PDP included presence of all three imaging features. Any case that did not fulfill the criteria was classified as CA. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value for characterization of PDP was calculated for each reader with 95% confidence intervals. A κ test assessed level of agreement between readers.Each reader correctly categorized 15 of 17 (88.2%) PDP cases when all three imaging criteria were met. Alternatively, 26 of 30 (86.7%) pancreatic duct CA were correctly categorized as inconsistent with PDP. Four patients with histopathologic diagnosis of CA were incorrectly classified as PDP by each reader. Agreement between the two readers showed substantial κ agreement for the diagnosis of PDP and differentiation from pancreatic duct CA.Contrast-enhanced MR imaging may help accurately identify PDP and distinguish it from CA when strict diagnostic criteria are followed.http://radiology.rsna.org/lookup/suppl/doi:10.1148/radiol.13112056/-/DC1.EUS-guided fine needle aspiration of pancreatic cysts: a retrospective analysis of complications and their predictors.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS FNA) of pancreatic cysts is considered safe, however, data are conflicting regarding complication rates. The aim of this study was to determine the complication rate of EUS-guided pancreatic cyst aspiration and predictors of these complications.Results of pancreatic cyst EUS FNA at 2 academic institutions from March 1996 to October 2003 were reviewed. A total of 603 patients with 651 pancreatic cysts were evaluated. Complications were identified from clinic, emergency department, and discharge notes, and laboratory and radiologic data. Data collected were as follows: cyst size, location, septations, diagnosis, number of passes, needle size, status as inpatient or outpatient, performance of same-day endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), and use of prophylactic antibiotics.Complications were identified in 13 patients (2.2%, 13 of 603): 6 patients had pancreatitis, 4 patients had abdominal pain, 1 patient had a retroperitoneal bleed, 1 patient had an infection, and 1 patient had bradycardia. Twelve patients required hospitalization, with an average length of stay of 3.8 +/- 1.1 days. Type of cyst, size, presence of septations or mass, and same-day ERCP were not predictors of complications.EUS-guided pancreatic cyst aspiration carries a low complication rate similar to that reported for solid pancreatic lesions. No patient or cyst characteristics appear to be predictive of adverse events.A novel distinguishing system for the diagnosis of malignant pancreatic cystic neoplasm.To explore a simple and reliable non-invasive distinguishing system for the pre-operative evaluation of malignancy in pancreatic cystic neoplasm (PCN).This study first enrolled an observation cohort of 102 consecutive PCN patients. Demographic information, results of laboratory examinations, and computed tomography (CT) presentations were recorded and analyzed to achieve a distinguishing model/system for malignancy. A group of 21 patients was then included to validate the model/system prospectively.Based on the 11 malignancy-related features identified by univariate analysis, a distinguishing model for malignancy in PCN was established by multivariate analysis: PCN malignant score=2.967 × elevated fasting blood glucose (FBG) (≥6.16 mmol/L) ± 4.496 × asymmetrically thickened wall (or mural nodules ≥ 4 mm) ± 1.679 × septum thickening (≥2 mm)-5.134. With the optimal cut-off value selected as -2.8 in reference to the Youden index, the proposed system for malignant PCN was established: septum thickening (>2 mm), asymmetrically thickened wall (or mural nodules>4 mm), or elevated FBG (>6.16 mmol/L, accompanying commonly known malignant signs), the presence of at least one of these 3 features indicated malignancy in PCN. The accuracy, sensitivity and specificity of this system were 81.4%, 95.8% and 76.9%, respectively. MRI was performed on 32 patients, making correct prediction of malignancy explicitly in only 68.8% (22/32). The subsequent prospective validation study showed that the proposed distinguishing system had a predictive accuracy of 85.7% (18/21). Moreover, a higher model score, or aggregation of the features in the proposed system, indicated a higher grade of malignancy (carcinoma) in PCN.Elevated FBG (>6.16 mmol/L), asymmetrically thickened wall (or mural nodules>4 mm) and septum thickening (>2 mm) are of great value in differentiating the malignancy in PCN. The developed distinguishing system is reliable in the diagnosis of malignant PCN.Endoscopic ultrasound guided fine needle aspiration with fluorescence in situ hybridization analysis in 104 patients with pancreatic mass.Diagnosis of pancreatic malignancy is often based on cytological specimens collected by endoscopic ultrasound guided fine needle aspiration (EUS FNA). Several factors can decrease sensitivity of EUS FNA for pancreatic cancer: well-differentiated tumors, pancreatitis, blood, necrosis and slides with low cellularity. The objective of this study is to report on the use of fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) analysis combined with cytology in pancreatic masses.EUS database and medical records of patients referred for EUS between January 2009 through august 2013 were reviewed. Data on cytology, FISH and surgical pathology were reviewed. Surgical pathology, death or extended clinical follow-up were used to verify correct diagnosis of malignancy. FISH performed using a four-set DNA probe for chromosomes 3, 7, 17, and band 9p21 in patients with inconclusive immediate cytology reading. Sensitivity of cytology and FISH were compared.Study cohort comprised of 104 patients with FISH analysis on EUS FNA specimens of pancreatic masses (74 adenocarcinoma, 7 neuroendocrine tumor and 23 benign. Sensitivity of cytology and FISH for carcinoma was respectively: 62% and 81%. Sensitivity of FISH + cytology was 89%. The specificity of FISH and cytology was 100%. The most common abnormality on FISH was a 9p21 deletion seen in 43 patients (58%) followed by polysomy of 7 (46%). FISH detected malignancy in 23 patients with negative cytology.In patients with inconclusive immediate cytology reading, FISH is superior to cytology and improves overall sensitivity. The 9p21 deletion is the most common abnormality seen in this cohort of patients with pancreatic cancer.Cross-modality PET/CT and contrast-enhanced CT imaging for pancreatic cancer.To explore the diagnostic value of the cross-modality fusion images provided by positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) and contrast-enhanced CT (CECT) for pancreatic cancer (PC).Data from 70 patients with pancreatic lesions who underwent CECT and PET/CT examinations at our hospital from August 2010 to October 2012 were analyzed. PET/CECT for the cross-modality image fusion was obtained using TureD software. The diagnostic efficiencies of PET/CT, CECT and PET/CECT were calculated and compared with each other using a χ(2) test. P < 0.05 was considered to indicate statistical significance.Of the total 70 patients, 50 had PC and 20 had benign lesions. The differences in the sensitivity, negative predictive value (NPV), and accuracy between CECT and PET/CECT in detecting PC were statistically significant (P < 0.05 for each). In 15 of the 31 patients with PC who underwent a surgical operation, peripancreatic vessel invasion was verified. The differences in the sensitivity, positive predictive value, NPV, and accuracy of CECT vs PET/CT and PET/CECT vs PET/CT in diagnosing peripancreatic vessel invasion were statistically significant (P < 0.05 for each). In 19 of the 31 patients with PC who underwent a surgical operation, regional lymph node metastasis was verified by postsurgical histology. There was no statistically significant difference among the three methods in detecting regional lymph node metastasis (P > 0.05 for each). In 17 of the 50 patients with PC confirmed by histology or clinical follow-up, distant metastasis was confirmed. The differences in the sensitivity and NPV between CECT and PET/CECT in detecting distant metastasis were statistically significant (P < 0.05 for each).Cross-modality image fusion of PET/CT and CECT is a convenient and effective method that can be used to diagnose and stage PC, compensating for the defects of PET/CT and CECT when they are conducted individually.[Diagnosis and staging of pancreatic carcinoma: MRI versus multislice-CT -- a prospective study].To evaluate multislice-CT versus MRI in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic carcinoma in a prospective multi-reader analysis.Fifty patients with suspected pancreatic carcinoma underwent both multislice-CT (4-Row, "hydro-technique") and state-of-the-art MRI (two 1.5 T units). In correlation with histopathologic findings or in case of a non-lesion diagnosis by follow-up (6-month interval), we evaluated MRI versus CT in a multi-reader analysis (2 reader pairs) for: 1. diagnostic quality; 2. examination time; 3. accuracy of potential resectability; 4. kappa analysis of observer variations; and 5. overall diagnostic reliability.A total of 28 lesions (n = 22 malignant, n = 6 benign) were present in the cohort group versus 22 patients without a focal lesion (n = 10 pancreatitis, n = 12 no tumor). For lesion detection, CT had a sensitivity of 100/89 % (reader pair 1/2) and specificity of 77 %, and MRI had a sensitivity of 75/89 % and specificity of 77/73 %. For the subgroup of adenocarcinomas of the pancreas (n = 17), we found a sensitivity of 100 % and a specificity of 61 % for CT versus a sensitivity of 82/94 % and a specificity of 67/61 % for MRI. The accuracy for determining the resectability was 91/82 % for CT and 90/82 % for MRI. The kappa analysis showed a good correlation for CT (0.71) and a moderate correlation of both groups for MRI (0.49).CT and MRI showed comparable results in the detection of pancreatic carcinomas as well as in the determination of resectability. Chronic pancreatitis as a "tumor-like-lesion" was the major factor of a missed diagnosis. The results of multi-reader analysis for both reading groups were almost identical with a moderate to good kappa correlation. There is no reason to prefer MRI (more expensive) over CT for patients with the presumptive diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.Characterization of pancreatic cancer and intra-abdominal lymph node malignancy using spectrum analysis of endoscopic ultrasound imaging.This study assessed the ability of spectral analysis of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) RF signals acquired in humans in vivo to distinguish between (1) benign and malignant intraabdominal and mediastinal lymph nodes and (2) pancreatic cancer, chronic pancreatitis, and normal pancreas. Mean midband fit, slope, intercept, and correlation coefficient from a linear regression of the calibrated RF power spectra were computed over regions of interest defined by the endoscopist. Linear discriminant analysis was then performed to develop a classification of the resulting spectral parameters. For lymph nodes, classification based on the midband fit and intercept provided 67% sensitivity, 82% specificity, and 73% accuracy for malignant vs. benign nodes. For pancreas, classification based on midband fit and correlation coefficient provided 95% sensitivity, 93% specificity, and 93% accuracy for diseased vs. normal pancreas and 85% sensitivity, 71% specificity, and 85% accuracy for pancreatic cancer vs. chronic pancreatitis. These promising results suggest that mean spectral parameters can provide a non-invasive method to quantitatively characterize pancreatic cancer and lymph malignancy in vivo.Negative predictive value of endoscopic ultrasound in a large series of patients with a clinical suspicion of pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) has been shown to be very accurate in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer. The accuracy of EUS in predicting the absence of pancreatic cancer in a large series of patients with a clinical suspicion of pancreatic cancer is not well documented. Our aim was to determine the negative predictive value (NPV) of EUS in patients with a suspicion of pancreatic cancer.We retrospectively reviewed, from our EUS database (between January 1999 and March 2003), 693 patients who were suspected of having pancreatic cancer and had EUS examinations. A total of 155 patients were found by EUS to have a completely normal pancreas. Indications for EUS in these patients included: weight loss/abdominal pain; and/or pancreatic enlargement/fullness on computed tomography (CT); and/or bile duct/pancreatic duct narrowing on endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography; and/or an elevated CA 19-9. Follow-up information was obtained in 135/155 (87%) patients from patient phone calls and/or physician visits and/or CT scan. The mean follow-up period was 25 months (range 8-48 months).No patients developed pancreatic cancer during the follow-up period. Following the EUS examination, no work-up was required in 119/135 (88%) of patients. CT scan was performed in 16 patients at 6 months post-procedure, none of which showed a pancreatic mass. The NPV of EUS in excluding pancreatic cancer in those patients with follow-up was 100%.EUS is highly specific in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer with a NPV of 100% and obviates the need for further diagnostic testing. In patients with a clinical suspicion of pancreatic cancer, EUS should be considered as the initial diagnostic modality.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration in 179 cases: the M. D. Anderson Cancer Center experience.Recently, endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) has emerged as a diagnostic adjunct for small pancreatic lesions and abdominal and mediastinal lymph node diseases.During a 21-month period, we performed 179 EUS-FNAs in 166 consecutive patients; these data are the subject of this study. An average of 2.6 needle passes were obtained and aspiration was performed most commonly in the pancreas (162 cases, 91%). The FNA smears were reviewed using six diagnostic categories (negative for malignancy/nondiagnostic [NND], atypia, suspicious for malignancy, benign tumor/cyst, neuroendocrine neoplasm [NEN], and carcinoma). The review diagnosis was correlated with the histologic diagnosis made on resection or surgical biopsy specimens in 70 cases. Up to 17 months of clinical follow-up were sought for the cases with a negative or inconclusive FNA diagnosis and no diagnostic tissue confirmation (81 cases).The review FNA diagnoses were as follows: NND (49 cases), atypia (17 cases), suspicious for malignancy (12 cases), benign tumor/cyst excluding NEN (10 cases), NEN (6 cases), carcinoma (85 cases). Follow-up methods included resection (49 cases), surgical biopsy (21 cases), repeat FNA or brushing cytology (28 cases), and clinical follow-up only (81 cases). Of the 49 NND cases, 23 (47%) had positive follow-up results (i.e., false-negative diagnosis) that were confirmed by tissue diagnosis (resection/surgical biopsy in 11 cases [48%] and repeat FNA/brushing in 12 cases [52%]). These included pancreatic/ampullary adenocarcinoma in 20 cases, esophageal squamous carcinoma in 1 case, and NEN in 2 cases. Follow-up also revealed carcinoma in all 12 suspicious cases and 13 pancreatic adenocarcinomas and 1 microcystic adenoma in 14 of the 17 atypical cases. Overall, repeat computed tomography (CT)-guided FNA samples yielded a definite diagnosis in four atypical and seven NND cases, whereas EUS-FNA results provided a definite diagnosis in three cases in which CT-guided FNA failed and in two cases in which ampullary biopsy failed. No false-positive cases were identified. The false-negative rate due to inadequate sampling was 13.2%. Sensitivity (including cases with inadequate cellularity and nondiagnostic aspirates) was 81.7% and specificity was 100%. None of the factors evaluated (lesion characteristics, aspiration site, and tumor type) significantly influenced diagnostic results.EUS-FNA is a valuable diagnostic and staging tool with high specificity and sensitivity. Negative or nondiagnostic cases on EUS-FNA require further diagnostic work for a definitive diagnosis when clinical or radiographic findings do not correlate with the FNA results.Percutaneous CT-guided fine needle aspiration cytology in the differential diagnosis of pancreatic lesions.Cytologic results were retrospectively evaluated in 83 patients who underwent CT-guided fine-needle aspiration of pancreatic lesions during a 5-year period. Sixty seven patients had malignant disease and 16 benign disease. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and diagnostic efficiency of fine-needle aspiration (FNA) cytology in detecting malignancy were 91%, 100%, 100%, 73%, and 93%, respectively. In solid pancreatic masses the sensitivity of FNA cytology rose to 98%, while in cystic pancreatic masses sensitivity fell to 62%. In 18 patients with cystic lesions (12 benign and 6 malignant), the cystic fluid was analyzed for amylase, CEA and CA 19-9 content. Amylase levels were high in pseudocysts and in 4/6 malignant cysts. CEA levels were low in benign cysts, and high in all malignant cysts. CA 19-9 levels were high in one pseudocyst and in all malignant cysts. Tumour marker content analysis enhanced the sensitivity of the cytologic diagnosis of malignant cysts to 92%. FNA cytology is a simple and highly accurate method in the differential diagnosis of solid pancreatic lesions. In cystic lesions, tumour marker fluid content determination increases the sensitivity of FNA cytology.Accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound elastography used for differential diagnosis of focal pancreatic masses: a multicenter study.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) elastography represents a new imaging procedure that might characterize the differences of hardness and strain between diseased tissue and normal tissue. The aim of this study was to assess the efficiency of EUS elastography for the differentiation of focal masses in chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic cancer.The study group comprised 258 patients with focal pancreatic masses included prospectively at 13 participating centers. Qualitative analysis of the diagnoses made by two expert doctors using all recorded video clips was performed in order to test the interobserver variability. A post-processing software analysis was used to examine the EUS elastography videos by calculating average-hue histograms of individual elastography images. The quantitative information was used to calculate intra-observer variability and the accuracy of the method.Qualitative analysis of the recorded videos revealed a kappa value of 0.72. Intra-observer variability analysis revealed that the single measure intraclass correlation ranged between 0.86 and 0.94. The average-hue histogram analysis of the data indicated a sensitivity of 93.4 %, a specificity of 66.0 %, a positive predictive value of 92.5 %, a negative predictive value of 68.9 %, and an overall accuracy of 85.4 %, based on a cut-off value of 175. Area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AUROC) was 0.854 ( P < 0.0001) with a confidence interval of 0.804 - 0.894.The value of quantitative analysis of EUS elastography recordings was proven by good reproducibility of the videos, as well as good parameters of the AUROC analysis. (Clinical Trials.gov identifier: CT00909103).False-negative rate of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration for pancreatic solid and cystic lesions with matched surgical resections as the gold standard: one institution's experience.The diagnosis of pancreatic tumors is often complicated because of sampling and interpretive challenges. The current study was performed to determine the rates, types, and causes of diagnostic discrepancies.The authors retrospectively reviewed cytology cases from 2004 to 2010 using matched surgical resection cases as the gold standard.A total of 733 cases were divided into 3 categories: 1) positive or suspicious (290 cases); 2) negative or atypical (403 cases); and 3) unsatisfactory (40 cases). Of these cases, 101 fine-needle aspiration (FNA) cases had matched surgical resections including 58 positive diagnoses, 39 negative diagnoses, and 4 unsatisfactory diagnoses. All 19 discrepant cases represented false-negative diagnoses without any false-positive cases noted, which included 2 cases with interpretive errors (10%) and 17 cases with sampling errors (90%). All matched cytology cases were divided into 5 subgroups based on the type of lesion or type of error and were analyzed for sensitivity and specificity. The sampling error rate in cystic lesions (8 of 24; 33%) was significantly higher than that in solid lesions (9 of 73; 12%). The false-negative rate in the interpretive error group (3%) was significantly lower than that in the sampling error group (23%).The results of the current study confirm that pancreatic endoscopic ultrasound-guided FNA diagnosis has a very low false-positive rate but a relatively high false-negative rate using matched surgical resections as the gold standard. The major cause of a false-negative cytology diagnosis is sampling error and the rate of sampling error in cystic lesions is significantly higher than that in solid lesions.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas: differentiate from chronic pancreatits by MR imaging.To evaluate the differentiating factors for intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas and chronic pancreatitis as determined by MR imaging.During a three-year period, we performed MR imaging on 33, consecutive patients with IPMN and on 41 patients with chronic pancreatitis. All IPMNs were confirmed by surgery. Two radiologists retrospectively analyzed the ductal change, the cyst shape, CBD dilatation, lymphadenopathy, and parenchymal change. The sensitivity and specificity were calculated for each MRI findings using the Chi square test. Statistically significant MR findings were further analyzed using multivariate logistic regression analysis. The diagnostic performance was evaluated according to the area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (A(z)) using specific MRI findings. Simple κ statistics were used to evaluate the inter-observer reliability.Statistically specific findings for IPMN compared with those for chronic pancreatitis, were duct dilatation without stricture (specificity=95.1%, sensitivity=75.8%, p<0.0001), bulging ampulla (specificity=97.6%, sensitivity=30.3%, p<0.0001), nodule in a duct (specificity=100%, sensitivity=15.2%, p<0.0004), grape-like cyst shape (specificity=97.6%, sensitivity=78.8%, p<0.0001), and nodule in a cyst (specificity=100%, sensitivity=24.2%, p<0.0001). Statistically specific findings for chronic pancreatitis compared with those for IPMN, were duct dilatation with strictures (specificity=93.9%, sensitivity=95.1%, p<0.0001), the presence of a stone (specificity=97.0%, sensitivity=56.1%, p<0.0001), and a unilocular cyst shape (specificity=93.9%, sensitivity=34.1%, p<0.0004). Duct dilatation without stricture and a grape-like cyst shape were independently associated with the IPMN. Duct dilatation with strictures was independently associated with the chronic pancreatitis. Interobserver agreement was good to excellent for each finding (κ=0.762-1.000).Highly specific findings for IPMN include duct dilatation without stricture, bulging ampulla, nodule in a duct, grape-like cyst shape, and nodule in a cyst. MRI is very useful for differentiating IPMN from chronic pancreatitis using these specific findings.Intraductal papillary and mucinous tumors of the pancreas: accuracy of preoperative computed tomography, endoscopic retrograde pancreatography and endoscopic ultrasonography, and long-term outcome in a large surgical series.Few data are available on the accuracy of preoperative imaging or on long-term outcome after surgery for intraductal papillary and mucinous tumors of the pancreas. The aims of this study were to assess the following: (1) the accuracy of preoperative computed tomography, endoscopic retrograde pancreatography, and endoscopic ultrasonography for determination of tumor invasion and pancreatic extension as compared with surgical findings; (2) the long-term outcome after surgery.Forty-seven patients who underwent surgery between 1980 and 1995 for pathologically diagnosed intraductal papillary and mucinous tumors were included in this study. The findings of available computed tomography (n = 25), endoscopic retrograde pancreatography (n = 29), and endoscopic ultrasonography (n = 21) were reviewed by experienced clinicians blinded to pathologic diagnosis to assess tumor invasion and pancreatic extension. Pathologic specimens were reviewed by experienced pathologists. Postoperative follow-up data were analyzed.Histologic features of invasive carcinoma were found in 43% of patients, severe dysplasia in 21%, and mild or moderate dysplasia in 36%. The overall accuracy of computed tomography, endoscopic retrograde pancreatography, and endoscopic ultrasonography in distinguishing between invasive and noninvasive tumors were, respectively, 76%, 79%, and 76%. The overall 3-year disease-free survival rate was 63%, but it was 21% among patients with invasive carcinoma at surgery (p < 0.001).This study emphasizes the need for early surgical resection in patients with suspected intraductal papillary and mucinous tumors of the pancreas because of the high frequency of invasive carcinoma and the inadequacy of preoperative imaging for assessing malignancy.Diagnostic yield and therapeutic impact of fine-needle aspiration biopsies guided by endoscopic ultrasound in pancreatic lesions.The correct approach and treatment in a patient with a pancreatic lesion detected by imaging is not easy. Recently, the endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) biopsy is becoming a useful tool. The aim of the study is to evaluate the diagnostic yield and therapeutic impact of EUS-FNA in pancreatic lesions.Fifty-three patients with focal pancreatic lesions underwent EUS-FNA from March 2005 to March 2006. The final diagnosis was confirmed by the histological analysis from the surgical specimen and/or clinical follow-up for at least 6 months.. Fifty-two patients were evaluated. Forty-seven useful samples for histological evaluation were obtained. Adequate samples were obtained in 83.3% (5/6) for lesions < 20 mm, 100% (19/19) for lesions from 20 to < 40 mm and 85.1% (23/ 27) for those > or = 40 mm. To differentiate between benign/malignant disease the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA were 97.3% (95% CI: 84.9-99.1), 100% (95% CI: 66-100), 100% (95% CI: 88-100), 90% (95% CI: 57-96) and 97.8%, respectively. There was a change in the initial diagnosis in seven patients (14.8%). No complications were reported.EUS-FNA is a useful and safe method with high predictive values to differentiate between malignant and benign pancreatic lesions.Role of curved planar reformations using multidetector spiral CT in diagnosis of pancreatic and peripancreatic diseases.To investigate the role of curved planar reformations using multidetector spiral CT (MSCT) in diagnosis of pancreatic and peripancreatic diseases.From October 2001 to September 2003, 47 consecutive patients with pancreatic or peripancreatic diseases, which were confirmed by operation, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and clinical follow-up, were enrolled in this study. CT scanning was performed at a MSCT with four rows of detector. A set of images with an effective thickness of 1.0-2.0 mm and a gap of 0.5-1.0 mm (50% overlap) were acquired in all patients for post-processing. Curved planar reformations were carried out by drawing a curved line on transverse source images, coronal or sagittal multiplanar reformations according to certain anatomic structures (such as cholangiopancreatic ducts or peripancreatic vessels) and the position of lesion.With thin collimation, MSCT could acquire high-quality curved planar reformations to display the profile of the whole pancreas, to trace the cholangiopancreatic ducts and peripancreatic vessels, and to show the relationship of lesions with pancreas and peripancreatic anatomic structures in one curved plane, which facilitates diagnosis and rapid communication of diagnostic information with referring physicians.MSCT with thin collimation could be used to create high-quality curved planar reformations in evaluating pancreatic and peripancreatic diseases with pertinent anatomic information and relative pathologic signs to facilitate the diagnosis and enhance communication with the referring physician. Curved planar reformations can serve as supplements for transverse images in diagnosis and management of pancreatic and peripancreatic diseases.Differentiation between pancreatic carcinoma and mass-forming chronic pancreatitis: usefulness of high b value diffusion-weighted imaging.To investigate the value of high b value diffusion-weighted (DW) imaging in differentiating between pancreatic carcinoma and mass-forming chronic pancreatitis (MFCP).Fifty-one consecutive patients with pathology-proven pancreatic carcinoma (n = 37) or MFCP (n = 14) were evaluated with DW imaging (b value, 0 and 1000 s/mm(2)) at a 3-T MR system. Overall 20 healthy volunteers were evaluated as the control group. The apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC) values of normal pancreas, pancreatic carcinoma, MFCP, and mass-associated obstructive pancreatitis were measured.On high b value (1000 s/mm(2) ) DW images, both pancreatic carcinoma and MFCP were hyperintense focal lesions; mass-associated obstructive pancreatitis occurred in 17 of 37 (45.9%) pancreatic carcinoma and 8 of 14 (57.1%) MFCP. The ADC (×10(-3) mm(2) /s) of the pancreatic carcinomas (1.06 ± 0.15) was significantly lower than that of normal pancreas (1.47 ± 0.18; P < 0.01), MFCP (1.35 ± 0.14; P < 0.01) and mass-associated chronic pancreatitis (1.44 ± 0.17; P < 0.01). The ADC of MFCP was also lower than that in the normal pancreas (P = 0.025), whereas the ADC of mass-associated obstructive pancreatitis was not different from those of the MFCP (P = 0.113) and normal pancreas (P = 0.544). When 1.195 was used as the optimal cut-off value, ADC quantification obtained a sensitivity of 85.7% and a specificity of 86.5% for differentiating pancreatic carcinomas from MFCP.High b value DW imaging in combination with ADC quantification at a 3-T MR system is useful in differentiating between pancreatic carcinoma and MFCP.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration of pancreatic masses: the utility and impact on management of patients.It is controversial whether endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is beneficial in all patients with suspected pancreatic cancer. The aim of this study was to assess diagnostic yield, safety and impact of EUS-FNA on management of patients with solid pancreatic mass.Consecutive patients undergoing EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic mass were enrolled. Gold standard for final diagnosis included histology from surgical resection. In patients without surgery, clinical evaluation methods and repeated imaging studies were used for the comparison of initial cytology and final diagnosis. Patients were followed-up prospectively focusing on subsequent treatment.Among 207 enrolled patients, final diagnosis was malignant in 163 (78.6%) and benign in 44 (21.4%). The sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of EUS-FNA in diagnosing pancreatic cancer were 92.6% (95% CI: 87.20-95.96), 88.6% (95% CI: 74.64-95.64) and 91.8% (95% CI: 87.24-94.81), respectively. No major and five (2.4%) minor complications occurred. Of 151 true-positive patients by EUS-FNA, 57 (37.7%) were surgically explored, of whom 28 (49.1%) underwent resection. Ten of 12 patients with false-negative cytology were explored based on detection of mass on EUS, of whom two had a delay due to false-negative cytology without curative treatment. From the whole study cohort, EUS-FNA had positive and negative impacts on subsequent management in 136 (65.7%) and 2 (0.9%) patients, respectively.EUS-FNA provides accurate diagnosis in 92% and has positive therapeutic impact in two-thirds of patients with solid pancreatic mass. Despite negative cytology, surgical exploration is recommended in clinical suspicion for pancreatic cancer and solid mass on EUS.Correlation between magnetic resonance imaging and histopathology in differentiation of pancreatic diseases.In the last four decades, the incidence of pancreatic cancer has tripled in Western countries. More than 90% of all pancreatic cancers are detected in the advanced stage of the disease when surgical treatment is no longer possible and survival after initial diagnosis is usually very short. The aim of this study was to correlate magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) established diagnosis of chronic pancreatitis, benign lesion and malignant neoplasm with final histopathology. The study included 29 patients in whom the nature of pancreatic pathology could not be determined clinically and by other imaging modalities including abdominal ultrasonography, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and multislice computed tomography. MRI examination was performed and radiological report was compared with histopathology assessment of the pancreatic lesion detected. The data obtained indicated systematic conformity between radiological and histopathology findings, confirmed high diagnostic accuracy of MRI for selected pancreatic pathology, and demonstrated the role of MRI as a problem solving diagnostic imaging modality in undetermined pancreatic changes.Randomized trial comparing the 22-gauge aspiration and 22-gauge biopsy needles for EUS-guided sampling of solid pancreatic mass lesions.To overcome limitations of cytology, biopsy needles have been developed to procure histologic samples during EUS.To compare 22-gauge (G) FNA and 22G biopsy needles (FNB) for EUS-guided sampling of solid pancreatic masses.Randomized trial.Tertiary-care medical center.This study involved 56 patients with solid pancreatic masses.Sampling of pancreatic masses by using 22G FNA or 22G FNB devices.Compare the median number of passes required to establish the diagnosis, diagnostic sufficiency, technical performance, complication rates, procurement of the histologic core, and quality of the histologic specimen.A total of 28 patients were randomized to the FNA group and 28 to the FNB group. There was no significant difference in median number of passes required to establish the diagnosis (1 [interquartile range 1-2.5] vs 1 [interquartile range 1-1]; P = .21), rates of diagnostic sufficiency (100% vs 89.3%; P = .24), technical failure (0 vs 3.6%; P = 1.0), or complications (3.6% for both) between FNA and FNB needles, respectively. Patients in whom diagnosis was established in passes 1, 2, and 3 were 64.3% versus 67.9%, 10.7% versus 17.9%, and 25% versus 3.6%, respectively, for FNA and FNB cohorts. There was no significant difference in procurement of the histologic core (100% vs 83.3%; P = .26) or the presence of diagnostic histologic specimens (66.7% vs 80%; P = .66) between FNA and FNB cohorts, respectively.Only pancreatic masses were evaluated.Diagnostic sufficiency, technical performance, and safety profiles of FNA and FNB needles are comparable. There was no significant difference in yield or quality of the histologic core between the 2 needle types.Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided brushing increases cellular diagnosis of pancreatic cysts: A prospective study.The diagnosis of pancreatic cystic lesions is still a challenge.To prospectively investigate the usefulness and safety of EUS-guided cytology brushing (EUS BR) in the cellular diagnosis of pancreatic cysts.Cysts >15mm were sampled with a 19G needle. The fluid was aspirated and processed for cytology. The brush was introduced to scrub the cystic wall and processed as standard brushings. Antibiotic prophylaxis was administered. Complications were assessed in the first 24h and 7 days after the procedure.30 patients were included. In 8 patients the technique failed for technical reasons. EUS BR provided with a cellular diagnosis in 20/22 cases (91%). The EUS BR was superior to the aspirated fluid for detecting diagnostic cells (73% vs. 36%, p=0.08) and mucinous cells (50% vs. 18%, p=0.016). In the 8 patients operated on, the specimen was consistent with EUS BR diagnosis. Three patients (10%) had complications, one of them a subacute retroperitoneal haemorrhage in a patient on anticoagulation therapy who died for complications 1 month later.EUS BR increases cellular diagnosis of pancreatic cystic lesions as compared with fluid analysis, mainly in mucinous lesions. Its use is not recommended in patients under anticoagulation therapy.EchoBrush may be superior to standard EUS-guided FNA in the evaluation of cystic lesions of the pancreas: preliminary experience.Cystic lesions of the pancreas are being detected with increasing frequency. Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is one of the most precise methods of diagnosis but still has limited accuracy. A new, through-the-needle cytologic brush system (EchoBrush; Cook Medical, Bloomington, Ind) has been approved for use during EUS evaluation of cystic pancreatic lesions.Data from 127 EUS-FNAs of pancreatic cystic lesions were analyzed to compare the cytologic yield of EchoBrush with conventional EUS-FNA. An attending cytopathologist was present on site to assess specimen adequacy in all the cases. Diagnostic yields of both procedures, as well as related adverse events, were recorded. Statistical analysis was performed with the SPSS 15.0 version software (SPSS, Chicago, Ill).A total of 127 cystic lesions of the pancreas from 120 patients (42 men and 78 women, mean age of 62.17 ± 12.17 years) were included in the study. Mean size of lesions was 23.58 ± 21.69 mm. Adequacy of the samples and diagnostic yield were higher using EchoBrush. In 80 (63 %) cases, conventional EUS-FNA was performed, whereas in 47 (37%), we used EchoBrush. Diagnostic material was obtained in 85.1% (40 of 47) of cases using EchoBrush and in 66.3% (53 of 80) with conventional EUS-FNA. (P < .05). There were very few clinically relevant complications related to EUS-FNA and EUS-EchoBrush techniques.This study suggests that cytological specimens from pancreatic cystic lesions obtained using EchoBrush at the time of EUS are superior to conventional EUS-FNA mainly because of the higher yield of epithelial cells. Larger studies are needed to compare both methods.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided, 18-gauge, fine needle aspiration biopsy of the pancreas using a 2.8 mm channel convex array echoendoscope.Previous studies have reported on endoscopic ultrasound-guided, fine needle aspiration biopsy using 22- to 25-gauge needles. We evaluated the histologic and cytologic yield of endoscopic ultrasound-guided, fine needle aspiration biopsy of the pancreas using an 18-gauge, Menghini-type core needle.Fine needle aspiration biopsy was performed in conjunction with a prototype 2.8 mm channel convex array echoendoscope. The core specimen was placed in formalin for cell block, and residual material was expelled on slides for cytology. Definitive diagnosis was established by surgery or clinical follow-up.Of 45 patients who underwent fine needle aspiration biopsy, the needle failed to penetrate indurated pancreatic lesions in five. An average of 2.6 passes were performed in the remaining patients. Sufficient material for a histologic and/or cytologic diagnosis was obtained in 40 patients (histologic and cytologic yield of 68% and 75%, respectively). Combining the results of histology and cytology, the sensitivity and specificity for detection of malignancy was 76% and 100%, respectively. Histology confirmed the cytologic findings in 35 patients, providing additional tissue specific information. In three cases histology established a diagnosis of malignancy where cytology was not conclusively malignant. However, in three cases of surgically confirmed malignancy histology failed to detect malignancy, whereas cytology showed suspicious or malignant cells. The sensitivity of histology and cytology alone in detecting malignancy was 53% and 70%, respectively. Mild pancreatitis occurred after pancreatic fine needle aspiration biopsy in one patient.Core specimens for histology can be safely obtained using an 18-gauge needle. Histology provides tissue-specific information that complements cytology, but histology is less sensitive than cytology in detecting malignancy.Implications of imaging criteria for the management and treatment of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms - benign versus malignant findings.Evaluation of computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) for differentiation of pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) subtypes based on objective imaging criteria.Fifty-eight patients with 60 histologically confirmed IPMNs were included in this retrospective study. Eighty-three imaging studies (CT,n = 42; MRI,n = 41) were analysed by three independent blinded observers (O1-O3), using established imaging criteria to assess likelihood of malignancy (-5, very likely benign; 5, very likely malignant) and histological subtype (i.e., low-grade (LGD), moderate-grade (MGD), high-grade dysplasia (HGD), early invasive carcinoma (IPMC), solid carcinoma (CA) arising from IPMN).Forty-one benign (LGD IPMN,n = 20; MGD IPMN,n = 21) and 19 malignant (HGD IPMN,n = 3; IPMC,n = 6; solid CA,n = 10) IPMNs located in the main duct (n = 6), branch duct (n = 37), or both (n = 17) were evaluated. Overall accuracy of differentiation between benign and malignant IPMNs was 86/92 % (CT/MRI). Exclusion of overtly malignant cases (solid CA) resulted in overall accuracy of 83/90 % (CT/MRI). The presence of mural nodules and ductal lesion size ≥30 mm were significant indicators of malignancy (p = 0.02 and p < 0.001, respectively).Invasive IPMN can be identified with high confidence and sensitivity using CT and MRI. The diagnostic problem that remains is the accurate radiological differentiation of premalignant and non-invasive subtypes.• CT and MRI can differentiate benign from malignant forms of IPMN. • Identifying (pre)malignant histological IPMN subtypes by CT and MRI is difficult. • Overall, diagnostic performance with MRI was slightly (not significantly) superior to CT.Differentiation of focal-type autoimmune pancreatitis from pancreatic carcinoma: assessment by multiphase contrast-enhanced CT.To evaluate the utility of multiphase contrast-enhanced computed tomography (CT) findings alone and in combination for differentiating focal-type autoimmune pancreatitis (f-AIP) from pancreatic carcinoma (PC).The study group comprised 22 f-AIP lesions and 61 PC lesions. Two radiologists independently evaluated CT findings. Frequencies of findings were compared between f-AIP and PC. Statistical, univariate and multivariate analyses were performed.Homogeneous enhancement during the portal phase (AIP, 59 % vs. PC, 3 %; P < 0.001), dotted enhancement during the pancreatic phase (50 % vs. 7 %; P < 0.001), duct-penetrating sign (46 % vs. 2 %; P < 0.001), enhanced duct sign (36 % vs. 2 %; P < 0.001) and capsule-like rim (46 % vs. 3 %; P < 0.001) were more frequently observed in AIP. Ring-like enhancement during the delayed phase (5 % vs. 46 %; P < 0.001) and peripancreatic strands with a length of at least 10 mm (5 % vs. 39 %; P = 0.001) were more frequently observed in PC. AIP was identified with 82 % sensitivity and 98 % specificity using four of these seven findings. Multivariate analysis revealed significant differences in dotted enhancement (P = 0.004), duct-penetrating sign (P < 0.001) and capsule-like rim (P = 0.007).The combination of CT findings may allow improvements in differentiating f-AIP from PC.• f-AIP can mimic PC on imaging findings. • The differentiation of f-AIP from PC is important in patient management. • Some CT findings can be used to identify AIP. • The combination of CT findings will improve differentiation from PC.Pancreatic cystic lesions without overt cytologic atypia: proposed diagnostic categories for endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration cytology with utilization of fluid carcinoembryonic antigen level.It was the aim of this study to examine pancreatic cyst cases that lack markedly atypical or malignant epithelium on endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspirations.We conducted a retrospective case review study, including 24 cases that were either acellular or lacked cytologic atypia and were subsequently resected. The cases were retrospectively divided into 3 categories: (1) non-diagnostic, (2) cyst contents only, and (3) cyst contents with bland-appearing epithelium. The cyst contents were subdivided into mucinous and non-mucinous types. The cytologic diagnoses were correlated with cyst fluid carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels and subsequent histologic diagnoses.Category 1 comprised 4 cases: 2 cases (CEA >800 ng/ml) with mucin-producing neoplasms and 2 cases (CEA not determined) with microcystic serous cystadenomas. Category 2 included 4 cases with non-mucinous and 4 with mucinous contents. In the first subgroup, 2 cases (CEA >800 ng/ml) showed mucinous cystic neoplasms and 2 cases (CEA negligible or not determined) pseudocysts. In the second subgroup, there were 3 cases with neoplastic mucinous cysts (1 CEA >800 ng/ml, 2 not determined) and 1 case with a lymphoepithelial cyst with mucinous metaplasia (CEA >800 ng/ml). Almost all cases (10/11) in category 3 had neoplastic mucinous cysts regardless of the CEA levels.The proposed 3 cytologic categories of pancreatic cystic lesion combined with cyst fluid CEA levels provide useful clinical information.Utility of 18F-FDG PET/CT for differentiation of autoimmune pancreatitis with atypical pancreatic imaging findings from pancreatic cancer.This study was conducted to evaluate the clinical usefulness of PET/CT in differentiating autoimmune pancreatitis from pancreatic cancer.To differentiate autoimmune pancreatitis from pancreatic cancer, we analyzed the cases of 17 patients with autoimmune pancreatitis and atypical pancreatic imaging findings who underwent integrated PET/CT. The PET/CT findings on the 17 patients with autoimmune pancreatitis were compared with those of 151 patients with pancreatic cancer.Fluorine-18 FDG uptake by the pancreas was found in all patients with autoimmune pancreatitis and in 82% (124/151) of patients with pancreatic cancer. Diffuse uptake by the pancreas was significantly more frequent in patients with autoimmune pancreatitis (53% vs 3%, p < 0.001). FDG uptake by the salivary glands and kidneys was seen only in patients with autoimmune pancreatitis, the former reaching statistical significance (p = 0.003). Follow-up PET/CT after steroid therapy was performed for eight patients with autoimmune pancreatitis. After steroid therapy, none of the patients had intense FDG uptake by the pancreas or extrapancreatic organs.In difficult cases, at PET/CT the presence of diffuse uptake of FDG by the pancreas or concomitant extrapancreatic uptake by the salivary glands can be used to aid in differentiation of autoimmune pancreatitis and pancreatic cancer.Role of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography imaging in surgery for pancreatic cancer.To evaluate the role of positron emission tomography using 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG-PET) in the surgical management of patients with pancreatic cancer, including the diagnosis, staging, and selection of patients for the subsequent surgical treatment.This study involved 53 patients with proven primary pancreatic cancer. The sensitivity of diagnosing the primary cancer was examined for FDG-PET, CT, cytological examination of the bile or pancreatic juice, and the serum levels of carcinoembrionic antigens (CEA) and carbohydrate antigen 19-9 (CA19-9). Next, the accuracy of staging was compared between FDG-PET and CT. Finally, FDG-PET was analyzed semiquantitatively using the standard uptake value (SUV). The impact of the SUV on patient management was evaluated by examining the correlations between the SUV and the histological findings of cancer.The sensitivity of FDG-PET, CT, cytological examination of the bile or pancreatic juice, and the serum levels of CEA and CA19-9 were 92.5%, 88.7%, 46.4%, 37.7% and 69.8%, respectively. In staging, FDG-PET was superior to CT only in diagnosing distant disease (bone metastasis). For local staging, the sensitivity of CT was better than that of FDG-PET. The SUV did not correlate with the pTNM stage, grades, invasions to the vessels and nerve, or with the size of the tumor. However, there was a statistically significant difference (4.6 +/- 2.9 vs 7.8 +/- 4.5, P = 0.024) in the SUV between patients with respectable and unresectable disease.FDG-PET is thus considered to be useful in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer. However, regarding the staging of the disease, FDG-PET is not considered to be a sufficiently accurate diagnostic modality. Although the SUV does not correlate with the patho-histological prognostic factors, it may be useful in selecting patients who should undergo subsequent surgical treatment.EUS-guided FNA cytology of pancreatic neuroendocrine tumour (PanNET): a retrospective study of 132 cases over an 18-year period in a single institution.To determine the diagnostic accuracy and pitfalls of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) cytology of pancreatic neuroendocrine tumour (PanNET).A search of our laboratory information system was performed from July 1992 to June 2010 to identify all FNA cytology and corresponding surgical specimens in which the diagnosis of PanNET was rendered or considered.One hundred and thirty-two cases diagnosed by EUS-guided FNA were collected. Histological correlation was available for 77 (58%) of FNAs; 55 patients may have been treated elsewhere or had no surgery because of advanced disease or co-morbidity. Among 56 cases diagnosed as PanNET on FNA, 54 (96%) were confirmed histologically; the remaining two were poorly differentiated adenocarcinoma with focal neuroendocrine features in one case and no tumour was found in the other. Follow-up histology of nine patients diagnosed as suspicious for PanNET on FNA showed four PanNETs, two pancreatic ductal adenocarcinomas (PDA), one solid pseudopapillary tumour (SPT) and two cases of chronic pancreatitis. Nine cases rendered by FNA as atypical (n = 3), no atypical cells identified (n = 4) or unsatisfactory (n = 2) were PanNETs on histology. Lastly, three cases of oncocytic variant of PanNET were misdiagnosed on FNA as either adenocarcinoma (n = 2) or as suspicious for carcinoma (n = 1).Overall, 54 of the 70 histologically confirmed PanNET cases (77%) were correctly diagnosed by preoperative FNA as PanNET. FNA cases designated as no atypical cells identified and unsatisfactory (7/132, 5%) were attributable to sampling error. Diagnostic pitfalls in our study mainly included PDA, SPT and chronic pancreatitis.Values and limitations of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose-positron-emission tomography with preoperative evaluation of patients with pancreatic masses.The aim of this study was to determine the value and limitations of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG)-position-emission tomography (PET) for differentiating benign and malignant pancreatic disease and for staging malignant disease. One hundred fifty-nine patients with 89 malignant and 70 benign pancreatic lesions all received PET, computed tomography (CT), and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) before pancreatic surgery. The original reports were compared for all patients (group I; N = 159), for a subgroup that neither had fasting plasma glucose levels > or =130 mg/dL or known elevated levels of C-reactive protein ([CRP], group II; n = 123), and for the remaining patients (group III; n = 36). For group I, accuracy values (areas under receiver operating characteristic [ROC] curves) for differentiation of benign/malignant masses were 0.86 (PET), 0.93 (ERCP), 0.82 (CT), and 0.95 for ERCP + PET (N = 159). For group II, ROC areas increased to 0.92 (PET), 0.94 (p < 0.05; n = 123) (ERCP), 0.82 (CT), 0.97 (p < 0.05; n = 123) (ERCP + PET). The results for group III were 0.71 (PET), 0.81 (CT), and 0.93 (ERCP); (n = 36). With 54 patients of group II that either had contradictory or indeterminate/technically unsuccessful CT/ERCP, PET was correct in 43 patients (84%). Sensitivity/specificity for lymph node staging was 49%/63%, respectively. For patients with hepatic metastasis, PET was 70% sensitive and 95% specific, missing some metastasis that were <1 cm. PET detected peritoneal metastasis in 25% of patients, missing poorly localized microscopic spread. For selected patients who have indeterminate pancreatic masses but no hyperglycemia or serologic evidence of active inflammation, FDG-PET is an independent functional assay that significantly adds to the diagnostic accuracy of ERCP and CT in the differentiation of benign and malignant pancreatic disease. PET can reliably detect hepatic, peritoneal, and other distant metastases that are > or =1 cm.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided biopsies of pancreatic masses: comparison between fine needle aspirations and needle core biopsies.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-guided FNA) is a highly sensitive and specific method for diagnosing pancreatic masses. Alternatively, EUS-guided needle core biopsies (NCB) have also been introduced. We sought to determine efficacies of pancreatic EUS-guided FNAs and NCBs. Records of consecutive EUS-guided FNAs received over a 24-mo-period were reviewed. Cases with concurrent NCBs were selected for the study. The diagnoses from the two modalities were compared and designated concordant (CC) or discordant (DC). Of 252 cases, 52 had concurrent NCBs. The final diagnoses included primary and secondary tumors. Of the 52 cases, 29/52 (55.8%) were CC and 23/52 (44.2%) were DC. The sensitivities for FNAs and NCBs were 95.0% and 67.6%, respectively. Both modalities were 100% specific. Direct comparison between EUS-guided FNAs and NCBs demonstrated that the former are more sensitive for diagnosing pancreatic neoplasms, both primaries and metastases. There was no correlation between CC/DC cases and type of neoplasm.Echo-enhanced color- and power-Doppler EUS for the discrimination between focal pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma.EUS is a precise method for detection and staging of pancreatic tumors. However, differentiation between inflammatory pseudotumor and pancreatic carcinoma remains difficult. The aim of this study was to evaluate contrast-enhanced EUS as a method of differentiating inflammation and carcinoma based on perfusion characteristics.Patients with solid pancreatic masses underwent EUS with a linear echoendoscope. Perfusion in the pancreatic tissue and the mass was assessed with native and contrast-enhanced EUS with power- and color-Doppler imaging. Examinations were evaluated by a blinded reader. A markedly hyperperfused lesion was considered an inflammatory pseudotumor whereas lesions that were hypoperfused compared with surrounding tissue were considered to be carcinoma.Fifteen of 23 patients had hypoperfusion within the mass and 8 patients had hyperperfused lesions. Of the 15 patients with hypoperfused masses, all had pancreatic adenocarcinoma; 1 of 8 patients with a hyperperfused lesion also had adenocarcinoma. The remaining 7 patients had focal inflammation. Sensitivity for differentiation of pancreatic carcinoma versus inflammatory changes was 94%, specificity 100%.Echo-enhanced power-Doppler EUS reliably differentiates pancreatic neoplasm and focal pancreatitis. The diagnostic accuracy of this technique is comparable to CT, magnetic resonance imaging, positron emission tomography, and ERCP.Optimal number of needle passes in endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration for pancreatic lesions.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is accurate in cytological diagnosis of pancreatic lesions. Our aim was to determine optimal number of needle passes in EUS-FNA for pancreatic lesions without onsite cytopathologist, who is not routinely available to participate in the procedure.Results of all needle passes in EUS-FNAs for 117 pancreatic neoplasms in 115 patients were reviewed retrospectively. Factors that required 2 or more needle passes for correct diagnosis were identified by multivariate logistic regression analysis. In each lesion group defined by the factors that required 2 or more passes and were known at the time of EUS-FNA, number of needle passes was regarded as optimal when an increase in diagnostic sensitivity by an additional needle pass did not reach 10%.Size of 15 mm or less (OR 4.58, 95% CI 1.70-12.3, P < 0.01), location of head (OR 5.02, 95% CI 1.82-13.9, P < 0.01), and neuroendocrine tumor (NET) (OR 5.04, 95% CI 1.38-18.4, P = 0.01) independently required 2 or more needle passes. Optimal numbers of needle passes for lesions of 15 mm or less in the head, those of more than 15 mm in the head, those of 15 mm or less in the body or tail, and those of more than 15 mm in the body or tail were 3, 2, 2, and 1, respectively. When these numbers of needle passes were performed, 93% of pancreatic lesions were correctly diagnosed.Optimal numbers of needle passes in EUS-FNA for pancreatic lesions without onsite cytopathologist were between 1 and 3.[Value of dual-phase-helical CT in the preoperative diagnosis of pancreatic cancer--a prospective study].A prospective study was performed to evaluate the accuracy of dual phase helical CT in suspected pancreatic cancer.Within one year 136 patients underwent helical CT with arterial and portal venous scans after bolus tracking and NaCl bolus injection. Evidence of pancreatic cancer and assessment of resectability were recorded using a standardised protocol. Suspected benign disease was verified by follow-up examination and clinical data, suspected malignant disease was correlated with biopsy or surgery.For the detection of tumor the overall concordance was 92%, the sensitivity 98% and the specificity 70% (6 false positive, 1 false negative). Resectability was correctly assessed in 90% with a sensitivity of 92% and a specificity of 88% (4 false positive, 4 false negative). Vascular invasion was detected correctly in 91% (veins)-94% (arteries), lymph node invasion in 67% and liver metastasis in 94%.Dual phase helical CT is a very reliable tool in the assessment of resectability in pancreatic cancer.Impact of 18-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography on the management of pancreatic cancer.We compared the usefulness of positron emission tomography with the glucose analogue 2-deoxy-2-[18F]-fluoro-D-glucose (FDG-PET) and multidetector-row computed tomography (MD-CT) in diagnosing pancreatic cancer and in determining the patients' suitability for surgery.We reviewed the clinical FDG-PET data of 103 consecutive pancreatic cancer patients between July 2004 and March 2009.The detection rates of pancreatic cancer by MD-CT (89%) and FDG-PET (91%) were similar. From the MD-CT findings, 38 patients were judged as operable, and 65, inoperable. Among the inoperable patients, noncurative factors (metastasis to the liver, peritoneum, remote lymph nodes, bones, and other organs and major arterial invasion) were detected by MD-CT and/or FDG-PET. Detection rates of liver metastasis and arterial invasion by FDG-PET were significantly inferior to those of MD-CT (neither was detected by FDG-PET alone). Remote lymph nodes and bone metastasis were detected in 20 lesions by FDG-PET alone; however, MD-CT indicated other noncurative factors in these patients. All 65 patients could be diagnosed as inoperable without FDG-PET.FDG-PET is not a suitable imaging modality for either diagnosis or preoperative treatment in pancreatic cancer patients. Since it is expensive, FDG-PET as a routine diagnostic tool in pancreatic cancer patients must be used with caution.Comparison of F-18-FDG PET/CT findings between pancreatic solid pseudopapillary tumor and pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma.Pancreatic solid pseudopapillary tumor (SPT) is a rare benign tumor. Little data are available on positron emission tomographic/computed tomographic (PET/CT) characteristics of this tumor. Therefore, we analyzed the metabolic characteristics of SPT using F-18-FDG PET/CT and compared the results with those of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma.We retrospectively reviewed the records of 11 SPT patients and 46 patients with ductal adenocarcinoma. Ten SPT patients had primary tumors and 1 patient had metastatic SPT. Maximum standardized uptake value (max SUV), mean SUV, metabolic tumor volume (MTV), total lesion glycolysis (TLG), and tumor-to-background ratio (TBR) were evaluated. Mann-Whitney U test between pancreatic SPT and ductal adenocarcinoma was performed. In addition, age, gender and tumor size-adjusted analysis of covariance (ANCOVA) was done between pancreatic SPT and ductal adenocarcinoma.Compared with pancreatic ductal adenocarcinomas, SPTs had significantly higher tumor size-adjusted MTV and TLG. MTV and TLG values were significantly correlated with T-stage of the SPTs. In 1 SPT patient, metastases in the liver and mesentery were revealed by intense uptake of FDG on F-18-FDG PET/CT, and after PET/CT had suggested the presence of pancreatic SPT.We recommend that SPT be considered when a solid pancreatic mass with increased FDG metabolism is encountered on PET/CT. F-18-FDG PET/CT may be useful in detecting subtle metastases of SPT.Computerized tomography, diagnostic ultrasound, and radionuclide scanning. Comparison of efficacy in diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma.Forty-six patients, including 33 with proved pancreatic carcinoma, were studied with computerized tomography (CT), ultrasound (US), and radionuclide (RN) scanning. The results of each scanning procedure were compared with the surgical and clinical findings. The detection rate was 82% for CT, and 92% with US. A mass is the most important finding in the diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma. Measurements of the pancreas with CT and US were similar, with visualization of all parts of the pancreas routinely better with CT scans. Radionuclide scans were abnormal in 96% of the patients with pancreatic carcinoma as well as in 75% of patients without pancreatic disease. A rational approach to examination of a patient with suspected pancreatic carcinoma should begin with US scan with available, because the detection rate with this method is equal to that with CT and its cost per procedure and for equipment is substantially less.Endoscopic ultrasound guided fine needle aspiration biopsy: a large single centre experience.Endoscopic ultrasound guided fine needle aspiration biopsy (EUS-FNA) is a recent innovation in the evaluation of gastrointestinal and pulmonary malignancies.To review the experience with EUS-FNA of a large single centre.333 consecutive patients underwent EUS-FNA. Follow up data were available on 327 lesions in 317 patients, including 160 lymph nodes, 144 pancreatic lesions, 15 extraintestinal masses, and eight intramural tumours.A primary diagnosis of malignancy was obtained by EUS-FNA in 62% of patients with clinically suspicious lesions. The overall accuracy of EUS-FNA for the diagnosis of malignancy was 86%, with sensitivity of 84% and specificity of 96%. With respect to lesion types, the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were 85%, 100%, and 89% for lymph nodes; 82%, 100%, and 85% for pancreatic lesions; 88%, 100%, and 90% for perirectal masses; and 50%, 25%, and 38% for intramural lesions, respectively. Compared with size and sonographic criteria, EUS-FNA in the evaluation of lymph nodes provided superior accuracy and specificity, without compromising sensitivity. Inadequate specimens were obtained from only six patients, including 3/5 with stromal tumors. Only one complication occurred.EUS-FNA is safe and can readily obtain tissue specimens adequate for cytopathological diagnoses. Compared with size and sonographic criteria, it is a superior modality for the detection of nodal metastases. While providing accurate diagnosis of pancreatic and perirectal malignancies, results suggest the technique is less useful for intramural lesions.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration with or without flow cytometry for the diagnosis of primary pancreatic lymphoma - a case series.The role of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) with flow cytometry for the diagnosis of primary pancreatic lymphoma (PPL) has not been previously described. Our aims were to describe the EUS features of PPL and the role of EUS-FNA with and without flow cytometry in the diagnosis of 16 patients. When EUS-FNA with flow cytometry was compared with EUS-FNA without flow cytometry, the sensitivities for diagnosing non-Hodgkin's lymphoma were 84.6 % versus 30.8 %, respectively ( P = 0.01). EUS-FNA with flow cytometry is a valuable tool to diagnose PPL. Flow cytometry analysis complements traditional assessment by standard cytology.A prospective study comparing rapid assessment of smears and ThinPrep for endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspirates.ThinPrep is often used for endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) samples but the sensitivity of this method is unknown. The objective of the study was to compare sensitivity and accuracy of ThinPrep versus the smear method in pancreas and lymph node samples obtained by EUS-FNA.Patients with suspected malignancy in the pancreas or lymph node underwent EUS-FNA. On-site rapid assessment of all aspirates using the smear method was performed. After rapid assessment, three additional passes from each site were submitted into ThinPrep liquid medium. Cytopathologists interpreting the smear method and ThinPrep slides were blinded to each other. The gold standard was final cytology or pathology results.A total of 130 patients (36 % women, mean age 63 years) underwent EUS-FNA of 139 sites (50 pancreas, 89 lymph node). Malignancy was confirmed in 47 pancreas samples (94 %) and 48 lymph node samples (54 %). Mean +/- SD number of passes made for the smear method was 2.6 +/- 1.3. For pancreatic cancer, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive value (NPV), and accuracy of the ThinPrep versus the smear method were: 62 % versus 98 %, 100 % versus 100 %, 100 % versus 100 %, 14 % versus 75 %, and 64 % versus 98 %, respectively. For lymph nodes the values were 67 % versus 92 %, 100 % versus 98 %, 100 % versus 98 %, 72 % versus 72 %, and 82 % versus 94 %, respectively.The smear method is more sensitive and accurate than ThinPrep in detecting malignancy from EUS-FNA samples of the pancreas and lymph nodes. Smear method with on-site rapid assessment should be favored over ThinPrep in suspected malignancy.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration of the pancreas. Diagnostic utility and accuracy.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy (EUS-FNAB) is regarded as a safe and reliable procedure for diagnosing and staging of pancreatic neoplasms. This study retrospectively evaluated both the diagnostic utility and accuracy of pancreatic EUS-FNABs and potential cytologic pitfalls when using Diff-Quik stain for on-site evaluation.Pancreatic EUS-FNABs performed between 1995 and 1998 were identified from the files of the Department of Pathology. All patients were studied via a linear-array ultrasound endoscope with an FNAB device. Immediate evaluation of the specimen by a pathologist using air-dried slides and Diff-Quik stain was done on all cases. An average of five passes (range, three to nine) were performed. Five cytologic categories were identified: nondiagnostic, benign, atypical, suspicious and malignant. EUS disease staging, histologic correlation and clinical follow-up were reviewed.Sixty-nine consecutive pancreative FNABs were evaluated in the study period. The patients comprised 38 females and 31 males with a mean age of 65 years (range, 36-83). Histologic correlation was available on 40 patients, and follow-up was available on the remaining 29. The cytologic diagnoses included: 31 malignant, 8 suspicious, 6 atypical, 20 benign and 4 nondiagnostic. Forty-three cases were true positive, 9 were true negative, 2 were false positive, and 11 were false negative. The overall sensitivity was 80% and specificity was 82%.The study showed that cytologic evaluation of pancreatic EUS-FNABs has 80% sensitivity and 82% specificity. False negative diagnosis was usually due to sampling error. A nondiagnostic cytologic diagnosis should be rendered in the absence of adequate sampling of a lesion. On-site cytologic evaluation of EUS-FNABs aids in guaranteeing specimen adequacy, and the pathologist should be trained to evaluate Diff-Quik-stained samples.Diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration for suspected pancreatic malignancy in relation to the size of lesions. Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is an accurate method for cytological confirmation of pancreatic malignancy, but it has been unknown whether its diagnostic accuracy for pancreatic lesions was affected by their size, location, or size of needles. Our aim was to investigate the accuracy of EUS-FNA for suspected pancreatic malignancy in relation to these factors, especially to the size of lesions. In a tertiary referral center, EUS-FNAs for 120 suspected pancreatic malignancies in 115 patients based on other imaging studies were evaluated retrospectively. Overall accuracy of EUS-FNA was 96% (115/120), with sensitivity of 95% (76/80), specificity of 98% (39/40), positive predictive value of 99% (76/77), and negative predictive value of 91% (39/43). Accuracies for lesions less than 10mm, 11-20mm, 21-30mm, and more than 31mm were 96%, 95%, 96%, and 100%, respectively; those for lesions in the head, the body, and the tail of the pancreas were 96%, 95%, and 95%, respectively. Accuracies for 22-gauge and 25-gauge needle were 93% and 98%, respectively. EUS-FNA was accurate in the evaluation of suspected pancreatic malignancy regardless of its size, location, or size of needles. It was useful also in the confirmation of small pancreatic malignancies less than 10mm.A comparison of ultrasound, computed tomography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the differential diagnosis of benign and malignant jaundice and cholestasis.To assess the accuracy of ultrasonography (US), computed tomography (CT), and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in distinguishing between benign and malignant causes of jaundice and cholestasis without jaundice.Prospective study.University Hospital in Finland.A consecutive series of patients with jaundice (n = 187) or cholestasis without jaundice (n = 33).Correlation between diagnosis on imaging and final diagnosis at follow up 6 months later. Final diagnoses made on histology (n = 79), cytology (n = 5), operative or endoscopic findings (n = 96), and clinical course or serology (n = 40).The most common benign disease was choledocholithiasis (n = 83) and the most common malignant disease was carcinoma of pancreas (n = 33). The benign nature of the extrahepatic obstruction was correctly defined by US, CT, and ERCP in 53%, 53%, and 90% of patients, respectively, and the corresponding figures for choledocholithiasis were 22%, 25%, and 79% (ERCP compared with each of the other techniques, p < 0.0001). Intrahepatic benign diseases were diagnosed by US and CT in a third of cases. Malignant extrahepatic obstruction was correctly diagnosed in 57%, 80%, and 83%, respectively and the corresponding figures for pancreatic cancer were 60%, 97%, and 89% (US compared with CT, p < 0.01, and with ERCP, p < 0.05). Intrahepatic malignant lesions were diagnosed by US, CT, and ERCP in 100%, 77%, and 60% of patients, respectively.When the obstruction was benign and extrahepatic ERCP was the most accurate, but when it was malignant CT was comparable. Intrahepatic disease was best diagnosed by US and CT. The results emphasise that the three methods of imaging are complementary.Intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas: helical CT with histopathologic correlation.To evaluate the accuracy of preoperative computed tomography (CT) in predicting the location and type of ductal involvement and malignant transformation in intraductal papillary mucinous (IPM) pancreatic tumors and to determine the predictive factors for malignancy at CT.The helical CT scans obtained in 36 operated on patients with a diagnosis of IPM pancreatic tumor were retrospectively assessed. CT-histopathologic correlation was then performed.The final diagnoses of IPM tumor were combined type (n = 26) and branch duct type (n = 10) lesions. Histologic analysis revealed adenocarcinoma (n = 9), hyperplasia (n = 8), low-grade dysplasia (n = 12), and high-grade dysplasia (n = 7). The lesions were located mainly in the head or uncinate process (n = 20) or were diffuse or multifocal (n = 12). In 12 patients (13 cases), CT-histopathologic correlation was poor, including that in the evaluation of ductal involvement (n = 7), evaluation of lesion location (n = 2), and diagnosis of malignant transformation (n = 4). The most specific predictive signs of malignancy were presence of diabetes and, at CT, a solid mass, main pancreatic duct dilatation greater than 10 mm, diffuse or multifocal involvement, and attenuating or calcified intraluminal content.The main causes of poor CT-histopathologic correlation were related to evaluation of main pancreatic duct involvement and diagnosis of malignant transformation. The association between diabetes and specific CT criteria was highly suggestive of malignancy.Macrocystic pancreatic lesions: differentiation of benign from premalignant and malignant cysts by CT.To assess useful CT features for differentiating benign from premalignant and malignant macrocystic pancreatic lesions.Seventy-four patients with pathologically proven macrocystic pancreatic lesions were enrolled: 17 benign cysts (macrocystic serous cystadenoma, n=12; congenital cyst; n=5) and 57 premalignant and malignant cysts (mucinous cystic neoplasm, n=28; intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of branch duct type, n=20; tumor with cystic change, n=9). Size, location, shape (lobulated, round or oval, or complex cystic with tubular cyst), wall thickness (thin, < or =1mm; thick, >1mm), internal surface (smooth or irregular), and other findings were analyzed with multiphasic CT with thin-section (2.5-3mm) images. CT features between two groups were compared using univariate and multivariate stepwise logistic regression analyses.On univariate analysis, the differences for the shape (p=0.007), wall thickness (p=0.011), and internal surface (p=0.012) between benign and premalignant and malignant cysts were significant. A lobulated shape, a thin wall and a smooth internal surface were more frequent in benign cysts, whereas a round or oval shape or a complex cystic shape with tubular cyst, a thick wall and an irregular internal surface were more frequent in premalignant and malignant cysts. On multivariate analysis, the shape (p=0.002) and wall thickness (p=0.025) were significant CT features for differentiating benign from premalignant and malignant cysts.Shape and wall thickness are the main CT features for differentiating benign from premalignant and malignant macrocystic pancreatic lesions.Value of the single-phase technique in MDCT assessment of pancreatic tumors.The purpose of our study was to determine the diagnostic value of single-phase MDCT in patients with suspected pancreatic carcinoma.Seventy-one patients (41 men, 30 women; mean age, 63 years; range, 29-80 years) with suspected pancreatic tumor underwent MDCT. Scanning was performed on an MDCT scanner with 0.5-sec gantry rotation and acquisition of 4 slices per rotation. Unenhanced scanning was followed by one set of scanning in the caudocranial direction from the inferior hepatic margin to the diaphragm with a scanning delay of 60 sec after the IV injection of 150 mL of contrast material delivered at 3 mL/sec. Two reviewers independently scored images in a blinded fashion for the presence of tumor and assessment of resectability. Receiver operating characteristic analysis was performed.A final histopathologic diagnosis derived from surgical findings was obtained in 42 patients; in the remaining 29 patients, percutaneous fine-needle aspiration biopsy coupled with a 1-year clinical follow-up to determine development of local, regional or distant neoplasm served as gold standard proof of diagnosis. Final diagnosis was pancreatic cancer in 40 patients (27 ductal adenocarcinoma, nine mucinous cystoadenocarcinoma, two neuroendocrine tumors, one lymphoma, and one papillary cystoadenocarcinoma) and chronic pancreatitis in 31. The mean tumor size was 2.4 cm (range, 4-1 cm). Values for the area under the curve (A(z)) for the assessment of tumor detection were 0.97 for reviewer 1 and 0.96 for reviewer 2 (p = not significant). A(z) values for tumor resectability were 0.90 for reviewer 1 and 0.90 for reviewer 2 (p = not significant). No statistically significant differences were observed between superior mesenteric artery and vein opacification with the hepatic parenchyma enhanced at a time closer to the peak hepatic enhancement, optimizing the detection of hepatic lesions.Thin-section single-phase MDCT is an accurate technique for the diagnosis and assessment of resectability in patients with a suspected pancreatic neoplasm. This technique provides optimal tumor-to-pancreas contrast and maximal pancreatic parenchymal and peripancreatic vascular enhancement. It allows visualization of the entire liver and the whole upper abdomen during the portal phase for accurate identification of liver metastases and peritoneal seeding.Comparison of resected and non-resected intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas.By comparing the clinicopathological features and survivals between the resected and non-resected intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) of the pancreas, this study tried to clarify the natural history of IPMNs, to provide a strategy for treatment, and to determine the justification of not performing resection for some patients. A total of 57 patients with IPMN, including 39 resected and 18 non-resected IPMNs, were recruited for study. Data on demographics, clinical presentations, diagnostic work-up, treatment modality, clinical course, and outcomes were evaluated and compared between the resected and non-resected IPMNs. The most common clinical presentation was abdominal pain (57% in total IPMNs, 67% in resected, 33% in non-resected), followed by body weight loss (32% in total IPMNs, 33% in resected, 28% in non-resected). The sensitivity in the diagnosis of IPMN was highest by magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) (88%), followed by endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) (68%), and computed tomography scan (CT scan) (42%) and sonography (10%). The median survival was 21.5 months for patients with resected IPMNs, ranging from 2 to 124 months, and 14 months in non-resected IPMN patients, ranging from 5.5 to 70 months. There is no significant survival difference between the resected and non-resected groups, with a 5-year survival of 69.8% in resected IPMNs and 59.8% in non-resected IPMNs, P = 0.347. The survival outcome of the unresectable non-resected IPMNs was much inferior to the resected IPMNs, P = 0.002 and resectable non-resected IPMNs, P = 0.001. Thus, the prime prognostic factor in predicting the survival outcome of IPMNs is resectability, instead of resection itself. Long-term survival could also be expected in resectable IPMNs without resection. No resection for the IPMN may be justified for patients with high surgical risks, especially for those who are asymptomatic and very aged.Pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms: role of CT in predicting pathologic subtypes.The objective of our study was to evaluate whether CT can be used to predict the pathologic subtypes of pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs).Three radiologists, blinded to the pathologic IPMN subtype, retrospectively and independently reviewed the preoperative CT scans of 38 patients with surgically resected pancreatic IPMN: 11 intraductal papillary mucinous adenomas, 11 intraductal papillary mucinous carcinomas, and 16 intraductal papillary mucinous carcinomas with invasion. The patients, 16 women and 22 men, ranged in age from 38 to 80 years (mean age, 64.3 years). CT findings were correlated with each pathologic subtype using the chi-square (two-sided) test and analysis of variance. Interobserver agreement of the CT diagnosis of pathologic subtype and agreement between the CT diagnosis and pathologic subtype were also studied (kappa statistic).Predominant main pancreatic duct (MPD) involvement (p = 0.04) and a wide (> 1 cm) connection of a side-branch lesion with the MPD (p = 0.03) correlated with intraductal papillary mucinous carcinoma with invasion. Tumor size, MPD diameter, number of tumors per patient, number of pseudoseptations per tumor, common bile duct dilatation, enlarged lymph nodes, intraductal calcifications, papillary bulging, and presence and size of a solid mass yielded no statistically significant relationship with pathologic subtype. Both interobserver agreement of CT diagnosis (range, 0.004-0.359) and agreement between CT diagnosis and pathologic subtype (range, 0.046-0.317) ranged from slight to fair.Prediction of the pathologic subtypes of pancreatic IPMNs by CT is limited. Predominant MPD involvement and a wide connection of a side-branch lesion with the MPD are the only CT findings that can be used to predict the pathologic subtype of pancreatic IPMN.Evaluation of various imaging methods in the differential diagnosis of intraductal papillary-mucinous tumor (IPMT) of the pancreas.IPMT (intraductal papillary-mucinous tumor) of the pancreas has unique clinicopathological characteristics. The lesions which show characteristic clinical features of IPMT exhibit a wide spectrum of histological types ranging from atypical hyperplasia to invasive cancer. Therefore, surgical treatment cannot be recommended for all patients with IPMT. It is necessary to assess the malignant potential of IPMT in individual patients in order to select an appropriate approach. The aim of this study was to evaluate the effectiveness of endoscopic ultrasonography and intraductal ultrasonography as compared with ultrasonography and computed tomography for this purpose.Ultrasonography, computed tomography, endoscopic ultrasonography and intraductal ultrasonography were performed in 49 cases of IPMT (atypical hyperplasia 7, adenoma 23, noninvasive 7 and invasive adenocarcinoma 12). On the basis of the histopathological analysis of another 28 cases of resected IPMT specimens, criteria for differential diagnosis by imaging modalities were defined as follows: Nonneoplastic lesion (atypical hyperplasia): no wall thickening or nodule; noninvasive IPMT (adenoma and intraductal carcinoma): a nodule or wall thickening is present; and invasive IPMT with pancreatic parenchymal invasion: a mass with a heterogenous pattern or interruption of the pancreatic duct wall by the mass.The diagnostic accuracy rate for differentiating nonneoplastic lesion noninvasive IPMT, and invasive IPMT was 33% by ultrasonography, 38% by computed tomography, 77% by endoscopic ultrasonography, and 67% by intraductal ultrasonography. Sensitivity, specificity and accuracy rates for differentiating neoplastic and nonneoplastic IPMT by ultrasonography was 33%, 100%, 42%, by computed tomography 36%, 100%, 44%, by endoscopic ultrasonography 90%, 71%, 88%, by intraductal ultrasonography 94%, 29%, 84%, respectively. Sensitivity, specificity and accuracy rates for differentiating invasive and noninvasive IPMT by ultrasonography was 25%, 100%, 80%, by computed tomography 33%, 100%, 83%, by endoscopic ultrasonography 55%, 97%, 88%, by intraductal ultrasonography 56%, 91%, 84%, respectively. Diagnostic accuracy for invasive IPMT except minimally invasive cases by endoscopic ultrasonography and intraductal ultrasonography was 80%, based on the results of the examination which demonstrated a higher grade lesion.With these criteria, ultrasonography and computed tomography showed high specificity, but low sensitivity for the differential diagnosis of neoplastic/nonneoplastic and invasive/noninvasive IPMT. However, endoscopic ultrasonography and intraductal ultrasonography had high sensitivity and diagnostic accuracy for the differential diagnosis of neoplastic/nonneoplastic lesions. Combination of endoscopic ultrasonography and intraductal ultrasonography showed a high accuracy rate in the diagnosis of invasive IPMT. Thus endoscopic ultrasonography and intraductal ultrasonography contributed significantly to the choice of the treatment for IPMT.Cytotechnologist on-site evaluation of pancreas fine needle aspiration adequacy: comparison with cytopathologists and correlation with the final interpretation.To compare on-site evaluations of adequacy (OSEA) of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) of the pancreas performed by cytotechnologists and cytopathologists.A 10-year retrospective review of 2,426 OSEA from 2,223 procedures in 1,984 patients was performed. Adequacy statistics were calculated along with the accuracy of the OSEA for each OSEA provider. The effect of other variables, including the lifetime number of EUS pancreatic OSEA, the number of years of experience at the time of each case, the institutional number of EUS FNA, and the number of smears was evaluated with ANOVA.There was no difference in the adequacy downgrade rate for cytotechnologists versus cytopathologists during this study period (38.2 vs. 32.2%, p = 0.13). Neither individual cytologist experience with EUS-guided pancreatic FNA (p = 0.25) nor years in practice (p = 0.86) was correlated with the accuracy of the OSEA. The experience of the institution with EUS-guided pancreatic FNA was correlated with both adequacy (p = 0.003) and accuracy (p = 0.000001).Cytotechnologists and cytopathologists are comparably accurate in OSEA of EUS-guided pancreatic FNA. The adequacy and accuracy of the OSEA increase with institutional experience, and this increase is not solely attributable to cytologist factors.Cell block technique and cytological smears for the differential diagnosis of pancreatic neoplasms after endosonography-guided fine-needle aspiration.Cytological smear is widely employed to analyse specimens obtained from endosonography-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA), but false-negative or inconclusive results may occur. A better diagnostic yield can be obtained from processing cell blocks. We compared the effectiveness of the cell block technique and cytological smear in the diagnosis of pancreatic neoplasms. From January 1997 to December 2006, 611 patients with pancreatic tumors were evaluated by EUS-FNA. Surgery was performed in 356 cases, and the other 255 patients were followed clinically for an average of 12.8 months. In total, 282 (46.2%) patients were evaluated with cytological smears, and 329 (53.8%) were evaluated using only cell blocks. Malignant disease was detected in 352 (57.6%) cases, in which adenocarcinoma accounted for 236 (67%) cases. A benign disease was found in the other 259 cases, including 35.1% focal chronic pancreatitis and 32.4% pseudocysts. Aspiration samples were satisfactory in 595 (97.4%) patients after an average of 2.2 (1-4) passes of the needle. Regardless of the cytopathological examination technique, EUS-FNA confirmed malignancy in 269 of 352 (76.4%) cases, and a benign disease in 257 of 259 (99.2%) cases. For patients who received surgery with histologically confirmed lesions, the sensitivity specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy of the smears versus cell blocks in diagnosing pancreatic tumors were 61% versus 85.2% (P<0.001), 100% versus 93.1%, 100% versus 98.4%, 36% versus 55.1% (P=0.046) and 68% versus 86.5% (P<0.001), respectively The cell block technique demonstrated a hig her sensitivity, negative predictive value and accuracy than cytological smears.Predictors of malignancy in intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas: analysis of 310 pancreatic resection patients at multiple high-volume centers.The present study was a retrospective investigation of predictors of malignancy in intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) of the pancreas.The subjects were 310 patients who underwent pancreatic resection at 3 high-volume centers. Preoperative laboratory and imaging findings were analyzed in logistic regression analyses. Endoscopic ultrasonography measurements were essential for the size of mural nodules, and a central review was conducted for pathological diagnosis.Pathological diagnosis was benign IPMN in 150 cases and malignant in 160 (noninvasive carcinoma, n = 100; invasive, n = 60). In multivariate analysis, size of mural nodules, diameter of main pancreatic duct, and cyst size of branch pancreatic duct were independent predictors of malignancy, and areas under the receiver operating characteristic curve for these 3 factors were 0.798, 0.643, and 0.601, respectively. With 7 mm taken as the cutoff value for the size of mural nodules, the diagnosis of malignant IPMN had sensitivity of 74.3% and specificity of 72.7%. Carcinoma without nodules was present in 15 patients (15/160 [9.4%]).The size of mural nodules measured with endoscopic ultrasonography showed high predictive ability. However, about 10% of carcinoma patients did not have nodules, and the handling of the diagnosis in such cases is a problem for the future.Pancreatic tumors: comparison of dual-phase helical CT and endoscopic sonography.The purpose of this study was to compare dual-phase helical CT and endosonography for the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic tumors.Thirty patients with suspected pancreatic tumors underwent endosonography and dual-phase helical CT. A pathologic diagnosis was obtained in all cases with surgery (n = 23) or biopsy (n = 7), resulting in 27 neoplasms. Dual-phase helical CT and endosonographic findings were correlated with surgical and pathologic findings to determine diagnosis and resectability of pancreatic tumors.Overall diagnostic sensitivity was 92% for dual-phase helical CT and 100% for endosonography (p = .45). Overall accuracy for staging of pancreatic tumors was 93% for both dual-phase helical CT and endosonography. Overall accuracy for predicting resectability was 90% for both dual-phase helical CT and endosonography. Accuracy of predicting unresectability was 100% for dual-phase helical CT and 86% for endosonography (p > .80). Differences were not considered statistically significant.Dual-phase helical CT and endoscopic sonography do not differ significantly for diagnosis and assessment of resectability of pancreatic tumors.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided pancreatic fine-needle aspiration: potential pitfalls in one institution's experience of 1212 procedures.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) has emerged as the diagnostic modality of choice for mass lesions in the pancreas. The objective of the current study was to determine the accuracy and pitfalls of EUS-FNA in the diagnosis of pancreatic lesions in cases that involved follow-up surgical resection.Cases of EUS-FNA of pancreatic lesions performed from 2007 to mid-2012 for which subsequent surgical resection was performed were retrieved from the department's database. The accuracy of the cytologic diagnosis was assessed using the histological diagnosis as the gold standard. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were calculated. "Neoplastic," "suspicious," and "malignant" were classified as a positive cytologic diagnosis. In one calculation method, "atypical" was also included as a positive cytologic diagnosis whereas in another it was not considered to be a positive cytological result. The cases with a cytologic-histological discrepancy were reviewed to identify sources of errors.A total of 1212 cases from 1104 patients (518 women and 586 men; age range, 18-94 years [average age, 63.5 years]) were identified. Cytologic diagnoses included 52 unsatisfactory, 224 benign, 129 atypical, 140 neoplasm, 35 suspicious, and 632 malignant diagnoses. Of these cases, 397 patients had histological follow-up information available. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 83.2%, 85.9%, 95.9%, and 56.1%, respectively, with atypical cases excluded from the analysis. When atypical cases were included as a positive cytologic diagnosis, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 86.7%, 67.9%, 90.7%, and 58.5%, respectively, and were 73.7%, 87.7%, 95.6%, and 48.0%, respectively, when atypical cases were included as a negative cytologic diagnosis. The major difficulty in EUS-FNA cytology was to differentiate pancreatic mucinous neoplasms from contaminants of gastric mucosa. Other pitfalls included differentiating mucinous neoplasm from extensive pancreatic intraepithelial neoplasia, and endocrine tumor from nesidioblastosis versus acinar cell carcinoma or intrapancreatic spleen.EUS-FNA is a valuable tool for the diagnosis of pancreatic lesions, especially solid malignant tumors. Cytologic-radiological correlation is essential in differentiating pancreatic mucinous neoplasms from gastric mucosa, because the former usually are found to have characteristic features on imaging. Pathologists should be aware of the pitfalls in the cytologic diagnosis of pancreatic lesions that may significantly change the clinical management of the patients.Accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration in the suspicion of pancreatic metastases.Metastases to the pancreas are rare, and usually mistaken for primary pancreatic cancers. This study aimed to describe the histology results of solid pancreatic tumours obtained by endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) for diagnosis of metastases to the pancreas.In a retrospective review, patients with pancreatic solid tumours and history of previous extrapancreatic cancer underwent EUS-FNA from January/1997 to December/2010. Most patients were followed-up until death and some of them were still alive at the end of the study. The performance of EUS-FNA for diagnosis of pancreatic metastases was analyzed. Symptoms, time frame between primary tumour diagnosis and the finding of metastases, and survival after diagnosis were also analyzed.37 patients underwent EUS-FNA for probable pancreas metastases. Most cases (65%) presented with symptoms, especially upper abdominal pain (46%). Median time between detection of the first tumour and the finding of pancreatic metastases was 36 months. Metastases were confirmed in 32 (1.6%) cases, 30 of them by EUS-FNA, and 2 by surgery. Other 5 cases were non-metastatic. Most metastases were from lymphoma, colon, lung, and kidney. Twelve (32%) patients were submitted to surgery. Median survival after diagnosis of pancreatic metastases was 9 months, with no difference of survival between surgical and non-surgical cases. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy of EUS-FNA with histology analysis of the specimens for diagnosis of pancreatic metastases were, respectively, 93.8%, 60%, 93.8%, 60% and 89%.EUS-FNA with histology of the specimens is a sensitive and accurate method for definitive diagnosis of metastatic disease in patients with a previous history of extrapancreatic malignancies.MR imaging versus PET/CT for evaluation of pancreatic lesions.To retrospectively determine the diagnostic accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and combined positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) in the differential diagnosis of benign and malignant pancreatic lesions.Twenty-seven patients (15 women/12 men, mean age 56.5 years) with MR imaging and PET/CT studies performed to differentiate benign and malignant pancreatic lesions were identified between October 2008 and October 2010. Both MR and PET/CT data sets were retrospectively and blindly evaluated by two independent readers (4 readers total) with different degrees of experience, using a visual five-point score system. The results were correlated with final diagnosis obtained by histopathology.17 patients had malignant diseases and 10 patients had benign diseases. Depending on the observer, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of MRI varied between 88-94%, 50-80%, 75-89% and 71-89% respectively. Sensitivities, specificities, positive predictive values and negative predictive values of PET/CT were 73%, 56%, 73% and 56% respectively. The diagnostic accuracy of MR for the differential diagnosis of pancreatic lesions was 74-89%, compared with 67% for PET/CT. The weighted Cohen's kappa coefficient was 0.47 at MR and 0.53 at PET/CT.MRI achieved higher sensitivity and specificity in the differential diagnosis of pancreatic lesions.EUS-guided FNA of solid pancreatic masses: a learning curve with 300 consecutive procedures.The objective of our study was to assess a single operator's learning curve with regard to the number of passes, the diagnostic accuracy, and the complications associated with EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) of solid pancreatic masses.The number of passes, the diagnostic accuracy, and the complication rate were prospectively evaluated in 300 consecutive EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses performed by a single endosonographer over a 3-year period. The procedures were placed into 3 groups, which contained 100 procedures each. The endosonographer had undergone a third-tier EUS fellowship and had performed 45 supervised pancreatic EUS-FNA during his training.Of the 300 EUS-FNA performed (median age 63 years, 64% men), no statistically significant differences among the 3 groups with regard to age, gender, race, location, or size of the mass were found. Diagnostic accuracy of the EUS-FNA procedure was similar over time (Group 1, 92%; Group 2, 92%; Group 3, 95%). Median number of passes showed a decreasing trend over the 3-year study period, despite an increasing trend of the number of procedures performed (r = -0.14, p = 0.42). The median number of passes was lower for Group 2 (median, 3; p = 0.02) and Group 3 (median, 3; p = 0.003) compared with Group 1 (median, 4). Group 3 (7/100, 7%) was less likely to encounter complications compared with Group 1 (13/100, 13%; p = 0.24) and Group 2 (18/100, 18%; p = 0.03). Frequency of serious complications was similar across the 3 groups (1%-3%).With adequate third-tier training, a newly developed EUS program can achieve safe and accurate results of EUS-FNA of the pancreas. The learning curve, however, needs to continue after the fellowship, because more procedures are needed for one to gain proficiency and efficiency with EUS-FNA.Usefulness of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy for the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy (EUS-FNAB) has come into widespread use, mainly in Western countries, as an efficient and safe method for the cytologic or histologic diagnosis of pancreatic cancer. However, it still has received relatively little attention in Japan. To evaluate the clinical status of EUS-FNAB in Japan, we retrospectively analyzed the results with regard to the ability of EUS-FNAB to diagnose pancreatic cancer, as well as its safety.A total of 52 patients (37 male, 15 female; mean age, 62.5 years; range, 33-85 years) with focal pancreatic lesions underwent EUS-FNAB at our group of hospitals in one region of Japan. Final diagnosis was confirmed by histologic examination of surgical specimens or clinical follow-up.The final diagnoses were malignant tumors in 32 patients and benign ones in 20. Insertion of the needle into the lesion was successful in 50 of the 52 patients (96.2%). Adequate specimens were obtained by EUS-FNAB from 47 of the 50 pancreatic lesions (94.0%). With five false-negative and no false-positive results, the accuracy, sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values were 89.4%, 82.1%, 100%, 100%, and 79.2%, respectively. No complications occurred.EUS-FNAB is an efficient and safe method for the histologic diagnosis of pancreatic cancer. It should be considered as one of the indispensable modalities for the histological diagnosis of pancreatic cancer in Japan, as it is in Western countries.Pancreatic fine needle aspiration. A comparison of computed tomographic and endoscopic ultrasonographic guidance.To compare the sensitivity and specificity of pancreatic fine needle aspiration (FNA) with computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) guidance.A 6-year retrospective review included 137 pancreatic FNAs (CT 51, magnetic resonance imaging 2 or EUS 84). Clinical or histologic follow-up was available for 110 patients.Positive (POS), suspicious (SUS), atypical, negative and unsatisfactory (UNSAT) results represented 25.5%, 7.3%, 7.3%, 40.1% and 19.1% of reported diagnoses, respectively. In detecting malignancy, the sensitivities of POS/SUS results were 71% and 42% for CT and EUS, respectively, with negative predictive value (NPV) of 41% and 45%. Also, 35% of UNSAT results were found to have malignancy. However, EUS was used on more difficult lesions, including 82% of small, cystic ones and 75% of small, solid ones.Although the apparent performance of percutaneous CT-guided biopsies surpasses that of EUS, this is due to the choice of endoscopy for more difficult lesions. The specificity and negative predictive value of EUS and CT are similar.Pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma and chronic mass-forming pancreatitis: Differentiation with dual-energy MDCT in spectral imaging mode.To investigate the value of dual-energy MDCT in spectral imaging in the differential diagnosis of chronic mass-forming chronic pancreatitis (CMFP) and pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma (PDAC) during the arterial phase (AP) and the pancreatic parenchymal phase (PP).Thirty five consecutive patients with CMFP (n=15) or PDAC (n=20) underwent dual-energy MDCT in spectral imaging during AP and PP. Iodine concentrations were derived from iodine-based material-decomposition CT images and normalized to the iodine concentration in the aorta. The difference in iodine concentration between the AP and PP, contrast-to-noise ratio (CNR) and the slope K of the spectrum curve were calculated.Normalized iodine concentrations (NICs) in patients with CMFP differed significantly from those in patients with PDAC during two double phases (mean NIC, 0.26±0.04 mg/mL vs. 0.53±0.02 mg/mL, p=0.0001; 0.07±0.02 mg/mL vs. 0.28±0.04 mg/mL, p=0.0002, respectively). There were significant differences in the value of the slope K of the spectrum curve in two groups during AP and PP (K(CMFP)=3.27±0.70 vs. K(PDAC)=1.35±0.41, P=0.001, and K(CMFP)=3.70±0.17 vs. K(PDAC)=2.16±0.70, p=0.003, respectively). CNRs at low energy levels (40-70 keV) were higher than those at high energy levels (80-40 keV).Individual patient CNR-optimized energy level images and the NIC can be used to improve the sensitivity and the specificity for differentiating CMFP from PDAC by use of dual-energy MDCT in spectral imaging with fast tube voltage switching.Comparison of 3'-deoxy-3'-[¹⁸F]fluorothymidine positron emission tomography (FLT PET) and FDG PET/CT for the detection and characterization of pancreatic tumours.Despite recent advances in clinical imaging modalities, differentiation of pancreatic masses remains difficult. Here, we tested the diagnostic accuracy of molecular-based imaging including 3'-deoxy-3'-[(18)F]fluorothymidine (FLT) positron emission tomography (PET) and [(18)F]fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) PET/CT in patients with suspected pancreatic masses scheduled to undergo surgery.A total of 46 patients with pancreatic tumours suspicious for malignancy and scheduled for resective surgery were recruited prospectively. In 41 patients, FLT PET and FDG PET/CT scans were performed. A diagnostic CT performed on a routine basis was available in 31 patients. FLT PET and FDG PET/CT emission images were acquired according to standard protocols. Tracer uptake in the tumour [FDG and FLT standardized uptake value (SUV)] was quantified by the region of interest (ROI) technique. For FDG PET/CT analysis, correct ROI placement was ensured via side-by-side reading of corresponding CT images.Of 41 patients, 33 had malignancy, whereas 8 patients had benign disease. Visual analysis of FDG and FLT PET resulted in sensitivity values of 91% (30/33) and 70% (23/33), respectively. Corresponding specificities were 50% (4/8) for FDG PET and 75% (6/8) for FLT PET. In the subgroup of patients with contrast-enhanced CT (n = 31), sensitivities were 96% (PET/CT), 88% (CT alone), 92% (FDG PET) and 72% (FLT PET), respectively. Mean FLT uptake in all malignant tumours was 3.0 (range SUV(max) 1.1-6.5; mean FDG SUV(max) 7.9, range 3.3-17.8; p < 0.001).For differentiation of pancreatic tumours, FDG PET and FDG PET/CT showed a higher sensitivity but lower specificity than FLT PET. Interestingly, visual analysis of FLT PET led to two false-positive findings by misinterpreting physiological bowel uptake as pathological FLT uptake in the pancreas. Due to the limited number of patients, the clinical value of adding FLT PET to the diagnostic workup of pancreatic tumours remains to be determined.Effectiveness of contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasound for the evaluation of solid pancreatic masses.To evaluate the usefulness of contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasound (CH-EUS) in differentiating between pancreatic adenocarcinomas and other pancreatic disease.This retrospective cohort study evaluated 90 patients who were seen between November 2010 and May 2013. All these patients had solid pancreatic masses that had a hypoechoic appearance on EUS. All patients underwent CH-EUS to evaluate this diagnostic method's usefulness. The mass lesions observed on CH-EUS were classified into three categories based on their echo intensity: hypoenhanced, isoenhanced, and hyperenhanced lesions. We adjusted the sensitivity and the specificity of each category for detecting malignancies. We also estimated the accuracy of CH-EUS by comparing it to a pathological diagnosis.Of the 90 patients, 62 had a pancreatic adenocarcinoma. Fifty-seven out of 62 pancreatic adenocarcinomas showed a hypoenhanced pattern on CH-EUS. The sensitivity was 92%, the specificity 68% and the accuracy approximately 82%. The area under the curve of the receiver operating characteristic analysis for CH-EUS was 0.799. There is a significant association between the hypoenhanced pattern on CH-EUS and pancreatic duct adenocarcinoma (χ(2) = 35.264, P < 0.001). In pathological examinations, the number of specimens for EUS-fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) was considered insufficient for diagnosis in three patients, and in two patients, the results were reported to be negative for malignancy. Pancreatic masses in all five patients revealed a hypoenhanced pattern with CH-EUS. Three patients were diagnosed with pancreatic adenocarcinoma based on the pathology results of a biopsy, and the remaining two patients were clinically diagnosed with malignancy.CH-EUS is useful for distinguishing between pancreatic adenocarcinoma and other pancreatic disease. When a pancreatic mass shows a hypoenhanced pattern on CH-EUS but involves either insufficient samples or negative results with EUS-FNA, clinicians might consider performing another pathologic diagnosis on the basis of an EUS-FNA sample or a biopsy.Pancreatic fine-needle aspiration cytology in patients < 35-years of age: a retrospective review of 174 cases spanning a 17-year period.Pancreatic lesions in young patients are relatively rare and, to our knowledge, the clinical value of pancreatic fine needle aspiration (FNA) in patients < 35 years of age has not been previously established by any other large retrospective studies. All pancreatic endoscopic ultrasound-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) cases performed on patients < 35 years of age were identified for a 17-year period (1994-2010). All FNAs and all available correlating surgical pathology reports were reviewed. There were a total of 174 cases of pancreatic FNA performed on 109 females and 65 males under the age of 35 (range: 8-34, mean: 27 years). The FNA diagnoses included 37 malignant, 114 negative, nine atypia/suspicious, and 14 cases that were nondiagnostic. Of the 37 malignant FNA cases, the diagnoses included 18 pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (PanNeT), 11 solid pseudopapillary neoplasms (SPN), five adenocarcinomas and three metastatic neoplasms. Histologic follow-up was available in 22 of the 37 malignant cases diagnosed by FNA, and the diagnosis was confirmed in 21 cases. One pancreatoblastoma was misclassified as SPN on EUS-FNA. False negative diagnoses were noted in three cases of low-grade mucinous cystic neoplasm and one case of PanNeT. The most common type of neoplasms diagnosed by EUS-FNA in patients < 35-year old is PanNeT, followed by SPN with both tumors accounting for 75% of all the neoplasms encountered in this age group. The sensitivity and specificity for positive cytology in EUS-FNA of the pancreas to identify malignancy and mucinous neoplasms were 90% and 100%, respectively. Diagn. Cytopathol. 2014;42:297-301. © 2013 Wiley Periodicals, Inc. Comparing the performance of visual estimation and standard uptake value of F-18 fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography for detecting malignancy in pancreatic tumors other than invasive ductal carcinoma.The utility of FDG PET/CT for the detection and evaluation of invasive ductal carcinoma has been widely reported, but a few studies have assessed the utility of FDG PET/CT to detect malignancy in a variety of pancreatic lesions other than invasive ductal carcinoma.To compare the diagnostic performance of visual estimation with the semi-quantitative scores of FDG PET/CT for detecting malignancy in a variety of pancreatic lesions other than invasive ductal carcinoma.Images of pathologically proven pancreatic lesions from 32 patients were retrospectively evaluated: 14 benign lesions, 7 borderline (low malignant) lesions, and 11 malignant lesions. The average scores from visual estimation by the two observers were compared to two semi-quantitative analyses of FDG uptake in the lesions, namely the maximum standardized uptake value (SUVmax) and mean standardized uptake value (SUVmean).Visual analysis value, SUVmax and SUVmean were 0.33 ± 0.21, 1.8 ± 0.7 and 1.5 ± 0.7 for the benign lesions, 0.70 ± 0.28, 5.0 ± 2.6 and 3.1±1.7 for the borderline lesions, and 0.73 ± 0.18, 4.7 ± 2.5 and 3.2 ± 1.6 for the malignant lesions, respectively. Receiver operating characteristic analysis revealed the areas under the curves for detecting non-benign (malignant or borderline) lesions through visual analysis, SUVmax, and SUVmean were 0.914, 0.954, and 0.875, respectively.For a variety of pancreatic lesions other than invasive ductal carcinoma, visual analysis and semi-quantitative analyses all showed strong diagnostic performance. However, semi-quantitative analysis with SUVmax proved to be the most effective method for detecting non-benign pancreatic lesions.Preoperative evaluation of invasive and noninvasive intraductal papillary-mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas: clinical, radiological, and pathological analysis of 123 cases.We aimed to investigate preoperative findings that are useful to distinguish intraductal papillary-mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) subtypes.One hundred twenty-three patients who underwent pancreatectomy for IPMN were analyzed clinicopathologically and radiologically. Invasive IPM carcinomas (IPMCs) were subdivided into early-stage nonaggressive (minimally invasive IPMC [MI-IPMC]) and more advanced and aggressive (invasive carcinoma originating in IPMC [IC-IPMC]) subtypes according to our recently proposed pathological criteria.The lesions consisted of 27 IPMNs with low-grade dysplasia, 14 IPMNs with moderate dysplasia, 21 IPMNs with high-grade dysplasia, 30 MI-IPMCs, and 31 IC-IPMCs. Multidetector-row computed tomography detected a component of invasive carcinoma in IC-IPMC with 86% sensitivity and 100% specificity. In patients with IPMNs other than IC-IPMC, multivariate analysis demonstrated 3 significant predictive factors of malignancy: IPMN size (>40 mm), IPMN duct type (main pancreatic duct or mixed type), and the presence of a mural nodule or thick septum. The diagnostic score obtained using these 3 factors showed a strong correlation with the presence of malignancy.For preoperative evaluation of patients with IPMN, it is recommended to rule out IC-IPMC using multidetector-row computed tomography and then to categorize IPMN other than IC-IPMC according to malignant potential based on the diagnostic score.Quantitative contrast-enhanced harmonic EUS in differential diagnosis of focal pancreatic masses (with videos).The role of EUS with contrast agents can be expanded through the use of time-intensity curve (TIC) analysis and computer-aided interpretation.To validate the use of parameters derived from TIC analysis in an artificial neural network (ANN) classification model designed to diagnose pancreatic carcinoma (PC) and chronic pancreatitis (CP).Prospective, multicenter, observational trial-endoscopy units from Romania, Denmark, Germany, and Spain.A total of 167 consecutive patients with PC or CP.Contrast-enhanced harmonic EUS (CEH-EUS) and EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA), TIC analysis, and ANN processing.Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values (PPV, NPV) for EUS-FNA, CEH-EUS, and the ANN.After excluding all of the recordings that did not meet the technical and procedural criteria, 112 cases of PC and 55 cases of CP were included. EUS-FNA was performed in 129 patients, and the diagnosis was confirmed by surgery (n = 15) or follow-up (n = 23) in the remaining cases. Its sensitivity and specificity were 84.82% and 100%, respectively, whereas the PPV and NPV were 100% and 76.63%, respectively. The sensitivity of real-time quantitative assessment of CEH-EUS was 87.5%, specificity 92.72%, PPV 96.07%, and NPV 78.46%. Peak enhancement, wash-in area under the curve, wash-in rate, and the wash-in perfusion index were significantly different between the groups. No significant differences were found between rise time, mean transit time, and time to peak. For the ANN, sensitivity was 94.64%, specificity 94.44%, PPV 97.24%, and NPV 89.47%.Only PC and CP lesions were included.Parameters obtained through TIC analysis can differentiate between PC and CP cases and can be used in an automated computer-aided diagnostic system with good diagnostic results. (NCT01315548.).Diagnostic value of mucins (MUC1, MUC2 and MUC5AC) expression profile in endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration specimens of the pancreas.Mucins are aberrantly expressed in various malignancies. We immunohistochemically tested mucins expression (MUC1, MUC2 and MUC5AC) in EUS-FNA samples from pancreatic occupying lesions for the diagnostic utility. The prevalence of MUC1, MUC2 and MUC5AC expression in pancreatic cancers were 77.5% (31/40), 10.0% (4/40) and 80.0% (32/40), respectively, and in the benign pancreatic diseases 25% (4/16), 31.3% (5/16) and 43.8% (7/16). MUC1 and MUC5AC significantly overexpressed in pancreatic cancer, and MUC1 negatively related with tumor differentiation degree (p < 0.05). The prevalence of MUC1, MUC2 and MUC5AC expression in pancreatic mucinous neoplasms were 66.7% (12/18), 38.9% (7/18) and 88.9% (16/18), respectively, and in the pancreatic non-mucinous neoplasms 60.5% (23/38), 5.3% (2/38) and 57.9% (22/38). MUC2 and MUC5AC significantly overexpressed in pancreatic mucinous neoplasms, especially MUC2 in benign mucinous neoplasms (p < 0.05). Compared with cytology alone, the combination test of MUC1+cytology, and MUC5AC+cytology could achieve higher sensitivity (85 vs. 65%, 100 vs. 65%) and accuracy (89.3% vs. 73.2%, 91.1% vs. 73.2%) for pancreatic cancer diagnosis; the combination test of MUC2 + cytology, and MUC5AC + cytology could achieve higher sensitivity (77.8% vs. 38.9%, 100% vs. 38.9%), and specificity (97.4% vs. 60.5%, 71.1% vs. 60.5%) accuracy (100% vs. 51.8%, 80.4% vs. 51.8%) for mucinous neoplasm diagnosis. The panel MUC1+/MUC2-/MUC5AC+/ was higher specific in pancreatic cancer diagnosis, as well as MUC1-/MUC2+/MUC5AC+/ in pancreatic mucinous neoplasms. Our observations suggest the mucins expression profile in EUS-FNA specimens has higher value for the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer and mucinous neoplasms.Evaluation of pancreatic cystic lesions with EUS.Mucin-hypersecreting intraductal neoplasms of the pancreas: a precursor to cystic pancreatic malignancies.Muncin-hypersecreting intraductal pancreatic neoplasms were first described in 1982 and have been observed in increasing numbers since. They are observed primarily by endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) and are characterized by an intraductal papillary neoplasm that secretes thick mucin, causing pancreatic duct dilatation and obstructive pancreatitis.Twenty patients are presented, 14 male and six female, with an average age of 59 +/- 11 years. All patients presented with abdominal pain, and most had nausea and vomiting, weight loss, and documented pancreatitis. Of the preoperative studies, ERCP was positive in all patients. Computed tomography scan, endoscopic ultrasonogram, and cytologic findings were less sensitive. Tumor markers were only positive in one patient. All 20 patients were treated surgically. Nine underwent Whipple procedure, one patient had a total pancreatectomy, and nine had distal pancreatic resections. The first patient in the series did not have a pancreatic resection, and his disease evolved into a lethal cystadenocarcinoma causing his death 99 months later.Histopathologic findings were interpreted as borderline malignant in 17 of the 20 patients, and three patients had evidence of invasive adenocarcinoma. Two of these three patients had nodal or distant metastases at the time of diagnosis, and all three died of adenocarcinoma. Seventeen of the patients are alive and well, although two of three with positive pancreatic margins have had recurrent symptoms and have been successfully reresected.The mucin-producing intraductal papillary tumor of the pancreas is a newly described variant of pancreatic cancer. It presents with symptoms of pancreatitis and has a progressive but more indolent course than the more lethal invasive ductal cancers. Patients with unexplained pancreatitis should undergo ERCP investigation, and aggressive surgical therapy should be carried out because the prognosis for this lesion, when appropriately treated, is more favorable than the usual pancreatic cancer.EUS-guided fine needle aspiration with and without trucut biopsy of pancreatic masses.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided trucut biopsy (EUS TCB) has a lower yield than fine needle aspiration (FNA) in pancreatic masses but the additional use of TCB to FNA may improve the diagnostic accuracy over FNA alone.To compare the yield of EUS FNA alone or combined with EUS TCB for diagnosis of pancreatic masses.Single center retrospective case control study conducted at academic tertiary center. Study conducted between March 2004 and April 2007.A total of 126 consecutive patients referred for EUS guided biopsy of pancreatic mass; three patients excluded from analysis, final cohort comprised 123 patients (108 malignant and 15 benign). EUS FNA was performed in 72 patients and EUS FNA+TCB was performed in 51 patients.The diagnostic performance of EUS FNA versus EUS FNA+TCB was compared.The sensitivity, specificity and frequency of cases correctly identified for malignancy of FNA alone were 87.1% (54/62), 100% (10/10) and 88.8% (64/72), while for the combination of FNA+TCB they were: 95.7% (44/46), 100% (5/5) and 96.0% (49/51), respectively (P=0.184, 1.000, and 0.193 FNA versus FNA+TCB). No major complication occurred in either group.FNA+TCB can be safely performed in selected lesions but sensitivity is not statistically improved over FNA alone (95.7% versus 87.1%).EUS elastography of the pancreas: feasibility and pattern description of the normal pancreas, chronic pancreatitis, and focal pancreatic lesions.Initial clinical applications have shown that US elastography might be able to distinguish tissues because of their specific consistency.(1) To investigate the feasibility of EUS elastography of the pancreas and (2) to describe elastographic patterns of the normal pancreas and the pancreas affected by inflammatory or focal disease.Prospective single-center study.Academic center of the University of Witten/Herdecke.Twenty patients with normal pancreas, 20 patients with chronic pancreatitis, and 33 patients with focal pancreatic lesion, histologically later proven in 32 of these 33 cases.Commercially available US equipment was used. The elasticity of tissue was reconstructed in real time within a sample area and was translated into a color scale imaging relative tissue elasticity within this area. Representative loops of at least 20 seconds were recorded regarding each region of interest.Adequate elastographic recordings could be obtained in all 73 patients. Patients with hypoechoic and intermediately echogenic normal pancreas revealed a relatively homogeneous elastographic pattern. Thirty-one focal lesions, including 30 neoplasms and most of the chronically inflamed pancreata had a honeycomb pattern dominated by hard strands. This pattern showed analogies to the histologic structure of 10 resected tumors. Other patients with chronic pancreatitis and those with hyperechoic healthy pancreas had miscellaneous elastographic appearances.EUS elastography of the pancreas is feasible and produces plausible results. The examination of homogeneous tissue is impaired by the relative scale used. Chronic pancreatitis and hard tumors cannot be distinguished by elastography, probably because of their similar fibrous structure.EUS elastography for pancreatic mass lesions: between image and FNA?[The role of FDG-PET scan in the diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma].In 22 patients with focal pancreatic lesions, the values of different diagnostic modalities were analysed for the evaluation of malignancy. The CA 19-9 level was elevated in 4/5 malignant cases (sensitivity: 80%) and in 4/15 of benign cases (specificity: 73%). Hypodensity/hypoechogeneity was considered to be the characteristic sign of malignancy during CT/ultrasound (sensitivity: 100%, specificity: 50%/47%). ERCP was found to be specific but not sensitive enough and the rate of unsuccessful investigations was relatively high (4/22). The diagnostic value of FDG-PET was found to be superior to other diagnostic modalities (sensitivity 100%, specificity 88%). In cases with focal pancreatic hypoechogenic/hypodense lesions detected by CT or US in suspicion of malignancy, the FDG-PET should be the next step in the diagnostic strategy.Diagnostic efficacy of cell block immunohistochemistry, smear cytology, and liquid-based cytology in endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration of pancreatic lesions: a single-institution experience.The diagnostic efficiency of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) cytology varies widely depending on the treatment method of the specimens. The present study aimed to evaluate the diagnostic efficacy of cell block (CB) immunohistochemistry, smear cytology (SC), and liquid-based cytology (LBC) in patients with pancreatic lesions without consulting an on-site cytopathologist.This study prospectively enrolled 72 patients with pancreatic lesions. The EUS-FNA specimens were examined by SC, LBC, and CB immunohistochemistry. The diagnostic efficacy of the 3 methods was then compared. Patients' final diagnosis was confirmed by surgical resection specimens, diagnostic imaging, and clinical follow-up.Our results included 60 malignant and 12 benign pancreatic lesions. The diagnostic sensitivity (90%), negative predictive value (66.7%), and accuracy (91.7%) of CB immunohistochemistry were significantly higher than those of SC (70.0%, 30.0%, and 75.0%, respectively) and LBC (73.3%, 31.6%, and 77.8%, respectively) (all P<0.05). The combination of CB and SC, or CB and LBC, did not significantly increase the efficacy compared to CB immunohistochemistry alone.Our findings suggest that in the absence of an on-site cytopathologist, CB immunohistochemistry on EUS-FNA specimens offers a higher diagnostic efficacy in patients with pancreatic lesions than does SC and LBC.EUS-guided FNA of solid pancreatic masses: a prospective, randomized trial comparing 22-gauge and 25-gauge needles.There is a lack of prospective, randomized studies comparing the diagnostic yield and complication rates of 22-gauge and 25-gauge needles during EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses.Our primary aim was to compare the diagnostic yield of 22-gauge and 25-gauge needles. Secondary aims included determining the number of needle passes performed, ease of needle passage, and complications.Prospective, randomized study.Tertiary referral centers at Yale University School of Medicine, New Haven, Connecticut, and Virginia Piper Cancer Institute, Minneapolis, Minnesota.Patients with a suspected solid pancreatic mass from February 2007 to June 2008 were enrolled.Patients were randomized to EUS-FNA with a 22-gauge or 25-gauge needle.A diagnostic result was defined as cytology findings positive for malignant cells.A total of 131 patients were enrolled: EUS-FNA was performed with a 22-gauge needle in 64 patients and with a 25-gauge needle in 67 patients. Cytology was diagnostic in 120 (91.6%) of 131 patients overall: 56 (87.5%) of 64 with 22-gauge needles and 64 (95.5%) of 67 with 25-gauge needles (no statistically significant difference was found between the 2 groups; P=.18). A similar number of passes was performed in both arms (mean [SD] 2.6 [1.2] each; P=.96). There were no complications in either group.A larger number of patients is needed to determine small differences in diagnostic yield.This is the first prospective, randomized trial comparing 22-gauge and 25-gauge needles in EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses. We achieved equally high diagnostic yields by using a similar number of passes, showing that 25-gauge needles are an effective alternative to 22-gauge needles.Relative efficiency and predictive value of ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde pancreatography in diagnosis of pancreatic disease.Improved early diagnosis of cystadenocarcinoma of the pancreas.Cystadenocarcinoma of the pancreas is insensitive to radiotherapy and chemotherapy, and surgery is at present the definitive treatment. Early and accurate diagnosis of cystadenocarcinoma is crucial for increasing the five-year survival rate and the resectable rate. There is no definitive and effective method of early diagnosis of cystadenocarcinoma of the pancreas in China and other countries.We compared endoscopic ultrasonography-guided (EUS-guided) fine needle aspiration biopsy combined with cyst fluid carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), CA19-9 examination with computed tomography (CT), B-ultrasonography (B-US) and serum CEA and CA19-9, to explore methods of early diagnosis of cystadenocarcinoma of the pancreas. Retrospective analysis was made on the clinical data of 126 cases of benign pancreatic lesion (90 cases) and cystadenocarcinoma (36).The sensitivity of B-US and CT for cystadeno-carcinoma was 52.8% and 77.8%, while the specificity was 78.9% and 86.7%, respectively. When measurement of CEA and CA19-9 of cyst fluid was combined with EUS-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy, the sensitivity was 94.4%, higher than that of B-US and CT (P<0.05). The sensitivity of cyst fluid CEA, CA19-9 examinations was considerably higher than that of serum CEA, CA19-9 (P<0.05). Upper gastrointestinal barium meal and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) had low sensitivity and specificity.EUS-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy combined with examination of cyst fluid CEA, CA19-9 is a credible means for early diagnosis of cystadenocarcinoma of the pancreas. B-US, CT and serum CEA, CA19-9 measurements are in common use, their findings are also very important.Diagnosis of pancreatic tumors by endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) for pancreatic solid tumors larger or smaller than 3 cm, and cystic lesions.From January/1997 to December/2006, 611 patients with pancreatic tumors were subjected to EUS-FNA. The final diagnosis was obtained either by surgery (356 cases) or after a mean clinical follow-up of 11.8 mo in the remaining patients.There were 405 solid tumors, 189 cystic lesions and 17 mixed. Pancreatic specimens for cytological assessment were successfully obtained by EUS-FNA in 595 (97.4%) cases. There were 352 (57.6%) malignancies and 259 (42.4%) benign tumors. Among the malignancies, pancreatic adenocarcinomas accounted for 67% of the lesions. Overall, the sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy of EUS-FNA were, respectively, 78.4%, 99.2%, 99.3%, 77.2% and 87.2%. Specifically for solid tumors, the same parameters for neoplasms larger and smaller than 3 cm were, respectively, 78.8% vs 82.4%, 100% vs 98.4%, 100% vs 99%, 54.8% vs 74.1% and 83.1% vs 87.8%. For cystic lesions, the values were, respectively, 72.2%, 99.3%, 97.5%, 91% and 92.2%.EUS-FNA can be used to sample pancreatic tumors in most patients. Even though the negative predictive value is inadequate for large solid tumors, the results are rather good for small solid tumors, especially concerning the sensitivity, negative predictive value and diagnostic accuracy. Among all pancreatic lesions, EUS-FNA for cystic lesions can reveal the best negative predictive value and diagnostic accuracy, both higher than 90%.A prospective multicenter evaluation of a new side-port endoscopic ultrasound-fine-needle aspiration in solid upper gastrointestinal lesions.Diagnostic yield of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-fine-needle aspiration (FNA) varies depending on the equipment used and the site targeted. Multiple needle passes are usually required to obtain a diagnosis. A new needle incorporating a side-port carries a theoretical advantage regarding acquisition of cytological material. The aim of the study was to demonstrate the safety and efficacy of the Olympus side-port needle in solid upper gastrointestinal indications.A prospective multicenter evaluation of patients referred for EUS-FNA for solid lesions was performed across six tertiary gastroenterology referral centers in four capital cities in Australia. The main outcome measures include cytological diagnosis, number of needle passes required for diagnosis and complication rates.Thirty patients (17 men; 13 women) with a mean age of 67.5 years were studied. Indications included pancreatic or biliary mass in 24 patients, retroperitoneal or periduodenal mass in 2, enlarged lymph node in 2, a gastric submucosal tumor in 1 and a subcarinal mass in 1. The mean size of the lesions was 3.47 cm (range, 0.5-8 cm). All but one case had a diagnosis made (96.7%). The mean number of passes required to reach a diagnosis was 1.7. In neoplastic lesions the diagnosis was made with a mean of 1.6 passes. No complications were encountered.The new EUS-FNA needle with side port appears effective and safe in solid upper gastrointestinal EUS-FNA indications.A prospective, randomized trial comparing 25-gauge and 22-gauge needles for endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration of pancreatic masses.Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is widely performed for pancreatic masses. The 25-gauge needle (25G) might be easier to be manipulated and expected to be associated with fewer complications since it is thinner and more flexible than the 22-gauge needle (22G) although obtaining adequate specimens is questioned. In this randomized trial, the authors tried to compare prospectively 25G and 22G in diagnostic accuracy, manipulability from the operator's viewpoint and procedure-related complications.A total of 188 consecutive patients undergoing EUS-FNA for solid or cystic pancreatic masses were consecutively enrolled and 94 patients were randomized to either 25G or 22G group, respectively.Baseline characteristics were similar except that more masses of 25G group were located in the head or uncinate process of pancreas than those from 22G group. Although there was no difference in diagnostic accuracy (89.4% vs. 88.3% with p = 0.82), 25G was easier to be manipulated (p = 0.004) and related with fewer procedure-related complications (10.6% vs. 3.2% with p = 0.004).25G can be chosen in preference to 22G when performing pancreatic EUS-FNA because 25G was significantly superior to 22G in terms of manipulability and complications although both were effective for accurate diagnosis.[Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) as primary diagnostic tool for unclear lesions in the upper gastrointestinal tract].Endoscopic Ultrasound (EUS) and the EUS guided fine-needle Aspiration (EUS-FNA) increasingly plays an important role in the diagnostic evaluation of lesions or lymph nodes in the mediastinum and upper gastrointestinal tract of unknown origin. The objective of this study was to assess safety and accuracy of EUS-FNA in two secondary and tertiary health care providers.Prospectively, from Mai 2003 to June 2007, all patients underwent EUS with devices from Pentax (FG38UX, EC3830UT) with EUS-FNA (Cook or Mediglobe) at Johannes Gutenberg University and Catholic Hospital in Mainz. In all cases, cytology and extracted cells were histological examined by the same pathologists. In case of negative EUS results, patients were observed for at least 12 months after initial diagnosis later by reanalysis, CT-scan and follow-up clinical data to confirm the diagnosis.In total, 776 patients with EUS and 167 EUS-FNA (21.5 %) could be evaluated. Median age was 62 years, 68 % of patients were male. Patients underwent EUS-FNA in the mediastinum (n = 54), pancreas (73), stomach (13), liver, adrenal glands and rectum (n = 6). The complication rate of EUS-FNA was very low with only 0.6 %, mainly consistent of one minor haemorrhage at the aspiration site. A clear histological diagnosis could not be achieved in 12.5 % (21/167). Statistical analyses of all EUS-FNA revealed a sensitivity of 77.8 % (95 %CI 67,2 - 86,3) and a specificity of 98.5 % (95 % CI 92,2 - 100), with a positive and negative predictive value of 98.4 % and of 78.1 %, respectively. The overall accuracy was 87 % (95 %CI 80,4 - 92,0).EUS combined with FNA is a safe tool for first histological evaluation of unidentified lesions or lymph nodes in the mediastinum and upper gastrointestinal tract, indicative for gastrointestinal cancers.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration for the diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses: the impact on patient-management strategy.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is a safe and accurate technique for diagnosing pancreatic cancer. However, its impact for management of these patients is poorly investigated.To investigate the diagnostic yield and the therapeutic impact of EUS-FNA in the management of solid pancreatic masses.One hundred consecutive patients who underwent EUS-FNA for a solid pancreatic mass were included. Aspirates were placed onto glass slides for cytological examination and microbiopsies were fixed in formaldehyde for histology. The impact on clinical management was analysed retrospectively according to different endpoints, such as its impact on indications for chemotherapy, surgery or appropriate follow-up modality.Eight procedures were considered failures and two patients were lost to follow-up. A final diagnosis was obtained in 90 patients. The sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of combined cytology and histology for the diagnosis of malignant or potentially-malignant tumours were 78%, 75%, and 78% respectively. The sensitivity and accuracy of cytology alone were significantly higher than those of histology alone (P = 0.0003). By intention-to-diagnose analysis, EUS-FNA directly influenced the management strategy in 62 of 100 patients.In patients with pancreatic mass and suspected malignancy, EUS-FNA provides an accurate diagnosis in approximately 80% of cases. EUS-FNA directly influences the management in two-thirds of patients.Endoscopic ultrasonography in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic adenocarcinoma. Results of a prospective study with comparison to ultrasonography and CT scan.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) was compared to ultrasonography (US) and CT scan (CT) in order to evaluate its role in the diagnosis and the locoregional spread assessment of pancreatic cancer. Sixty-four patients suspected of pancreatic cancer were studied prospectively, and the results of imaging techniques were compared to histology and surgical exploration. There were 49 cases of pancreatic adenocarcinoma, 11 of pancreatitis, 2 of common bile duct carcinoma, 1 lymphoma and 1 hepatocellular carcinoma with peripancreatic metastatic lymph nodes. EUS was significantly more accurate (91%) than CT (66%) and US (64%) for diagnosis of pancreatic cancer. EUS was able to image all 7 cancers less than 25 mm in diameter, US and CT only one. There were 4 false positives with EUS which were all cases of pseudotumorous pancreatitis. For detecting lymph node involvement, EUS was significantly more sensitive (62%) and accurate (74%) than US (8% and 37%) and CT (19% and 42%), respectively. Invaded lymph nodes adjacent to large tumors and micrometastatic involvement were responsible for this lack of sensitivity. EUS was significantly more sensitive (100%) than CT (71%) and US (17%) for detecting venous involvement. The specificity of EUS was lower (67%) because of duodenal bulb stenosis and large tumors. In conclusion, this prospective and comparative study confirms that EUS is an accurate tool for diagnosis and locoregional spread assessment of pancreatic cancer when performed in a reference center. EUS is of particular interest for small tumours. However, EUS does not enable differentiation of pseudotumorous pancreatitis from adenocarcinoma.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy using linear array and radial scanning endosonography.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) accurately stages gastrointestinal malignancies but is less able to differentiate between neoplastic and inflammatory processes. EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS FNA) has been reported useful for obtaining a diagnosis in suspected gastrointestinal lesions. We report our entire experience with EUS FNA using both radial and linear array endosonography, including our diagnostic accuracy and complication rate.Two hundred eight consecutive patients (119 men, 89 women) referred for EUS evaluation of suspected gastrointestinal or mediastinal masses underwent EUS-guided FNA. We performed EUS FNA using radial scanning or linear array endosonography and a 23 gauge, 4 cm needle or a 22 gauge, 12 cm needle. Data collected included lesion types, number of passes, complications, and diagnostic accuracy.Two hundred eight lesions were targeted, with a total of 705 FNA passes (mean 3.39 passes/patient). Overall diagnostic accuracy for our study population was 87% with a 89% sensitivity and 100% specificity. The diagnostic accuracy for each subgroup was 95% for mediastinal lymph node, 85% for intra-abdominal lymph node, 85% for pancreatic, 84% for submucosal, and 100% for perirectal masses. EUS FNA provided an adequate specimen in 90% of patients. The FNA results were similar for both types of endosonography. We observed immediate complications in 2% (4 of 208) of patients. All complications occurred with EUS FNA of pancreatic lesions and consisted of bleeding and pancreatitis in 2 patients each. For EUS FNA of pancreatic masses there was a 1.2% (2 of 121) risk of pancreatitis, 1% (1/121) risk of severe bleeding, and risk of death in less than 1%.EUS-guided FNA appears to be technically feasible, safe, and accurate for obtaining diagnostic tissue of suspicious gastrointestinal and mediastinal lesions and provides important preoperative information.Non-invasive differentiation of pancreatic lesions: is analysis of FDG kinetics superior to semiquantitative uptake value analysis?The diagnostic utility of fluorine-18 2-deoxy-D-glucose positron emission tomography (FDG PET) for the non-invasive differentiation of focal pancreatic lesions originating from cancer or chronic pancreatitis by combined visual image interpretation and semiquantitative uptake value analysis has been documented. However, in clinical routine some misdiagnosis is still observed. This is because there is potential overlap between the semiquantitative uptake values obtained for active inflammatory lesions and cancer. Therefore, this prospective study was undertaken to test the hypothesis that analysis of dynamic kinetics of focal pancreatic lesions based on FDG PET may more accurately determine the benign or malignant nature of such lesions. Thirty patients (56+/-17 years) were studied dynamically with FDG PET for a period of 60-90 min. Patients were assigned to one of four groups: control, acute pancreatitis, chronic pancreatitis or pancreatic cancer. Two observers, blinded to the clinical data, analysed the time-activity curves of FDG kinetics based on region of interest analysis. The diagnosis predicted by FDG PET was compared with the result of histological examination of the surgical specimen. Analysis of FDG kinetics revealed significant differences in the shape of the time-activity curve for controls, pancreatic cancer and inflammatory disease. Surprisingly, there was no significant difference in the time-activity curve shape for chronic pancreatitis and acute pancreatitis; this is, however, not a clinical issue. Furthermore, acquisition time (60 min vs 90 min) did not affect interpretation of the time-activity curve, so that scanning time may be regularly shortened to 60 min. Interobserver agreement was 1. Based on these findings, non-invasive differentiation between pancreatic cancer and chronic pancreatitis was correctly predicted in all cases, as confirmed by histology. In addition, the specificity was increased compared with that obtained from standardised uptake value analysis. Non-invasive differentiation between pancreatic cancer and chronic pancreatitis may best be achieved based on a dynamic FDG PET study including kinetic analysis. This approach yields results superior to those obtained from a semiquantitative analysis of pancreatic lesions.Validating a simple scoring system to predict malignancy and invasiveness of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas.The objective of the present study was to identify reliable preoperative factors predicting malignancy or invasiveness of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) of the pancreas and the effectiveness of a diagnostic scoring system based on these factors.Between August 1994 and December 2007, 204 patients underwent pancreatic resection for IPMN at a single institute. Medical records were reviewed retrospectively, and a new diagnostic scoring system for predicting malignant IPMN preoperatively was designed.Univariate analysis revealed nine significant predictors of both malignant and invasive IPMN: age > or =60 years, history of pancreatitis, presence of mural nodule(s), diameter of main pancreatic duct (MPD) >6 mm, main duct or mixed type, total bilirubin >1.2 mg/dl, CA-19-9 >37 U/ml, tumor location in the pancreatic head, and tumor size >30 mm. Multivariate analysis showed that age, pancreatitis, mural nodule(s), and MPD diameter were independent predictors of invasive IPMN, and that all these parameters, plus elevated carbohydrate antigen-19-9 (CA-19-9), were independent predictors of malignant IPMN. A scoring system based on these five factors, each assigned 1 point, and with a cut-off of 3 points, could predict malignant IPMN with a sensitivity of 50.7% and a specificity of 90.1%. The 5-year survival rates of patients with benign and malignant IPMN were 95.0% and 64.0%, respectively.Our scoring system using five independent factors (age > or =60 years, history of pancreatitis, presence of mural nodule(s), elevated level of CA-19-9, and MPD diameter >6 mm) may be helpful for predicting malignancy and postoperative survival.Cyst wall puncture and aspiration during EUS-guided fine needle aspiration may increase the diagnostic yield of mucinous cysts of the pancreas.Pancreatic cysts are common, however, their diagnosis and classification remains a challenge despite advances in cross-sectional imaging and endoscopic ultrasound with fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA).To determine the incremental yield of cytologic examination of material obtained from targeted fine needle aspiration ("puncture") of the cyst wall after aspiration of fluid for CEA.Retrospective consecutive series.Consecutive patients undergoing EUS-FNA of a pancreatic cyst by 2 expert endoscopists at a single tertiary care center between January 2006 and June 2008.Standard EUS-FNA of pancreatic cysts was carried out, and after cyst fluid aspiration the cyst wall was punctured and aspirated (CWP) to obtain epithelium for cytologic analysis.The diagnostic yields of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) obtained from cyst fluid and of cytology obtained from CWP. CEA greater than192 ng/mL was considered diagnostic of a mucinous cyst.One hundred seven patients underwent EUS-FNA with CWP. Sixteen (31%) of 52 patients with CEA <192 ng/mL had cytology positive for mucinous epithelium, whereas 15 (47%) of 32 cysts with an insufficient amount of fluid for CEA analysis had positive cytology from CWP. The additional, cumulative diagnostic yield for mucinous cysts was therefore, 37%. Of 55 cysts diagnosed as mucinous, more (56%) were diagnosed by CWP cytology alone than by CEA (P<0.05).Retrospective design and limited surgical pathology.Cyst wall puncture and aspiration during routine EUS-FNA may be a safe, easily applied, and inexpensive technique for improving the diagnostic yield for mucinous cysts of the pancreas.Comparison of multidetector CT and endoscopic ultrasonography in malignant pancreatic mass lesions.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) has been shown to be superior to conventional CT in detecting and staging pancreatic cancer. We conducted a prospective trial to compare EUS and MDCT, in discriminating benign/malignant, in determining local and vascular invasion of a suspected pancreatic cancer and deciding its resectability.The study was performed at the Gastroenterology Department of Izmir Ataturk Training and Research Hospital, from June 2009 to June 2010, all patients with suspected pancreatic and periampullary tumors referred to our department were enrolled. A total of 56 patients were evaluated at the beginning. Five patients having distal CBD tumor (n=2), gallbladder tumor (n=1) and papillary tumor (n=2) were excluded from the study. Analysis was done for the remaining 51 patients.For the diagnosis of resectability/unresectability, EUS alone demonstrated a definite role in 4 (9%) of the 43 patients in confirming surgical and pathologic results and MDCT alone demonstrated a definite role in 6 (14%) of the 43 patients in confirming their results. An accurate diagnostic decision regarding resectability/unresectability was accomplished in 27 (63%) patients with EUS and MDCT.While MDCT is clinically quite effective, in terms of a correct resectability/unresectability decision, EUS should also be used.Optimal scan time for evaluating pancreatic disease with positron emission tomography using F-18-fluorodeoxyglucose.Image interpretation in positron emission tomography (PET) using F-18-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG) is usually performed for images obtained at 1 h postinjection (PI) of FDG, but it remains unknown whether this is the optimal time for imaging patients with pancreatic disease. The aim of this study was to assess the optimal scan time for FDG-PET for patients suspected of having pancreatic cancer.Forty-four patients with suspected pancreatic cancer underwent FDG-PET scans at both 1 h and 2 h PI. Tracer uptake in the pancreatic lesions and possible liver metastasis was interpreted qualitatively, using a 5-point grading system (0 = normal, 1 = probably normal, 2 = equivocal, 3 = probably abnormal, and 4 = definitely abnormal) by 4 nuclear medicine physicians independently, who were blind to all clinical information. Detection performance with each image was compared using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis. An average score of the 4 readers for each patient was also defined as consensus average index (CAI) and compared between the two images.ROC results indicated no significant differences in detection performance (Averaged areas under ROC curves of 1 h vs. 2 h were 0.92 vs. 0.90 for primary tumor, and 0.81 vs. 0.85 for liver metastases). There were no significant differences in CAIs between 1 h and 2 h PI images in interpreting primary tumor and positive liver metastases, but a significant difference was observed for cases without liver metastases (p < 0.05).The certainty of excluding liver metastases was increased when the 2h image was used, although ROC analysis did not establish a difference between 1 h and 2 h imaging for differentiating malignant and benign lesions in primary pancreatic cancer or its liver metastases.[Combined use of MRI and MR cholangiopancreatography and contrast enhanced dual phase 3-D MR angiography in diagnosis of pancreatic tumors: initial clinical results].To evaluate the accuracy of a non-invasive "all-in-one" staging MR method in patients with pancreatic tumors.46 patients were prospectively evaluated by a combined MR imaging protocol including breath-hold T1- and T2-weighted pulse sequence, MRCP using a breath-hold 2D-RARE sequence, and breath-hold gadolinium-enhanced dual-phase 3D-MR angiography.All pancreatic tumors were detected by the combination of cross-sectional imaging and MRCP. In spite of the use of MRCP, definitive differentiation between pancreatic carcinoma and chronic pancreatitis was not possible in 3 (6.5%) out of 46 cases. High quality 3D-MR angiograms were obtained in 43 (93.5%) cases. In 6 (13%) patients 3D-MRA showed an aberrant right hepatic artery. The overall accuracy of MRI in assessing extrapancreatic tumor spread, lymph node metastases, liver metastases, and vascular involvement was 95.7%, 80.4%, 93.5%, and 89.1%, respectively.Due to its high accuracy, the "all-in-one" MR protocol may become the most important modality after clinical examination and ultrasound in the diagnostic work-up for most patients with suspicion of pancreatic tumors.Differentiation of benign from malignant pancreatic masses by endoscopic ultrasound.It is often difficult to determine whether a mass in the pancreas is benign or malignant. The goal was to evaluate whether endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) can reliably establish whether a mass is benign or malignant.One hundred five patients with possible pancreatic tumors were referred for EUS. Those who were found to have a lesion suspicious for carcinoma and did not have a known malignancy also underwent EUS-guided FNA.A mass suspicious for cancer was identified in 73 patients, whereas inflammatory changes or a normal pancreas was noted in 32 patients. Four of the latter 32 patients were subsequently found to have cancer. EUS-guided FNA was performed on 47 of the 73 patients with a suspicious mass and was read as cancer in 27 patients, atypia in 10 patients, and benign in 10 patients. All 10 patients with atypia were subsequently confirmed to have cancer, and 6 of the 10 patients with a benign FNA were proved to have a tumor at surgery. EUS could differentiate the lesion as malignant with a sensitivity of 95%, specificity 88%, positive predictive value 95%, and negative predictive value 88%.Radial array EUS is helpful in supporting or refuting a diagnosis of cancer in a patient with a pancreatic mass. Although EUS-guided FNA can confirm the diagnosis, a negative FNA should not preclude exploration when clinically indicated.Absence of a dilated duct predicts benign disease in suspected pancreas cancer: a simple clinical rule.Pancreatic cancer can be difficult to diagnose. Fine-needle aspiration (FNA) biopsies may be negative even when malignancy is present.To identify endosonographic features predictive of malignancy that will separate patients into high- and low-risk groups, in whom a negative FNA effectively rules out malignancy.Patients presenting for endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) evaluation for suspected pancreatic mass were prospectively enrolled. If a mass or abnormal lymph nodes were present, sampling via fine-needle aspiration (FNA) was performed. The characteristics of patients with cancer were compared to the characteristics of patients without cancer using Chi-square testing and t-tests.Seventy-three patients were enrolled. Thirty-three patients had cancer and 40 had benign disease. On multivariate analysis, only vascular or organ invasion and dilation of the pancreatic duct (PD) were significantly associated with cancer. PD dilation was examined as a stand-alone feature. The presence of a dilated PD placed patients into a group with a 65% prevalence of malignancy. In the non-dilated PD group, the prevalence of malignancy was only 17%, and in this group, the negative predictive value of FNA was 100%, compared to an NPV of 73% in the entire cohort.The most significant negative predictive endosonographic finding in patients with suspected pancreatic cancer is a non-dilated PD. If a patient with suspected pancreatic cancer does not have a dilated PD and the FNA is negative for malignancy, the likelihood of cancer is low.Endoscopic ultrasound fine needle aspirate DNA analysis to differentiate malignant and benign pancreatic masses.Accurate diagnosis of malignant and benign pancreatic masses can be challenging, potentially delaying treatment for cancer and subjecting patients with benign disease to unnecessary surgery. Endoscopic ultrasound fine needle aspirate (EUS-FNA) of pancreatic masses remains inconclusive in a subset of patients. The role of EUS-FNA molecular analysis in this context is studied.Patients with benign pancreatic masses (6 cases, 4 autoimmune pancreatitis, 2 focal chronic pancreatitis) and malignant pancreatic masses (15) with inconclusive cytology (5 cases) and positive cytology (10 controls) were selected. All cases had definitive pathology. Representative cells were microdissected from each EUS-FNA sample and subjected to PCR for analysis of 16 microsatellite allele loss markers situated at 1p, 3p, 5q, 9p, 9q, 10q, 17p, 17q, 21q, and 22q. Loss of heterozygosity analysis used fluorescent capillary electrophoresis for quantitative determination of allelic imbalance. k-ras-2 point mutation analysis was also performed. Mean fractional mutation rate (FMR) was calculated and compared for each group.All malignant cases carried multiple mutations (FMR 0.50), regardless of positive cytology (FMR 0.52) or suspicious cytology (FMR 0.47) (p = NS). Five of the 6 benign cases carried no mutations whereas 1 case of autoimmune pancreatitis and coexisting PanIN lesions exhibited a k-ras mutation (FMR 0.01). The mean FMR for the malignant and benign samples was significantly different (p < 0.0001).Broad panel microsatellite loss and k-ras point mutation analysis can be reliably performed on EUS-FNA samples from pancreatic masses and improves the diagnostic accuracy. Furthermore, it accurately differentiates between malignant and benign pancreatic masses.Diffusion-weighted imaging in characterization of cystic pancreatic lesions.To evaluate whether apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC) measurements from diffusion-weighted imaging (DWI) can characterize or predict the malignant potential of cystic pancreatic lesions.Retrospective review of the magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) database over a 2-year period revealed 136 patients with cystic pancreatic lesions. Patients with DWI studies and histological confirmation of cystic mass were included. In patients with known pancreatitis, lesions with amylase content of >1000 IU/l that resolved on subsequent scans were included as pseudocysts. ADC of cystic lesions was measured by two independent reviewers. These values were then compared to categorize these lesions as benign or malignant using conventional MRI sequences.Seventy lesions were analysed: adenocarcinoma (n=4), intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN; n=28), mucinous cystic neoplasm (MCN; n=9), serous cystadenoma (n=16), and pseudocysts (n=13). There was no difference between ADC values of malignant and non-malignant lesions (p=0.06), between mucinous and serous tumours (p=0.12), or between IPMN and MCN (p=0.42). ADC values for low-grade IPMN were significantly higher than those for high-grade or invasive IPMN (p=0.03).ADC values may be helpful in deciding the malignant potential of IPMN. However, they are not useful in differentiating malignant from benign lesions or for characterizing cystic pancreatic lesions.Intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas: pancreatic resections guided by preoperative morphological assessment and intraoperative frozen section examination.We undertook this study to assess the results of a policy of limited pancreatic resections for intraductal papillary-mucinous tumors (IPMT), guided by a standardized preoperative morphological assessment and the frozen section histologic examination of pancreatic resection margins.From 1991 to 1998, there were 41 patients who underwent resection of IPMT in our center after standardized morphological preoperative assessment, including abdominal computed tomography scans, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, and endoscopic ultrasonography. All patients but one underwent a partial pancreatic resection.Preoperative assessment had an 89% diagnostic accuracy for IPMT. It detected malignant transformation with a 67% sensitivity and a 95% specificity, but failed to correctly assess ductal extension of the disease in 17 cases (41%). The diagnostic accuracy of frozen section histologic examination of the pancreatic resection margin was 92%. There was no recurrence in case of in situ carcinoma when epithelial lesions were completely resected (8 cases) nor in lower grades of dysplasia (23 cases). Conversely, recurrence was constant in invasive carcinoma (10 cases) regardless of the status of the pancreatic margin.Frozen section histologic examination of the pancreatic resection margin is useful and reliable to ensure a complete resection of IPMT by a partial resection that prevents recurrence of noninvasive lesions.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy coupled with KRAS mutation assay to distinguish pancreatic cancer from pseudotumoral chronic pancreatitis.Differential diagnosis between pancreatic adenocarcinoma (PADC) and pseudotumoral forms of chronic pancreatitis remains difficult. Mutation of KRAS oncogene is present in 75% to 95% of PADC. This study aimed to evaluate whether the combined analysis of KRAS mutation with cytopathological findings from endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy (EUS-FNAB) might improve discrimination between PADC and chronic pancreatitis.This prospective multicenter study included 178 patients with solid pancreatic masses (men 104, women 74; mean age 64.5 years). Cytopathological examination and KRAS mutation analysis (codon-12 and codon-13, restriction fragment length polymorphism [RFLP] and direct sequencing) were performed on EUS-FNAB material. Final diagnoses were obtained on EUS-FNAB analysis and/or a second biopsy and/or clinical follow-up and/or surgery: PADC, n = 129; chronic pancreatitis, n = 27; other pancreatic neoplasms, n = 16; and benign lesions, n = 6.KRAS status analysis was successful in all EUS-FNAB samples. Codon-12 KRAS point mutation was found in 66% of PADC samples. No case of chronic pancreatitis displayed KRAS mutation. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and overall accuracy of cytopathology alone for diagnosis of PADC versus chronic pancreatitis were 83%, 100%, 100%, 56% and 86%, respectively. When KRAS mutation analysis was combined with cytopathology, these values reached 88%, 100%, 100%, 63% and 90% respectively.Although the value of KRAS analysis in addition to EUS-FNAB is limited for distinguishing pancreatic mass lesions, when chronic pancreatitis presented as a pseudotumor a negative finding (wild-type KRAS), was useful in strongly suggesting a benign lesion.Abdominal imaging studies: comparison of diagnostic accuracies resulting from ultrasound, computed tomography, and magnetic resonance imaging in the same individual.We retrospectively compared the diagnostic accuracy of abdominal ultrasound (US), computed tomography (CT), and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) studies performed on the same individual to determine the relative performance of these modalities in the evaluation of disease processes, arising from different intra-abdominal organ systems. We retrospectively reviewed all procedure codes accrued by our abdominal imaging section during a 1-year period to determine how many patients underwent all three imaging procedures in our institution within a 2-week interval. These cases were then further evaluated to determine: (1) the primary organ system of disease involvement, (2) the final diagnosis, and (3) the imaging modality that provided the most accurate information upon which appropriate medical management was based. Imaging findings were determined by review of diagnostic reports, and medical management was determined by chart review. Two thousand six hundred-ninety five patients underwent ultrasound, 4,394 patients underwent CT, and 872 patients underwent MRI for the investigation of abdominal disease. Among these 5,126 patients, 26 underwent sequential US, CT, and MRI evaluation within a two-week interval. Appropriate clinical management was based on the US findings in 12/26 cases (46%; 95% CI: 27-67%), CT findings in 16/26 cases (62%; 95% CI: 41-80%), and MRI findings in 24 cases (92%; 95% CI: 75-99%). Significant differences in directing appropriate clinical management were found when comparing the relative diagnostic accuracies of MRI to US (p = 0.0003) and MRI to CT (p = 0.009). However, differences were not significant when comparing CT to US (p = 0.27). All final diagnoses in a given patient were accurately determined by US in 7/26 cases (27%), by CT in 10/26 cases (38%), and by MRI in 23/26 cases (88%). When analyzed according to individual diagnoses (61 total), US detected 33 of 61 (54%) abnormalities, CT detected 41 (67%) abnormalities, and MRI detected 51 (84%) abnormalities. US correctly characterized 32 (52%) abnormalities, CT correctly characterized 36 (59%) abnormalities, and MRI correctly characterized 49 (80%) abnormalities. Ultrasound, CT, and MR imaging correctly diagnosed the disease process in 3 of 12 (25%), 3 of 12 (25%), and 10 of 12 (83%) patients, respectively, with liver disease; 2 of 9 (22%), 6 of 9 (66%), and 9 of 9 (100%) patients, respectively, with pancreatic disease; 17 of 17 (100%), 8 of 17 (47%), and 10 of 17 (58%) patients, respectively, with gallbladder and biliary disease; 2 of 8 (25%), 5 of 8 (63%), and 5 of 8 (63%) patients, respectively, with renal disease; 0 of 3 (0%), 2 of 3 (66%), and 3 of 3 (100%) patients, respectively, with adrenal disease; and 8 of 12 (75%), 12 of 12 (100%), and 12 of 12 (100%) patients with free intraperitoneal fluid. Our results provide new information, regarding the relative benefits of ultrasound, CT, and MRI for the investigation of abdominal diseases at our institution. This initial data suggests that ultrasound provides the most accurate diagnoses in the investigation of gallbladder disease; MRI provides the most accurate diagnoses in the investigation of hepatic, adrenal, and pancreatic disease; and either CT or MRI may be the most appropriate first imaging study for the detection of renal disease.The impact of preoperative endoscopic ultrasound on the surgical management of pancreatic neuroendocrine tumours.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is accurate in diagnosing pancreatic neuroendocrine tumours (PNETs), but its impact on surgical management is unclear.To determine whether preoperative EUS findings altered the decision for, and extent of, surgery in patients with PNETs.A retrospective review of patients referred for EUS because of suspected PNETs was conducted. The diagnosis of PNETs was confirmed by EUS-guided fine needle aspiration cytology, where indicated, or by surgical histology. EUS findings were compared with computed tomography (CT) findings to determine whether there was an impact on the decision for surgical management.Fourteen patients (10 women), with a mean age of 44 years, underwent EUS for suspected PNETs. PNETs were seen with CT in 10 of 13 patients (77%) and with EUS in 14 of 14 patients (100%). One obese patient could not fit into the CT scanner. This patient had five PNETs on EUS. Three patients with a normal CT scan were determined to have one or two PNETs on EUS. Three patients with one or two PNETs on CT were found to have five to eight PNETs on EUS. EUS altered the decision for possible surgical management in five of 14 patients (36%), either by identifying a PNET or by finding multiple and multifocal PNETs that were not visualized on CT scans.EUS is useful in the preoperative assessment of PNETs by providing information that significantly influences the decision for surgical intervention or changes the extent of the planned surgery.Optimizing the multimodal approach to pancreatic cyst fluid diagnosis: developing a volume-based triage protocol.The objective of this study was to develop a triage algorithm to optimize diagnostic yield from cytology, carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), and v-Ki-ras2 Kirsten rat sarcoma viral oncogene homolog (KRAS) testing on different components of a single pancreatic cyst fluid specimen. The authors also sought to determine whether cell block supernatant was suitable for CEA and KRAS testing.Fifty-four pancreatic cysts were triaged according to a volume-dependent protocol to generate fluid (neat and supernatant) and cell block specimens for cytology, comparative CEA, and KRAS testing. Follow-up histology, diagnostic cytology, or a combined clinicopathologic interpretation was recorded as the final diagnosis.There were 26 mucinous cystic lesions and 28 nonmucinous cystic lesions with volumes ranging from 0.3 mL to 55 mL. Testing different components of the specimens (cell block, neat, and/or supernatant) enabled all laboratory investigations to be performed on 50 of 54 cyst fluids (92.6%). Interpretive concordance was observed in 17 of 17 cases (100%) and in 35 of 40 cases (87.5%) that had multiple components tested for CEA and KRAS mutations, respectively. An elevated CEA level (>192 ng/mL) was the most sensitive test for the detection of a mucinous cystic lesion (62.5%) versus KRAS mutation (56%) and "positive" cytology (61.5%). KRAS mutations were identified in 2 of 25 mucinous cystic lesions (8%) in which cytology and CEA levels were not contributory.A volume-based protocol using different components of the specimen was able to optimize diagnostic yield in pancreatic cyst fluids. KRAS mutation testing increased diagnostic yield when combined with cytology and CEA analysis. The current results demonstrated that supernatant is comparable to neat fluid and cell block material for CEA and KRAS testing.[Difficulties of differential diagnosis of pancreatic pseudocysts and cystic neoplasms].Surgical resection is indicated in potentially malignant pancreatic cystic neoplasms. Drainage operations are performed in large (5-6 cm) and/or symptomatic pseudocysts. Misdiagnosis results in a considerable delay in an appropriate treatment. Our aims were to compare clinical, morphological, biochemical features of cystic neoplasms and pseudocysts, in which diagnosis of cystic neoplasm was suspected preoperatively, and to determine characteristics, which could predict the misdiagnosis of cystic neoplasms as "pseudocysts".One hundred and thirty four patients were operated because of pancreatis cystic lesions (22 cystic neoplasms and 112 pseudocysts) between January 1999 and May 2004. Two groups of patients were evaluated retrospectively. Group I included 22 (10 serous and 8 mucinous cystoadenomas, 3 mucinous cystadenocarcinomas, 1 solid papillary tumor) resected neoplasms. Group II included 11 patients in whom neoplasm was suspected during investigation, but definitive diagnosis of pseudocyst was established. Clinical manifestation, morphologic characteristics and data of instrumental investigations were also compared. Preoperative and postoperative diagnoses were compared with histopathological findings.Women predominated in group I (67.2%) and men in group II (81.2%). Group I patients were older (mean age 57.9+/-14.55 versus 49.27+/-10.07 years). All pseudocysts were symptomatic. Two (9.1%) incidental cystic neoplasms and 2 drainage operations were performed previously because of misdiagnosed "pseudocysts" in other hospitals. Abdominal pain, 81.8% and 100%, and abdominal mass, 31.8% and 54.4%, were recorded most frequently, group I and group II respectively. Neoplasms (median diameter 59.6 mm) were mainly located in pancreatic head (31.8%) and body (36.4%). Most of pseudocysts (median diameter 71.1 mm) were located in pancreatic head (45.5%). Diagnostic sensitivity of ultrasonography (86.4%) and computed tomography scan (84.2%) was higher in group I than in group II (63.6% and 77.8%). Two serous oligocystic and 1 mucinous cystoadenomas were misdiagnosed as "pseudocyst" preoperatively. In one case malignancy of mucinous tumor diagnosed only postoperatively.Differentiating serous and mucinous cystoadenomas from pseudocysts may be difficult. Malignant neoplasms may be undetermined preoperatively. Resection should always be performed in instances where findings cannot be clearly identified.Does general anesthesia increase the diagnostic yield of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration of pancreatic masses?: Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) of the pancreas has become the preferred method for tissue diagnosis for pancreatic solid masses. The yield of EUS-FNA in this setting is influenced by multiple factors. We hypothesized that general anesthesia (GA) may improve EUS-FNA yield by improving patient cooperation and stillness during the procedure. Our objective was to assess the association between the sedation method employed and the diagnostic yield of EUS-FNA.: A retrospective cohort study was conducted involving consecutive patients who received EUS-FNA for diagnosis of a solid pancreatic mass at the Cleveland Clinic (Cleveland, OH) gastrointestinal endoscopy units from 2007 to 2009. We compared the diagnostic yield of EUS-FNA between patients receiving GA provided by an anesthesiologist (GA group) and patients receiving conscious sedation (CS) provided by a qualified registered nurse (CS group).: Of 371 patients, a cytological diagnosis was obtained in 73/88 patients (83%) in the GA group and 206/283 patients (73%) in the CS group. Anesthesiologist-delivered GA was associated with an increased odds of having a successful diagnosis as compared with CS (adjusted odds ratio [95% CI]: 2.56 [1.27-5.17], P = 0.01). However, the incidence of complication during or after the procedure was not different between the groups (P > 0.99).: Anesthesiologist-delivered GA was associated with a significantly higher diagnostic yield of EUS-FNA. GA should be considered a preferred sedation method for EUS-FNA of a solid pancreatic mass.Endoscopic ultrasound elastography strain histograms in the evaluation of patients with pancreatic masses.To investigate the accuracy of the strain histogram endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-based method for the diagnostic differentiation of patients with pancreatic masses.In a prospective single center study, 149 patients were analyzed, 105 with pancreatic masses and 44 controls. Elastography images were recorded using commercially available ultrasound equipment in combination with EUS linear probes. Strain histograms (SHs) were calculated by machine integrated software in regions of interest and mean values of the strain histograms were expressed as Mode 1 (over the mass) and Mode 2 (over an adjacent part of pancreatic tissue, representing the reference area). The ratio between Mode 2 and Mode 1 was calculated later, representing a new variable, the strain histogram ratio. After the final diagnosis was established, two groups of patients were formed: a pancreatic cancer group with positive cytology achieved by fine needle aspiration puncture or histology after surgery (58 patients), and a mass-forming pancreatitis group with negative cytology and follow-up after 3 and 6 mo (47 patients). All statistical analyses were conducted in SPSS 14.0 (SPSS Inc., Chicago, IL, United States).Results were obtained with software for strain histograms with reversed hue scale (0 represents the hardest tissue structure and 255 the softest). Based on the receiver operating characteristics (ROC) curve coordinates, the cut-off point for Mode 1 was set at the value of 86. Values under the cut-off point indicated the presence of pancreatic malignancy. Mode 1 reached 100% sensitivity and 45% specificity with overall accuracy of 66% (95%CI: 61%-66%) in detection of pancreatic malignant tumors among the patients with pancreatic masses. The positive and negative predictive values were 54% and 100%, respectively. The cut-off for the new calculated variable, the SH ratio, was set at the value 1.153 based on the ROC curve coordinates. Values equal or above the cut-off value were indicative of pancreatic malignancy. The SH ratio reached 98% sensitivity, 50% specificity and an overall accuracy of 69% (95%CI: 63%-70%). The positive and negative predictive values were 92% and 100%, respectively.SH showed high sensitivity in pancreatic malignant tumor detection but disappointingly low specificity. Slight improvements in specificity and accuracy were achieved using the SH ratio.[Echography, computerized tomography and retrograde cholangiopancreatography for the diagnosis of focal pathology of the exocrine pancreas].In spite of the improved imaging techniques currently available, mortality for pancreatic cancer is still high, and pancreatitis is often diagnosed only in its advanced stages. The authors investigated the value of different imaging techniques--i.e., US, CT, and ERCP--for an early diagnosis, when a more effective (curative?) treatment can be suggested. Fifty-six cases of pancreatic cancer and 36 cases of chronic pancreatitis were evaluated. The results indicate that ERCP, with the help of statistical methods, is superior to US and CT not only in evaluating early neoplastic or inflammatory lesions, but also for their differential diagnosis. In the latter case, ERCP can sometimes be used as a valid alternative to fine-needle aspiration biopsy.Mucinous cystic neoplasms of the pancreas: definition of preoperative imaging criteria for high-risk lesions.Pancreatic mucinous cystic neoplasms (MCN) are premalignant lesions whose natural history is poorly known. Whether the dysplasia grade might be determined with precision by preoperative clinical and imaging criteria is not known. We aimed to determine if CT scan data might be useful to predict the grade of dysplasia in a series of 60 histologically proven MCN.All consecutive patients who were operated on with pathological confirmation of MCN were included. Careful CT scan evaluation was reviewed without knowledge of pathological results. Imaging and pathological results were correlated.Sixty patients (59 females) were included. Low- and intermediate-grade dysplasias were identified in 47 and 3 patients (benign MCN), respectively, and high-grade dysplasia and invasive carcinoma in 7 and 3 patients (malignant MCN), respectively. Patients with benign lesions were significantly younger. None of the studied clinical data were statistically different to distinguish benign and malignant MCN, except age (42 vs. 48 years, p < 0.05). Only maximal diameter and mural nodules on CT scan were significantly more frequent in the malignant group. No malignant MCN had a maximal diameter <40 mm. At a 40-mm threshold, the sensitivity and specificity of the maximal diameter to diagnose malignant MCN were 100 and 54%, respectively. Mural nodules seen on CT scan were confirmed in all cases but one upon pathological examination of the surgical specimen. The sensitivity and specificity of the presence of a mural nodule seen on CT scan for the diagnosis of a malignant lesion were 100 and 98%, respectively.Preoperative CT scan detection of a mural nodule within a cystic pancreatic neoplasm suggestive of MCN strongly suggests malignancy. A diameter <40 mm is associated with no risk of malignancy.Management of 100 consecutive cases of pancreatic serous cystadenoma: wait for symptoms and see at imaging or vice versa?Pancreatic serous cystadenomas have a low malignancy rate. When nonsymptomatic, in selected patients, they can be managed without surgery; however, a high degree of diagnostic reliability is crucial. We admitted 100 consecutive cases (87 women with a median age of 51.86 years). Of these, 44 were symptomatic and 56 were diagnosed incidentally. Ultrasound correctly diagnosed 53% of the cases, incorrectly 31%, and was nondiagnostic in 16%. Computed tomography scan had similar rates (54%, 34% and 12%, respectively), while magnetic resonance imaging improved diagnostic accuracy to 74% and reduced incorrect diagnoses to 26%. In 21 cases, exploratory needle aspiration of the cyst was carried out; only 8 samples (38%) resulted in a diagnosis; in 12 patients (57%) insufficient material was acquired to allow for diagnosis, one case demonstrated epithelial dysplasia. In 1 patient an exploratory puncture resulted in a very serious bleeding. Sixty-eight patients were treated surgically, the 44 symptomatic cases and another 24 patients with ill-defined oligocystic lesions that could not be differentiated as serous or mucinous in the preoperative period. Two patients underwent resection because of frank tumor growth. In the two time periods analyzed (the first 7 years and the subsequent 6.5 years) the relationship between cases observed/operated on did not significantly change. Twenty-one (30.8%) distal pancreatectomies, 14 (20.5%) intermediate resections, 10 (14.7%) pancreaticoduodenectomies 4 (5.8%) enucleations, and 1 (1.4%) duodenum-preserving pancreatic head resection were carried out. Nine patients (13.2%), underwent exploratory laparotomy with a diagnostic biopsy. Another 9 underwent decompressive interventions with cystojejunostomies. The morbidity was 27.9%, with a reoperation rate of 7.3% and zero mortality. In general the patient's pain resolved in the postoperative period. Median follow-up was 43 months (range, 4-191 months). One patient died from other causes, and all others are currently alive. In the group of 32 patients who did not undergo operation, the median follow-up is 69 months (range, 8-164 months). Until more sophisticated technologies can be developed, the current diagnostic work-up will not result in increased preoperative diagnosis of serous-cystic tumors of the pancreas. This is mainly relevant to the oligocystic forms, which account for about one fourth of all serous tumors observed.New trends in diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging as a tool in differentiation of serous cystadenoma and mucinous cystic tumor: a prospective study.Pancreatic cystic lesions are increasingly being recognized. Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is the method that brings the greatest amount of information about the morphologic features of pancreatic cystic lesions. To establish if diffusion-weighted MRI (DW-MRI) can be used as a tool to differentiate mucinous from nonmucinous lesions.Fifty-six patients with pancreatic cystic lesions (benign, n = 46; malignant, n = 10) were prospectively evaluated with DW-MRI in order to differentiate mucinous from nonmucinous lesions. Final diagnosis was obtained by follow-up (n = 31), surgery (n = 16) or endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (n = 9). Serous cystadenoma was identified in 32 (57%) patients.The threshold value established for the differentiation of mucinous from nonmucinous lesions was 2,230.06 s/mm(2) for ADC of 700. DWI-MRI behavior between mucinous and nonmucinous groups revealed sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and accuracy to be 80, 98, 92, 93 and 93%, respectively (p < 0.01, power of sample = 1.0). In the comparison of the diffusion behavior between mucinous (n = 13) and serous (n = 32) lesions, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and accuracy were 100, 97, 92, 100 and 98%, respectively (p < 0.01, power of sample = 1.0). The results of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration were similar to those of DW-MRI.DW-MRI can be included as part of the array of tools to differentiate mucinous from nonmucinous lesions and can help in the management of pancreatic cystic lesions. and IAP.Diagnosis of pancreatic cancer by 2[18F]-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose positron emission tomography.The detection of pancreatic cancer or the discrimination between pancreatic cancer and chronic pancreatitis remains an important diagnostic problem. The increased glucose metabolism in malignant tumours formed the basis for this investigation, which focused on the role of positron emission tomography (PET) with 2[18F]-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG) in the detection of pancreatic cancer and its differentiation from chronic pancreatitis. Eighty patients admitted for elective pancreatic surgery received preoperatively 250-350 mBq FDG intravenously and emission scans were recorded 45 minutes later. Intense focal activity in the pancreatic region was taken at the time of scanning as showing the presence of pancreatic cancer. The presence of cancer was later confirmed by histological examination of the surgical specimens and histological findings were compared with the preoperative PET results. Forty one patients with pancreatic cancer (group I: n = 42) had a focally increased FDG uptake in the pancreatic region. Two patients with a periampullary carcinoma (group II: n = 6) failed to develop FDG accumulation. In 28 patients with chronic pancreatitis (group III: n = 32) no FDG accumulation occurred. Overall sensitivity and specificity of PET for malignancy (group I + II) were 94% (45 of 48) and 88% (28 of 32), respectively. The standard uptake value of the patients with pancreatic carcinoma was significantly higher than in patients with chronic pancreatitis (3.09 (2.18) v 0.87 (0.56); p < 0.001; median (interquartile range)). These findings show that FDG-PET represents a new and non-invasive diagnostic procedure for the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer and to differentiate pancreatic cancer from chronic pancreatitis. However, the diagnostic potential of this technique requires further evaluation.Endoscopic ultrasound for differential diagnosis of focal pancreatic lesions, confirmed by surgery.Endoscopic ultrasound is increasingly used for evaluation of pancreatic cancer. The potential of sonographic morphology to differentiate histology type and biological behaviour of pancreatic lesions is doubtful.We prospectively studied 115 patients with focal pancreatic lesions on endoscopic ultrasound. Morphology was assessed using Olympus UM3/20/200 echoendoscopes. Histologic confirmation of diagnosis was obtained in all patients.Endoscopic ultrasound correctly diagnosed 18/34 benign and 77/81 malignant lesions. Sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, PPV and NPV for diagnosing malignancy were 95%, 53%, 83%, 83% and 82%, respectively. Endosonographic diagnosis of the lesions (% correct) were: pancreatic cancer, 84 (63.3%); chronic pancreatitis, 14 (71.4%); ampullary cancer, 9 (77.8%); cystadenoma, 5 (80%); ampullary adenoma, 2 (50%); acute pancreatitis, 1 (0). In 13 patients of chronic pancreatitis, diagnosed as cancer, diagnosis was based on absence of sonographic features of chronic pancreatitis (7) or suspected involvement of adjacent structures (6). In 3 patients malignancy was missed owing to features of chronic pancreatitis. Non-suspected neuroendocrine tumours were misjudged in all 10 cases using morphologic criteria as pancreatic cancer (8), cystadenoma and chronic pancreatitis. Accuracy for prediction of metastatic lymph nodes and an advanced pancreatic cancer stage (TxN1 or T3Nx) was 61% and 75%, respectively. On retrospective analysis, a lesion >2 cm, vessel ingrowth, absence of cystic spaces and absence of diffuse pancreatitis were associated with pancreatic cancer.While overall sensitivity was high, specificity of endoscopic ultrasound for diagnosis of malignancy was low, especially in presence of chronic pancreatitis. In addition, endosonography had only a limited potential to predict the histological type of lesions.Differential diagnosis of focal pancreatic masses by semiquantitative EUS elastography: between strain ratios and strain histograms.Rapid on-site cytopathological examination (ROSE) performed by endosonagraphers and its improvement in the diagnosis of pancreatic solid lesions.To evaluate the diagnosis improvement of EUS-FNA when using ROSE performed by the endosonographer.A retrospective study was conducted. A total of 48 pancreatic solid masses EUS-FNA were divided into two groups according to the availability of on-site cytology (ROSE) - the first 24 patients (group A-without ROSE) and the latter 24 cases (group B-with ROSE). Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, accuracy, complications and inadequacy rate of EUS-FNA were determined and compared.Among the 48 EUS-FNA, the overall performance was: sensitivity 82%; specificity 100%; positive predictive value (PPV) 100%; negative predictive value (NPV) 70% and accuracy 87%. The sensitivity of the Group A was 71%, versus 94% in-group B (p=0.61). Moreover, the negative predictive value was 58% versus 87% (p=0.72). The accuracy rate increased from 79% to 96% (p=0.67) in the ROSE group. The number of punctures was similar between the groups. No major complications were reported.Rapid on-site cytopathological examination, even when performed by the endosonographer, may improve the diagnostic performance in the diagnosis of solid pancreatic lesions, regardless of the slight increase in the number of punctures.The role of EUS in the diagnosis of cystic lesions of the pancreas.Preoperative evaluation of periampullary tumors by endoscopic sonography, transabdominal sonography, and computed tomography.The purpose of this retrospective study was to compare the sensitivity of endoscopic sonography (EUS), transabdominal sonography (US), and CT in the detection of, local staging of, and prediction of vascular involvement by or distant metastasis from periampullary tumors.Seventy-four consecutive patients with presumed periampullary tumors were evaluated by EUS, US, and CT during a 3.25-year period. The local staging accuracy of the modalities was assessed in the 36 patients with solid tumors who underwent surgery. The sensitivity of the modalities in predicting vascular involvement and distant metastasis was assessed in the 56 patients with carcinomas.EUS was the most sensitive modality in the detection (EUS, 97%; US, 24%; and CT, 39%; p < 0.001 for EUS versus US or CT) and T classification (EUS, 72%; US, 11%; CT, 22%; p < 0.001 for EUS versus US or CT) of periampullary tumors. EUS also had better sensitivity than US in detecting lymph node metastasis from periampullary cancers (EUS, 47%; US, 7%; and CT, 33%; p = 0.02 for EUS versus US; p = 0.7 for EUS versus CT). The accuracy of EUS in determining the T classification (without stent, 81%; with stent, 65%) and N classification (without stent, 80%; with stent, 70%) tended to decrease in the presence of an endobiliary stent, but the differences were not significant. EUS was the most sensitive modality in demonstrating vascular involvement (EUS, 100%; US, 0%; and CT, 33%; p = 0.002 for EUS versus US; p = 0.03 for EUS versus CT) but was not significantly different in detecting distant metastasis (EUS, 11%; US, 44%; and CT, 44%).EUS is superior to US and CT in the local assessment of periampullary tumors. The staging accuracy of EUS is minimally but not significantly affected by the presence of an endobiliary stent.Delayed (18)F-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose positron emission tomography scan for differentiation between malignant and benign lesions in the pancreas.Positron emission tomography (PET) using (18)F-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG) has been used for the evaluation of various tumors, but accumulation in inflammatory lesions makes it a controversial modality. The aim of this study was to investigate the usefulness of delayed scanning in differentiation between malignant and benign lesions in the pancreas.Forty-seven patients with suspected pancreatic carcinoma were studied by FDG-PET. All patients received approximately 370 megabequerels of FDG after a transmission scan, and an emission scan was performed 1 hour and 2 hours later for all patients. A subset of 19 patients was also scanned at 3 hours postinjection. The standardized uptake value (SUV) was determined, and the retention index was calculated by dividing the increase in the SUV between 1 hour and 2 hours postinjection by the SUV at 1 hour postinjection.Of 27 malignant lesions, the SUVs of 22 lesions increased at 2 hours postinjection, whereas the FDG uptake in 17 of 20 benign lesions decreased. The SUVs at 3 hours postinjection were higher than those at 2 hours postinjection in 9 of 14 malignant lesions and in 2 of 5 benign lesions. Malignant lesions showed a higher retention index than benign lesions (mean +/- standard deviation: 12. 36 +/- 13.37 and -7.05 +/- 17.28, respectively; P < 0.0001). Applying an SUV of 2.5 at 1 hour postinjection with the cut-off value for the differentiation between malignant and benign lesions caused one false negative result and seven false positive results, with a diagnostic accuracy of 83.0% (39 of 47 patients). However, combining the retention index with the SUV obtained at 2 hours postinjection provided a higher diagnostic accuracy (91.5%; 43 or 47 patients) than the SUV alone. The false negative rate remained constant when the retention index was taken into account. Images at 3 hours postinjection usually were unhelpful in differentiating further between malignant lesions and benign lesions.The current data suggest that delayed FDG-PET scanning at 2 hours postinjection may contribute to differentiation between malignant and benign lesions in the pancreas.Utility of contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasonography for diagnosis of small pancreatic carcinomas.The aim of our study was to assess the utility of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and contrast-enhanced EUS (CE-EUS) for the depiction and differential diagnosis of pancreatic tumors focusing in particularly those 2 cm or smaller. We compared different diagnostic procedures, contrast-enhanced multidetector computed tomography (CE-CT) and EUS with the use of power Doppler (PD-EUS) and CE-EUS for detection and differential diagnosis of pancreatic tumors. The study included 156 consecutive patients with suspected pancreatic tumors, who underwent CE-CT, and EUS followed by PD-EUS and CE-EUS. CE-EUS was performed by power Doppler mode using sonographic contrast agent Levovist. Thirty-six of 156 patients examined had tumors of < or =2 cm. EUS had significantly higher sensitivity (94.4%) for detection of pancreatic carcinomas of 2 cm or less in comparison to CE-CT (50%). For small pancreatic tumor of 2 cm or less, sensitivities for differentiating ductal carcinomas from other tumors were 50.0%, 11.0% and 83.3% for CE-CT, PD-EUS and CE-EUS. CE-EUS was significantly more sensitive than PD-EUS and CE-CT. EUS and subsequent CE-EUS are more sensitive than CE-CT in the detection and the differentiation of small pancreatic tumors.Evaluation of pancreatic carcinoma with FDG PET.To assess the diagnostic usefulness and clinical impact of positron emission tomography with [F-18]fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG PET) on the management of patients with known or suspected pancreatic carcinoma.Attenuation-corrected FDG PET was performed in 20 patients (12 male, eight female) with pancreatic carcinoma at the time of initial diagnosis (n = 7), for tumor surveillance after Whipple surgery (n = 11), and for reevaluation after chemoradiation therapy (n = 2). Visual analysis of PET images were correlated with the results of abdominal computed tomography (CT) and carbohydrate antigen (CA) 19-9 serum tumor marker level that were obtained within 1 month of the PET study. Diagnostic validation was by histology in nine patients and by clinical or radiologic follow-up (5-48 months) in 11 patients. Changes in therapeutic management that were prompted by PET were tabulated.PET was concordant with the findings of abdominal CT in 14 patients (13 true positive, 1 true negative). PET detected clinically unsuspected lung lesions, confirmed subsequently by a chest CT, in one of these 14 patients. PET was discordant with CT in six patients. PET detected tumor recurrence in three patients in this group (15% of total) with nondiagnostic CT findings and elevated CA 19-9 serology. In two of these three patients, chemotherapy with gemcitabine was initiated based on PET localization of disease. Tumor was confirmed in the remaining one of the three patients at autopsy shortly after the PET study. FDG localization in a displaced loop of bowel resulted in an apparent false-positive hepatic lesion in one of six patients in the discordant group. PET underestimated the extent of metastatic disease in the remaining two of six patients due to hyperglycemia.In patients with suspected pancreatic carcinoma at the time of initial presentation, PET is complementary to abdominal CT and allows detection of unsuspected distant metastases. In patients with suspected recurrent pancreatic carcinoma, based on elevated or rising CA 19-9 serology, PET can localize the disease when abdominal CT is nondiagnostic as a result of posttherapy anatomic alteration. Imaging evaluation with PET may impact the clinical management of patients with pancreatic carcinoma.Small pancreatic lesions: is there need for EUS-FNA preoperatively? What to do with the incidental lesions?Detection of KRAS gene mutations in endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy for improving pancreatic cancer diagnosis.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy (EUS-FNAB) is a useful tool in the diagnosis of pancreatic masses. Genetic analysis of these samples could increase the sensitivity and specificity of diagnosis. This study aimed to evaluate the usefulness of a novel method for the detection of mutations in the KRAS (Kirsten rat sarcoma-2 virus) gene for the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.EUS-FNABs were performed on 82 patients with pancreatic masses, including 54 cases of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma and 28 of non-malignant pancreatic masses. The biopsies were histopathologically and cytopathologically evaluated, and the detection of KRAS gene mutations (codons 12 and 13) was performed through peptide nucleic acid-directed polymerase chain reaction clamping and DNA sequencing.In the pancreatic cancer cases, 88.9% (48/54; 95% confidence interval (CI): 80.5-97.2%) had KRAS mutations, while 61.1% (33/54; 95% CI: 48.1-74.1%) were unequivocally diagnosed by histo/cytopathology. In the indeterminate patients (n=49; diagnosed by EUS-FNA as either insufficient material to make a diagnosis, no malignancy, or suspicion of malignancy), there were 10 cases of pancreatic cancer with low serum carbohydrate antigen 19-9 (CA19-9) (<37 U/l) and 6 of these were KRAS mutations. The sensitivity of detection by KRAS mutations (76.2%) and the combination of KRAS mutations and serum CA19-9 (81%) were significantly higher than for serum CA19-9 alone (52.4%). A logistic regression model showed that the KRAS mutation was significant (odds ratio=5.830; CI: 1.531-22.199, P=0.01), but not serum CA19-9. In the non-malignant pancreatic masses (n=28), KRAS mutations were detected in nine precancerous lesions.Our method for the detection of KRAS gene mutations may be useful to supplement histo/cytopathologic evaluations for pancreatic cancer, and is superior to serum CA19-9 in EUS-FNAB histo/cytopathology-indeterminate patients. Results warrant further verification in other patient populations.Impact of F18-fluorodeoxyglycose positron emission tomography/computed tomography on the management of resectable pancreatic tumours.Positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) using F18-fluorodeoxyglucose has been shown to be valuable in the management of malignant disease. The aim of this study is to investigate the impact of this technique on the management of patients with resectable pancreatic tumours.Thirty-six patients with 37 potentially resectable pancreatic tumours on diagnostic CT imaging underwent PET/CT scans. Operative findings, histological reports and/or clinical follow-up served as standard of reference. The impact of PET/CT on patient management was estimated by calculating the percentage of patients whose treatment plan was altered due to PET/CT.Pancreatic adenocarcinoma was diagnosed in 30 patients, neuroendocrine tumours in 3, mass-forming pancreatitis in 3 and serous cystadenoma in 1. The median standard uptake (max) value was 5.0 (range 2.2-12.0). Sensitivity and specificity of detecting extrapancreatic metastatic disease were 73% and 100%, respectively. Three occult liver metastases were detected at laparotomy following negative PET/CT. PET/CT findings influenced the management of 8 (22%) patients - 3 with liver metastases, 3 with bone metastases, 1 with lymph node metastases and 1 by identifying the benign appearance of the pancreatic tumour.PET/CT achieves a significant diagnostic impact in detecting extrapancreatic metastatic disease. F18-fluorodeoxyglucose PET/CT appears to be useful in assessing suspicious pancreatic masses.Diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer: comparison of mangafodipir trisodium-enhanced MR imaging and contrast-enhanced helical hydro-CT.The purpose of this study was to compare mangafodipir trisodium-enhanced MR imaging performed with a phased array coil and contrast-enhanced single-detector helical CT for accuracy in the detection and local staging of pancreatic adenocarcinoma and in the differentiation between cancer and focal pancreatitis.Forty-two patients with suspected pancreatic masses underwent contrast-enhanced helical CT and mangafodipir trisodium-enhanced MR imaging at 1.5 T. The images were assessed for the presence or absence of tumors; characterization of masses; and presence of vascular invasion, lymph node metastases, or liver metastases. Imaging findings were correlated with findings at laparotomy, laparoscopy, biopsy, or follow-up.Focal masses were present in 36 patients (cancer, n = 26; focal pancreatitis, n = 7; other, n = 3). The sensitivity for lesion detection of MR imaging was 100% and of CT, 94%. Two small malignant lesions were missed on CT. For the diagnosis of tumor nonresectability, the sensitivity of MR imaging and CT was 90% and 80%, respectively. Liver metastases were missed on MR imaging in one of the eight patients and on CT in four. For differentiation between adenocarcinoma and nonadenocarcinoma, the sensitivity of MR imaging was 100% (positive predictive value, 90%; negative predictive value, 100%), and the sensitivity of CT was 92% (positive predictive value, 80%; negative predictive value, 67%). Receiver operating characteristic analysis revealed that the mean area under the curve for MR imaging was 0.920 and for CT, 0.832 (not significant).Mangafodipir trisodium-enhanced MR imaging is as accurate as contrast-enhanced helical CT for the detection and staging of pancreatic cancer but offers improved detection of small pancreatic metastases and of liver metastases compared with CT.[Endosonographic diagnosis of pancreatic tumors].140 patients (72 men, 68 women; mean age 57 [26-83] years) with suspected pancreatic tumours were investigated by endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and also by conventional ultrasound, computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP). The EUS scans were performed with an echo-endoscope in the descending part of the duodenum (for the head of the pancreas) or in the stomach (for the body and tail). The definitive diagnosis or exclusion of a pancreatic tumour (malignant n = 85, benign n = 4, inflammatory n = 23, no tumour n = 28) was made at operation (n = 63), by needle biopsy (n = 35), at necropsy (n = 4) or by clinical follow up (n = 38, mean 10.5 months). The sensitivity and specificity of endoscopic ultrasound (99% and 100%) were superior to the results given by conventional ultrasound scans (71% and 39%), CT (82% and 46%) and ERCP (89% and 64%). This was also true of small tumours of 3 cm or less (EUS 100%, conventional ultrasound 57%, CT 68% and ERCP 89%). However, the differential diagnosis between malignant and inflammatory masses in the pancreas was not feasible by endoscopic ultrasound, either prospectively (detection rate 69%) or by comparative analyses of echo structure. Endoscopic ultrasound appears to be a valuable aid to the diagnosis or exclusion of pancreatic tumours. When conventional ultrasound and CT give negative or doubtful results it can be used in conjunction with or instead of ERCP to confirm the diagnosis.Comparison of methods to detect neoplasia in patients undergoing endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration.Digital image analysis (DIA) and fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) can be used to evaluate biliary strictures with greater accuracy than conventional cytology (CC). We performed a prospective evaluation of the accuracy of CC, compared with that of DIA and FISH, in detection of malignancy in patients undergoing endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) fine-needle aspiration (FNA).We collected a minimum of 6 FNA samples from each of 250 patients during EUS. CC or DIA and FISH analyses were performed on every other specimen (from every other FNA pass); patients were randomly assigned to the first test performed. CC slides were reviewed by gastrointestinal cytopathologists who were blinded to all data. Findings from cytohistologic analysis, after a minimum 24-month follow-up period, were used as the standard (n = 202; median age, 65 years).Aspirates were collected from lymph nodes (n = 111), pancreas (n = 61), gastrointestinal lumen wall (n = 9), periluminal mass (n = 4), liver (n = 8), and miscellaneous sites (n = 9). Matched samples provided a mean of 3.2 passes for CC and 1.6 passes for DIA and FISH. The data indicate a potential lack of utility for DIA. The combination of CC and FISH detected malignancy with 11% greater sensitivity than CC alone (P = .0002), but specificity was reduced from 100% to 96%.FISH analysis identifies neoplastic lesions with significantly greater sensitivity than CC in patients with diverse pathologies who underwent EUS with FNA, despite limited tissue sampling for FISH analysis.Contrast harmonic echo-endoscopic ultrasound improves accuracy in diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses.Contrast harmonic echo (CHE) has been developed for endoscopic ultrasound (EUS). This new technique detects echo signals from microbubbles in vessels with very slow flow, without artifacts. We assessed whether CHE-EUS increases the accuracy of diagnosis of pancreatic solid lesions.At a tertiary-care EUS center, we examined 90 patients who were suspected of having pancreatic solid neoplasm. Radial and linear echoendoscopes were used with dedicated software for CHE. Sonovue (Bracco International BV, Amsterdam, The Netherlands) uptake, pattern, and washout were studied; data were compared for pancreatic lesions and adjacent parenchyma. The final diagnosis was obtained based on results of surgical pathology and/or EUS-fine needle aspiration (FNA) analyses.The finding of a hypoenhancing mass with an inhomogeneous pattern was a sensitive and accurate identifier of patients with adenocarcinoma (96% and 82%, respectively) (49 of 51 patients with primary pancreatic adenocarcinoma had a hypoenhancing mass that was inhomogeneous and had fast washout). This finding was more accurate in diagnosis than the finding of a hypoechoic lesion using standard EUS (P < .000). Hyperenhancement specifically excluded adenocarcinoma (98%), although sensitivity was low (39%). Of neuroendocrine tumors, 11 of 13 were non-hypo-enhancing (9 hyperenhancing, 2 isoenhancing). Interestingly, CHE-EUS allowed detection of small lesions in 7 patients who had uncertain standard EUS findings because of biliary stents (n = 5) or chronic pancreatitis (n = 2). Targeted EUS-FNA was performed on these lesions.Detection of a hypoenhancing and inhomogeneous mass accurately identified patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma. CHE-EUS increased the detection of malignant lesions in difficult cases (patients with chronic pancreatitis or biliary stents) and helped guide EUS-FNA. A hyperenhancing pattern could be used to rule out adenocarcinoma.The role of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) with magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) in the diagnosis and assessment of resectability of pancreatic tumors.Carcinoma of the pancreas is one of the most malignant tumors. Symptoms are usually nonspecific and insidious, such that the cancer is advanced by the time of diagnosis. The aim of the study was to assess the usefulness of MRI and MRCP in the diagnosis of patients suspected of pancreatic carcinoma and to define the role of these methods in the evaluation of resectability of pancreatic cancer in comparison with surgical findings.Forty-seven patients (32 men and 15 women) aged 46-81 had undergone MRI and MRCP examination of the upper abdomen on a 1.5 T system with a standard flexible surface coil. The results of those tests were compared with surgical and histopathological findings. The capacity of MR and MRCP to detect pathological mass, assess the nature of the disease process, and accurately assess the resectability of the malignant lesion were evaluated. In the statistical analysis the chi-squared and Fisher's precise tests were performed.Statistical analysis showed 87% sensitivity, 97% specificity, and 95% accuracy of MRI and MRCP in the evaluation of the nature of tumors within the pancreas and 100% sensitivity, 90% specificity, and 93% accuracy in determining the resectability of the lesion. The positive predictive value came to 83%, while the negative predictive value was 100%. The kappa compatibility index in comparison with surgical findings was 0.85714.MR and MRCP is an important diagnostic method in assessing pancreatic tumors. It is very useful in differential diagnosis and determination of tumor resectability.Predictors of malignant potential of cystic lesions of the pancreas.Cystic lesions of the pancreas (CLP) are a diagnostic dilemma, the correct characterisation of which determines surgical management.From 1995 to 2005, radiology and pathology records were reviewed for the presence of CLP. CLP were divided into three groups; Group 1: Benign, Group 2: Pre-malignant, and Group 3: Malignant.Seventy-nine of 121 patients were included [Group 1: n=46, Group 2: n=10, Group 3: n=23], with a median age at diagnosis of 68 (31-92) years. The median follow-up period was 24 (14-84) months. On univariate analysis, female gender (p=0.04), jaundice (p<0.01), raised serum ALT concentration (p=0.03), cyst size (> or = 2.5 cm) (p<0.01), and biliary duct dilatation (p<0.01) were associated with malignant potential. Benign cysts were more likely to present incidentally (p<0.01). On multi-variate analysis, cyst size (> or =2.5 cm) was an independent predictor of malignant potential. Sub-group analysis revealed that cysts <2.5 cm in the head of the pancreas with evidence of biliary obstruction (either abnormal liver function; raised ALT [p=0.01], ALP [p=0.01], total bilirubin [p=0.02], and/or biliary duct dilatation [p<0.01]) were associated with malignant potential.Cyst size > or =2.5 cm on computer tomography imaging was an independent predictor of pre-malignant and malignant pancreatic cysts. Cyst size and the presence of biliary obstruction predict potentially malignant cysts of the head of the pancreas, which require surgical management.Mucinous ductal ectasia of the pancreas.Pancreatic mucinous ductal ectasia (MDE) is a recently described and poorly understood disorder, with few cases reported in the imaging literature. We undertook this study to describe the spectrum of CT and pancreatographic findings of MDE and to investigate the incidence of associated pancreatic malignancy.The medical records, CT scans, and pancreatograms of 12 consecutive patients with pathologically proven MDE were retrospectively reviewed. There were nine men and three women, ranging in age from 37 to 72 years (mean 59 years).Focal lesions involved primarily the uncinate (two patients) and head (eight patients) by CT imaging. The entire gland was involved in two patients. CT findings were variable and included focal pancreatic enlargement, a low attenuation or cystic mass, low attenuation of the entire gland, or marked ductal dilatation. Pancreatographic findings were more consistent, showing ductal dilatation with or without intraluminal filling defects, obstruction, or displacement. In all cases, findings at endoscopy were felt to be characteristic, with ductal dilatation, filling defects, or abundant mucus seen upon cannulation of the pancreatic duct. Carcinoma-in-situ was present in six cases, cellular atypia without malignancy in two, and in three cases the lesions were histologically benign. One case demonstrated invasive adenocarcinoma. No finding or group of findings on CT or pancreatography permitted differentiation between benign and malignant lesions.MDE can present with a variety of appearances on CT, none of which is diagnostic. Pancreatography can be diagnostic if dilatation and intraluminal filling defects are seen. Carcinoma-in-situ, invasive adenocarcinoma, or cellular atypia is present in approximately 75%, but cannot be accurately diagnosed prospectively.Cyst fluid carcinoembryonic antigen level is not predictive of invasive cancer in patients with intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas.Cyst fluid CEA concentration>192 ng/mL has proven accurate to differentiate mucinous from non-mucinous pancreatic cystic neoplasms. It is unclear whether the degree of cyst fluid CEA elevation is predictive of malignant behavior in IPMNs.To determine whether elevated cyst fluid CEA concentrations were predictive of invasive cancer.Cross sectional study.Single National Cancer Institute comprehensive cancer care center experience.47 patients underwent preoperative EUS-FNA with cyst fluid analysis and surgical resection of an IPMN over a 9 year period.Cyst fluid CEA concentrations among the four grades associated with IPMN (low grade dysplasia, moderate dysplasia, high grade dysplasia, and invasive cancer).The mean±standard deviation cyst fluid CEA concentration increased as the pathology progressed from low grade dysplasia (1,261±1,679 ng/mL) to moderate dysplasia (7,171±22,210 ng/mL) to high grade dysplasia (10,807±36,203 ng/mL). However, the mean CEA level decreased (462±631 ng/mL) once invasive cancer developed (P=0.869). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of a cyst fluid CEA concentration greater than 200 ng/mL for the diagnosis of malignant IPMN (cases of high grade dysplasia and invasive IPMN) was 52.4%, 42.3%, 42.3%, 52.4% and 46.8%, respectively.Single center experience, small patient numbers, retrospective data collection.The degree of cyst fluid CEA elevation is a poor predictor of malignant degeneration within IPMNs. Clinical management decisions regarding surgical resection should not be based upon degree of cyst fluid CEA elevation.Quantitative analysis of K-ras gene mutation in pancreatic tissue obtained by endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine needle aspiration: clinical utility for diagnosis of pancreatic tumor.Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) has become established in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer. The combination of pathological diagnosis and analysis for mutant K-ras gene was investigated to improve the accuracy of diagnosis.EUS-FNA was performed in 34 patients with pancreatic masses (26 adenocarcinomas and eight chronic pancreatitis). Mutant ras gene was analyzed semiquantitatively in the specimens obtained by EUS-FNA as well as in pancreatic juice obtained by ERCP.Mutant gene was detected at high amounts (more than 2% of total ras genes) in 20 of 26 (77%) specimens of EUS-FNA and in 12 of 19 (63%) of pancreatic juice in cases with pancreatic carcinoma. Cytological diagnosis of malignancy by EUS-FNA was found in 16 of 26 (62%) patients with pancreatic cancer. Accurate diagnosis of the carcinoma was 21 of 26 (81%) by combined cytology and molecular method of EUS-FNA, and increased to 23 of 26 (88%) by adding molecular analysis of pancreatic juice. In contrast, mutant gene was absent or low level despite suspicious cytology in patients with benign pancreatic lesion.Quantitative analysis of mutant ras gene supplemented conventional cytology of EUS-FNA and ERCP. Detection of mutation at high amounts may represent pancreatic cancer, whereas its absence increased the possibility of benign lesion.A randomized comparison of EUS-guided FNA versus CT or US-guided FNA for the evaluation of pancreatic mass lesions.Diagnosing pancreatic cancer by EUS-FNA is a potentially appealing alternative to percutaneous biopsy.To compare EUS-FNA with CT or US-guided FNA for diagnosing pancreatic cancer.Single center, prospective, randomized, cross-over.Duke University Medical Center.Eighty-four patients referred with suspicious solid pancreatic mass lesions randomized to CT/US-FNA (n = 43) or EUS-FNA (n = 41).Patients underwent an imaging procedure/FNA. If cytology was nondiagnostic, cross over to the other modality was offered. Final outcome was determined by clinical follow-up every 6 months for 2 years and/or surgical pathology for patients with negative FNA.Sensitivity and accuracy of EUS-FNA versus CT/US-FNA for pancreatic cancer.There were 16 true positive (TP) by CT/US-FNA and 21 TP by EUS-FNA. Sixteen of the 20 CT/US-FNA negative patients crossed over to EUS-FNA; 12 underwent FNA, 4 had no mass at EUS. Seven of the 12 had positive EUS-FNA. Eight EUS-FNA negative crossed over to CT/US; 4 had no mass at CT/US, 3 remained true negative throughout follow-up, 1 had chronic pancreatitis at surgery. The sensitivity of CT/US-FNA and EUS-FNA for detecting malignancy was 62% and 84%, respectively. A comparison of the accuracy for CT/US-FNA and EUS-FNA was not statistically significant (P = .074, chi(2)).Failure to meet target enrollment resulted in an inability to demonstrate a statistically significant difference between the 2 modalities.EUS-FNA is numerically (though not quite statistically) superior to CT/US-FNA for the diagnosis of pancreatic malignancy.EUS or percutaneous CT/US-guided FNA for suspected pancreatic cancer: when tissue is the issue.Histological diagnosis by EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy in pancreatic solid masses without on-site cytopathologist: a single-center experience.There are few reports on the histological diagnostic ability of endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in a large-series of pancreatic masses. In the present study therefore we retrospectively evaluated the histological diagnostic ability of EUS-FNA in pancreatic masses without on-site cytopathologist. In 355 patients with pancreatic solid masses, EUS-FNA was carried out. EUS-FNA histology showed accuracy, 90.7%; sensitivity, 89.5%; specificity, 95.6%; positive predict value, 98.8%; negative predict value, 68.8% by intention-to-treat analysis. Except for 10 with inadequate materials, EUS-FNA histology showed accuracy, 93.3%; sensitivity, 91.8%; specificity, 100%; positive predict value, 100%; negative predict value, 77.6%. The mean number of puncture was 2.88 (range 1 to 8). There was two (0.6%) procedure-related bleeding. In conclusion, diagnostic ability of EUS-FNA by histological materials was similar to previous literature on the EUS-FNA without on-site cytopathologist.[Comparison of enhanced magnetic resonance imaging and magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography in the differential diagnosis of benign and malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas].To compare the value of liver acquisition with volume acceleration (LAVA) and magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) in diagnosing benign and malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMN) of the pancreas.The MR findings of 35 IPMN patients confirmed by pathology were analyzed retrospectively, and the sequences included T1WI, T2WI, LAVA, and MRCP. All patients were divided into two groups: the group of MRI enhancement (including T1WI, T2WI, and MRI enhancement) and the group of MRCP (including T1WI, T2WI, and MRCP). Two groups were evaluated by the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve.Totally 23 cases of intraductal papillary mucinous tumors and 12 cases of intraductal papillary mucinous carcinomas were diagnosed. Finally, 29 cases (29/35) of IPMN were diagnosed correctly in the group of MR enhancement, and 25 cases (25/35) diagnosed correctly in the group of MRCP. The differential diagnostic accuracy of the group of MRI enhancement (82.9%) was higher than that of the group of MRCP (71.4%), although the difference was not statistically significant (P=0.068). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and the area under the ROC curve (AUC) of the group of MRI enhancement were 83.3%, 82.6%, 71.4%, and 0.850, and those of the group of MRCP were 75.0%, 69.6%, 52.3%, and 0.723. The AUC of the group of MRI enhancement was significantly larger than that of the group of MRCP (P=0.0465).MRI enhancement is more valuable than MRCP in the differential diagnosis of benign and malignant IPMN.EUS-guided 22-gauge fine-needle aspiration versus core biopsy needle in the evaluation of solid pancreatic neoplasms.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is widely used for diagnosis of pancreatic lesions. The Echotip Procore Needle (Wilson-Cook Medical) is a new 22G fine biopsy needle (FNB) for obtaining core biopsy material at time of EUS. This study aimed to compare the technical and diagnostic performance of conventional FNA and FNB. Thirty-two patients met the design criteria for this prospective paired cohort study. All lesions sampled were solid (non-cystic) pancreatic masses by EUS appearance. Patients were randomized to receive FNA or FNB by first attempt. A cytopathologist performed on-site evaluations. Samples were assessed for accuracy of diagnosis, cellularity, contamination, and sufficiency for ancillary studies. Technical and diagnostic performances were compared. Compared to FNA, there was a statistically significant decreased ability of FNB to achieve a diagnosis (FNA 93.8%, FNB 28.1%, P < 0.001). FNB was diagnostically superior to FNA in 1 of 32 cases. Technical failures were observed in five cases due to resistance to advancement of the FNB needle. Regarding operator perceived ease-of-use, FNA outperformed FNB (P < 0.001). Eight cases had insufficient FNB material to survive tissue processing. There was no significant difference in mean specimen cellularity between devices. FNA samples showed an increased amount of contaminant (P = 0.036) but were more sufficient for ancillary studies (P = 0.502). Although deemed comparable to FNA when providing material for cytology, the pledged advantage of FNB acting like a core biopsy needle was not apparent in our series. Additional studies are needed before routine adoption of 22G FNB can be recommended.Combining fine needle aspiration with brushing cytology has improved yields in diagnosing pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma.The aim of this retrospective study is to evaluate the diagnostic yields of combining fine needle aspiration (FNA) with brushing cytology (BC) in clinical work-up of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma. The study included a total of 97 patients who underwent both FNA and BC along with histologic/clinical follow-up (F/U). Cytologic diagnoses were categorized as negative for neoplasm (NEG), atypical/favor neoplasm (AN), and suspicious or positive for neoplasm (POS). Based on the cytologic diagnoses, the cohort was divided as follows: 23 had concordant FNA and BC diagnoses of POS/AN, all were neoplasms on F/U; 34 had disconcordant (POS/AN vs. NEG) FNA and BC diagnoses, all but 2 were neoplasms on F/U; The remaining 40 were NEG on both FNA and BC, F/U revealed that 10 were neoplasms and 30 were chronic pancreatitis. Overall, FNA rendered more true positive diagnoses than BC. However, BC but not FNA detected neoplasms in 10 patients. Most of the neoplasms identified on F/U were ductal adenocarcinoma (59 of 65). Diagnostic sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and accuracy were 69.2, 93.8, 95.7, 60, and 77.3% for FNA alone, 50.8, 100, 100, 50.0, and 67.0% for BC alone, and 84.6, 100, 100, 76.2, and 89.7% for combining FNA with BC. In conclusion, both EUS-guided FNA and BC are valuable modalities in the preoperative diagnosis of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma. When used in combination, the two modalities complement each other and achieve better diagnostic yield in pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma than either FNA or BC alone.Comparison of ultrasound and computed tomography in the detection of pancreatic malignancy.A retrospective analysis was performed on 102 patients who were examined by both ultrasound (US) and computed tomography (CT) for known or possible carcinoma of the pancreas. In 38% of the patients, ultrasonography was unsatisfactory due to overlying interfering intestinal gas or ascites, whereas only 2% of CT studies were unsatisfactory due to technical considerations. In comparing the two modalities, CT was found to be more accurate (96% CT vs. 84% US), and this became more significant when nondiagnostic studies were considered in evaluating accuracy (95% CT vs. 54% US). Because of the findings in this analysis, CT is recommended as the initial diagnostic imaging modality for the evaluation of possible pancreatic neoplasm.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration and cyst fluid analysis for pancreatic cysts.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) with EUS-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) has been increasingly utilized to differentiate malignant/pre-malignant pancreatic cysts from those that are benign or have low malignant potential.To determine the utility of EUS morphology, EUS-FNA cytology and cyst fluid analysis to distinguish mucinous cystic neoplasms from non-mucinous cystic neoplasms based on histopathology following surgical resection.A retrospective, single center case series.Patients who underwent EUS and EUS-FNA of known or suspected pancreatic cysts followed by surgical resection. The final diagnosis was based on histopathology.Patients were divided in two groups: mucinous cystic neoplasms and non-mucinous cystic neoplasms. Patients with intraductal papillary mucinous tumors were excluded.Clinical profiles and EUS findings.Forty-eight patients (mean age: 52 years; 29 females, 19 males) were identified: 16 mucinous cystic neoplasms and 32 non-mucinous cystic neoplasms. There were more women in the mucinous cystic neoplasm group compared to the non-mucinous cystic neoplasm group (88% vs. 47%; P=0.011) but the two groups were otherwise similar. The sensitivity, specificity and frequency of cases correctly identified of EUS-FNA cytology for the diagnosis of mucinous cystic neoplasms were 12.5% (95% CI: 2.2-37.2%), 90.6% (95% CI: 75.0-97.5%) and 64.6% (95% CI: 50.4-77.0%), respectively. Median cyst fluid CEA for the mucinous cystic neoplasm group (277 ng/mL; n=14) was significantly higher (P=0.002) than the non-mucinous cystic neoplasm group (1.5 ng/mL; n=21). Cyst fluid CEA greater than 800 ng/mL had a sensitivity of 42.9% (95% CI: 21.3-67.4%) and specificity of 95.2% (95% CI: 75.6-99.9%) for the diagnosis of mucinous cystic neoplasm. On the other hand, a cyst fluid CEA greater than a best cut-off ranging from 3.5 to 8.5 ng/mL had a sensitivity of 92.9% (95% CI: 66.5-100%), a specificity of 66.7% (14/21; 95% CI: 45.2-83.0%), and an accuracy of 81.1% with a frequency of cases correctly identified of 77.1% (95% CI: 60.7-88.2%).EUS-FNA cytology and cyst fluid CEA greater than 800 ng/mL are insensitive but highly specific for differentiating mucinous cystic neoplasms from non-mucinous cystic neoplasms. EUS morphology alone cannot distinguish between the two groups.Role of (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography in diagnosis and management of pancreatic cancer; comparison with multidetector row computed tomography, magnetic resonance imaging and endoscopic ultrasonography.We aimed to analyze the contribution of (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography (FDG PET/CT) imaging to the diagnosis and management of pancreatic cancer compared with multidetector row computed tomography (MDCT), magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS).We retrospectively scanned the data of 52 patients who were referred for FDG PET/CT imaging for evaluation of pancreatic lesions greater than 10mm. The diagnostic performances of 4 imaging methods and the impact of PET/CT on the management of pancreatic cancer were defined.Pancreatic adenocarcinoma was diagnosed in 33 of 52 patients (63%), 15 patients had benign diseases of pancreas (29%), and 4 patients were normal (8%). Sensitivity and NPV of EUS and PET/CT were equal (100%) and higher than MDCT and MRI. Specificity, PPV and NPV of PET/CT were significantly higher than MDCT. However, sensitivities of two imaging methods were not significantly different. There was no significant difference between PET/CT and MRI and EUS for these values. When the cut-off value of SUVmax was 3.2, the most effective sensitivity and specificity values were obtained. PET/CT contributed to the management of pancreatic cancer in 30% of patients.FDG PET/CT is a valuable imaging method for the diagnosis and management of pancreatic cancer, especially when applied along with EUS as first line diagnostic tools.Aspirative cytology with fine-needle in the abdomen, retroperitoneum and pelvic cavity: a seven year experience of the Portuguese Institute of Oncology, Center of Porto.A review was made of 236 fine-needle aspiration cytologies (FNAC), guided by ultrasound, computerized tomography or fluoroscopy, performed in the abdomen, retroperitoneum and pelvic cavity. Seventy-three FNAC were from the liver, 41 from the kidneys, 30 from the pelvic cavity, 26 from the retroperitoneum, 24 from the peritoneal cavity, 13 from the pancreas, 11 from the adrenal glands, nine from the abdominal wall, seven from the spleen and two from the digestive tract. The total accuracy rate was 90%, ranging from 77% in the abdominal wall lesions to 100% in the splenic lesions. Indications for FNAC and results are discussed as well as the accuracy rate obtained with different guiding modalities. We conclude considering FNAC a safe, unexpensive and reliable method to confirm the diagnosis of malignant lesions in the abdomen, retroperitoneum and pelvic cavity.Indications for and clinical impact of repeat endoscopic ultrasound.The value of repeating endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is seldom described. This study evaluates a patient population in which EUS was repeated.This was a retrospective study of patients who between January 2002 and December 2006 had an EUS scan performed; this EUS scan (re-EUS) was the second or more EUS scan performed.Over the study period, the department performed 3024 EUS procedures, of which 561 investigations were defined as re-EUS. According to defined exclusion criteria, 244 procedures were not analyzed further. The study group thus consisted of 317 procedures (242 patients). In 163 cases (126 patients), re-EUS was planned by the endosonographer for control of an undetermined lesion. The first re-EUS scan performed changed the further management in 91 of 126 patients (72%). Sensitivity and specificity of re-EUS regarding pancreatic cancer were 0.65 and 1.00, respectively. Re-EUS was performed in 82 cases (77 patients) where no re-investigation had been planned at the initial EUS scan but worsening of symptoms or new findings of other imaging procedures had led to an additional EUS scan. Thirteen of these patients (17%) proved to have pancreatic cancer. In 62 cases (57 patients) re-EUS and EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration (FNA) had been planed in order to confirm the suspicion of malignant disease. Following re-EUS and EUS-FNA, 40 of these patients could be referred for either oncology or surgery. In the remaining 10 cases, re-EUS was performed for miscellaneous indications.Re-EUS has a substantial clinical impact on the further management of the patient.Is diagnostic accuracy of fine needle aspiration on solid pancreatic lesions aspiration-related? A multicentre randomised trial.Endoscopic ultrasound fine needle aspiration has a central role in the diagnostic algorithm of solid pancreatic masses. Data comparing the fine needle aspiration performed with different aspiration volume and without aspiration are lacking. We compared endoscopic ultrasound fine needle aspiration performed with the 22 gauge needle with different aspiration volumes (10, 20 and 0 ml), for adequacy, diagnostic accuracy and complications.Prospective clinical study at four referral centres. Endoscopic ultrasound fine needle aspiration was performed with a 22G needle with both volume aspiration (10 and 20 cc) and without syringe, in randomly assigned sequence. The cyto-pathologist was blinded as to which aspiration was used for each specimen.100 patients met the inclusion criteria, 88 completed the study. The masses had a mean size of 32.21±11.24 mm. Sample adequacy evaluated on site was 87.5% with 20 ml aspiration vs. 76.1% with 10 ml (p=0.051), and 45.4% without aspiration (20 ml vs. 0 ml p<0.001; 10 ml vs. 0 ml p<0.001). The diagnostic accuracy was significantly better with 20 ml than with 10 ml and 0 ml (86.2% vs. 69.0% vs. 49.4% p<0.001).A significantly higher adequacy and accuracy were observed with the 20 ml aspiration puncture, therefore performing all passes with this volume aspiration may improve the diagnostic power of fine needle aspiration.Comparison of endoscopic ultrasound and computed tomography in the assessment of pancreatic cyst size using pathology as the gold standard.Accurate assessment of whether a cyst is greater than 3 cm is an essential component when considering resection especially for mucinous lesions. The most accurate method of assessing cyst size is uncertain with many patients undergoing several complimentary imaging modalities. This study aimed to compare the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) with CT scanning in assessing pancreatic cyst size compared to histology.Patients referred for EUS of a pancreatic cystic lesion from April 2003 to August 2011. Patient age and gender, lesion size and site were recorded and compared using cyst size at histology compared to EUS and CT recorded within 3 months of surgery. Subgroup analysis was performed with respect to cyst site and proven mucinous lesions.357 patients were included of which 70 (mean age 60.6 years, 24 males) had undergone surgical resection. The resected cysts were located 30/17/23 in the head/body/tail of the pancreas. Median size at histology was 32 mm compared to 35 mm at EUS (p = 0.47) and 35 mm at CT (p = 0.52). For mucinous lesions alone, median size at histology was 32 mm compared to 33 mm at EUS (p = 0.46) and 35 mm at CT (p = 0.39). EUS and CT had comparable sensitivity, specificity, negative predictive value, positive predictive value and accuracy for all cyst types and locations.CT and EUS measurements are not significantly different to pathological size following resection of pancreatic cystic lesions. CT and EUS are interchangeable investigations for determining cyst size pre-operatively although EUS has the additional advantage of fluid sampling.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration in focal pancreatic lesions: a prospective intraindividual comparison of two needle assemblies.The results of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in focal pancreatic lesions are less impressive than those in the mediastinum. The aim of this prospectively randomized study was to compare two commercially available needle assemblies with regard to handling and cytopathological yield.A total of 30 patients (19 men, 11 women; mean age 61) with focal pancreatic lesions underwent EUS-FNA with each of the two needles (GIP, Wilson-Cook). The sequence was randomized for the examiner and blinded for the cytologist. Three patients had to be excluded because of the impossibility of sample assignment or patient follow-up. EUS-FNA was performed using the standard technique with linear echo endoscopes.None of the characteristics evaluated by the examiner differed significantly between either of the needles. Inadequate results were obtained in 11% using the GIP needle, but in none with the Wilson-Cook needle. GIP needle cytology revealed malignancy in 11 patients (sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were 55%, 100%, and 65%, respectively, including inadequate results). The aspirates obtained with the Wilson-Cook needle identified malignancy in 16 patients (sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were 85%, 100%, and 89%, respectively).No statistically significant differences were detected in the handling of either of the two needle assemblies. No complications were reported using the GIP needles. However, in four procedures breakages of the outer Teflon sheath of the Wilson-Cook needle occurred, and in another four cases re-insertion of the stylet was impossible. Nevertheless, cytopathologic results were significantly better with the Wilson-Cook needle.Diagnosis of pancreatic cancer by contrast-harmonic endoscopic ultrasound (EUS): complementary and not competitive with EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle biopsy of small solid pancreatic lesions using a 22-gauge needle with side fenestration.Early detection of small pancreatic cancer is important because expected survival is markedly better for tumors ≤ 2 cm. A new endoscopic ultrasound-(EUS) guided biopsy needle with side fenestration has been recently developed to enable fine-needle biopsy (FNB) under EUS guidance. The aim of this study was to evaluate the outcome of EUS-FNB using a 22-gauge ProCore needle in solid pancreatic lesions ≤ 2 cm, in terms of diagnostic accuracy and yield.From January 2011 to December 2012, all consecutive EUS-guided tissue sampling of small pancreatic lesions (≤ 2 cm) were performed using 22-gauge ProCore needles; the data of these patients were analyzed retrospectively.Sixty-eight patients with a mean age of 65.7 years were included. The mean lesion size was 16.5 mm (range 5-20). None of the patients developed complications. On pathological examination, the tissue retrieved was judged adequate in 58 out of 68 cases (85.3 %) and the presence of a tissue core was recorded in 36 out of 68 cases (52.9 %). The overall sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy were 80, 100, 100, 40, and 82 %, respectively.Our results suggested that EUS-FNB of small pancreatic lesions using a 22-gauge ProCore needle is effective and safe, and supports our hypothesis that EUS-FNB is highly useful in establishing the nature of small pancreatic lesions.Utility of endoscopic ultrasound, cytology and fluid carcinoembryonic antigen and CA 19-9 levels in pancreatic cystic lesions.To assess the diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS), fluid tumor markers and cytology in distinguishing benign from (pre)malignant pancreatic cystic lesions.46 consecutive patients, referred to a gastroenterologist and surgeon for a symptomatic or incidental pancreatic cyst, were reviewed. EUS, cytology, and carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and carbohydrate antigen (CA 19-9) levels were compared with the final diagnosis, based on surgical pathology and/or imaging follow-up of at least 12 mo. Cysts were classified as benign (pseudocyst, serous cystadenoma) or malignant/pre-malignant (mucinous cystic neoplasm). Receiver-operator characteristics (ROC) curve analysis was performed.The mean age was 56 years; 29% were male and median cyst diameter was 3 cm. Final outcome was obtained in 41 (89%) patients. Twenty-three (56%) of these 41 had surgical pathology. Twenty-three (56%) had benign lesions and 18 (44%) had malignant/pre-malignant lesions. Sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive value of EUS alone to distinguish benign from malignant/premalignant pancreatic cystic lesions were 50%, 56%, 36% and 54% and for cytology were 71%, 96%, 92% and 85%, respectively. The corresponding values for the ROC-derived ideal cutoffs were 75%, 90%, 75%, 90% for CA 19-9 (> 37 U/mL) and 70%, 85%, 79% and 78% for CEA (> 3.1 ng/mL). Subgroup analysis of those with surgical pathology yielded almost identical performance and cutoffs.Cytology and cyst fluid tumor marker analysis is a very useful tool in distinguishing benign from (pre)malignant pancreatic cystic lesions.Predictors of malignancy in patients with suspicious or indeterminate cytology on pancreatic endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration: a multivariate model.The aim of this study was to evaluate predictors of malignancy in pancreatic lesions with suspicious or indeterminate endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) cytology.Suspicious/indeterminate EUS-FNA cytology was identified from our database. Stable imaging, benign pathology, or survival for 12 months after EUS-FNA was considered benign. Diagnosis of malignancy was based on positive pathology, local invasion/metastasis on imaging, or death within 12 months from cancer-associated causes. Univariate analysis was performed to compare variables between benign and malignant lesions. Multivariate analysis (covariates: age [<70 or ≥70], appearance [solid/cystic], size [<20 or ≥20 mm], and serum CA19-9 [<40 or ≥40]) was performed using binary logistic regression.There were 81 patients with suspicious or indeterminate cytology. Final diagnosis was cancer in 55 (67.9%) of 81 (adenocarcinoma in 40/81 [49.4%], "other neoplasms" in 15/81 [18.5%]) and benign in 26 (32.1%) of 81. Univariate analysis revealed a difference in age, lesion size, solid/cystic characteristics, and serum CA 19-9 between benign and malignant lesions. Only elevated serum CA 19-9 was independently associated with a diagnosis of malignancy on multivariate analysis.Age, lesion size, and solid/cystic characteristics on EUS were not independently associated with cancer. Pancreatic lesions with suspicious/indeterminate cytology and elevated serum CA 19-9 should be considered as concerning for a malignant diagnosis.Endoscopic ultrasound guided aspiration cytology--a useful diagnostic tool.To evaluate the diagnostic utility of endoscopic ultrasound guided fine needle aspiration cytology in the diagnosis of mediastinal and abdominal lesions.Endoscopic ultrasound guided aspiration cytology was carried out on a total of 155 cases during the study period. The lesions were categorized according to the site of needle biopsy. Clinical impression and provisional diagnoses were compared with the final cytological diagnoses and the percentage of inadequate/non diagnostic smears was calculated.Out of 155 cases, 18 cases (11.5%) were reported as inadequate while a definite diagnosis was given in the remaining cases (88.5%). The mean patient age was 49 +/- 14.0 years. There were 105 (68%) males and 50 (32%) females. The most common site biopsied was mediastinal lymph nodes followed by pancreas. The most frequent diagnosis was adenocarcinoma mostly of pancreas followed by chronic granulomatous inflammation of mediastinal and abdominal lymph nodes. The average number of passes made was 3. The size of the lesions ranged from 0.6 cm to 25 cm with mean size of 3 cm as measured by endoscopic ultrasound probe.Endoscopic ultrasound guided aspiration cytology is a useful procedure in the evaluation of deep seated lesions of gastrointestinal tract (GIT), abdominal cavity and mediastinum.Contrast enhanced ultrasound and computer tomography diagnosis of solid and mixed pancreatic tumors - analysis of confounders.AIMS. The aim of this study was to evaluate the leading causes of discrepancies between imaging studies [contrast enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) and contrast enhanced computer tomography (CECT)] diagnosis and histology in patients presenting to a tertiary referral center with previously detected pancreatic masses by standard abdominal ultrasound. METHODS. We performed a prospective longitudinal observational study on 76 patients with pancreatic masses: 57 (75%) patients with solid pancreatic tumors and 19 (25%) patients with cystic and mixed pancreatic masses. For each tumor the CEUS and CECT features were analyzed and compared with the final histological diagnosis. RESULTS. Testing the performance of CEUS and CECT in evaluating the benign or malignant etiology of pancreatic masses, we obtained a probability of 82% for CEUS and of 83% for CECT, for a randomly selected individual from the pancreatic tumor group to have an imaging result indicating suspicion for malignancy. We obtained discordances with the histopathological diagnosis in 25 (32.89%) patients for CEUS and in 23 (30.26%) patients for CECT. In multiple regression analysis, two variables independently influenced the discordance between the two imaging methods and histological conclusion: enhancement pattern and tumor nature (solid vs. cystic). CONCLUSIONS.CEUS and CECT showed a good diagnostic performance in differentiating benign from malignant pancreatic tumors. Enhancement pattern and tumor nature (solid vs. cystic) are independent confounders between imaging and histological diagnosis.A prospective comparison of liquid-based cytology and traditional smear cytology in pancreatic endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration.To compare results of liquid-based cytology (LBC) and the conventional smear method (SMEAR) when performing endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) for lesions of suspected pancreatic malignancy without an on-site cytopathologist.Fifty-eight patients were prospectively enrolled between July and December 2009. Aspirates obtained from the first needle pass were randomized either to SMEAR or LBC. Another sample from the second needle pass was allocated to the other method. The rest of the aspirates from the third or later needle passes were used for SMEAR. Diagnostic accuracy was compared and related factors were pursued.Although both methods were 100% specific, LBC was inferior to SMEAR in terms of sensitivity, negative predictive value, and accuracy. However, LBC provided correct diagnoses in 2 out of 3 cases of false negatives for malignancy by SMEAR in which blood was highly contaminated. Although no factor was identified for LBC, low blood contamination and more than 3 needle passes were related with accurate diagnosis in SMEAR.LBC was less accurate than SMEAR when performing pancreatic EUS-FNA without an on-site cytopathologist. However, LBC might serve as a good complement to SMEAR if blood contamination is profound.Value of endoscopic ultrasound guided fine needle aspiration biopsy in the diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses.To assess the feasibility and diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound guided fine needle biopsy (EUS-FNAB) in patients with solid pancreatic masses.Ninety nine consecutive patients with pancreatic masses were studied. Histological findings obtained by EUS-FNAB were compared with the final diagnosis assessed by surgery, biopsy of other tumour site or at postmortem examination, or by using a combination of clinical course, imaging features, and tumour markers.EUS-FNAB was feasible in 90 patients (adenocarcinomas, n = 59; neuroendocrine tumours, n = 15; various neoplasms, n = 6; pancreatitis, n = 10), and analysable material was obtained in 73. Tumour size (>/= or < 25 mm in diameter) did not influence the ability to obtain informative biopsy samples. Diagnostic accuracy was 74.4% (adenocarcinomas, 81.4%; neuroendocrine tumours, 46.7%; other lesions, 75%; p<0.02). Overall, the diagnostic yield in all 99 patients was 68%. Successful biopsies were performed in six patients with portal hypertension. Minor complications (moderate bleeding or pain) occurred in 5% of cases.EUS-FNAB is a useful and safe method for the investigation of pancreatic masses, with a high feasibility rate even when lesions are small. Overall diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNAB seems to depend on the tumour type.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas (IPMN): clinico-pathological correlations and surgical indications.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) are increasingly recognized entities, whose management remains sometimes controversial, due to the high rate of benign lesions and on the other side to the good survival after resection of malignant ones.Retrospective analysis of a prospectively collected Western series of IPMN.Forty cases of IPMN were analysed (1992-2007). Most patients were symptomatic (72.5%); cholangio-MRI had the best diagnostic accuracy both for the tumour nature (83.3%) and for the presence of malignancy (57.1%). ERCP was done in 8 cases (20%), and the results were poor. Thirteen patients were treated by pancreatic resection and 27 were maintained in follow-up. Total pancreatectomy was performed in 46% of the cases; in situ and invasive carcinoma were recognized in 15.4% and 38.4% of the cases, respectively. The mean follow-up was 42 months (range 12-72). One only patients with nodal metastases died 16 months after the operation for disease progression, while 91.6% of the operated patients are disease free. Out of the 27 not resected patients, 2 out of 4 presenting a lesion at high risk for malignancy died, while the remaining are in good conditions and disease free, with a mean follow-up of 31 months.Therapeutic indication for IPMNs is mainly based upon radiological evaluation of the risk of malignancy. While the main duct tumours should be resected, preserving whenever possible a portion of the gland, the secondary ducts tumours may be maintained under observation, in absence of radiological elements of suspicion such as size larger than 3 cm, or a wall greater than 3 mm or nodules or papillae in the context of the cyst.Imaging features of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas in multi-detector row computed tomography.To retrospectively evaluate the imaging features of pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) in multi-detector row computed tomography (MDCT).A total of 20 patients with pathologically-confirmed intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) were included in this study. Axial MDCT images combined with CT angiography (CTA) and multiplanar volume reformations (MPVR) or curved reformations (CR) were preoperatively acquired. Two radiologists (Tan L and Wang DB) reviewed all the images in consensus using an interactive picture archiving and communication system. The disputes in readings were resolved through consultation with a third experienced radiologist (Chen KM). Finally, the findings and diagnoses were compared with the pathologic results.The pathological study revealed 12 malignant IPMNs and eight benign IPMNs. The diameters of the cystic lesions and main pancreatic ducts (MPDs) were significantly larger in malignant IPMNs compared with those of the benign IPMNs (P < 0.05). The combined-type IPMNs had a higher rate of malignancy than the other two types of IPMNs (P < 0.05). Tumors with mural nodules and thick septa had a significantly higher incidence of malignancy than tumors without these features (P < 0.05). Communication of side-branch IPMNs with the MPD was present in nine cases at pathologic examination. Seven of them were identified from CTA and MPVR or CR images. From comparison with the pathological diagnosis, the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of MDCT in characterizing the malignancy of IPMN of the pancreas were determined to be 100%, 87.5% and 95%, respectively.MDCT with CTA and MPVR or CR techniques can elucidate the imaging features of IPMNs and help predict the malignancy of these tumors.18F-FDG PET/MRI fusion in characterizing pancreatic tumors: comparison to PET/CT.To demonstrate that positron emission tomography (PET)/magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) fusion was feasible in characterizing pancreatic tumors (PTs), comparing MRI and computed tomography (CT) as mapping images for fusion with PET as well as fused PET/MRI and PET/CT.We retrospectively reviewed 47 sets of (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose ((18)F -FDG) PET/CT and MRI examinations to evaluate suspected or known pancreatic cancer. To assess the ability of mapping images for fusion with PET, CT (of PET/CT), T1- and T2-weighted (w) MR images (all non-contrast) were graded regarding the visibility of PT (5-point confidence scale). Fused PET/CT, PET/T1-w or T2-w MR images of the upper abdomen were evaluated to determine whether mapping images provided additional diagnostic information to PET alone (3-point scale). The overall quality of PET/CT or PET/MRI sets in diagnosis was also assessed (3-point scale). These PET/MRI-related scores were compared to PET/CT-related scores and the accuracy in characterizing PTs was compared.Forty-three PTs were visualized on CT or MRI, including 30 with abnormal FDG uptake and 13 without. The confidence score for the visibility of PT was significantly higher on T1-w MRI than CT. The scores for additional diagnostic information to PET and overall quality of each image set in diagnosis were significantly higher on the PET/T1-w MRI set than the PET/CT set. The diagnostic accuracy was higher on PET/T1-w or PET/T2-w MRI (93.0 and 90.7%, respectively) than PET/CT (88.4%), but statistical significance was not obtained.PET/MRI fusion, especially PET with T1-w MRI, was demonstrated to be superior to PET/CT in characterizing PTs, offering better mapping and fusion image quality.EUS elastography combined with the strain ratio of tissue elasticity for diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses.Recently, the usefulness of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) elastography has been reported for the diagnosis of pancreatic lesions. In the present study, we retrospectively assessed EUS elastography as a diagnostic tool by evaluating tissue elasticity distribution and elasticity semiquantification, using the strain ratio (SR) of tissue elasticity, in patients with pancreatic masses.One hundred and nine patients who underwent EUS elastography between September 2006 and May 2009 were retrospectively evaluated. The final diagnosis was chronic pancreatitis (CP) in 20 patients [6 with non-mass-forming pancreatitis, 7 with mass-forming pancreatitis (MFP), and 7 with autoimmune pancreatitis (AIP)], pancreatic cancer (PC) in 72, pancreatic neuroendocrine tumor (PNET) in 9, and normal pancreas in 8. The tissue elasticity distribution calculation was performed in real time, and the results were represented in color in fundamental B-mode imaging. In addition, we performed quantification using the SR (non-mass area/mass area).Elastography for all PC patients showed intense blue coloration, indicating malignant lesions. In contrast, MFP presented with a mixed coloration pattern of green, yellow, and low-intensity blue. Normal controls showed an even distribution of green to red. The mean SR was 23.66 ± 12.65 for MFP and 39.08 ± 20.54 for PC (P < 0.05).Endoscopic ultrasound elastography is a promising diagnostic tool for defining the tissue characteristics of pancreatic masses. In addition, semiquantitative analysis of elasticity using the SR may allow the differentiation of MFP from PC.Diagnostic efficacy of the cell block method in comparison with smear cytology of tissue samples obtained by endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration.The diagnostic efficacy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) cytology may vary greatly depending on the treatment of the samples obtained and the level of proficiency of the cytopathologist or cytoscreener.We prospectively evaluated the diagnostic efficacy of the cell block (CB) method and that of smear cytology using tissue samples obtained in the same needle pass at EUS-FNA in 33 patients with pancreatic tumors, abdominal tumors or swollen lymph nodes. An average of 3.1 passes were applied during the procedure without affirmation by rapid cytology. About half of the material obtained by each single pass was subjected to smear cytology, while the other half was evaluated by the CB method. Four to 12 glass slides were prepared for both Papanicolaou stain and Giemsa stain. The CB sections were prepared using the sodium alginate method and subjected to HE, PAS-AB and immunohistochemical stains. Two pathologists independently made cytological and histological diagnoses. The final diagnosis was based on integration of cytohistological findings, diagnostic imaging, and clinical course.The diagnostic accuracy of the CB method and that of smear cytology were 93.9 and 60.6%, respectively (p = 0.003), and their respective sensitivities were 92.0 and 60.0% (p = 0.02). It was easier to make a definite diagnosis of not only malignancies but also benign conditions by the CB method than by the smear method.The CB method with immunostaining showed a higher diagnostic yield than smear cytology in patients who had undergone EUS-FNA without rapid on-site cytology.Prospective assessment of diagnostic utility and complications of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration. Results from a newly developed academic endoscopic ultrasound program.It is currently unknown whether a newly developed endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) program can produce results similar to those of experienced EUS centers. We therefore prospectively evaluated the diagnostic accuracy and major complications of EUS-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in a newly developed EUS program.All procedures were performed by a single endosonographer in the presence of a cytopathologist. Reference standard for classification of final disease included: surgical resection, death from disease progression and repeat radiologic and/or clinical follow-up. Major complications were defined as oversedation, and those that resulted in a physician or emergency department visits, hospitalization, or death.540 patients (median age 63 years, 77% white) underwent EUS-FNAs of 656 lesions: lymph nodes (LNs, n = 248), solid pancreatic masses (SPMs, n = 229), cystic pancreatic masses (CPM, n = 57), mural lesions (n = 41), bile duct/gallbladder (n = 28), liver (n = 17), mediastinum/lung (n = 17), adrenal (n = 15), spleen (n = 3) and kidney (n = 1). SPMs and bile duct/gallbladder lesions were more likely to have suspicious/atypical cytology when compared to other lesions (8.7 vs. 4.6%; p = 0.04) and required more passes to achieve a tissue diagnosis (p < 0.001). The overall sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV and accuracy of EUS-FNA was 91.7, 97.1, 98.1, 87.7 and 93.8%, respectively. Six patients (1.1%) (95% CI 0.4-2.4) experienced a major complication. One patient died shortly after the procedure due to preexisting pulmonary embolus (0.18%).EUS-FNA is highly accurate and safe in sampling a variety of peri-intestinal organs and lymph nodes. With adequate third-tier training, a newly developed program can produce results similar to those from expert EUS centers.Intravoxel incoherent motion MRI for the differentiation between mass forming chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma.To determine which of the quantitative parameters obtained from intravoxel incoherent motion diffusion weighted imaging (DWI) is the most significant for the differentiation between pancreatic carcinoma and mass-forming chronic pancreatitis.Twenty-nine patients with pancreatic masses were included, 9 proved to have a mass-forming pancreatitis and 20 had a pancreatic carcinoma. The patients were studied using intravoxel incoherent motion DWI with 11 b-values and the apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC), the true diffusion constant (D) and the perfusion fraction (f) were calculated. The diagnostic strength of the parameters was evaluated using receiver operating characteristic analysis.The ADC in chronic pancreatitis was higher than in pancreatic carcinoma with significant differences at b = 50, 75, 100, 150, 200, 300 s/mm (ADC50 = 3.17 ± 0.67 vs. 2.55 ± 1.09, ADC75 = 2.46 ± 0.4 vs. 1.93 ± 0.52, ADC100 = 2.28 ± 0.48 vs. 1.73 ± 0.45, ADC150 = 1.97 ± 0.26 vs. 1.63 ± 0.40, ADC200 = 1.98 ± 0.24 vs. 1.53 ± 0.28, and ADC300 = 1.76 ± 0.19 vs. 1.46 ± 0.31 × 10(-3) mm2/s). No significant differences were found at b = 25, 400, 600, and 800 s/mm (ADC25 = 4.69 ± 0.65 vs. 4.04 ± 1.35, ADC400 = 1.57 ± 0.21 vs. 1.37 ± 0.30, ADC600 = 1.38 ± 0.18 vs. 1.24 ± 0.25, and ADC800 = 1.27 ± 0.10 vs. 1.18 ± 0.19 × 10(-3) mm2/s) nor using ADCtot (1.42 ± 0.23 vs. 1.28 ± 0.12 × 10(-3) mm2/s). The perfusion fraction f was significantly higher in pancreatitis compared with pancreatic carcinoma (16.3% ± 5.30% vs. 8.2% ± 4.00%, P = 0.0001). There was no significant difference between groups for D (1.07 ± 0.224 × 10(-3) mm2/s for chronic pancreatitis and 1.09 ± 0.3 × 10(-3) mm2/s for pancreatic carcinoma, P = 0.66). For f, the highest area under the curve (0.894) and combined sensitivity (80%) and specificity (89.9%) were found.There were significant differences in ADC50-300 between chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma. Because D is not significantly different between groups, differences in ADC can be attributed mainly to differences in perfusion. The perfusion fraction f proved to be the superior DWI-derived parameter for differentiation of mass-forming pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma.Utility of a repeated EUS at a tertiary-referral center.The utility of a repeated EUS by experts is not known.To define the utility of a repeated EUS for the same indication.A retrospective case series.Tertiary-referral hospital in Indianapolis, Indiana.Consecutive subjects, with and without cancer, who, between January 2000 and September 2006, underwent an initial EUS elsewhere within 6 and 12 weeks of a repeated EUS at our hospital.A repeated EUS.Clinical impact of a repeated EUS.Of 8936 EUS examinations, 73 repeated procedures (0.8%) were identified, and 24 were excluded. The 49 initial EUS procedures (26 men, median age 59 years) were done in Indiana (n = 44) or another state (n = 5) by one of 15 physicians in private practice (n = 48) or at a teaching hospital (n = 1). An EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) was performed during an initial EUS in 21 patients (no biopsy diagnostic for cancer) and was not attempted in 14 patients. The principle indication for a repeated EUS (n = 35) was for an EUS-FNA after the initial tissue sampling was benign, nondiagnostic, or not done. A second EUS had no clinical impact in 18 patients (37%). In the remaining 31 patients (63%), a repeated EUS provided a new or changed clinical diagnosis (n = 12), the initial diagnosis of primary pancreatic cancer (n = 5) or GI stromal tumor (GIST) (n = 1) after a previous nondiagnostic biopsy; or the initial diagnosis of primary (n = 4) or metastatic (n = 2) pancreatic cancer, metastatic esophageal cancer (n = 1), hilar cholangiocarcinoma (n = 1), GIST (n = 1), or pancreatic neuroendocrine tumor (n = 1), or an initial aspiration of a pancreatic cyst (n = 3) after a previous EUS-FNA was not able to be performed.A retrospective design; a small number of nonpancreatic indications.In this study, a repeated EUS at a tertiary-referral center had a clinical impact in 63% of patients when performed by experts for a similar clinical indication.Pancreatic cystadenoma and cystadenocarcinoma: diagnostic value of preoperative morphological investigations.To find out whether preoperative morphological investigations differentiated between serous cystadenoma, mucinous cystadenoma, and cystadenocarcinoma of the pancreas.Multicentre retrospective study of casenotes.24 Adult gastroenterology units (1 private, 8 non-university teaching hospitals, and 15 university teaching hospitals) in France.71 Patients with 74 tumours diagnosed between January 1978 and January 1988.Correlation between histological diagnosis and results of ultrasonography, computed tomography, angiography, and magnetic resonance imaging.6 of 59 ultrasound scans (10%), 7 of 52 computed tomograms (13%), 0 of 18 angiograms, 1 of 12 pancreatograms (8%), and the single magnetic resonance scan correctly diagnosed the type of pancreatic tumour. Ultrasonography or computed tomography, or both, diagnosed cystadenoma (but not the type) in 26 cases (37%). "Pseudocyst" was diagnosed in 14 cases (20%).In contrast to other studies, our results indicate that preoperative morphological investigations are of limited value in diagnosing cystadenomas of the pancreas. In particular, their ability to differentiate between different types of cystadenoma is poor.FDG-PET scanning in the diagnosis of gastrointestinal cancers.This review deals with the current, well-established indications for two-(18F)-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) scanning in patients with gastrointestinal cancers. FDG-PET is a non-invasive, functional imaging technique. FDG exploits the native glucose transporter to enter the cell. Since many tumours have enhanced glucose uptake, FDG is readily accumulated in malignant cells and can be detected by a PET camera. FDG-PET has been established as an important diagnostic tool in clinical oncology. This review deals with the current, well-established indications for FDG-PET scanning in patients with gastrointestinal cancers. In the current practice, FDG-PET is most commonly used to stage oesophageal carcinoma, to detect and stage recurrence of colorectal carcinoma and to differentiate between benign and malignant pancreatic lesions. The benefit of FDG-PET scanning in patients with oesophagus carcinoma is best established in stage IV disease, as the diagnostic accuracy to detect metastatic disease is higher compared to the combination of computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS). In patients with a history of colorectal carcinoma, FDG-PET scanning is particularly effective in diagnosing recurrent disease, especially in those with a rising carcinoembryonic antigen without a suspect lesion on conventional imaging. Large series have indicated that the sensitivity and specificity for detecting recurrent colorectal carcinoma are in the range of 87%-100% and 66%-100%, respectively. Equally, FDG-PET has a high sensitivity (68%-96%) and specificity (78%-100%) in detecting pancreatic carcinoma in patients with a suspicious-looking pancreatic mass on CT scan. Lastly, we focus on the use of FDG-PET as a modality for early monitoring of treatment response in patients with gastrointestinal stromal cell tumours. Without doubt, future developments will further establish the diagnostic role of the FDG-PET scan in the care of patients with gastrointestinal cancers.Evaluation of cyst fluid CEA analysis in the diagnosis of mucinous cysts of the pancreas.Although cyst fluid carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA; > 192 ng/ml) is the preferred test for identifying mucinous pancreatic cysts, the data are more robust for mucinous cystic neoplasms (MCN) than for intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMN). The role of cyst fluid CEA as a marker for either malignancy or malignant progression is uncertain.All patients with pancreatic cysts who had undergone endoscopic ultrasound with cyst fluid CEA measurement between 2001 and 2009 were identified. Patient outcomes and pathology from operative resections were recorded.Two hundred sixty-seven patients were identified; pathological diagnosis was obtained in 97. Mucinous cysts were identified in 66 of 97 (68%): benign IPMN, n = 42; malignant IPMN, n = 10; benign MCN, n = 12; malignant MCN, n = 2. CEA > 192 ng/mL had a sensitivity and specificity of 73% and 65% for identifying mucinous cysts; cyst fluid CEA was not associated with malignancy (p = 0.85). One hundred seventy-eight patients were managed with an initial non-operative strategy. Eight (4%) developed radiographic changes necessitating surgery; pathology demonstrated seven benign mucinous cysts and one retention cyst. CEA was not associated with radiographic progression (p = 0.37).Cyst fluid CEA is a useful test for identifying mucinous cysts, including MCN and IPMN. In mucinous cysts, cyst fluid CEA is not associated with malignancy or radiographic progression.Intraductal papillary mucinous tumour of the pancreas: differentiation of malignancy and benignancy by CT.To retrospectively identify signs predictive of malignant intraductal papillary mucinous tumour (IPMT) of the pancreas on computed tomography (CT) images.Thirty-four benign and 21 malignant pancreatic IPMTs were evaluated. Preoperative helical CT images in these 55 cases of pathologically proven pancreatic IPMT were reviewed by two radiologists unaware of the histological grading. Tumour morphological types, locations, numbers and sizes of cystic lesions, maximum main pancreatic duct diameters, the presence of septa, mural nodule, wall thickening, and calcification in cysts, communication with the main pancreatic duct, peripancreatic haziness, protrusion of duodenal papilla, pancreatic atrophy, lymphadenopathy and distant metastasis were analysed using univariate and multivariate analysis.Main duct IPMTs were more likely to be malignant (71%) than branch duct (23%) or combined type IPMTs (28%; p=0.002). Among the branch duct type and combined types, large cystic lesion (p=0.018), the presence of a mural nodule (p=0.018), a thickened wall (p=0.009), and peripancreatic haziness (p=0.039) were found to predict malignancy.CT is helpful in the preoperative differentiation of malignant and benign pancreatic IPMT. The presence of a dilated main pancreatic duct, mural nodules, thickened wall and peripancreatic haziness may be used as independent predictive signs of malignancy.Usefulness of multidetector computed tomography for detecting protruding lesions in intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas in comparison with single-detector computed tomography and endoscopic ultrasonography.To retrospectively evaluate the usefulness of multidetector computed tomography (MDCT) with multiplanar reformations (MPRs) and curved planar reformations (CPRs) for detecting protruding lesions in intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas (IPMNs) as compared with single-detector CT (SDCT) and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS).Eighty-six patients with IPMNs were imaged either with SDCT (n = 52) or MDCT with MPRs/CPRs and EUS (n = 34). The diagnostic accuracy of each imaging modality for identifying protruding lesions was compared with histological samples.Among the patients in whom protruding lesions were histopathologically identified, the lesions were detected in 9 of the 33 patients subjected to SDCT (51.9% accuracy), in 17 of the 25 patients subjected to MDCT with MPRs and CPRs (76.5% accuracy), and in 21 of the 25 patients subjected to EUS (70.6% accuracy). Thus, significant difference was observed between MDCT and SDCT regarding accuracy (P < 0.05); however, no significant difference was seen between MDCT and EUS. Protruding lesions of less than 10 mm in height were better visualized with MDCT (53.3%) than with SDCT (13.0%; P < 0.05).Multidetector computed tomography proved more useful than SDCT and equivalent to EUS in detecting protruding lesions in IPMNs.Pancreatic adenocarcinoma versus chronic pancreatitis: differentiation with triple-phase helical CT.Chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic adenocarcinoma often show similar clinical and imaging appearances. This study aims to differentiate chronic pancreatitis from pancreatic adenocarcinoma by defining enhancement patterns in both pathologic conditions during triple-phase helical CT.The study included 42 patients with chronic pancreatitis and 85 patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma. CT images obtained according to protocol A (scan delays, 30, 60, and 150 s; 300 mg I/mL contrast material) or protocol B (scan delays, 40, 70, and 150 s; 370 mg I/mL contrast material) were retrospectively evaluated.Mean contrast enhancement value of normal pancreas peaked in the first phase (early-washout pattern) while that of chronic pancreatitis peaked in the second phase (delayed-washout pattern), and that of pancreatic adenocarcinoma gradually rose (increasing pattern) in both protocols. Diagnostic indices for pancreatic adenocarcinoma were 82.4% and 94.1% for sensitivity, 83% and 83% for specificity, 82.7% and 90.4% for accuracy in protocols A and B, respectively, when differentiation between chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic adenocarcinoma was performed based on time-attenuation curve patterns.Our results indicate that time attenuation curves obtained from triple-phase helical CT in protocol B provide useful information in differentiating chronic pancreatitis from pancreatic adenocarcinoma.MDCT imaging findings for characterization pancreatic cystic lesion: differentiation between benign and malignant pattern.The purpose of the present study was to determine the characteristic imaging findings for diagnosis of the benign or malignant nature of pancreatic cystic lesions by 64 slice multidetector computed tomography (MDCT) for further investigation or treatment.A retrospective study was performed in 33 patients with pancreatic cystic lesion who underwent 64 slice MDCT to characterize and establish the diagnosis. The patients were enrolled between January 2004 and March 2009. The MDCT scan of abdomen from patients with pancreatic cystic lesion was retrospectively evaluated by two gastrointestinal radiologists without knowledge of the patient's history, clinical data, and final diagnosis. Sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, PPV, and NPV of CT scan for discriminate benign and malignant pancreatic cystic lesion were calculated. Weighted-kappa statistics were used to estimate agreement between readers.Thirty-three patients with pancreatic cystic lesion were included in the present study. Benign pancreatic cystic lesion are pancreatic pseudocyst (n = 16), serous cystadenoma (n = 4) and benign intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms IPMN (n = 2). Premalignant and malignant pancreatic cystic tumor are mucinous cystic tumor (n = 5) and include solid pseudopapillary epithelial neoplasm of pancreas (n = 3) and malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms IPMN (n = 3). The final diagnosis was established either by pathological diagnosis (20 patients), EUS with FNA (11 patients) or F/U clinical and imaging findings (2 patients). Pseudopod sign is a helpful finding for diagnosis pancreatic pseudocyst (3/16) and not observed in other types pancreatic cystic lesions. Type of cyst (unilocular, multilocular microcystic, multilocular macrocystic and solid component) is the only finding that has statistical significance for differentiating between the benign and malignant groups (p < 0.005). The overall sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of 64-slice MDCT to discriminate benign and malignant pancreatic cystic lesion were 36.3%, 100% and 78.8%, respectively. In addition, the PPV and NPV were 100% and 75.9%, respectively.The 64 sliced MDCT is a noninvasive method that can be used for discriminating between benign and malignant pancreatic cystic lesions, which is an important finding for further investigation and proper treatment.[Fine needle aspiration of pancreatic masses. A study of 81 cases].Study of 81 cases. Fine Needle Aspiration Biopsy (FNAB) was performed under computerized thomography scan (CT) in 81 patients with documented pancreatic mass (54 with neoplasia and 27 with chronic pancreatitis). This procedure, when associated to the immediate cytological evaluation of the adequacy of the smears, permits to obtain 100% in sensibility, specificity and predictive value of positive cases. These results and the study of the literature confirm CT-guided FNAB of the pancreas as the procedure of choice to resolve problems of differential diagnosis in pancreatic masses.Impact of FDG-PET/MRI image fusion on the detection of pancreatic cancer.This study assessed the value of image fusion with (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in patients suspected of having pancreatic cancer.32 patients (12 women, 20 men; age 24-79 years; mean 56.6 years) were included. All patients underwent whole-body FDG-PET examinations and contrast-enhanced MRI. Image fusion used a semiautomatic voxel-based algorithm. Separate reading, side-by-side analysis and evaluation of fused PET/MRI images were performed. Results were correlated to histopathology (n = 30), or clinical follow-up (n = 2).15/32 patients had pancreas cancer and 17/32 patients benign disease. The sensitivity and specificity for cancer detection by FDG-PET were 93 and 41% for visual and 86 and 58% for semiquantitative analysis whereas MRI achieved 100 and 76% respectively. Topographical assignment of PET foci by image fusion was superior to side-by-side analysis in 11/39 (28%) foci (in 8/32 patients). However, a true impact on therapeutic strategy was observed only in 1/8 patients as the presence of multiple metastases, irresectable primaries or medical reasons for inoperability prevented a curative setting.Compared to side-by-side analysis, PET/MRI image fusion improves the anatomical assignment and interpretation of FDG foci. The therapeutic benefit for the patient however is limited in patients with multiple lesions or incurable primaries.Comparison of MRI and endoscopic ultrasound in the characterization of pancreatic cystic lesions.The purpose of this study was to compare the diagnostic performance of MRI and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) for the characterization of cystic pancreatic lesions and prediction of malignancy.Fifty patients (24 women and 26 men; average age, 57 years) underwent both MRI and EUS. All pancreatic lesions (21 cystic and 29 solid lesions) were proven by histopathologic analysis. Two radiologists retrospectively examined MR images, and a single gastroenterologist reviewed EUS images. The MRI and EUS characterizations of morphologic features of the cystic lesions and predictions of malignancy were evaluated. The prediction of malignancy was done by receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis.There was no difference between the ability of MRI and EUS to correctly classify lesions as cystic or solid (accuracy, 90-98% vs 88%; p > 0.05). There was no difference between the sensitivity of MRI and EUS for the characterization of septa (94.4% for MRI vs 77.8% for EUS), mural nodule (66.7-58.3% for MRI vs 58.3% for EUS), main pancreatic duct dilatation (92.9-85.7% for MRI vs 85.7% for EUS), and communication with main pancreatic duct (100% for MRI vs 88.9% for EUS). The area under ROC curve values for predicting malignancy showed no statistical significance (0.755-0.774 for MRI vs 0.769 for EUS; p > 0.894).MRI and EUS are comparable in the characterization of cystic pancreatic lesions and prediction of malignancy.PDX-1 mRNA expression in endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle cytoaspirate: perspectives in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration is routinely used in the diagnostic work up of pancreatic cancer but has a low sensitivity. Studies showed that Pancreatic Duodenal Homeobox-1 (PDX-1) is expressed in pancreatic cancer, which is associated with a worse prognosis. We aimed to verify whether the assessment of PDX-1 in endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration samples may be helpful for the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.mRNA of 54 pancreatic cancer and 25 cystic lesions was extracted. PDX-1 expression was assessed by Real-Time PCR.In all but two patients with pancreatic cancer, PDX-1 was expressed and was found positive in 7 patients with pancreatic cancer in which cytology was negative. The positivity was associated with a probability of 0.98 (95% CI 0.90-1.00) of having cancer and the negativity with one of 0.08 (95% CI 0.01-0.27). The probability of cancer rose to 1.00 (95% CI 0.97-1.00) for patients positive to both PDX-1 and cytology and fell to 0.0 (95% CI 0.00-0.15) in patients negative for both.PDX-1mRNA is detectable in samples of pancreatic cancer. Its quantification may be helpful to improve the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.EUS and/or EUS-guided FNA in patients with CT and/or magnetic resonance imaging findings of enlarged pancreatic head or dilated pancreatic duct with or without a dilated common bile duct.Incidental findings of an enlarged head of pancreas (HOP) or dilated pancreatic duct (PD) with or without a dilated common bile duct (CBD) on CT or magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), in patients without obstructive jaundice, raise suspicion for a pancreatic neoplasm, but their clinical significance has not been established.To determine the prevalence of pancreatic neoplasm in this patient group.Retrospective analysis of a prospective database.Tertiary-care university hospital.Patients without obstructive jaundice at initial presentation, who underwent EUS and/or EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) for an abnormal CT and/or MRI with an enlarged HOP (n = 67) or a PD with or without a dilated CBD (n = 43). The final diagnosis was based on definitive cytology, surgical pathology, and clinical follow-up.An EUS examination was performed by using a radial echoendoscopy followed by a linear echoendoscopy, if a focal pancreatic lesion was identified. Fine-needle aspirates were stained with Diff-Quik and Papanicolaou's methods, and were immediately assessed by an attending cytopathologist.(1) The prevalence of pancreatic neoplasms and (2) performance characteristics of EUS-FNA for identifying malignant neoplasm, in this patient group.In 110 study patients, the final diagnosis included adenocarcinoma (n = 7), pancreatic intraepithelial neoplasia (n = 1), neuroendocrine tumor (n = 1), tumor metastasis (n = 1), and benign cyst (n = 3). Thirty-two patients had EUS evidence of chronic pancreatitis, and, in the remaining 65 patients, the pancreas was normal. The accuracy of EUS and EUS-FNA for diagnosing pancreatic neoplasm in these patients was 99.1%, with 88.8% sensitivity, 100% specificity, 99% negative predicative value, and 100% positive predictive value.A retrospective design and surgical confirmation in only a small number of study patients.A pancreatic neoplasm is seen in a clinically significant number of patients with "enlarged HOP" or "dilated PD with or without a dilated CBD" but without obstructive jaundice. EUS-FNA seems highly accurate for diagnosing pancreatic neoplasm in these patients.Accuracy of 18F-FDG PET/CT, Multidetector CT, and MR Imaging in the Diagnosis of Pancreatic Cysts: A Prospective Single-Center Study.Accurate diagnosis of the nature of pancreatic cysts is challenging but more important than ever, in part because of the increasing number of incidental cystic findings in the pancreas. Preliminary data suggest that (18)F-FDG PET/CT may have a significant influence on clinical decision making, although its role is still evolving. Our aim was to prospectively compare the accuracy of combined (18)F-FDG PET and contrast-enhanced CT ((18)F-FDG PET/CT), multidetector CT (MDCT), and MR imaging in differentiating malignant from benign pancreatic cysts.Thirty-one consecutive patients with pancreatic cysts were enrolled in the study. They underwent a protocol including (18)F-FDG PET/CT, MDCT, and MR imaging combined with MR cholangiopancreatography, all of which were evaluated in a masked manner. The findings were confirmed macroscopically at surgery or histopathologic analysis (n = 22) or at follow-up (n = 9).Of the 31 patients, 6 had malignant and 25 had benign lesions. The diagnostic accuracy was 94% for (18)F-FDG PET/CT, compared with 77% and 87% for MDCT (P < 0.05) and MR imaging, respectively. (18)F-FDG PET/CT had a negative predictive value of 100% and a positive predictive value of 75% for pancreatic cysts. The maximum standardized uptake value was significantly higher in malignant (7.4 ± 2.6) than in benign lesions (2.4 ± 0.8) (P < 0.05). When the maximum standardized uptake value was set at 3.6, the sensitivity and specificity were 100% and 88%, respectively. Furthermore, when compared with MDCT and MR imaging, respectively, (18)F-FDG PET/CT altered the clinical management of 5 and 3 patients, respectively.(18)F-FDG PET/CT is an accurate imaging modality for differentiating between benign and malignant pancreatic cysts. We recommend the use of (18)F-FDG PET/CT in the evaluation of diagnostically challenging pancreatic cysts.Differentiation between benign and malignant solid pseudopapillary tumor of the pancreas by MDCT.The purpose of this study was to determine if characteristic features on computed tomographic and (or) magnetic resonance imaging can differentiate benign and malignant solid pseudopapillary neoplasms (SPN).A total of 82 pathologically diagnosed SPN patients were included. CT and MRI were reviewed by 3 radiologists. Each tumor was analyzed through the clinical and imaging features.The highest occurrence of malignant SPN was observed in the group of patients (11-19 years old) followed by the group of patients (50-65 years old). When the tumor was located in the tail and the size was equal or larger than 6.0 cm, the positive and predictive value, the predictive value, sensitivity and specificity for a malignant SPN were 61.5%, 100%, 100% and 78.6%, respectively. Presence of complete encapsulation was more frequent in benign SPNs, but focal discontinuity in the malignant SPNs. Amorphous or scattered calcifications, all near-solid tumors and presence of upstream pancreatic ductal was found in the benign SPNs.A focal discontinuity of the capsule, large tumor size (>6.0 cm) and a pancreatic tail location may suggest malignancy of SPN. In contrast, tumors with amorphous or scattered calcifications, and all near-solid tumors may be indicative of benignancy. Age (less than 20 or more than 50 years old) is a possible risk factor of SPN. In comparison to other pancreatic neoplasms, such as ductal adenocarcinoma, a complete/incomplete pseudo-capsule, without upstream pancreatic duct dilatation and lymph nodes metastasis, and the presence of internal calcification and hemorrhage are more likely SPN.Clinical usefulness of KRAS mutational analysis in the diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma by means of endosonography-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy.To establish the usefulness of KRAS mutational analysis in the diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma by comparing this technique with conventional cytology in aspirates obtained by endosonography-guided fine-needle aspiration.All consecutive patients with pancreatic focal lesions undergoing endosonography-guided fine-needle aspiration were included. Samples were obtained with the concurrence of an attendant cytopathologist. Detection of codon-12 KRAS mutations was performed by the restriction fragment length polymorphism-polymerase chain reaction method. The effectiveness of conventional cytology, KRAS mutational analysis and their combination was established with respect to the definitive diagnosis. A cost-effectiveness analysis was also performed.Thirty-three patients had pancreatic adenocarcinoma and 24 patients had other lesions. A total of 136 samples was obtained. In patients in whom specimens were adequate (93% for cytology; 100% for mutational analysis), the specificity of both techniques was 100%, whereas the sensitivity favoured cytology (97% vs. 73%). When inadequate samples were considered as misdiagnosed, a combination of both techniques reached the highest overall accuracy (cytology, 91%; mutational analysis, 84%; combination of both, 98%).Cytology from aspirates obtained by endosonography-guided fine-needle aspiration is the most precise single technique for the diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma. However, when adequate specimens are not available to reach a cytological diagnosis, the addition of KRAS mutational analysis represents the best strategy.Determination of malignant and invasive predictors in branch duct type intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas: a suggested scoring formula.Prediction of malignancy or invasiveness of branch duct type intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (Br-IPMN) is difficult, and proper treatment strategy has not been well established. The authors investigated the characteristics of Br-IPMN and explored its malignancy or invasiveness predicting factors to suggest a scoring formula for predicting pathologic results. From 1994 to 2008, 237 patients who were diagnosed as Br-IPMN at 11 tertiary referral centers in Korea were retrospectively reviewed. The patients' mean age was 63.1 ± 9.2 yr. One hundred ninty-eight (83.5%) patients had nonmalignant IPMN (81 adenoma, 117 borderline atypia), and 39 (16.5%) had malignant IPMN (13 carcinoma in situ, 26 invasive carcinoma). Cyst size and mural nodule were malignancy determining factors by multivariate analysis. Elevated CEA, cyst size and mural nodule were factors determining invasiveness by multivariate analysis. Using the regression coefficient for significant predictors on multivariate analysis, we constructed a malignancy-predicting scoring formula: 22.4 (mural nodule [0 or 1]) + 0.5 (cyst size [mm]). In invasive IPMN, the formula was expressed as invasiveness-predicting score = 36.6 (mural nodule [0 or 1]) + 32.2 (elevated serum CEA [0 or 1]) + 0.6 (cyst size [mm]). Here we present a scoring formula for prediction of malignancy or invasiveness of Br-IPMN which can be used to determine a proper treatment strategy.Diagnostic performance of MRI and EUS in the differentiation of benign from malignant pancreatic cyst and cyst communication with the main duct.To assess the diagnostic ability of MRI and EUS for differentiating benign from malignant pancreatic cyst focusing on cyst communication with pancreatic duct.During 44 months, we performed MRI on 65 pancreatic cysts. Among them, 36 patients had confirmed cyst communication with duct by ERCP or surgery and 39 patients underwent EUS. Fifty-one had proven by surgery or aspiration. Among them, 36 had confirmed malignant cysts. Two radiologists independently graded cyst communication with duct and the likelihood of malignancy. When the readers' interpretations differed, third opinion was obtained. They also measured the size of cyst and main duct. The diagnostic performance was analyzed using the ROC curve. The Mann-Whitney U test and κ statistics were used to determine interobserver agreement.The Az of MRI and EUS for determining diagnostic performance regarding the cyst communication with duct, were 0.931 and 0.930, without statistically difference (p=0.6). Interobserver agreement was excellent (κ=0.81) on MRI and substantial (κ=0.69) on EUS. The Az of MRI and EUS for assessing diagnostic performance to differentiate malignant from benign cyst, was 0.902 and 0.923, without statistically difference (p=0.587). Interobserver agreement was excellent (κ=0.81) on MRI and moderate (κ=0.47) on EUS. The mean cyst size (3.98 cm+2.74: 3.17 cm+1.26, p=0.327) and the duct size (5.20 mm+3.22: 4.39 mm+4.12, p=0.227) showed no statistically difference between malignant and benign cysts.MRI and EUS can accurately assess pancreatic cyst communication with duct and are very useful for obtaining a differential diagnosis of malignant cyst versus benign pancreatic cyst.Diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer by endoscopic ultrasound.The aim of this study was to evaluate the usefulness of and problems associated with endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the diagnosis and pre-operative staging of pancreatic cancer. 96 patients suspected of having pancreatic cancer were pre-operatively examined with EUS. 37 of these 96 patients had pancreatic cancer. Results of the EUS imaging were compared with findings of histology and/or surgery, and the patient's clinical course. The sensitivity and specificity of EUS for diagnosing pancreatic cancer were 89% and 97%, respectively. EUS had excellent sensitivity regardless of tumour size or location. EUS was accurate (90%) in determining tumour size in pancreatic cancers less than 3 cm in maximum diameter, but not for tumours greater than 3 cm (30%). The accuracy of tumour (T) and nodal (N) staging were 64% and 50%, respectively. EUS is a promising method for the early diagnosis and pre-operative staging of pancreatic cancers, but requires further refinement.[Endosonographically controlled fine needle aspiration cytology--indications and results in routine diagnosis].The usefulness and clinical utility of routine EUS-guided fine needle aspiration cytology (FNA) in the diagnosis of lesions adjacent to the upper gastrointestinal tract was prospectively studied.EUS/FNA was performed in 122 patients for 125 lesions: Mediastinal lymph nodes (n = 56), pancreatic lesions (n = 45), paragastric masses (n = 12), submucosal tumors (n = 4) and small hepatic lesions (n = 2) were successfully punctured for cytological diagnosis.Adequate material was gained in 119 out of 125 punctures (95%). Overall sensitivity, specifity, positive and negative predictive value were 90%, 98%, 98% and 89%. Results of EUS/FNA in mediastinal lymph nodes were superior (95%, 100%, 100%, 90%) to those in pancreatic lesions (80%, 100%, 100%, 80%). In paragastric masses sensitivity was 100% whereas specifity was only 67%--due to one false-positive result. Out of four submucosal tumors diagnosis was revealed in three. Two liver metastasis were successfully punctured. 35 out of 56 mediastinal nodes showed malignancy. 27 metastases of lung-, three of gastric-, two of renal cancer and three Non-Hodgkins's lymphoma were diagnosed. The cytological results of 45 pancreatic lesions showed cancer in 19 and chronic inflammation in 21, two abscesses and three benign cysts. There were no complications. 37 patients were treated on outpatient's basis.EUS-guided FNA is an accurate and safe technique to sample cytology from lesions adjacent to the wall of the upper gastrointestinal tract. New indications may be established for the diagnosis of lung cancer or metastases of other spreading out into the mediastinum or the celiac axis.EUS-guided FNA diagnostic yield of malignancy in solid pancreatic masses: a benchmark for quality performance measurement.The diagnostic yield of EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) of solid pancreatic masses is a potential benchmark for EUS-FNA quality, because the majority of EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses should be diagnostic for malignancy.To determine the cytologic diagnostic rate of malignancy in EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses and to determine if variability exists among endoscopists and centers.Multicenter retrospective study.EUS centers provided cytology reports for all EUS-FNAs of solid, noncystic, >or=10-mm-diameter, solid pancreatic masses during a 1-year period.Cytology diagnostic of pancreatic malignancy.A total of 1075 patients underwent EUS-FNA at 21 centers (81% academic) with 41 endoscopists. The median number of EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses performed during the year per center was 46 (range, 4-177) and per endoscopist was 19 (range, 1-97). The mean mass dimensions were 32 x 27 mm, with 73% located in the head. The mean number of passes was 3.5. Of the centers, 90% used immediate cytologic evaluation. The overall diagnostic rate of malignancy was 71%, 95% confidence interval 0.69%-0.74%, with 5% suspicious for malignancy, 6% atypical cells, and 18% negative for malignancy. The median diagnostic rate per center was 78% (range, 39%-93%; 1st quartile, 61%) and per endoscopist was 75% (range, 0%-100%; 1st quartile, 52%).Retrospective study, participation bias, and varying chronic pancreatitis prevalence.(1) EUS-FNA cytology was diagnostic of malignancy in 71% of solid pancreatic masses and (2) endoscopists with a final cytologic diagnosis rate of malignancy for EUS-FNA of solid masses that was less than 52% were in the lowest quartile and should evaluate reasons for their low yield.Impact of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle biopsy for diagnosis of pancreatic masses.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of histological evaluation of pancreatic tissue samples obtained by a modified method for recovering and processing the endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) material in the differential diagnosis of pancreatic solid masses.Sixty-two consecutive patients with pancreatic masses were prospectively studied. EUS was performed by the linear scanning Pentax FG-38UX echoendoscope. Three FNAs (22G needle) were carried out during each procedure. The materials obtained with first and second punctures were processed for cytological study. Materials of the third puncture were recovered into 10% formol solution by careful injection of saline solution through the needle, and processed for histological study.Length of the core specimen obtained for histological analysis was 6.5 +/- 5.3 mm (range 1-22 mm). Cytological and histological samples were considered as adequate in 51 (82.3%) and 52 cases (83.9%), respectively. Overall sensitivity of both pancreatic cytology and histology for diagnosis of malignancy was 68.4%. Contrary to cytology, histology was able to diagnose tumours other than adenocarcinomas, and all cases of inflammatory masses. Combination of cytology and histology allowed obtaining an adequate sample in 56 cases (90.3%), with a global sensitivity of 84.21%, specificity of 100% and an overall accuracy of 90.32%. The complication rate was 1.6%.Adequate pancreatic core specimens for histological examination can be obtained by EUS-guided FNA. This technique is mainly useful for the diagnosis of different types of pancreatic tumours and evaluation of benign diseases.Characterization of focal pancreatic lesions using normalized apparent diffusion coefficient at 1.5-Tesla: preliminary experience.To compare the capabilities of apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC) and normalized ADC using the pancreatic parenchyma as reference organ in the characterization of focal pancreatic lesions.Thirty-six patients with focal pancreatic lesions (malignant, n=18; benign tumors, n=10; focal pancreatitis, n=8) underwent diffusion-weighted MR imaging (DWI) at 1.5-Tesla using 3 b values (b=0, 400, 800 s/mm(2)). Lesion ADC and normalized lesion ADC (defined as the ratio of lesion ADC to apparently normal adjacent pancreas) were compared between lesion types using nonparametric tests.Significant differences in ADC values were found between malignant (1.150 × 10(-3)mm(2)/s) and benign tumors (2.493 × 10(-3)mm(2)/s) (P=0.004) and between benign tumors and mass-forming pancreatitis (1.160 × 10(-3)mm(2)/s) (P=0.0005) but not between malignant tumors and mass-forming pancreatitis (P=0.1092). Using normalized ADC, significant differences were found between malignant tumors (0.933 × 10(-3)mm(2)/s), benign tumors (1.807 × 10(-3)mm(2)/s) and mass-forming pancreatitis (0.839 × 10(-3)mm(2)/s) (P<0.0001).Our preliminary results suggest that normalizing ADC of focal pancreatic lesions with ADC of apparently normal adjacent pancreatic parenchyma provides higher degrees of characterization of focal pancreatic lesions than the conventional ADC does.Cystic tumors of the pancreas: evaluation by ultrasonography and computed tomography.The personal series of 30 cystic tumors of the pancreas [12 serous cystic tumors (SCT) and 18 mucinous cystic tumors (MCT)] is presented. All neoplasms were evaluated with ultrasonography (US) 28 of 30 with computed tomography (CT); the tumoral histotype could be correctly defined in 73% of cases (seven of 12 SCT and 15 of 18 MCT). Percutaneous fine-needle aspiration (FNA) with diagnostic aims (preparation of cytological smears and/or biochemical assays) was performed in only 10 of 30 cases, yielding a 100% sensitivity; on the whole, the combined use of imaging modalities and FNA allowed correct characterization of the cystic tumors in 27 of 30 cases (90%). The usefulness of a precise diagnostic workup of these neoplasms is emphasized, due to their prognostic and therapeutic outcome.Surgical management of intraductal papillary mucinous tumor of the pancreas.Intraductal papillary mucinous tumor (IPMT) is a type of pancreatic cystic neoplasm. IPMT consists of intraductal papillary mucinous adenoma (benign IPMT) and intraductal papillary mucinous carcinoma (malignant IPMT). Preoperative diagnosis of malignancy is difficult; the invasiveness and metastatic character are not well known. The purpose of the study was to evaluate the optimal diagnostic and therapeutic strategy of IPMT.Medical charts of 38 patients with final diagnosis of IPMT in Kyoto University Hospital were retrospectively reviewed. Preoperative imaging, mode of operation, and clinical and histopathologic findings were analyzed.In 38 IPMTs, imaging of localization was correct in 82% by computed tomography, 90% by ultrasonography, 70% by endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, 100% by magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography, and 100% by endoscopic ultrasonography. Evaluation of malignancy by endoscopic ultrasonography resulted in sensitivity and specificity of 81% and 78%, respectively. Pylorus-preserving pancreaticoduodenectomy was preferably performed in 20 of 38 patients with IPMT. Twenty-two patients had histologically malignant disease. Half of them had an invasive component in the adjacent stroma. One case of malignant IPMT showed lymph node metastasis, and the patient had no recurrence after pancreaticoduodenectomy with regional lymphadenectomy. No case was diagnosed as margin positive; however, 27% showed a dysplasia with atypia in the epithelial cells of the cut edge of the pancreas. One patient with negative atypia at the cut edge of the pancreas developed a recurrent tumor in the remnant pancreas.The preoperative diagnosis of malignancy is difficult, and 50% of malignant IPMT showed an invasive component. Thus, radical resection of the pancreas with regional lymph node dissection should be the choice of treatment. Lymph node metastasis and intraductal distant invasion should be carefully managed in the surgical treatment of these lesions.Endosonographically guided transduodenal and transgastral fine-needle aspiration puncture of focal pancreatic lesions.Mass lesions of the pancreas can be clearly visualized by endoscopic ultrasonography. For the differentiation of benign from malignant mass lesions, however, cytological examination is still recommended. As transcutaneous fine-needle biopsies have a limited diagnostic value, we have evaluated the efficiency of transmural (trangastral, transduodenal) endosonographically guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-guided FNA) puncture for cytological confirmation of such pancreatic mass lesions. EUS-guided FNA puncture was performed in 11 patients with focal pancreatic solid lesions. In 4 patients a malignant mass lesion and in 2 patients a benign lesion were correctly identified by EUS-guided FNA puncture, while in 4 patients a false benign diagnosis was established and in 1 patient with a malignant mass lesion a sufficient cytological sample could not be obtained. Histological confirmation or rejection of the cytological diagnosis gained by EUS-guided FNA puncture was obtained in all patients by surgical biopsy or resection. It is concluded that transmural EUS-guided FNA puncture-with the application of a curved-array EUS transducer scanning parallel to the axis of the endoscope-is a new approach to the cytological diagnosis of pancreatic mass lesions. However, the of flexible puncture needles with a short needle tip-destined for multiple use-results in a considerable amount of false-negative diagnoses, as the needle tip frequently can only be advanced into the margin of the lesion. New prototypes of aspiration needles with an extending steel are presently under study for improved transmural EUS-guided FNA puncture.Main pancreatic duct intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms: accuracy of MR imaging in differentiation between benign and malignant tumors compared with histopathologic analysis.To retrospectively determine the accuracy of magnetic resonance (MR) imaging combined with MR cholangiopancreatography (CP) in differentiating benign from malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) involving the main pancreatic duct (MPD), with histopathologic analysis as the reference standard.The informed consent requirement was waived for this institutional review board-approved study. A total of 51 patients with histopathologically proved IPMNs (MPD IPMN, n = 29; mixed type IPMN, n = 22), underwent MR imaging, MR CP, and surgery, with a mean interval of 2.6 months between MR examination and surgery. Qualitative image analysis included assessment of the site of MPD dilatation (head of the pancreas, body and/or tail of the pancreas, or diffuse), presence or absence of duct wall nodules, and contrast enhancement of the MPD walls. Quantitative image analysis included measurement of the maximum diameter of the MPD. A comparison of adenomas and borderline IPMNs with cancerous IPMNs was performed with the Student t test or the Mann-Whitney U test for continuous variables.At histopathologic analysis, 27 IPMNs were classified as carcinomas; 13, as borderline tumors; and 11, as adenomas. MPD wall nodules were observed in 16 carcinomas involving the MPD and one adenoma or borderline neoplasm (P < .00001). Duct wall enhancement was observed in 20 MPD or mixed type carcinomas and five adenomas or borderline neoplasms (P = .0001). The median maximal diameter of the MPD was 18 mm in malignant MPD or mixed type IPMNs and 11 mm in benign borderline IPMNs (P = .038). No significant difference in the overall 5-year survival rate of patients with MPD IPMNs and those with mixed type IPMNs was observed (P = .813).Duct wall nodules and enhancement of the MPD walls are signs of malignant MPD or mixed type IPMNs.http://radiology.rsna.org/lookup/suppl/doi:10.1148/radiol.2531080604/-/DC1.A nine year retrospective analysis of resectable pancreatic cancer at the National Cancer Center Hospital in Tokyo: clues to diagnosis and diagnostic assessment.A nine year retrospective survey was carried out at the National Cancer Center Hospital in order to define the diagnostic clues and most suitable diagnostic assessment in resectable pancreatic cancer patients. Forty six cases were detected (27 pancreatic head cancers, 19 pancreatic body and tail cancers). There were 8, 26, 3 and 9 cases of t1, t2, t3 and t4 tumour size cancers, respectively. Abdominal pain and/or discomfort and back pain were the most common initial symptoms and chief complaints. Jaundice was present only in pancreatic head cancer cases. Abnormal GTT and CA 19-9 were the biochemical tests most commonly found abnormal, irrespective of tumour size. ERCP followed by US and CT were the most accurate technical tests. The best care toward the awareness of the initial symptoms needs to be followed, as a first choice, by a proper biochemical (CA 19-9, GTT) and technical (US, ERCP, CT) assessment in the hope of identifying those patients whose prognosis might be improved by an early operation.Non-operative differentiation between pancreatic cancer and chronic pancreatitis.Eighty-five of 186 patients investigated for suspected pancreatic cancer had an unequivocal final diagnosis of either pancreatic cancer (58 patients) or chronic pancreatitis (27 patients). They had been studied prospectively using ultrasonography, computerized tomography, radionuclide scanning, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), selective celiac and superior mesenteric angiography, duodenal drainage studies, cytologic studies, serum carcinoembryonic antigen assay, and pancreatic oncofetal antigen assay, The results were compared to determine which test would most frequently and reliably differentiate between pancreatic cancer and pancreatitis in a patient believed to have one or other disease. Criteria for interpreting results, first for highest rate of correct diagnoses, and second for highest accuracy were derived. Applying these criteria, ultrasonography achieved the highest rate of correct diagnoses (97% of patients diagnosed with 84% accuracy). ERCP, duodenal drainage studies, and cytology were the most accurate tests ((86% accuracy each test) but, with this accuracy, ERCP most frequently gave a diagnosis (diagnosis rate: ERCP--70%, duodenal drainage--32%, cytology--35%). The results suggest that ultrasonography is the best noninvasive test, and that a combination of ERCP, pancreatic juice assay and cytology in a single procedure may prove to be the best discriminating investigation.Neural network analysis of EUS images to differentiate between pancreatic malignancy and pancreatitis.The differentiation of focal pancreatitis and pancreatic adenocarcinoma is problematic and often resolved only by pancreaticoduodenectomy. EUS is the most sensitive imaging modality for both conditions, yet ultrasonic criteria for distinguishing the two have not been described and differentiation remains difficult. The aims of this study were to develop a self-learning computer program that can analyze EUS images and differentiate malignancy from pancreatitis, and to compare results obtained with this system with EUS interpretation by experienced endosonographers.Twenty-one patients with pancreatic cancer and 14 with focal pancreatitis were included. The diagnosis was confirmed histologically in all cases and each patient had undergone EUS. A single EUS image from each procedure was used for computer analysis. The results were compared with the EUS diagnosis reported at the actual procedure as well that of an endosonographer who reviewed videotapes of the procedures.The software program differentiated focal pancreatitis from malignancy with a maximal 89% accuracy. With sensitivity set at 100% for malignancy, the program was 50% specific and accuracy was 80%. Sensitivity and accuracy of the endosonographer's impression at the time of EUS were, respectively, 89% and 85%. A sensitivity of 73% and accuracy of 83% were achieved with blinded interpretation of EUS videotapes.Analysis of EUS images with computer software programs is feasible and compares favorably with human interpretation. The application of this technology to EUS and other imaging scenarios could be a useful adjunct to diagnostic endoscopy and warrants further investigation.Pancreatic cystic neoplasms: predictors of malignant behavior and management.Pancreatic cystic neoplasms are being increasingly identified with the widespread use of advanced imaging techniques. In the absence of a good radiologic or pathologic test to preoperatively determine the dianosis, clinical characteristics might be helpful. The objectives of this analysis were to define the incidence and predictors of malignancy in pancreatic cysts.Patients with true pancreatic cysts who were treated at our institution were included. Patients with documented pseudocysts were excluded. Demographic data, clinical manifestations, radiological, surgical, and pathological records of those patients were reviewed.Eighty-one patients had true pancreatic cyst. The mean age was 47 ± 15.5 years. There were 28.4% serous cystadenoma, 21% mucinous cystadenoma, 6.2% intraductal papillary tumors, 8.6% solid pseudopapillary tumors, 1.2% neuroendocrinal tumor, 3.7% ductal adenocarcinoma, and 30.9% mucinous cystadenocarcinoma. Malignancy was significantly associated with men (P = 0.04), older age (0.0001), cysts larger than 3 cm in diameter (P = 0.001), presence of solid component (P = 0.0001), and cyst wall thickening (P = 0.0001). The majority of patients with malignancy were symptomatic (26/28, 92.9%). The symptoms that correlated with malignancy included abdominal pain (P = 0.04) and weight loss (P = 0.0001). Surgical procedures were based on the location and extension of the lesion.The most common pancreatic cysts were serous and mucinous cysts. These tumors were more common in females. Old age, male gender, large tumor, presence of solid component, wall thickness, and presence of symptoms may predict malignancy in the cyst.Prediction of malignancy in cystic neoplasms of the pancreas: a population-based cohort study.Pancreatic cystic neoplasms (PCNs) are being detected with increased frequency. The aims of this study were to determine the incidence of malignancy and develop an imaging-based system for prediction of malignancy in PCN.We conducted a retrospective cohort study of patients ≥18 years of age with confirmed PCN from January 2005 to December 2010 in a community-based integrated care setting in Southern California. Patients with history of acute or chronic pancreatitis were excluded. Malignancy diagnosed within 3 months of cyst diagnosis was considered as pre-existing. Subsequent incidence of malignancy during surveillance was calculated based on person-time at risk. Age- and gender-adjusted standardized incidence ratio (SIR) was calculated with the non-cyst reference population. Recursive partitioning was used to develop a risk prediction model based on cyst imaging features.We identified 1,815 patients with confirmed PCN. A total of 53 (2.9%) of patients were diagnosed with cyst-related malignancy during the study period. The surveillance cohort consisted of 1,735 patients with median follow-up of 23.4 months. Incidence of malignancy was 0.4% per year during surveillance. The overall age- and gender-adjusted SIR for pancreatic malignancy was 35.0 (95% confidence level 26.6, 46.0). Using recursive partitioning, we stratified patients into low (<1%), intermediate (1-5%), and high (9-14%) risk of harboring malignant PCN based on four cross-sectional imaging features: size, pancreatic duct dilatation, septations with calcification as well as growth. Area under the receiver operator characteristic curve for the prediction model was 0.822 (training) and 0.808 (testing).Risk of pancreatic malignancy was lower than previous reports from surgical series but was still significantly higher than the reference population. A risk stratification system based on established imaging criteria may help guide future management decisions for patients with PCN.Contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration in the diagnosis of solid pancreatic lesions: a retrospective study.The negative predictive value of endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine needle aspiration for the diagnosis of solid pancreatic lesions remains low, and the biopsy specimens are sometimes inadequate for appropriate pathological diagnosis.To evaluate the usefulness of a novel method of contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration for the differential diagnosis and adequate sampling of solid pancreatic lesions.Patients with a diagnosis of solid pancreatic lesions who underwent fine-needle aspiration guided by contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasonography or by endoscopic ultrasonography from October 2010 to July 2013 were retrospectively identified and classified into the CH-EUS or EUS group, respectively. Surgical pathology and/or follow-up results were defined as the final diagnosis. Operating characteristics and adequacy of biopsy specimens by fine-needle aspiration were compared between the two groups.Operating characteristics for contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration in solid pancreatic lesions were as follows: area under the curve = 0.908, sensitivity = 81.6%, specificity = 100%, positive predictive value = 100%, negative predictive value = 74.1%, and accuracy = 87.9%. The percentage of adequate biopsy specimens in the CH-EUS group (96.6%) was greater than that in the EUS group (86.7%).Simultaneous contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasonography during fine-needle aspiration is useful for improving the diagnostic yield and adequate sampling of solid pancreatic lesions.Comparison between CT and CEUS in the diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma.The aim of this study is to compare CEUS and MDCT features of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma in relation to tumor size.All patients with pathological diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma and studied by means of CEUS and MDCT were enrolled in this study. Two radiologists evaluated tumor size, site and imaging appearance. Patients in which at least one method yielded a positive result were divided into 4 groups on the basis of lesion size. For each dimensional category, sensitivity of the two imaging methods was calculated and compared using McNemar test.One hundred thirty-three patients were included in this study. In 9 of 133 patients neither MDCT nor US/CEUS could identify the lesion, while in 9 of 133 patients only MDCT and in 13 of 133 only US/CEUS could identify the lesion. In the remaining 102 patients, both MDCT and US/CEUS yielded a positive result. US/CEUS sensitivity was 86.47% while MDCT sensitivity was 83.58%, with no statistically significant difference (p = 0.523). For lesions smaller than 2 cm US/CEUS had a 100% sensitivity, while MDCT had a 73.33% sensitivity with no statistically significant difference (p = 0.125). For lesions between 2.1 and 3 cm US/CEUS had a sensitivity of 95.35%, while MDCT had a sensitivity of 83.72% with no statistically significant difference (p = 0.180). For lesions between 3.1 and 4 cm, US/CEUS had a sensitivity of 87.88%, while MDCT had a sensitivity of 93.94% with no statistically significant difference (p = 0.688). For lesions larger than 4 cm US/CEUS, had a sensitivity of 90.91%, while MDCT had a sensitivity of 100% with no statistically significant difference (p = 0.250).US/CEUS sensitivity in diagnosing pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma is adequate and does not statistically differ from that of MDCT. US/CEUS sensitivity seems to be higher for small and medium lesions, while MDCT sensitivity is higher for large lesions. By combining both the imaging methods a higher accuracy in diagnosing pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma can be expected.Clinical usefulness of endoscopic ultrasonography with or without fine needle aspiration in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic carcinoma.The aims of this study was to show the accuracy and clinical usefulness of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) with EUS-guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer not obvious in computed tomographic (CT) scan abdomen imaging.Five male patients were evaluated; 4 presented with obstructive jaundice and 1 had unexplained loss of weight. The mean age was 66 years (range, 40 to 77). All had CT scan abdomen imaging which did not show any obvious pancreatic tumour. EUS with FNA was done for all cases when indicated. Surgical findings, if any, were obtained and compared to EUS findings.EUS easily detected the pancreatic tumour in all 5 cases. The tumour sizes detected ranged from 27 to 40 mm in diameter. These corresponded fairly accurately with that of surgical findings for all 3 who had surgery. EUS reported 3 cases with pathological lymph node involvement. All 5 cases were confirmed by FNA or surgery. EUS was also accurate in 4 cases, which reported the absence of portal vein or superior mesenteric vein invasion. Surgical documentation could not verify the fifth case. There were no complications at all from the EUS with/without FNA.This case series showed that EUS with/without FNA appears to be useful and safe in diagnosing and staging pancreatic head tumours not detectable by CT scanning.Is combined 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography superior to positron emission tomography or computed tomography alone for diagnosis, staging and restaging of pancreatic lesions?To evaluate whether combined 18F-FDG PET/CT has an additive value over 18F-FDG-PET or CT alone for diagnosis, staging and restaging of pancreatic lesions.Forty-six consecutive patients (23 women, 23 men; median age 62.5 years) underwent FDG-PET/CT. Analysis of PET, CT and fused PET/CT images was performed by 2 readers. Patients were divided into 2 groups: diagnosis and staging of primary tumours (n=34) and restaging: screening for recurrent or progressive pancreatic cancer (n=12). Accuracy analysis was performed lesion-by-lesion and patient-by-patient. Results were correlated with histopathology or clinical follow-up.Ninety-five foci were identified on PET, 140 lesions on CT and 119 on PET/CT. Thirty-four lesions were defined as 'definitely pathologic' and localised in pancreas, liver, lung or bone by all 3 techniques with equal certainty. In 11 patients malignancy was ruled out with the highest certainty by PET/CT. All 3 modalities made 2 false positive diagnoses of malignancy and missed metastases or vascular ingrowth in 7 patients. The accuracy rate of PET/CT (91.2%) for diagnosis of primary pancreatic lesions is higher compared to CT (88.2%) and PET alone (82.3%). Also for locoregional staging PET/CT has a higher accuracy rate (85.3%) compared to CT (83.8%) and PET (79.4%). When used for restaging, sensitivity (90.0%) and accuracy rate (91.6%) were highest for PET and PET/CT. CT had a lower sensitivity (80.0%).Topographical assignment of 'spots' with high FDG uptake is superior with PET/CT compared to PET alone. Fused PET/CT has a slightly higher sensitivity and accuracy rate for diagnosis and locoregional staging of primary pancreatic lesions compared to CT alone. PET and PET/CT perform equally well in screening for recurrent or progressive pancreatic cancer, with high accuracy. Due to its unlimited access, lower radiation exposure and cost, multidetector row CT remains the imaging technique of choice for diagnosis, staging and screening for recurrent pancreatic cancer.Fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography in pancreatic cancer: an unsolved problem.The aim of this study was to examine the significance and problems of 2-[fluorine-18]-2-deoxy-d-glucose (FDG) positron emission tomography (PET) in diagnosing pancreatic cancer and mass-forming pancreatitis (MFP). PET, X-ray computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance (MR) imaging were performed in 15 patients with pancreatic cancer and nine patients with MFP. The areas of the PET scan were determined according to the markers drawn on the patients at CT or MR imaging. Regions of interests (ROIs) were placed by reference to the CT or MR images corresponding to the PET images. Tissue metabolism was evaluated by the differential absorption ratio (DAR) at 50 min after intravenous injection of FDG [DAR = tissue tracer concentration/(injected dose/body weight). The DAR value differed significantly in pancreatic cancer (mean +/- SD, 4.64 +/- 1.94) and MFP (mean +/- SD, 2.84 +/- 2.22) (P < 0.05). In one false-negative case (mucinous adenocarcinoma), the tumour contained a small number of malignant cells. In one false-positive case, lymphocytes accumulated densely in the mass in the pancreatic head. Further studies are necessary to investigate the histopathological characteristics (especially the cellularity) and other factors affecting the FDG DAR on PET images.Comparison of the influence of plastic and fully covered metal biliary stents on the accuracy of EUS-FNA for the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.Prior studies have reported that the presence of prior biliary stent may interfere with EUS visualization of pancreatic tumors. We aimed to compare the influence of the biliary plastic and fully covered self-expanding metal stents (CSEMS) on the accuracy of EUS-FNA cytology in patients with solid pancreatic masses.We conducted a retrospective study evaluating 677 patients with solid pancreatic head/uncinate lesions and a previous biliary stent in whom EUS-FNA was performed. The patients were stratified into two groups: (1) those with a plastic stents and (2) those with CSEMS. Performance characteristics of EUS-FNA including the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy were compared between the two groups.The frequency of obtaining an adequate cytology by EUS-FNA was similar in both the CSEMS group and the plastic stent group (97 vs. 97.1 % respectively; p = 1.0). The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of EUS-FNA was not significantly different between patients with CSEMS and plastic stents (96.8, 100, 100 % and 97.3, 98, 99.8 %, respectively). The negative predictive value for EUS-FNA was lower in the CSEMS group compared to the plastic stent group (66.6 vs. 78.1 % respectively; p = 0.42). There was one false-positive cytology in the plastic stent group compared to none in the CSEMS group.In a retrospective cohort trial, EUS-FNA was found to be highly accurate and safe in diagnosing patients with suspected pancreatic cancer, even in the presence of a plastic or metallic biliary stent. The presence of a stent did not contribute to a higher false-positive cytology rate.Cystic neoplasms of the pancreas. A clinicopathologic study, including DNA flow cytometry.To review the classification, clinical behavior, and appropriate therapy for cystic neoplasms of the pancreas. We examined patient demographics, clinical parameters, preoperative imaging modalities, histologic findings, and tumor DNA content to determine which best predict outcome.Case series and survey of pathologic specimens.Tertiary care center.Twenty-two patients with cystic neoplasms of the pancreas treated at affiliates of Northwestern University Medical School, Chicago, Ill.Predictive value of preoperative testing, tumor DNA content, patient survival.In 20 patients undergoing computed tomographic scan, the tumor was visualized in every case. All other imaging studies evaluated were less likely to demonstrate the lesion. Eight of 10 patients with serous cystadenomas were alive with no evidence of disease at the time of this report; one patient was alive with local recurrence, and a second patient had died of unrelated causes. All patients with mucinous cystadenomas were alive with no evidence of disease. Three of seven patients with cystadenocarcinomas had aneuploid, high S-phase tumors, and one had a diploid, high S-phase tumor; all four died (mean survival, 4.8 months). Two patients with cystadenocarcinomas had diploid, low S-phase tumors; both were long-term survivors but died of their disease at 8.6 and 9.3 years.(1) Computed tomographic scan is the most valuable diagnostic imaging study for preoperative evaluation of these patients. (2) Precise preoperative determination of tumor type is not possible. (3) DNA flow cytometry may help identify patients with aggressive tumors who may benefit from adjuvant chemoradiation.The utility of UroVysion fluorescence in situ hybridization in pancreatic fine-needle aspiration samples directed and obtained by endoscopic ultrasonography.The diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma can be challenging for the pathologist. Endoscopic ultrasound-guided, fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) can be used to obtain samples of pancreatic masses. UroVysion fluorescence in situ hybridization (UFISH) has been reported to increase the sensitivity and to be very specific for the diagnosis of adenocarcinoma when combined with cytology in the diagnosis of biliary brushings and washings.To determine the sensitivity and specificity of UFISH on tissues obtained from pancreatic lesions suggestive of adenocarcinoma obtained by EUS-FNA, compared against fine-needle aspiration (FNA) results. Additionally, to use patient follow-up data to evaluate UFISH results in FNA samples that showed significant atypia but did not meet the criteria for malignancy.Sixty consecutive cases of pancreatic EUS-FNA from our institution submitted for UFISH testing.Polysomic UFISH has a sensitivity of 93% and a specificity of 100% when compared against FNA results. Follow-up studies showed that adding UFISH to FNA increased the sensitivity for patients with true-positive results from 83% to 94% and increased specificity from 85% to 100%. For 7 patients with suspicious FNA results who had sufficient follow-up, UFISH was 100% sensitive and 100% specific.UFISH can be used to confirm the diagnosis of malignancy in pancreatic adenocarcinoma. Because of the high specificity, polysomic UFISH may help establish a diagnosis of malignancy when the FNA features are suggestive of, but not conclusive for, malignancy. The most common cause for a false-negative UFISH result was insufficient numbers of malignant cells.High single-pass diagnostic yield of a new 25-gauge core biopsy needle for EUS-guided FNA biopsy in solid pancreatic lesions.Current limitations of EUS-guided FNA include the need for multiple passes and on-site cytology assessment and lack of core specimen. Recently, a new 25-gauge core biopsy needle (PC25) was developed to overcome these limitations.To determine the diagnostic yield of EUS-guided FNA aspiration biopsy (FNAB) when using the PC25 needle among patients with solid pancreatic lesions.Retrospective analysis.Academic tertiary referral center.Fifty consecutive patients with a solid pancreatic lesion underwent EUS-guided FNAB with PC25.EUS-guided FNAB with PC25.The primary outcome was the diagnostic yield in single and overall passes of EUS-guided FNAB when using the PC25 needle for pancreatic solid lesions.Cytologic analysis showed malignancy in 38 patients on the first pass, with a cumulative sensitivity of 83%, 91%, and 96% on passes 1, 2, and 3, respectively. Although visible core was reported in 46 patients (92%), histologic core was seen in 16 patients (32%). Histologic analysis showed malignancy in 29 patients on the first pass, with a cumulative sensitivity of 63% and 87% on pass 1 and passes 1 to 4, respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy in combined cytologic and histologic results were 85%, 100%, and 86% for single pass and 96%, 100%, and 96% on multiple passes, respectively. No complications were seen.A retrospective study design at a single center using a single arm.EUS-guided FNAB with the PC25 needle showed excellent single-pass and overall diagnostic yields. This needle appears to maintain a high cytologic yield, similar to standard 25-gauge FNA needles, while also providing some histologic core tissue.Impact of inconclusive endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration results in the management and outcome of patients with solid pancreatic masses.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) can be inconclusive in diagnosing solid pancreatic masses. The aim of the present study was to evaluate the impact of an inconclusive EUS-FNA in the management of patients with solid pancreatic masses.This is a retrospective analysis of a prospective database of patients with solid pancreatic masses referred for EUS-FNA between December 2011 and December 2013. Consecutive patients with inconclusive initial EUS-FNA were included. Demographic, clinical, procedural and outcome data were analyzed.Over the study period, 387 patients underwent EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses, of which 38 patients had inconclusive cytology. Of the 38 patients, 18 were categorized as atypical, two were categorized as indeterminate or suspicious for malignancy, and 18 were categorized as benign process. Subsequently, 24 (63.2%) patients achieved cytopathological diagnosis by repeat EUS-FNA (8), transcutaneous FNA (4) and surgery (12). Repeat EUS-FNA were done a median of 13 days after the index examination and resulted in conclusive diagnosis in 72.7% of cases. Five patients undergoing surgery were confirmed to have benign lesions. In 14 (36.8%) patients not receiving a positive cytopathological diagnosis, 11 were eventually confirmed to be malignant based on clinical outcome and imaging evidence.Inconclusive EUS-FNA could lead to unnecessary surgical procedures in patients with resectable solid pancreatic masses if no cytopathological diagnosis is obtained through either repeat or alternative diagnostic modalities. Repeat EUS-FNA provided a conclusive diagnosis in a majority of cases, and therefore should be strongly considered ahead of other modalities.Preliminary experience with a new cytology brush in EUS-guided FNA.Despite the high diagnostic yield of EUS-guided FNA, room for technical improvements remains. Recently, the EchoBrush (Cook Endoscopy, Winston-Salem, NC), a disposable cytologic brush, was introduced to the market. To date, only 1 study, limited to 10 pancreatic cyst cases, using this device has been published.To assess the diagnostic yield of the EchoBrush in a cohort of consecutive patients, irrespective of the target lesion.Case series.Tertiary care university hospital (Molinette Hospital, Turin, Italy).Thirty-nine consecutive patients (12 with solid pancreatic masses, 12 with pancreatic cysts, 7 with enlarged lymph nodes, and 8 with submucosal masses) were enrolled.The material collected with the EchoBrush and with a standard FNA needle was double-blind evaluated by 2 cytopathologists.Adequacy of the sample and sensitivity and specificity of the EchoBrush method.Adequate material for cytologic analysis was collected in 17 of 39 patients (43.6%) with a single pass of the EchoBrush. Results were better for pancreatic lesions (for solid and cystic lesions, the adequacy was 58.3% and 50%, respectively); adequacy was low (28.6% and 25%, respectively) for lymph nodes and submucosal masses. The overall sensitivity and specificity were 57.9% and 31.2%, respectively. There were no adverse events with the procedure.Preliminary study.This report suggests that the EchoBrush may provide adequate cellularity to diagnose solid and cystic pancreatic lesions. More extensive studies are needed to compare the EchoBrush and standard needles.Positron emission tomography/computed tomography influences on the management of resectable pancreatic cancer and its cost-effectiveness.We sought to determine the impact of positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) on the management of presumed resectable pancreatic cancer and to assess the cost of this new staging procedure.PET using 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) is increasingly used for the staging of pancreatic cancer, but anatomic information is limited. Integrated PET/CT enables optimal anatomic delineation of PET findings and identification of FDG-negative lesions on computed tomography (CT) images and might improve preoperative staging.Patients with suspected pancreatic cancer who had a PET/CT between June 2001 to April 2004 were entered into a prospective database. Routine staging included abdominal CT, chest x-ray, and CA 19-9 measurement. FDG-PET/CT was conducted according to a standardized protocol, and findings were confirmed by histology. Cost benefit analysis was performed based on charged cost of PET/CT and pancreatic resection and included the time frame of staging and surgery.Fifty-nine patients with a median age of 61 years (range, 40-80 years) were included in this analysis. Fifty-one patients had lesions in the head and 8 in the tail of the pancreas. The positive and negative predictive values for pancreatic cancer were 91% and 64%, respectively. PET/CT detected additional distant metastases in 5 and synchronous rectal cancer in 2 patients. PET/CT findings changed the management in 16% of patients with pancreatic cancer deemed resectable after routine staging (P = 0.031) and was cost saving.PET/CT represents an important staging procedure prior to pancreatic resection for cancer, since it significantly improves patient selection and is cost-effective.Value of EUS-FNA cytological preparations compared with cell block sections in the diagnosis of pancreatic solid tumours.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is performed in order to achieve a definite tissue diagnosis of pancreatic lesions. This in turn is a guide to the appropriate treatment for the patient. Tissue samples collected by the same needle for cytological preparations and cell block histological sections (often referred to as FNA-cytology and FNA-biopsy, respectively) are handled differently. The specific contribution of each of these tests was evaluated.One hundred and two consecutive patients underwent EUS-FNA while being investigated for pancreatic solid lesions. Diagnosis was made by cytology, cell block sections or both. The diagnosis was confirmed by clinical outcome.Male/female ratio was 61/41. Mean age was 65±12 years (range, 22-94). Mean lesion size was 3.1±1.8 cm (range, 0.6-10 cm); 68% were >2 cm and 75% were located in the pancreatic head. The average number of needle passes was two (range, 1-4 passes). Final tissue diagnosis was malignant in 66 (65%) patients. Sensitivity, specificity and accuracy were 73%, 94% and 81%, respectively, for cytology alone, and 63%, 100% and 78%, for cell blocks alone. Eighty-two patients (80%) had cytology and cell blocks, which matched in 64 (78%) patients. EUS-FNA results that relied on both techniques had 84% sensitivity, 94% specificity and 88% accuracy. Cytology revealed 13 malignancies not diagnosed on cell blocks, while cell blocks revealed five malignancies not diagnosed by cytology. Malignant lesions were more common in men; they were larger in size and located in the pancreatic head.EUS-FNA cytology was more sensitive than cell blocks but less specific for the diagnosis of solid pancreatic lesions. The two methods are complementary and implementing both improves the diagnostic value of EUS-FNA.A prospective comparison of current diagnostic tests for pancreatic cancer.In 70 patients suspected of having pancreatic cancer, we prospectively compared results of seven diagnostic tests. Subsequent exploration (of 68) and liver biopsy (of two) demonstrated pancreatic cancer in 30, pancreatitis in seven, nonpancreatic neoplasms in nine and nonpancreatic non-neoplastic disease (or no disease) in 24. For detection of pancreatic disease, the best tests were the pancreatic-function test (cholecystokinin-stimulated enzyme outputs) and ultrasonography. The pancreatic scan was nonspecific (P less than 0.001), and thermography was insensitive (P less than 0.001). Endoscopic retrograde pancreatography and arteriography were significantly more sensitive than cytologic study in diagnosis of pancreatic cancer (P less than 0.001). Therefore, when pancreatic cancer is suspected, abdominal ultrasound should be performed first, and if it is negative, a pancreatic-function test next. A positive result from either test warrants an endoscopic retrograde pancreatography for definitive diagnosis. This sequence identified 88 per cent of patients without pancreatic disease and 89 per cent with pancreatic cancer.Providing on-site diagnosis of malignancy on endoscopic-ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspirates: should it be done?Rapid and accurate tissue diagnosis for a deep-seated malignancy would allow treating physicians to provide disease-specific interventions and help patients make early informed management decisions. Providing on-site tissue diagnosis for fine-needle aspirate samples obtained with endosonography would help develop such efficient patient management issues. Here we report our experience of prospectively providing on-site diagnosis on 485 endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspirate samples.Four hundred eighty-five endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspirates from the pancreas (n= 305), lymph nodes (n = 91), biliary tree (n = 47), liver (n = 15), gastrointestinal tract (n = 19), and adrenal gland (n = 8) were reviewed. For all aspirates, the cytologic diagnoses, both preliminary and final, were categorized into the following: positive for malignancy, positive for neoplastic process, suspicious for malignancy, atypical cells, reactive process, and nondiagnostic.Of the 485 cases, 163 (33.6%) were diagnosed as benign, 43 (8.8%) as atypical, 21 (4.3%) as suspicious, 18 (3.7%) as positive for neoplasm, and 230 (47.4%) as malignant after final cytologic interpretation. A significantly (P < .001) higher degree of concordance was noted for unequivocal diagnosis of malignancy (196/198, 98.9%) vs nonmalignancy (200/250, 67.2%) between on-site and final cytologic diagnosis. Of the 52 discordant cases, 12 (2.6%) diagnoses were downgraded and 40 (8.9%) were upgraded from preliminary on-site diagnosis. Our overall sensitivity (87 vs 92), specificity (95% vs 100%), and accuracy (90% vs 94%) improved for final cytologic diagnosis.On-site diagnosis of malignancy could be used to initiate informed patient management decisions. Cases where a diagnosis of malignancy is not rendered at on-site interpretation need further cytologic evaluation.Incidental pancreatic cysts: natural history and diagnostic accuracy of a limited serial pancreatic cyst MRI protocol.To examine the natural history of incidentally detected pancreatic cysts and whether a simplified MRI protocol without gadolinium is adequate for lesion follow-up.Over a 10-year period, 301-patients with asymptomatic pancreatic cysts underwent follow-up (45 months ± 30). The magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) protocol included axial, coronal T2-weighted images, MR cholangiopancreatographic and fat suppressed T1-weighted sequences before and after gadolinium. Three radiologists independently reviewed the initial MRI, the follow-up studies using first only unenhanced images, then secondly gadolinium-enhanced-sequences. Lesion changes during follow-up were recorded and the added value of gadolinium-enhanced sequences was determined by classifying the lesions into risk categories.Three hundred and one patients (1,174 cysts) constituted the study population. Only 35/301 patients (12 %) showed significant lesion change on follow-up. Using multivariate analysis the only independent factor of lesion growth (OR = 2.4; 95 % CI, 1.7-3.3; P < 0.001) and mural nodule development (OR = 1.9; 95 % CI, 1.1-3.4, P = 0.03) during follow-up was initial lesion size. No patient with a lesion initial size less than 2 cm developed cancer during follow-up. Intra-observer agreement with and without gadolinium enhancement ranged from 0.86 to 0.97. After consensus review of discordant cases, gadolinium-enhanced sequences demonstrated no added value.Most incidental pancreatic cystic lesions did not demonstrate change during follow-up. The addition of gadolinium-enhanced-sequences had no added-value for risk assignment on serial follow-up.Significant growth of pancreatic cysts occurred in a minority of patients only. No lesion <2 cm demonstrated any change during the first year of follow-up. Intra-observer agreement between MR pancreatic protocols with and without gadolinium was excellent. Gadolinium application had limited value for follow-up of asymptomatic pancreatic cystic lesions.Fluorescence in situ hybridization and K-ras analyses improve diagnostic yield of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration of solid pancreatic masses.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine-needle aspiration (FNA) is the main diagnostic modality for pancreatic mass lesions. However, cytology is often indeterminate, leading to repeat FNAs and delay in care. Here, we evaluate whether combining routine cytology with fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) and K-ras/p53 analyses improves diagnostic yield of pancreatic EUS-FNA.Fifty EUS-FNAs of pancreatic masses in 46 patients were retrospectively analyzed. Mean follow-up was 68 months. Thirteen initial cytologic samples (26%) were benign, 23 malignant (46%), and 14 atypical (28%). We performed FISH for p16, p53, LPL, c-Myc, MALT1, topoisomerase 2/human epidermal growth factor receptor 2, and EGFR, as well as K-ras/p53 mutational analyses.On final diagnosis, 11 (79%) of atypical FNAs were malignant, and 3 benign (21%). Fluorescence in situ hybridization was negative in all benign and all atypical samples with final benign diagnosis. Fluorescence in situ hybridization plus K-ras analysis correctly identified 60% of atypical FNAs with final malignant diagnosis. Combination of routine cytology with positive FISH and K-ras analyses yielded 87.9% sensitivity, 93.8% specificity, 96.7% positive predictive value, 78.9% negative predictive value, and 89.8% accuracy.Combining routine cytology with FISH and K-ras analyses improves diagnostic yield of EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses. We propose to include these ancillary tests in the workup of atypical cytology from pancreatic EUS-FNA.Utility of 2-[18F] fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose positron emission tomography in differential diagnosis of benign and malignant intraductal papillary-mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas.Intraductal papillary-mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) of the pancreas presents in various histopathological stages from benign to malignant lesions. The differentiation between benign and malignant IPMN is important in order to determine the treatment of the patients. However, pre-operative differentiation remains difficult. The aim of this study was to assess the utility of 2-[18F] fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) in pre-operative differentiation of benign and malignant IPMN of the pancreas. In the present study we prospectively investigated 29 patients who underwent CT, FDG-PET, and surgery for IPMNs, followed by histopathological examination. The maximum standardized uptake value (SUVmax) was determined on FDG-PET, and differentiation of benign from malignant IPMN was tested using various SUVmax cut-off levels and various parameters derived from the CT. SUVmax was found to be significantly higher in malignant IPMNs (4.7+/-3.0) than that in benign IPMNs (1.8+/-0.3, P=0.0011). SUVmax values correlated with the histopathological types of IPMN (adenoma/borderline lesion/carcinoma in situ/invasive carcinoma) (Spearman rank correlation 0.865, P<0.0001). The specificity, sensitivity and accuracy values were best for SUVmax of 2.5 (100, 93, and 96%, respectively). The combination of mural nodule, detected on CT, and SUVmax of 2.5 offered the best diagnosis of malignant IPMN. These results suggest that FDG-PET is useful for differentiation of malignant IPMN of the pancreas, and that it should be performed in combination with other conventional imaging modalities.Cystic tumours of the pancreas: diagnostic accuracy, pathologic observations and surgical consequences.Cystic neoplasms of the pancreas account for only 1% of primary pancreatic lesions. However, patients with these tumors are diagnosed more frequently. Up to now, nonsurgical management is still the established form of treatment of benign cystic tumours of the pancreas.Between 1987 and 1996 we treated 51 patients with serous and mucinous cystadenoma and their malignant counterparts, serous and mucinous cystadenocarcinoma.Eighty-five percent of the patients presented symptoms. Computed tomography and endoscopic cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) were the most sensitive diagnostic techniques; however, in three patients with serous cystadenoma and in one patient with serous cystadenocarcinoma, ERCP findings were completely normal. The tumour was resected in all but one patient. There was no perioperative mortality. After dismissal from the hospital, all patients in whom benign tumours had been resected are still alive; however, the late mortality of mucinous cystadenocarcinoma was 36% after a median follow-up of 6 years.Surgical resection is recommended in all cystic tumours, even in serous cystic tumours, because symptoms may develop and malignant transformation to serous cystadenocarcinoma is possible.Efficacy of an artificial neural network-based approach to endoscopic ultrasound elastography in diagnosis of focal pancreatic masses.By using strain assessment, real-time endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) elastography provides additional information about a lesion's characteristics in the pancreas. We assessed the accuracy of real-time EUS elastography in focal pancreatic lesions using computer-aided diagnosis by artificial neural network analysis.We performed a prospective, blinded, multicentric study at of 258 patients (774 recordings from EUS elastography) who were diagnosed with chronic pancreatitis (n = 47) or pancreatic adenocarcinoma (n = 211) from 13 tertiary academic medical centers in Europe (the European EUS Elastography Multicentric Study Group). We used postprocessing software analysis to compute individual frames of elastography movies recorded by retrieving hue histogram data from a dynamic sequence of EUS elastography into a numeric matrix. The data then were analyzed in an extended neural network analysis, to automatically differentiate benign from malignant patterns.The neural computing approach had 91.14% training accuracy (95% confidence interval [CI], 89.87%-92.42%) and 84.27% testing accuracy (95% CI, 83.09%-85.44%). These results were obtained using the 10-fold cross-validation technique. The statistical analysis of the classification process showed a sensitivity of 87.59%, a specificity of 82.94%, a positive predictive value of 96.25%, and a negative predictive value of 57.22%. Moreover, the corresponding area under the receiver operating characteristic curve was 0.94 (95% CI, 0.91%-0.97%), which was significantly higher than the values obtained by simple mean hue histogram analysis, for which the area under the receiver operating characteristic was 0.85.Use of the artificial intelligence methodology via artificial neural networks supports the medical decision process, providing fast and accurate diagnoses.Accuracy of preoperative workup in a prospective series of surgically resected cystic pancreatic lesions.Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) are considered useful techniques in the evaluation of pancreatic cysts. Aim of this study was to prospectively compare the diagnostic value of these techniques.This study included consecutive patients who underwent MRI, EUS, and EUS-FNA for a pancreatic cyst that was eventually resected surgically. Observers scored for cyst characteristics, a distinction between mucinous and non-mucinous cysts and a suspicion of malignancy. The interobserver agreement between MRI and EUS was calculated.A total of 32 patients were included. Sensitivity for diagnosing a mucinous cyst was 78% for EUS versus 91% for MRI. Sensitivity for detecting malignancy was 25% (1/4) and 50% (2/4) for EUS and MRI respectively. Sensitivity of EUS-FNA for diagnosing a mucinous cyst (positive cytology and/or CEA >192 ng/ml) was 61%. Sensitivity for detecting malignancy (positive cytology) was 1/4 (25%). Interobserver agreement between MRI and EUS for the features was poor to fair.MRI and EUS are comparable techniques for the morphological characterization of pancreatic cysts. Combined sensitivity of EUS and MRI was higher than the sensitivity of one of the techniques alone. For diagnosing a mucinous cyst, FNA findings showed a low sensitivity, but a high specificity.Fine-needle aspiration cytology guided by endoscopic ultrasonography: results in 141 patients.Diagnosis of submucosal lesions, pancreatic tumors, and mediastinal or celiac lymph nodes or masses is possible using endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS), but histological confirmation to differentiate between benign and malignant lesions is still required. The aim of this study was to evaluate the efficacy of a new method of EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy of intramural and paramural lesions.From October 1991 to September 1994, EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy was carried out in 141 patients with findings of mediastinal masses (18 cases), mediastinal lymph nodes (24 cases), submucosal tumors (seven cases), celiac lymph nodes (26 cases), large gastric folds with negative endoscopic biopsy (13 cases), pancreatic tumors (43 cases), a small liver metastasis (five cases), retrorectal tumors (four cases), and an adrenal metastasis (one case). The EUS examination was performed using a Pentax-Hitachi FG 32-UA system.A malignant tumor was diagnosed in 110 of the 141 patients. EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration was positive in 85 cases. In 15 cases, an adequate specimen could not be obtained (10.6%). The sensitivity and specificity of the diagnosis of malignancy were 77.0% and 100%, respectively. Results were better for mediastinal masses (sensitivity 88%), mediastinal lymph nodes (81%), and celiac lymph nodes (80%) than for pancreatic tumors (75%) or submucosal tumors (60%).These results suggest that EUS-guided fine-needle biopsy using a curved-array transducer represents a step forward in the tissue diagnosis of gastrointestinal lesions.Fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography in the differential diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma: a report of 106 cases.The aim of this study was to evaluate fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography ([18F]FDG PET) as a tool for the differential diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma while taking into account serum glucose level. A group of 106 patients with unclear pancreatic masses were recruited for the study. PET was performed following intravenous administration of an average of 190 MBq [18F]FDG. Focally increased glucose utilisation was used as the criterion of malignancy. In addition, the "standardised uptake value" (SUV) was determined 45 min after injection. Carcinoma of the pancreas was demonstrated histologically in 74 cases, and chronic pancreatitis in 32 cases. Employing visual evaluation, 63 of the 74 (85%) pancreatic carcinomas were identified by PET. In 27 of the 32 cases (84%) of chronic pancreatitis it was possible to exclude malignancy. False-negative results (n=11) were obtained mostly in patients with raised serum glucose levels (10 out of 11), and false-positives (n=5) in patients with inflammatory processes of the pancreas. Thus PET showed an overall sensitivity of 85%, a specificity of 84%, a negative predictive value of 71%, and a positive predictive value of 93%. In a subgroup of patients with normal serum glucose levels (n=72), the results were 98%, 84%, 96% and 93%, respectively. Quantitative assessment yielded a mean SUV of 6.4+/-3.6 for pancreatic carcinoma as against a value of 3.6+/-1.7 for chronic pancreatitis (P<0.001), without increasing the diagnostic accuracy. This shows PET to be of value in assessing unclear pancreatic masses. The diagnostic accuracy of PET examinations is very dependent on serum glucose levels.Possible additional value of 18FDG-PET in managing pancreas intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms: preliminary results.Although some clinical and radiological features may predict malignancy presence in intraductal papillary mucinous pancreas neoplasms, preoperative diagnosis remains difficult. In this study we present 7 patients with Intraductal Papillary Mucinous Neoplasm (IPMN) studied both with 18FDG-PET and magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP). A focal hypermetabolism was documented in 2 patients (the standardized uptake value in the neoplastic foci was 6.7 and 9), while absence of FDG uptake in the neoplasm area was recorded in the remaining 5 cases. Mean follow-up was 27 months (range 21-34). The final judgement was benign IPMN in 5 cases and malignant IPMN in 2. PET scan always correctly predicted the presence or absence of malignancy, while MRCP failed to detect malignancy in 3/7 cases. In conclusion, this preliminary experience suggests that 18FDG-PET may prove useful for malignancy detection in IPMN, improving differential diagnosis with benign intraductal papillary growth by functional data.Pancreatic resections for cystic neoplasms: from the surgeon's presumption to the pathologist's reality.Current guidelines for the management of pancreatic cystic neoplasms are based on the assumption that these lesions can be classified correctly on the basis of features of cross-sectional imaging. However, a certain degree of overlap between different lesions exists, and little is known about the rate of inaccurate preoperative diagnoses. To address this issue, preoperative and final pathologic diagnoses of patients resected for a presumed pancreatic cystic neoplasm were compared.Retrospective analysis was undertaken of patients managed operatively between 2000 and 2010. Preoperative workup was reviewed to identify diagnostic pitfalls and potential risk factors for incorrect preoperative characterization of cystic lesions presumed to be neoplastic.We analyzed 476 patients. Final pathologic diagnosis matched the preoperative diagnosis in 78% of cases. The highest accuracy was reached for solid pseudopapillary neoplasms (95%) and for main duct/mixed duct intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (81%). Surprisingly, 23 cysts (5%) were found to be ductal adenocarcinoma, whereas 45 patients (9%) underwent a pancreatic resection for a non-neoplastic condition. The use of a routine radiologic workup, including contrast-enhanced ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging, was associated with a favorably correct characterization of the cystic lesion. Endoscopic ultrasonography did not seem to improve diagnostic accuracy. Increased levels of serum carbohydrate antigen (CA)19-9 resulted as risk factors for an incorrect diagnosis as well as for a final diagnosis of a ductal adenocarcinoma.The overall rate of inaccurate preoperative diagnoses in a tertiary care center with a broad experience in pancreatology approached 22%. Serum CA19-9 is an important complementary tool within the context of preoperative investigation of cystic neoplasms of the pancreas.The role of cytopathology and cyst fluid analysis in the preoperative diagnosis and management of pancreatic cysts >3 cm.Pancreatic cyst size >3 cm is a worrisome rather than high-risk feature for malignancy based on the 2012 International Guidelines for the management of mucinous cysts. The value of cytology in preoperative evaluation and surgical triage is unclear.All pancreatic cysts >3 cm resected over a 7-year period were evaluated for clinical, radiologic, and pathologic information. Performance of cytology for the detection of malignancy and surgical triage compared with imaging was assessed.There were 93 histologically confirmed cysts, 52 of which were mucinous and 41 of which were nonmucinous. Of these, 37% were malignant, including 16 nonmucinous malignancies and 18 mucinous cysts (12 with invasive carcinoma, 6 with high-grade dysplasia). Thirty-nine cysts (41% malignant, 59% benign) were not subject to endoscopic ultrasound-fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) prior to resection (average size, 6.0 cm). Fifty-four were evaluated by EUS-FNA, with 35 available for review (average size, 5.4 cm). Cytology/cyst fluid analysis had the highest specificity (88.9%) compared with imaging, whereas magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) showed the highest sensitivity (100%). MRI had the highest predictive value for mucinous (100%) versus nonmucinous cysts (100%). MRI and EUS were able to predict malignancy from the presence of high-risk imaging features in all cases. Some benign cases also showed high-risk imaging features on MRI (28.6%), computed tomography (32.3%), and EUS (45.8%). Cytology correctly classified 5 of 6 benign cysts with high-risk imaging as benign.Preoperative evaluation of pancreatic cysts >3 cm is warranted, as many are nonmucinous cysts and not high-grade. Cytology is more specific than imaging for the detection of malignancy in cysts >3 cm.Rapid on-site evaluation for endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle biopsy of the pancreas decreases the incidence of repeat biopsy procedures.Rapid on-site evaluation (ROSE) for endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) biopsy of the pancreas provides immediate feedback regarding cellular adequacy to aid in obtaining a definitive diagnosis and has the potential to avoid repeat procedures. The objective of the current study was to measure the impact of ROSE service on the incidence of repeat EUS FNA biopsy procedures.Over a consecutive 3-year period, the pathology database at Washington University Medical Center was searched for patients with both an initial and subsequent EUS FNA biopsy demonstrating a solid lesion of the pancreas. These were divided temporally between the time before and after the introduction of ROSE service. Reports were reviewed and results were recorded.A total of 379 patients underwent ROSE service and 377 patients did not. The percentage of repeat non-ROSE EUS FNA cases was 5.8% and the percentage of repeat ROSE EUS FNA cases was 2.9%. The use of the ROSE service was found to decrease the number of repeat procedures by approximately 50% (P = .024). For those patients who underwent a repeat EUS-FNA procedure, the ROSE service provided a higher rate of definitive diagnosis among patients undergoing repeat procedures (67%) versus the non-ROSE cohort (27%).The use of ROSE for EUS-FNA biopsy of the pancreas was found to result in fewer patients undergoing repeat procedures. Patients who required a repeat procedure with the use of ROSE had a higher percentage of definitive diagnostic categorization on the repeat biopsy. Initial use of ROSE for EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic lesions was found to decrease the number of patients who required a repeat procedure.Malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas: in situ versus invasive carcinoma surgical resectability.To retrospectively evaluate computed tomographic (CT) findings in patients with in situ and invasive malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) of the pancreas and to evaluate the accuracy for surgical resectability, with surgery and pathologic analysis as the reference standards.Institutional review board approval was obtained, and the informed consent requirement was waived. Forty-six patients with malignant IPMN proved at pathologic examination of the surgically resected specimen (n = 44) or laparotomy (n = 2) underwent surgery after multidetector CT was performed. CT findings were retrospectively evaluated to determine if a pancreatic malignant IPMN tumor was present; to make this determination, CT criteria were used to differentiate in situ from invasive tumors and signs of unresectability (liver metastasis, vascular CT pattern of encasement, or regional lymph node metastasis). The extent of the vascular CT pattern of encasement was recorded for each patient (no obliteration of the fat plane, obliteration of the fat plane of <50%, or obliteration of the fat plane of > or =50%). Statistical analysis was performed with the chi(2) and Student t tests.CT revealed a mural nodule in the pancreatic duct wall in 14 patients with in situ carcinoma and one patient with invasive carcinoma (P < .003). CT revealed an infiltrative pancreatic mass in 17 patients with invasive carcinoma and two patients with in situ carcinoma (P < .02). Of the mural nodules, 93% were seen in patients with in situ carcinoma, whereas 90% of infiltrative pancreatic masses were observed in patients with invasive carcinomas. The positive predictive value of CT for determining resectability was 100%, and the overall accuracy of CT for determining resectability and unresectability was 74%. The positive predictive value of CT for determining unresectability was 17%, mainly owing to overestimation of arterial invasion.CT is helpful in the differentiation of in situ and invasive IPMN. Classic vascular invasion criteria lead to the overestimation of surgical tumor unresectability in patients with malignant IPMN.Interobserver agreement for detection of malignant features of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas on MDCT.The purpose of this retrospective study was to measure interobserver agreement in the assessment of malignant imaging features of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) on MDCT.Pancreatic protocol CT studies were reviewed for 84 patients with resected IPMNs. Maximal diameter of the dominant cyst, presence of a mural nodule, presence of a solid component, and diameters of the main pancreatic duct (MPD) and common bile duct (CBD) were measured by four radiologists independently. In each patient, the IPMN was classified into one of three types: main duct, branch duct, or mixed IPMN. Interobserver agreement of lesion features was examined using the intraclass correlation coefficient (ICC) for continuous features and Fleiss kappa for categorical features.The final dataset included 55 branch duct IPMNs, nine main duct IPMNs, and 20 mixed IPMNs. Moderate agreement (ĸ = 0.458; 95% CI, 0.345-0.564) was observed in assigning branch duct, main duct, or mixed IPMN subtypes. Measurement agreement was substantial to excellent for dominant cyst (ICC = 0.852; 95% CI, 0.777-0.907), MPD (0.753, 0.655-0.837), and CBD (0.608, 0.463-0.724) but only fair to moderate for the detection of the presence of mural nodule (ĸ = 0.284, 0.125-0.432) or solid component (ĸ = 0.405, 0211-0.577).Substantial to excellent interobserver agreement in the measurement of cyst diameter, MPD, and CBD support their use for characterizing malignant features of IPMN on MDCT. However, the subjective interpretation of the presence of solid components and mural nodules by individual radiologists was more variable.Value of diffusion-weighted MRI for differentiating malignant from benign intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas.The purpose of this study was to evaluate whether the use of diffusion-weighted MRI (DWI) increases diagnostic accuracy in the differentiation of malignant from benign intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) of the pancreas over the accuracy of contrast-enhanced MRI with MRCP.A total of 61 patients with surgically resected IPMNs (19 malignant, 42 benign) who underwent gadoxetic acid-enhanced MRI, DWI, and MRCP were included. Two blinded observers evaluated two image sets, that is, conventional MRI with MRCP images versus combined conventional MRI with MRCP and DW images, and scored their confidence for malignancy of IPMNs. Qualitative analyses of the IPMNs were also conducted. Diagnostic performance (ROC curve analysis), accuracy, sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), and negative predictive value (NPV) were evaluated. The Fisher exact test was used to compare groups.The diagnostic performance (area under the ROC curve [Az]) with respect to predicting malignancy of IPMNs improved significantly for both observers after additional review of DW images (p < 0.05). The diagnostic accuracy, sensitivity, specificity, PPV, and NPV of combined conventional and DW images were higher than those of conventional MR images alone. Diffusion restriction was more often present in malignant IPMNs (78.9%) than in benign IPMNs (16.7%) (p < 0.001) with excellent interobserver agreement (ĸ = 0.965).Compared with conventional MRI alone, adding DWI to conventional MRI improves diagnostic accuracy with increased specificity for differentiating malignant from benign IPMNs of the pancreas.[Is accurate preoperative assessment of pancreatic cystic lesions possible?].Cystic lesions of the pancreas (CLP) are of different origin and behaviour. Mucinous lesions with the risk of invasive cancer represent an important subgroup. The key point in differential diagnosis of CLP is to distinguish malignant and benign lesions and also correct indication for surgery in order to minimize the impact of serious complications after resection. Different and unsatisfying predictive values of each of the examinations make proper diagnosis challenging. We focused on overall diagnostic accuracy of preoperative imaging and analytic studies. We studied the accuracy of distinguishing between non-neoplastic vs. neoplastic and bening vs. malignant lesions.We retrospectively analyzed all of the patients (N=72) with CLP (median of age 58 years, range 22-79) recommended for surgery. CT, EUS, ERCP, MRCP findings, cytology and aspirate analysis were used to establish preoperative diagnosis. Finally, preoperative diagnoses were compared with postoperative pathological findings to establish overall accuracy of preoperative assessment.During 5 years, 72 patients underwent resection for CLP. We performed 66 (92%) resection and 6 (8%) palliative procedures with 32% morbidity and 7% of one hospital stay mortality. All the patients were examined by CT and EUS. FNA was performed in 44 (61%) patients. Cytology was evaluable in 39 (88%) cases. ERCP was done in 40 (55%) patients. Pathology revealed non-neoplastic CLP in 25 (35%) and neoplastic lesions in 47 (65%) specimens. Mucinous lesions accounted for 25%. Malignant or potentially malignant CLP were found in 37 (51%) patients. Sensitivity, specificity and diagnostic accuracy of preoperative diagnosis for distinguishing between inflammatory and neoplastic, and benign and malignant was 100%, 46%, 85% and 61%, 61%, 44%, respectively.Correct and accurate preoperative assessment of CLP remains challenging. Despite the wide range of diagnostic modalities, the definitive preoperative identification of malignant or high-risk CLP is inaccurate. Because of this, a significant portion of the patients undergo pancreatic resection for benign or inflammatory lesions that are not potentially life-threatening. Possible serious complications after pancreatic surgery are the main reason for precise selection of patients with cystic affections recommended for surgery.Contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasound in solid lesions of the pancreas: results of a pilot study.Distinguishing pancreatic adenocarcinoma from other pancreatic masses remains challenging with current imaging techniques. This prospective study aimed to evaluate the accuracy of a new procedure, imaging the microcirculation pattern of the pancreas by contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasound (CEH-EUS) with a new Olympus prototype echo endoscope.35 patients presenting with solid pancreatic lesions were prospectively enrolled. All patients had conventional B mode and power Doppler EUS. After an intravenous bolus injection of 2.4 ml of a second-generation ultrasound contrast agent (SonoVue) CEH-EUS was then performed with a new Olympus prototype echo endoscope (xGF-UCT 180). The microvascular pattern was compared with the final diagnosis based on the pathological examination of specimens from surgery or EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) or on follow-up for at least 12 months.The final diagnoses were: 18 adenocarcinomas, 9 neuroendocrine tumors, 7 chronic pancreatitis, and 1 stromal tumor. Power Doppler failed to display microcirculation, whereas harmonic imaging demonstrated it in all cases. Out of 18 lesions with a hypointense signal on CEH-EUS, 16 were adenocarcinomas. The sensitivity, specificity, negative predictive value (NPV), positive predictive value (PPV), and accuracy of hypointensity for diagnosing pancreatic adenocarcinoma were 89 %, 88 %, 88 %, 89 %, and 88.5 %, compared with corresponding values of 72 %, 100 %, 77 %, 100 %, and 86 % for EUS-FNA. Of five adenocarcinomas with false-negative results at EUS-FNA, four had a hypointense echo signal at CEH-EUS.CEH-EUS with the new Olympus prototype device successfully visualizes the microvascular pattern in pancreatic solid lesions, and may be useful for distinguishing adenocarcinomas from other pancreatic masses.Value of repeat endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration for suspected pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is a safe and accurate technique for diagnosing pancreatic cancer. The value of repeat EUS-FNA in patients with high clinical suspicion for pancreatic cancer after an inconclusive index study is unknown. Our aims were to determine the yield and success of repeat EUS-FNA and the reasons for failure of initial EUS-FNA.This was a retrospective analysis of prospectively collected data in a tertiary University based referral center for pancreatico-biliary disorders. All patients who underwent more then one EUS-FNA for evaluation of suspected pancreatic cancer over a five and a half year period were included in this analysis.Of the 547 procedures performed on 517 patients, 24 (4.6%) patients underwent 51 repeat EUS-FNA procedures. Initial EUS-FNA was atypical/suspicious in 10 (41.6%), benign in 10 (41.6%), malignant in two (8.3%), and failed/indeterminate in two (8.3%) patients. Eight of 10 (80%) patients with atypical/suspicious findings at initial EUS-FNA were diagnosed with malignancy on repeat EUS-FNA. Of the 10 patients with benign findings at initial EUS-FNA, repeat study diagnosed two (20%) with malignancy and the rest were confirmed benign on long-term follow up (average 530 days, SD 369 days). Of the two patients with indeterminate findings at initial EUS-FNA, repeat study diagnosed one patient with malignant disease and the other with benign disease that was confirmed by long-term follow up. Of the two patients diagnosed with neoplastic disease at initial EUS-FNA, repeat EUS-FNA with immunostains downgraded both to chronic pancreatitis. Repeat EUS-FNA facilitated determination of the true status of disease in 20 of 24 patients (accuracy 84%). Suspected reasons for failed initial EUS-FNA were: coexisting pancreatitis (n = 10; 42%), technical difficulty due to scope positioning in uncinate lesion/sedation failure (n = 4; 16.7%), difficult cytology (partly cystic, extensive necrosis, well-differentiated adenocarcinoma) (n = 4; 16.7%), presence of ascites or collaterals (n = 3; 12.5%), pathologist's interobserver variation (n = 2; 8.33%), and unknown reason in one patient.Repeat EUS-FNA is warranted in patients with high clinical suspicion for pancreatic cancer despite indeterminate or negative findings at initial EUS-FNA.[The value of magnetic resonance tomography (MRT), magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the diagnosis of pancreatic tumors].To prospectively evaluate the role of MRI including MR cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) compared to endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.ERCP and MRI including MRCP were performed in 52 patients with suspected pancreatic cancer. MRCP was obtained using a single-shot RARE technique. The results of axial images and MRCP were compared to concurrently performed ERCP examinations. The standards of reference were the surgical and pathological findings, respectively. Image quality of MRCP was assessed using a three-step-score (1 = good, 2 = fair, 3 = nondiagnostic).In 88% of the cases the MRCP was of good quality. Only in 4% was MRCP non-diagnostic. The combination of MRI and MRCP showed an overall accuracy of 88%, whereas the overall accuracies of MRCP alone and ERCP were 80%, and 85%, respectively. The positive predictive values of MRI/MRCP, MRCP alone, and ERCP were 91%, 85%, and 88%, respectively.For the detection of pancreatic cancer MRI including MRCP is comparable to ERCP and can be regarded as the method of choice in patients with suspected pancreatic cancer. ERCP is the procedure of choice in patients with contraindications to MRI and in patients in whom additional therapeutic procedures are performed.Endoscopic ultrasound elastography for evaluation of lymph nodes and pancreatic masses: a multicenter study.To evaluate the ability of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) elastography to distinguish benign from malignant pancreatic masses and lymph nodes.A multicenter study was conducted and included 222 patients who underwent EUS examination with assessment of a pancreatic mass (n = 121) or lymph node (n = 101). The classification as benign or malignant, based on the real time elastography pattern, was compared with the classification based on the B-mode EUS images and with the final diagnosis obtained by EUS-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) and/or by surgical pathology. An interobserver study was performed.The sensitivity and specificity of EUS elastography to differentiate benign from malignant pancreatic lesions are 92.3% and 80.0%, respectively, compared to 92.3% and 68.9%, respectively, for the conventional B-mode images. The sensitivity and specificity of EUS elastography to differentiate benign from malignant lymph nodes was 91.8% and 82.5%, respectively, compared to 78.6% and 50.0%, respectively, for the B-mode images. The kappa coefficient was 0.785 for the pancreatic masses and 0.657 for the lymph nodes.EUS elastography is superior compared to conventional B-mode imaging and appears to be able to distinguish benign from malignant pancreatic masses and lymph nodes with a high sensitivity, specificity and accuracy. It might be reserved as a second line examination to help characterise pancreatic masses after negative EUS-FNA and might increase the yield of EUS-FNA for lymph nodes.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration and biopsy using a 22-gauge needle with side fenestration in pancreatic cystic lesions.Cytologic diagnosis by endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration is associated with low sensitivity and adequacy. A newly designed endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle biopsy device, endowed with a side fenestration, is now available.We carried out a study with the aim of evaluating the feasibility, safety, and diagnostic yield of the 22-gauge needle with side fenestration for endoscopic ultrasound fine needle aspiration and biopsy of pancreatic cystic lesions.58 patients with 60 pancreatic cystic lesions consecutively referred for endoscopic ultrasound guided-fine needle aspiration were enrolled in a prospective, dual centre study, and underwent fine needle aspiration and biopsy with the 22-gauge needle with side fenestration.Fine needle aspiration and biopsy was technically feasible in all cases. In 39/60 (65%) pancreatic cystic lesions, the specimens were adequate for cyto-histologic assessment. In lesions with solid components, and in malignant lesions, adequacy was 94.4% (p = 0.0149) and 100% (p = 0.0069), respectively. Samples were adequate for histologic evaluation in 18/39 (46.1%) cases. There were only 2 (3.3%) mild complications.Fine needle aspiration and biopsy with the 22-gauge needle with side fenestration is feasible, and superior to conventional endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration cytology from cystic fluid, particularly in pancreatic cystic lesions with solid component or malignancy, with a higher diagnostic yield and with no increase in complication rate.Intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas: the preoperative value of cytologic and histopathologic diagnosis.The preoperative diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas must be as certain as possible because removal of a large portion of the pancreas or even total pancreatectomy may be necessary. The value of cytologic and histopathologic analysis of specimens obtained by preoperative endoscopic investigations is unknown. The aim of this study was to assess the value of such analyses of specimens obtained by EUS-guided FNA and/or biopsy, or transpapillary biopsy specimens obtained during endoscopic retrograde pancreatography for the diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas and for the detection of malignancy.Between 1992 and 2001, 42 patients (22 men, 20 women; median age 64 years) underwent surgical resection for intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas and had preoperative pancreatic tissue sampling. In the case of isolated dilatation of pancreatic ducts, pancreatic juice was obtained by EUS-guided FNA for cytologic analysis. In the presence of a solid lesion or main pancreatic duct stenosis, biopsy specimens were obtained by EUS-guided FNA biopsy or endoscopic retrograde pancreatography, which permitted histopathologic assessment. The accuracy of cytology and histopathology was evaluated for the following: (1) positive diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas and (2) assessment of malignancy, by comparison with histopathologic examination of surgical resection specimens.Cytologic analysis was performed in 19 patients; it was positive in 4 (21%) and noninformative in 15 (79%). Histopathologic analysis was performed in 23 patients; it was positive in 21 (91%) and negative in 2 (9%). Histopathologic analysis yielded a positive result in 83% of patients who did not have extrusion of mucus from a patulous papilla. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of histopathologic analysis for the diagnosis of malignancy were, respectively, 44%, 100%, 100%, and 33%. When histopathologic analysis was positive, the tumor grade was similar to that determined by final histopathologic examination in 38% of patients, whereas the grade was underestimated in 62%. No complication occurred as a result of tissue sampling.The sensitivity of histopathologic analysis of EUS-guided FNA biopsy specimens or transpapillary biopsy specimens is 91% for the positive diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas with a solid component, which is of particular interest as extrusion mucus from the papilla was absent in most patients. Histopathologic analysis of biopsy specimens of malignant intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas often underestimates tumor grade. The result for cytologic analysis of juice obtained from dilated pancreatic ducts is disappointing.Endosonography-guided real-time fine-needle aspiration biopsy.Twenty-six patients were prospectively evaluated with endosonography-guided real-time fine-needle-aspiration biopsy. This cohort comprised 14 patients with a pancreatic mass revealed by CT or a stricture of the main pancreatic duct seen at ERCP, 7 patients with mediastinal lymphadenopathy, 3 patients with extrapancreatic abdominal masses, and 2 patients with subepithelial or infiltrative lesions. Endosonography-guided real-time fine-needle-aspiration biopsy was diagnostic in 18 of 20 patients in whom surgical confirmation was available or in whom malignancy was found and confirmed by clinical follow-up (accuracy of 90%). In the subgroup of patients with pancreatic lesions, 3 had previously undergone nondiagnostic CT-guided fine-needle-aspiration biopsy and 2 did not have evidence of a mass by CT. Real-time fine-needle-aspiration biopsy was diagnostic for malignancy in 4 of these individuals. In the 7 patients with mediastinal lymph nodes, 2 had nondiagnostic transbronchial biopsy and 2 had no evidence of mediastinal lymphadenopathy by CT scan. Endosonography-guided real-time fine-needle-aspiration biopsy diagnosed malignancy in both individuals with nondiagnostic transbronchial studies and was able to identify mediastinal lymphadenopathy in the 2 patients with negative CT scans (malignancy confirmed with real-time fine-needle-aspiration biopsy in 1). Overall, in 9 of 10 lesions in which visualization by CT was not possible (5), CT-guided fine-needle aspiration was unsuccessful (3), or prior nonsurgical biopsy techniques were unsuccessful (2), real-time fine-needle-aspiration biopsy was diagnostic.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Duct-penetrating sign at MRCP: usefulness for differentiating inflammatory pancreatic mass from pancreatic carcinomas.To define the duct-penetrating sign at magnetic resonance (MR) cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and to assess the usefulness of this sign for distinguishing an inflammatory pancreatic mass (IPM) from a conventional pancreatic carcinoma (CPC) compared with arterial phase computed tomography (hereafter, CT) and arterial phase MR imaging (hereafter, MR imaging).MRCP, CT, and MR images were compared by means of receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis for 11 IPMs and 43 CPCs. With the MRCP images, a morphologic classification of the main pancreatic duct (MPD) was attempted for all lesions. On the basis of this classification and the enhancement patterns of a lesion, all readers graded the presence of IPM or CPC on a five-point scale for all images.On the MRCP images, the morphologic characteristics of the MPD were nonobstruction for IPM (28 of 33, 85%) and obstruction or irregular stenosis for CPC (124 of 129, 96%). At ROC analysis among all the techniques, MRCP images had the highest value (0.98) for significant areas under the ROC curve (CT, 0.84; MR, 0.76) (P <.001). For the duct-penetrating sign in the broad sense (nonobstructed MPD) and the sign in the narrow sense (only normal MPD), the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy for diagnosis of IPM were 85%, 96%, and 94%, respectively, and 36%, 100%, and 87%, respectively.The duct-penetrating sign on MRCP images was more helpful to distinguish IPM from CPC than were the enhancement patterns on CT and MR images.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration.Thirty-eight consecutive patients underwent endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration. Of 46 lesions, 34 were extraluminal (12 pancreatic masses, 8 periesophageal nodes, 6 celiac nodes, 2 pericolonic masses, 1 mediastinal mass, 1 perigastric mass, 1 liver, 1 periduodenal node, 1 perirectal mass, 1 perirectal node) and 12 were submucosal (8 gastric, 3 duodenal, 1 esophageal). One hundred sixty-three passes were made, with an average of 3.5 passes per lesion and 4.3 passes per patient (range, 1 to 8). Adequate specimens were obtained from 91% of targeted lesions. The overall diagnostic accuracy was 87%. In patients with malignant lesions, sensitivity was 91% and specificity 100%. Celiac nodes were successfully sampled and diagnostic in 5 of 6 (83%) patients. No complications occurred. Using this technique, an initial tissue diagnosis of malignancy was made in 66% of cancer patients without a previous diagnosis and the preoperative stage was changed in 44% of cancer patients. The additional information gained by this modality directly influenced the decision not to perform surgery in 26% of patients with a primary malignancy. Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration is feasible and can be safely used to evaluate submucosal and extraluminal lesions in both the upper and lower gastrointestinal tract with a high degree of diagnostic accuracy.The usefulness of S100P, mesothelin, fascin, prostate stem cell antigen, and 14-3-3 sigma in diagnosing pancreatic adenocarcinoma in cytological specimens obtained by endoscopic ultrasound guided fine-needle aspiration.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) of the pancreas is an efficient and minimally invasive procedure for the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic adenocarcinoma. Because of some limitations of EUS-FNA in diagnosis of well-differentiated or early stage cancers, the purpose of this study is to assess the added benefit of immunohistochemistry. We studied five proteins overexpressed in pancreatic adenocarcinoma, namely, prostate stem cell antigen, fascin, 14-3-3 sigma, mesothelin and S100P utilizing immunohistochemistry on paraffin sections from cellblocks obtained by EUS-FNA. Sixty-two cases of EUS-FNA of the pancreas that had follow-up histological and/or clinical diagnosis and sufficient material in cell blocks were included. Using histological diagnosis and/or clinical outcome as the reference standard, EUS-FNA shows the highest sensitivity (95%) and specificity (91%) and is superior to any marker in this study. Among five antibodies, S100P reveals the best diagnostic characters showing 90% of sensitivity and 67% of specificity. Fascin shows high specificity (92%) but low sensitivity (38%). Mesothelin has a moderate sensitivity (74%) and low specificity (33%), PSCA and 14-3-3 show high sensitivity but zero specificity. S100P and mesothelin were useful in nine indeterminate cases. S100P correctly predicted six of seven cancers and one of one without cancer and mesothelin correctly diagnosed five of seven cancers and one of two noncancers in this group. EUS-FNA cytomorphology is superior to any of the immunohistochemical markers used in this study. Use of S100P and mesothelin in cytologically borderline cases can increase the diagnostic accuracy in this group.Ratio of pancreatic duct caliber to width of pancreatic gland by endosonography is predictive of pancreatic cancer.This study aimed to determine whether (1) a pancreatic duct (PD) diameter to pancreatic gland width (G) ratio (PDG) by endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) predicts pancreatic cancer (PC) and (2) whether this ratio better indicates PC compared to PD dilation alone.Patients presenting for EUS were classified into the following 4 categories: (1) normal, (2) noncalcific chronic pancreatitis (NCCP), (3) calcific CP (CCP), and (4) PC.There were 198 patients enrolled. Final diagnoses were PC (n = 34), CCP (n = 16), and normal/NCCP (n = 148). The median PD diameter (8, 5, and 2 mm, respectively; P = <0.001), G (16, 20, and 17 mm, respectively; P = 0.002), and PDG ratio were significantly different among groups (0.54, 0.25, and 0.12, respectively; P < 0.001). Patients with PC were more likely to have a PDG ratio of greater than or equal to 0.34 compared to CCP, and normal/NCCP groups (94%, 19%, 1.3%, respectively; P < 0.001). The positive predictive value, negative predictive value, sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of PDG greater than or equal to 0.34 for detecting cancer were 87%, 99%, 94%, 97%, and 97%, respectively. The accuracy and positive predictive value of PD dilation alone for diagnosing PC were 83% and 50%, respectively.A PDG ratio is a good predictor of PC and is better than PD dilation. This sign should be routinely used by endosonographers to improve EUS diagnostic capability of PC.Clinical utility and diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration of pancreatic lesions: Saudi Arabian experience.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) has emerged as a new and effective tool in the evaluation of pancreatic mass lesions. It has proven to be a safe, accurate, and reliable diagnostic procedure and should be performed in centers with experienced gastroenterologists and cytopathologists for optimum results. In this study, we elaborate on our experience of specimen adequacy criteria, overall efficiency of the technique, and the cytomorphologic features of various pancreatic lesions.EUS-FNA of the pancreas and subsequent surgical and/or clinical follow-up of all cases performed at King Khalid University Hospital, King Saud University, Riyadh, Saudi Arabia, from November 2006 to January 2010, were retrospectively reviewed. Diff-Quik and Papanicolaou staining methods were used. Immunohistochemistry stains on cell-block preparations were applied whenever available and required. A total of 43 aspirates from 42 patients were available for retrospective review, including 37 (86%) adequate/diagnostic and 6 (14%) inadequate/non-diagnostic cases. The diagnostic group included 17 (46%) malignant and 20 (54%) benign cases. Of the malignant category (17 cases), 11 (65%) were diagnosed as positive for adenocarcinoma, 4 (23%) as neuroendocrine tumor, 1 (6%) as solid pseudo-papillary neoplasm, and 1 (6%) as non-Hodgkin's lymphoma. The benign category (20 cases) included 5 (25%) cysts/pseudo-cysts, 8 (40%) non-specific pancreatitis, 4 (20%) granulomatous/tuberculous pancreatitis, 1 (5%) benign neoplasm, and 2 (10%) benign not otherwise specified, both were proven to be false-negative cases. The sensitivity, specificity and accuracy rate for the diagnosis of cancers were 74, 100, and 86%, respectively. No false-positive results were reported. All malignant cases showed characteristic cytomorphologic features that were sufficient for their diagnosis.EUS-FNA in adequate samples is an efficient and accurate modality in the diagnosis of pancreatic lesions. Applying immunohistochemical studies on cell-block preparation can facilitate the final, definitive, and specific diagnosis of some difficult pancreatic neoplasms.Clinical impact of on-site cytopathology interpretation on endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-guided FNA) is becoming a preferred modality for diagnosing and staging GI and mediastinal malignancies. Although experts advocate on-site cytopathology assessment for tissue sample adequacy, there are few data to support this claim. Our goal was to determine whether on-site cytopathology interpretation improves the diagnostic yield of EUS-guided FNA.EUS-guided FNA results from two university hospital centers were reviewed and compared. At center 1, where EUS-guided FNA was performed with a cytopathologist on site, the results of 108 consecutive patients were evaluated. At center 2, where a cytopathologist is unavailable, the results of 87 consecutive patients were reviewed. One endoscopist performed all procedures at both institutions. Cytologic diagnoses were categorized as positive or negative for malignancy, suspicious for malignancy, atypical/indeterminate, or unsatisfactory. The number of repeat procedures, needle passes, medication use, target site, age, and sex were compared between the two sites.Patients at center 2 were older (p = 0.04) and predominantly female (p = 0.03). Pancreas was the most common target site at center 2, whereas thoraco-abdominal nodes were the most common at center 1 (p = 0.0001). Patients at center 1 had a diagnosis of positive or negative for malignancy more frequently (p = 0.001) and were less likely to have an unsatisfactory specimen (p = 0.035) or repeat procedure, although the latter was not significant (p = 0.156).On-site cytopathology interpretation improves the diagnostic yield of EUS-guided FNA. EUS centers should allocate resources to cover for on-site cytopathology evaluation.[Cystic space-occupying lesion of the pancreas. Invasive mucinous cystadenocarcinoma of the tail of the pancreas].Can long-term follow-up strategies be determined using a nomogram-based prediction model of malignancy among intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas?This study investigated whether a risk assessment nomogram can predict the malignant potential of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) and provide valuable information for the follow-up and counseling strategies of such patients.We studied 126 of 589 patients with IPMN who were followed up for at least 36 months with annual endoscopic ultrasonography. We analyzed scores derived from our nomogram, incorporating the parameters of sex, lesion type, mural nodule height, and pancreatic juice cytology determined at the initial IPMN evaluation.The rate of malignant IPMNs was 5.5% (7/126). The initial average nomogram score was 19.8 (range, 0-55), and the final follow-up average was 23.8 (range, 0-109). When a cutoff score was set at 35 points, the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of the nomogram to assess malignancy risk were 87.5%, 96.6%, and 96%, respectively. The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve of malignant IPMN prediction during follow-up was 0.865.The ability of the nomogram to predict malignancy in patients with IPMN was validated. Our findings can suggest that a follow-up for patients at high and low risk for cancer progression could be scheduled every 3 to 6 and 12 months, respectively.Correlation between CT patterns and pathological classification of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm.To examine CT patterns of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN), analyze their correlation with pathologic classification, and discuss the value of CT in the diagnosis and differential diagnosis of IPMN.CT patterns of 39 IPMN patients, whose clinical data were complete and whose diagnosis was confirmed by surgery and pathology, were classified into three types: (1) simple main pancreatic duct (MPD) dilation type, (2) MPD dilation with pancreatic cystic lesion type, and (3) simple pancreatic cystic lesion type. Correlations between the three CT types and Takada pathologic classification (MPD type, furcation type and mixture type) were analyzed. The 39 IPMN cases were pathologically classified as the benign group and the malignant/borderline group. CT characteristics including the presence or absence of mural nodules, intrafocal partitions, focal size and the degree of MPD and common bile duct (CBD) dilation were analyzed statistically.A correlation was found between the CT simple MPD dilation type and the pathological MPD type, between the MPD dilation with pancreatic cystic lesion type and the furcation and mixture types, and between the simple cystic lesion type and the furcation type (p<0.001). The benign rate was 92% in patients without intrafocal mural nodules, and 42% in patients with intrafocal mural nodules. The difference between the two groups was statistically significant (p=0.003). The presence or absence of intrafocal partitions was not correlated with benignancy or malignancy (p=0.793). The maximum diameter of malignant/borderline lesions was bigger than that of benign ones (p=0.016). There was no significant difference in MPD and CBD diameters between the benign and malignant/borderline groups. Regardless of pathological classification, the MPD diameter was larger than the CBD diameter in all cases (p=0.02).The three CT types of IPMN well correlated with the pathologic classification, which is helpful for analyzing CT manifestations and improving the accuracy of diagnosis. MPD dilation is usually larger than CBD dilation in IPMN patients, which is also helpful in the diagnosis and differential diagnosis of IPMN in the context of other related findings.Factors predictive of adverse events associated with endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration of pancreatic solid lesions.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) provides high diagnostic accuracy with a low incidence of procedural complications. However, it occasionally causes serious complications, and factors that increase the susceptibility to such adverse events remain unknown.We aimed to examine post-procedural events and determine risk factors associated with EUS-FNA of pancreatic solid lesions.This single-center retrospective study included 316 consecutive patients with pancreatic solid lesions who underwent 327 EUS-FNA procedures from April 2003 to September 2011. We registered all patients undergoing EUS-FNA in the database and retrospectively ascertained the presence/absence of post-procedural adverse events.The incidence of post-procedural adverse events, including moderate to mild pancreatitis, mild abdominal pain, and mild bleeding, was 3.4 %. Univariate analysis showed that the incidence of post-procedural events was significantly increased in patients with tumors less than or equal to 20 mm in diameter (P < 0.001), those with pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (PNET) (P = 0.012), and patients who had intervening normal pancreas for accessing the lesion (P = 0.048). Multivariate analysis identified tumors measuring less than or equal to 20 mm in diameter (OR 18.48; 95 % CI 3.55-96.17) and case of PNETs (OR 36.50; 95 % CI 1.73-771.83) were an independent risk factors.EUS-FNA of pancreatic solid lesions is a safe procedure. However, pancreatic lesions with small diameters and pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors are important factors associated with adverse events after EUS-FNA.Endoscopic ultrasound guided fine needle aspiration of malignant pancreatic lesions.To evaluate the accuracy, safety, and clinical utility of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) of pancreatic masses.Forty-seven patients were referred for EUS with a pancreatic mass and suspicion of pancreatic cancer based upon painless obstructive jaundice, epigastric abdominal pain plus weight loss/anorexia, or idiopathic pancreatitis. All patients underwent EUS with both radial (Olympus UM20) and linear array (Pentax FG32-UA) systems. After TNM staging by EUS, ultrasound directed FNA of the pancreatic mass was performed using a 23 gauge, 4 cm long needle.EUS-guided FNA was performed in all 47 patients. Results: successful targeting = 100%, adequate cellularity = 100%,adeno Ca = 25, squamous cell Ca = 1, lymphoma = 1, poorly differentiated Ca= 1, atypical cytology or suspicious for carcinoma = 9, no malignant cells = 10. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of EUS-guided pancreatic FNA for the diagnosis of malignancy was 64%, 100%, 100% and 16% respectively.EUS with FNA is useful for detection of malignancy in a pancreatic mass. The procedure appears to have a complication rate of 2%. Impact of this technique on clinical management of patients needs further evaluation.Value of 18-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography in the management of patients with cystic tumors of the pancreas.To assess the reliability of 18-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (18-FDG PET) in distinguishing benign from malignant cystic lesions of the pancreas.The preoperative differential diagnosis of cystic lesions of the pancreas remains difficult: the most important point is to identify malignant or premalignant cysts that require resection. 18-FDG PET is a new imaging procedure based on the increased glucose metabolism by tumor cells and has been proposed for the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer.During a 4-year period, 56 patients with a suspected cystic tumor of the pancreas underwent 18-FDG PET in addition to computed tomography scanning, serum CA 19-9 assay, and in some instances magnetic resonance imaging or endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography. The 18-FDG PET was analyzed visually and semiquantitatively using the standard uptake value. The accuracy of 18-FDG PET and computed tomography was determined for preoperative diagnosis of a malignant cyst.Seventeen patients had malignant tumors. Sixteen patients (94%) showed 18-FDG uptake with a standard uptake value of 2.6 to 12.0. Twelve patients (70%) were correctly identified as having malignancy by computed tomography, CA 19-9 assay, or both. Thirty-nine patients had benign tumors: only one mucinous cystadenoma showed increased 18-FDG uptake (standard uptake value 2.6). Five patients with benign cysts showed computed tomography findings of malignancy. Sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for 18-FDG PET and computed tomography scanning in detecting malignant tumors were 94%, 97%, 94%, and 97% and 65%, 87%, 69%, and 85%, respectively.18-FDG PET is more accurate than computed tomography in identifying malignant pancreatic cystic lesions and should be used, in combination with computed tomography and tumor markers assay, in the preoperative evaluation of patients with pancreatic cystic lesions. A positive result on 18-FDG PET strongly suggests malignancy and, therefore, a need for resection; a negative result shows a benign tumor that may be treated with limited resection or, in selected high-risk patients, with biopsy, follow-up, or both.Efficacy of endoscopic ultrasound guided fine needle aspiration in patients with solid pancreatic neoplasms.Endosonography is a distinct method for evaluating the structural lesions of the gastrointestinal (GI) tract, particularly the pancreatobilliary region. This procedure has made a fundamental change in the diagnosis of pancreatic mass lesion through providing fine needle aspiration. This study aims at evaluating the results and efficacy of endoscopic ultrasound fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in patients with pancreatic solid mass.The present study is an observational, prospective case series nature, evaluated patients with pancreatic solid mass referred to Imam Khomeini educational hospital in Tehran for a duration of one year since November 2010. In order to determine the false negative cases, the patients were followed-up from 6 to 12 months.EUS-FNA was conducted on all 53 patients without any complication. The majority of patients included in the study were males (68%) and 81% of patients had a mass in the head of pancreas. The result of cytopathology revealed 36 adenocarcinomas (68%), 7 other malignancies (13%), benign lesions (6%) and 7 non-diagnostic cases (13%). The frequency of non-diagnostic results was significantly high in masses smaller than 3 cm (6 vs. 1, P < 0.002). Patients with non-diagnostic result were younger than those with malignant cytopathology (52 ± 7.5 vs. 66 ± 7.5 years, P < 0.001).. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and accuracy of this procedure concerning Adenocarcinoma were 88%, 100%, 100%, 70% and 90%, respectively.EUS - FNA is an effective and safe procedure in histopathologic diagnosis of pancreatic tumors. This procedure is useful in all pancreatic mass cases including resectable and non-resectable ones.Contrast-Enhanced Endoscopic Ultrasonography for Pancreatic Tumors.To investigate the usefulness of contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasonography (CE-EUS) for histological differentiation of pancreatic tumors.CE-EUS was performed for consecutive patients having a pancreatic solid lesion, and tumors were classified into three vascular patterns (hypervascular, isovascular, and hypovascular) at two time phases (early-phase and late-phase). Correlation between vascular patterns and histopathology of resected pancreatic cancer (PC) tissues was ascertained.The final diagnoses of 147 examined tumors were PC (n = 109), inflammatory mass (n = 11), autoimmune pancreatitis (n = 9), neuroendocrine tumor (n = 8), and others (n = 10). In late-phase images, 104 of 109 PCs had the hypovascular pattern, for a diagnostic sensitivity and specificity of 94% and 71%, respectively. Of 28 resected PCs, 10 had isovascular, and 18 hypovascular, patterns on the early-phase image. Early-phase isovascular PCs were more likely to be differentiated than were early-phase hypovascular PCs (6 well and 4 moderately differentiated versus 3 well, 14 moderately, and 1 poorly differentiated, P = 0.028). Immunostaining revealed that hypovascular areas of early-phase images reflected heterogeneous tumor cells with fibrous tissue, necrosis, and few vessels.CE-EUS could be useful for distinguishing PC from other solid pancreatic lesions and for histological differentiation of PCs.CT diagnosis of intraductal papillary neoplasm of the pancreas in comparison with histopathologic findings.The existence of excrescent nodules in the cystic component of intraductal papillary neoplasms (IPN) on computed tomography (CT) is useful for differentiating between malignant and benign lesions.We sought to evaluate the ability of CT to differentiate malignant from benign lesions in IPN of the pancreas.CT findings in 20 cases of IPN (11 benign and 9 malignant lesions) were compared with histopathological findings from subsequent surgery.The size of the cystic portion on CT did not correlate with the malignant potential of the lesion. Seven (78%) of 9 malignant lesions had excrescent nodules on CT, whereas 1 (9%) of 11 benign lesions did.International Consensus Guidelines parameters for the prediction of malignancy in intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm are not properly weighted and are not cumulative.The International Consensus Guidelines (ICG) stratify risk for malignancy in patients with intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) into three progressive categories according to whether patients show 'no criteria', 'worrisome features' (WFs) or 'high-risk stigmata' (HRS).This study was conducted to test the hypothesis that type (clinical versus radiological) and quantity of ICG WFs and HRS carry unequal weight and are not cumulative in the prediction of risk for malignancy or invasiveness in IPMN.A retrospective review of a prospectively maintained database of patients who underwent surgical resection for IPMN at a single, university-based medical centre during 1992-2012 was performed. Differences that achieved a P-value of <0.05 were considered significant.Of 362 patients, 340 were eligible for entry into the study and were categorized as demonstrating no criteria (n = 70), WFs (n = 185) or HRS (n = 85). Patients in the WFs group had higher rates of malignant and invasive IPMN than those in the no-criteria group [26.5% versus 4.3% (P < 0.0001) and 15.7% versus 4.3% (P = 0.02), respectively]. Patients in the HRS group had higher rates of malignant and invasive IPMN than those in the WFs group [56.5% versus 26.5% (P = 0.0001) and 42.4% versus 15.7% (P = 0.0001), respectively]. When radiological parameters only were considered for WFs versus HRS, no difference was found in rates of malignant or invasive IPMN. By contrast, when clinical parameters only were considered, patients in the HRS group had higher rates of malignant or invasive IPMN [66.7% versus 8.1% (P = 0.04) and 66.7% versus 2.7% (P = 0.01), respectively]. There was no stepwise increase in rates of malignant or invasive IPMN with the number of WFs. However, patients with only one WF had a lower risk for malignancy than patients with two or more WFs.The type and quantity of ICG WFs and HRS carry unequal weight and are not cumulative in the prediction of risk for malignancy or invasiveness in IPMN.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration with cyst fluid analysis in pancreatic cystic neoplasms.Pancreatic cystic neoplasms represent a heterogeneous group of tumors with varied malignant potential. The aim of this prospective study was to evaluate EUS, EUS-FNA and cyst fluid analysis in distinguishing serous cystadenomas (SCA) and mucinous cystic neoplasms (MCN).Twelve patients with SCA (4 men, 8 women, mean age 58), 16 with MCN (3 men, 13 women, mean age 53) and 10 pancreatic non-tumorous cysts as controls (1 man, 9 women, mean age 43) were investigated by EUS-FNA from January 2003 to February 2006. Cyst fluid evaluation was done for cytology, amylase, CEA, CA 19-9, CA 72-4 and CA 15-3 (RIA). The final diagnosis was based on surgery & histology (14 patients) and/or follow-up after EUS-FNA (mean 15 months).In the MCN-group 13 mucinous cystadenomas, 2 cystadenocarcinomas and 1 malignant IPMT were found. EUS-FNA results: cytology (including staining for mucin) was diagnostic in 2/12 SCA (17%), 10/16 MCN (63%) and negative in all controls. Fluid CEA in MCN-group (mean 9487, 95%CI 0-23637) was significantly higher compared both with SCA-group (mean 22, 95%CI 0-54, p<0.001) and controls (mean 4, 95%CI 0.5-8, p<0.001). Similar results were found in fluid CA72-4 and fluid CA19-9. Accuracy of EUS-FNA with final diagnosis was 93%.EUS-FNA with cyst fluid CEA, CA72-4, CA19-9 and cytology are useful tools in differentiating SCA, MCN and non-tumorous cysts.Diagnostic ability and factors affecting accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration for pancreatic solid lesions: Japanese large single center experience.Several studies have investigated the diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) for pancreatic lesions, but they have included only limited patient populations. This study aimed to clarify the diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA in a large number of pancreatic lesions, and to describe the factors that influence it.From March 1997 to May 2010, 944 consecutive patients who had undergone EUS-FNA for pancreatic solid lesions were evaluated retrospectively. Factors affecting EUS-FNA accuracy were then analyzed.A total of 996 solid pancreatic lesions were sampled by EUS-FNA. The overall sampling adequacy and diagnostic accuracy of these lesions were 99.3 % (989/996) and 91.8 % (918/996), respectively. The sensitivity and specificity for differentiating malignant from benign lesions were 91.5 % (793/867) and 97.7 % (126/129), respectively. The diagnostic performance was significantly higher when both cytological and cell-block examinations were carried out than with only cytological examination. In multivariate analysis, final diagnosis, location of lesion, lesion size, availability of on-site cytopathological evaluation, and experience of EUS-FNA procedure were independent factors affecting the accuracy of EUS-FNA. On-site cytopathological evaluation and lesion size were found to be the most weighted factors affecting diagnostic accuracy.EUS-FNA for pancreatic solid lesions yielded a high accuracy and low complication rate. Both cytological and cell-block preparations and on-site cytopathological evaluation contributed to improve the accuracy. The diagnostic ability of EUS-FNA was less for smaller lesions, and repeated procedures may be needed if malignancy is suspected.Small and potentially resectable focal pancreatic lesions noted on CT/MRI scans in nonjaundiced patients: likelihood of neoplasia and utility of EUS.Management of small and potentially resectable "mass" lesions encountered on CT/MRI scans in patients without obstructive jaundice (ObJ) is rather empirical since there is scant data on likelihood of neoplasm to formulate treatment strategies. We evaluated (1) the prevalence of neoplasm and (2) performance characteristics of EUS-FNA for diagnosing neoplasm in above-mentioned subset of patients.This is a retrospective analysis of 232 patients (without ObJ) with a focal pancreatic lesion, ≤ 25 mm and potentially resectable on CT/MRI who underwent EUS-FNA from 2002 to 2009.Seventy-five patients (32.3%, 95% CI 26.6, 38.6) were finally diagnosed to have a neoplasm. Four of 92 (4.3%) lesions ≤ 15 mm, 13 of 57(22.8%) lesions 16-20 mm, and 35 of 83 (42.1%) lesions 21-25 mm had an adenocarcinoma. Larger lesion size, older patient age, and h/o recent weight loss significantly increased the likelihood of adenocarcinoma. EUS-FNA had 98.2% overall accuracy and 98.1% NPV with no significant differences based on lesion size.In nonjaundiced patient with a potentially resectable pancreatic lesion ≤25 mm in size noted on CT/MRI scanning, EUS-FNA can provide useful adjunctive information to optimize the use of surgery and can potentially obviate the need for "wait and watch approach" with repeat imaging in their clinical management.Comparison of contrast-enhanced sonography and MRI in displaying anatomic features of cystic pancreatic masses.The purpose of this study was to compare the accuracy rates of unenhanced sonography, contrast-enhanced sonography, and MRI in displaying the anatomic features of cystic pancreatic masses larger than 1.5 mm in diameter.Unenhanced and contrast-enhanced sonographic and MRI examinations of 33 patients who underwent resection of a cystic pancreatic mass were retrospectively reviewed. Two radiologists blinded to the final histologic diagnosis reviewed the images, specifically assessing the presence of intralesional mural nodules and septa. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy were calculated on the basis of correlation with surgical findings. Results of unenhanced sonography, contrast-enhanced sonography, and MRI were compared by McNemar test. Correlation of unenhanced and contrast-enhanced sonographic versus pathologic results was established with Spearman's test. Interobserver variability was determined.Contrast-enhanced sonography correctly depicted intralesional septa in 14 of 15 lesions (sensitivity, 93.3%; specificity, 88.8%; positive predictive value, 87.5%; negative predictive value, 94.1%; accuracy, 90.9%) and nodules in six of eight lesions (sensitivity, 75%; specificity, 96%; positive predictive value, 85.7%; negative predictive value, 92.3%; accuracy, 90.9%). MRI correctly depicted intralesional septa in 14 of 15 lesions (sensitivity, 93.3%; specificity, 61.1%; positive predictive value, 66.6%; negative predictive value, 91.6%; accuracy, 75.7%) and nodules in seven of eight lesions (sensitivity, 87.5%; specificity, 80%; positive predictive value, 58.3%; negative predictive value, 95.2%; accuracy, 81.8%). The difference between the diagnostic accuracy of contrast-enhanced sonography and that of MRI was not significant (p = 0.05, McNemar test) in the identification of septa and nodules. The correlation between contrast-enhanced sonographic findings and pathologic results (Rs = 0.93; p < 0.001) was significantly better than that between sonographic and pathologic results (Rs = 0.52; p < 0.0001). Interobserver agreement had a kappa value of 0.86-0.94.Contrast-enhanced sonography compares favorably with MRI in displaying the anatomic features of cystic pancreatic masses seen on transabdominal sonography.Value of endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) in the diagnosis of neoplastic tumor(-like) pancreatic lesions in daily clinical practice.To investigate the value of EUS-guided FNA in the diagnosis of solid and cystic pancreatic tumor(-like) lesions as well as metastatic tumor growth within peripancreatic lymph nodes and its impact on therapeutic decision-making. The results of the cytologic and pathohistological investigation were compared with i) each other and ii) the detection rates of various imaging procedures.Overall, 153 patients (mean age, 56.9 years) underwent EUS-guided FNA from I/ 2000 - III/ 2003.Comparing various imaging procedures such as CT scan (80 %), MRI (57.1 %) and abdominal US (88.8 %), EUS achieved the highest diagnostic accuracy: 100 %. For EUS-based T-staging in 26 patients with malignant tumor lesions undergoing surgical intervention, there was a sensitivity of 73.3 % (specificity, 85.9 %; PPV, 69.2 %; NPV, 84.4 %), while the parameters for N-staging (n = 25) were: sensitivity, 61.5 %; specificity, 75 %; NPV, 64.3 %; PPV, 72.7 %. While the sensitivity of EUS-guided FNA in the group of patients who underwent surgical intervention (n = 55) was 81.4 % (specificity, 75 %; PPV, 92.1 %; NPV, 52.9 %), the parameters were as follows in the subgroup of individuals with chronic pancreatitis (n = 30): sensitivity in detecting a malignant pancreatic tumor lesion, 50 %; specificity, 91.7 %; PPV, 60 %; NPV, 88 %. Based on preoperative characteristics such as suspected diagnosis, TNM stage and tumor entity, a surgical intervention could be avoided in 29 / 153 patients (19 %).EUS-guided FNA allows more precise diagnosis clarification (malignant tumor growth and tumor entity) in solid and cystic pancreatic tumor(-like) lesions, which may assist in early and sufficient therapeutic decision-making.Diagnostic value of unusual gross appearance of aspirated material from endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration of pancreatic and peripancreatic cystic lesions.To evaluate the diagnostic value of the gross appearance of aspirated material from endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) of pancreatic orperipancreatic cystic lesions.This study focuses on nonneoplastic (peri)-pancreatic cystic lesions on EUS-FNA. Eight cases were identified with distinct gross appearances of aspirated material by the authors' experience and by computerized review. Gross observations are evaluated together with clinical data, radiologic findings, laboratory markers and cytologic and surgical microscopy findings.Aspiration of cystic lesions often results in nonspecific cytologic findings. Gross and microscopic appearance of aspirated material can provide valuable information. We divide findings of 8 cystic lesions into 3 different patterns according to their gross appearance at on-site EUS-FNA: Pattern 1, 2 cases of biloma; Pattern 2, 1 case of lymphoepithelial cyst with sebaceous differentiation; Pattern 3, 3 cases of regular lymphoepithelial cysts and 2 cases ofpancreatic pseudocyst.The full value of FNA is achieved only with the integrated approach, including the gross appearance of the cytology specimens. Certain unusual gross appearances of the aspirated material can add valuable information toward a pathologic diagnosis.Intraductal papillary-mucinous tumors of the pancreas: differential diagnosis between benign and malignant tumors by endoscopic ultrasonography.Recently, intraductal papillary-mucinous tumor (IPMT) of the pancreas has increasingly been recognized. However, differential diagnosis between benign and malignant IPMT is often difficult using conventional imaging modalities. The purpose of this study was to retrospectively investigate the value of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) for differentiating malignant from benign IPMT.A total of 51 patients with IPMT were preoperatively examined by EUS. The endosonograhic findings were compared with histopathological findings of the resected specimens.In main duct type IPMT, the diameter of the main pancreatic duct (MPD) was > or =10 mm in seven of the eight malignant tumors, compared with two of the seven benign tumors (p < 0.05). In branch duct type IPMT, three of the four large tumors (>40 mm) with irregular thick septa were malignant lesions. In both main duct type IPMT and branch duct IPMT, eight patients had large mural nodules (>10 mm); seven of the eight tumors were malignant and one of the eight tumors was benign. When the tumor was diagnosed as malignant according to above three findings, EUS was able to differentiate between malignant and benign IPMT with an accuracy of 86%.Main duct type tumors with > or =10 mm dilated MPD, branch duct type tumors (>40 mm) with irregular septa, and large mural nodules (>10 mm) strongly suggest malignancy on EUS. EUS would be a useful modality for differentiating between benign and malignant IPMT.Quantitative analysis of diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging of the pancreas: usefulness in characterizing solid pancreatic masses.To evaluate whether measurement of apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC) and pure diffusion coefficient (D) can help to characterize solid pancreatic masses.Diffusion-weighted MR imaging was performed in both a patient group (n = 71; pancreatic cancer [n = 47], mass-forming pancreatitis [n = 13], solid pseudopapillary neoplasm [n = 6], and neuroendocrine tumor [n = 5]) and a normal control group (n = 11) by applying three b-factors of 0, 500, and 1000 sec/mm(2). ADC(500), ADC(1000), D (ADC using b = 500 and 1000 sec/mm(2)), and perfusion fraction (f, 1- exp [-500 sec/mm(2) x (ADC(500) - D)]) of normal pancreas, pancreatic cancer, and mass-forming pancreatitis were compared using the Kruskal-Wallis test. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis was performed to evaluate the diagnostic performance and optimal cutoff value of these parameters in differentiating pancreatic cancer from mass-forming pancreatitis.Normal pancreas had significantly higher mean ADC(500), ADC(1000), and f than either pancreatic cancer (P < 0.001, < 0.001, and 0.004, respectively) or mass-forming pancreatitis (P < 0.001, < 0.001, and 0.002, respectively). ADC(500), ADC(1000), and D of mass-forming pancreatitis were significantly lower than those of pancreatic cancer (P = 0.002, 0.004, and 0.014, respectively). Sensitivities and specificities in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer were 72.3% and 76.9% for ADC(500), 87.2% and 69.2% for ADC(1000), 87.2% and 61.5% for D, and 42.6% and 92.3% for f, respectively.Measurement of ADC and D may be helpful in differentiating pancreatic cancers from mass-forming pancreatitis.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration for diagnosis of solid pseudopapillary tumors of the pancreas: a multicenter experience.Solid pseudopapillary tumors of the pancreas are rare, low-grade, epithelial neoplasms that are usually discovered incidentally in young women. Distinguishing solid pseudopapillary tumors from other pancreatic tumors, especially pancreatic endocrine tumors, can be challenging. The role of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in this context remains unclear. The purpose of this study was to describe the endoscopic ultrasound features of solid pseudopapillary tumors and the role of EUS-FNA in the preoperative diagnosis of these tumors.Patients from five tertiary referral centers with surgically confirmed solid pseudopapillary tumors who had undergone preoperative EUS-FNA were included. The endoscopic ultrasound findings, cytologic descriptions, immunostaining results, operative records, surgical pathology, and results of the most recent clinical follow-up were reviewed.A total of 28 patients were identified (four men [14 %], 24 women [86 %], mean age +/- standard deviation [SD] 35 +/- 10 years). Solid pseudopapillary tumors had been found as incidental findings on cross-sectional imaging in 50 % of cases. The mean tumor size +/- SD was 42 +/- 19.5 mm and the majority were located in the pancreatic body and tail. The endoscopic ultrasound report described a well-defined, echo-poor mass in 86 %; the tumors were solid in 14 patients (50 %), mixed solid and cystic in 11 patients (39 %), and cystic in three patients (11 %). A preoperative diagnosis of solid pseudopapillary tumor was made in 21 patients (75 %) on the basis of EUS-FNA cytology. Surgical resection was performed in all cases. Laparoscopic resection was performed in eight of these patients (29 %).A solid pseudopapillary tumor should be included in the differential diagnosis of any well-demarcated, echo-poor, solid or mixed solid/cystic pancreatic lesion seen during endoscopic ultrasound, particularly in young women. The diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA for solid pseudopapillary tumors was 75 % in this study. A definitive preoperative diagnosis can guide the surgical approach in selected cases.The role of pancreatic cyst fluid molecular analysis in predicting cyst pathology.Current methods to detect malignancy in mucinous cystic neoplasms of the pancreas remain inadequate. The role of detailed molecular analysis in this context was investigated.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided pancreatic cyst aspirates were prospectively collected during a period of 19 months and studied for cytology, carcinoembryonic antigen level, and molecular analysis. Molecular evaluation incorporated DNA quantification (amount and quality), k-ras point mutation, and broad panel tumor suppressor linked microsatellite marker allelic loss analysis by using fluorescent capillary electrophoresis. The sequence of mutation acquisition was also calculated on the basis of a clonal expansion model, and comparison was made to the final pathology.Thirty-six cysts with confirmed histology were analyzed. There were 11 malignant, 15 premalignant, and 10 benign cysts. Malignant cysts could be differentiated from premalignant cysts on the basis of fluid carcinoembryonic antigen level (P=.034), DNA quality (P=.009), number of mutations (P=.002), and on the sequence of mutations acquired (P<.001). Early k-ras mutation followed by allelic loss was the most predictive of a malignant cyst (sensitivity, 91%; specificity, 93%).Malignant cyst fluid contains adequate DNA to allow mutational analysis. A first hit k-ras mutation followed by allelic loss is most predictive of the presence of malignancy in a pancreatic cyst. This approach should serve as an ancillary tool to the conventional work-up of pancreatic cysts. Cumulative amount and timing of detectable mutational damage can assist in diagnosis and clinical management.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided trucut biopsy of the cyst wall for diagnosing cystic pancreatic tumors.Nonoperative methods for diagnosis of pancreas cysts often lack sufficient accuracy. Accurate diagnosis is needed to determine prognosis and guide clinical management. The aim of this study was to determine whether the tissue obtained by endoscopic ultrasound-guided trucut biopsy (EUS TCB) is sufficient for histologic diagnosis of cystic pancreatic tumors (CPTs).EUS TCB was performed in patients with a suspected CPT. A dedicated gastrointestinal pathologist reviewed the core biopsies. The final diagnosis was based on clinical, laboratory, imaging, and biopsy findings, and resected specimens when available.EUS TCB was performed in 10 patients with a suspected CPT. Final diagnoses included serous cystadenoma (SCA, n=5), islet cell tumor (n=2), mixed seromucinous lesion (n=1), polycystic disease of the pancreas (n=1), and pseudocyst (n=1). EUS TCB was nondiagnostic in 3 of 10 patients. Among the other 7 patients, TCB diagnosed 4 SCAs, obviating the need for planned surgery in 3 patients. In the fourth patient with an SCA, the TCB result ruled out metastatic disease from locally recurrent lung cancer, allowing a narrowed radiation field. EUS TCB confirmed the need for surgery in 2 patients with an islet cell tumor. In 1 patient, EUS TCB findings were "partially" diagnostic, leading to previously unplanned surgery.This report establishes the capability and safety of EUS TCB to collect sufficient tissue for diagnosing CPTs. The results might help guide clinical management.Decision making for pancreatic resection in patients with intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms.To identify a practical approach for preoperative decision-making in patients with intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) of the pancreas.Between March 1999 and November 2006, the clinical characteristics, pathological data and computed tomography/magnetic resonance imaging (CT/MRI) of 54 IPMNs cases were retrieved and analyzed. The relationships between the above data and decision-making for pancreatic resection were analyzed using SPSS 13.0 software. Univariate analysis of risk factors for malignant or invasive IPMNs was performed with regard to the following variables: carcinoembryonic antigen, carbohydrate antigen 19-9 (CA19-9) and the characteristics from CT/MRI images. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis for pancreatic resection was performed using significant factors from the univariate analysis.CT/MRI images, including main and mixed duct IPMNs, tumor size > 30 mm or a solid component appearance in the lesion, and preoperative serum CA19-9 > 37 U/mL had good predictive value for determining pancreatic resection (P < 0.05), but with limitations. Combining the above factors (CT/MRI images and CA19-9) improved the accuracy and sensitivity for determining pancreatic resection in IPMNs. Using ROC analysis, the area under the curve reached 0.893 (P < 0.01, 95%CI: 0.763-1.023), with a sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of 95.2%, 83.3%, 95.2% and 83.3%, respectively.Combining preoperative CT/MRI images and CA19-9 level may provide useful information for surgical decision-making in IPMNs.A comparative analysis of pancreas cyst fluid CEA and histology with DNA mutational analysis in the detection of mucin producing or malignant cysts.The main objective of pancreatic cyst fluid analysis is to differentiate mucin-producing or malignant cysts from other cysts which have a benign course. K-ras-2 point mutation and at least two mutations of allelic imbalance or loss of heterozygosity with good quality DNA has been suggested to predict mucinous cystic neoplasm (MCN). Elevated carcinogenic embryonic antigen (CEA) level in cyst fluid has also been shown to be predictive of mucinous or malignant cysts.Identify the clinical impact of DNA mutational analysis of pancreatic cyst fluid with its correlation to cyst fluid chemistry and histologic analysis.This retrospective analysis included all consecutive patients with pancreatic cysts who presented for evaluation by endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) with fine needle aspiration (FNA) over an 18 month period until November 2007.DNA analysis performed by Pathfinder TG (RedPath Integrated Pathology, Inc., Pittsburgh, PA, USA) and fluid CEA exceeding 192 ng/dL were used to suggest mucinous or malignant cysts. These parameters were compared to surgical histology or cytopathology of FNA specimens.Twenty-seven consecutive patients with cysts had samples submitted for DNA analysis which included 15 men and 12 women (mean age 62.8 and 61.3 years, respectively). In 20 patients, all parameters including cyst fluid, DNA analysis, and histology were available for comparison. Consistent findings were seen in 7/20 (35%) in which all parameters suggested negative benign findings. CEA level was elevated in 7 patients of which 4 had mucinous or malignant histology. In the remaining 13 patients with low CEA levels, 11 had negative histology. The sensitivity and specificity of CEA based on these results was 66% and 78.6% respectively. The positive predictive value (PPV) of CEA was 57% and the negative predictive value (NPV) was 84.6%. K-ras-2 mutation was detected in 3 patients, absent in 17 patients and falsely negative in 4 cases based on histology. The sensitivity and specificity were 33% and 92.6% respectively. The PPV was 66% and NPV was 76%. Detection of loss of heterozygosity mutations was noted in 7 patients, of which 4 were falsely positive. In the remaining 13 patients, 3 were falsely negative. The sensitivity and specificity were 50% and 71% respectively. The PPV was 42.9% and NPV was 76.9%. In a group of 6 patients with available surgical histology demonstrating mucin-producing or malignant cysts, fluid CEA level had a sensitivity of 66.7%. However, K-ras-2 and loss of heterozygosity mutational analysis had a much lower sensitivity at 33% and 50% respectively.Consistency in histology, CEA levels, and K-ras-2 and loss of heterozygosity mutations was seen in only 35% of cases, all of which were benign cysts. In the detection of malignant cysts, elevated CEA levels were more predictive of histology in comparison to K-ras-2 or loss of heterozygosity mutations. Additionally, false positivity of loss of heterozygosity mutations was noted to be considerably higher than K-ras-2 mutations or even fluid CEA levels. These findings suggest that DNA mutation analysis should not be used routinely but rather selectively in the evaluation of pancreatic cysts.Role of cystic fluid in diagnosis of the pancreatic cystadenoma and cystadenocarcinoma.Early and accurate diagnosis of cystic neoplasm of the pancreas is difficult especially for the differentiation of benign or malignancy. In this study, we try to compare EUS-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy combined with measurement of the cyst fluid and serum levels of CEA, and CA19-9 for the preoperative diagnosis of pancreatic cystadenoma or cystadenocarcinoma.Retrospective analysis was made on the clinical data of 37 patients with pancreatic cystadenoma and 48 patients with cystadenocarcinoma from 1998 to 2005.Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), and CA19-9 of the cyst fluid and serum combined with EUS-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy was made. Examination of serum CEA, and CA19-9 resulted in 21.0+/-18.0, 2.7+/-1.7 U/L and 18.7+/-17.5, 269.0+/-182.0 U/L for cystadenoma and cystadenocarcinoma respectively (P<0.05). The sensitivity of cyst fluid combined with biopsy was higher than that of a single marker. However, the sensitivity and specificity of tumor markers of cystic fluid were much higher than that of the serum (P<0.05).EUS-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy combined with examination of cyst fluid level of CEA and CA19-9 will be a credible means for early diagnosis of pancreatic cystadenoma and cystadenocarcinoma.Differential diagnosis of cystic tumors of the pancreas by endoscopic ultrasonography.Generally, cystic tumors are divided into two categories: neoplastic cystic tumors and non-neoplastic cystic (NNC) tumors. Neoplastic cystic tumors include mucinous cystic neoplasm (MCN), intraductal papillary-mucinous neoplasm (IPMN), and serous cystic neoplasm (SCN). MCNs and IPMNs have the potential to progress to a malignant state, whereas SCNs are known for their almost benign behavior. Thus, in order to make management decisions, it is important to distinguish between potentially malignant (MCN and IPMN), and benign (SCN and NNC) tumors. The aim of this study was to retrospectively investigate the value of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) for the differential diagnosis of cystic tumors of the pancreas.A total of 76 patients with cystic tumors of the pancreas were preoperatively examined by EUS. Eight cases were MCNs, 45 were IPMNs, 13 were SCNs, and 10 were NNC tumors. The EUS findings relevant to distinguishing between potentially malignant and benign were analyzed statistically.All patients with MCNs were female and all these tumors were located in the pancreatic body/tail. IPMN, however, occurred predominantly in men, and in the pancreatic head. Eight of 11 monolocular cystic tumors were NNC in nature. Eleven of 13 SCNs included microcystic areas within the tumors. All MCNs were round in appearance, whereas 93 % of IPMNs were not round in appearance. Mural nodules were present in 25 % of MCN and 38 % of IPMN cases. In univariate analysis, age, tumor size, locularity, the number of cystic formation, cystic component, and appearance were significant variables. In multivariate analysis, locularity and cystic component were important for differential diagnosis of potentially malignant cystic tumors.The characteristics of cystic tumors of the pancreas revealed by EUS are useful for their differential diagnosis.Preliminary experience comparing routine cytology results with the composite results of digital image analysis and fluorescence in situ hybridization in patients undergoing EUS-guided FNA.Studies indicate enhanced diagnostic accuracy for digital image analysis (DIA) and fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) versus routine cytology examination (RC) when biliary strictures are evaluated. These tumor markers have not been applied to EUS-guided FNA.Our purpose was to determine the accuracy of RC versus the composite results of DIA/FISH.Patients enrolled with known or suspected malignancy. The final diagnosis was based on strict cytopathologic and imaging criteria and 12-month follow-up.Tertiary referral center.A total of 39 patients were enrolled in whom each diagnostic test was performed on samples from 42 sites to evaluate lymphadenopathy (n=19), pancreatic mass (n=19), esophageal or gastric wall mass (n=3), and thyroid mass (n=1).EUS-guided FNA with RC, DIA, and FISH.Diagnostic accuracy of RC, DIA, and FISH.Malignancy was diagnosed in 30 of 42 patients, including esophageal squamous cell carcinoma, esophageal adenocarcinoma, gastric adenocarcinoma, pancreatic adenocarcinoma, pancreatic mucinous cystic neoplasia, intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasia, metastatic forearm sarcoma, small cell and non-small cell lung cancer, thyroid carcinoma, malignant GI stromal tumor, melanoma, adenocarcinoma of unknown primary, and lymphoma. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of DIA/FISH versus RC for detecting malignancy were 97%, 100%, and 98% versus 87%, 100%, and 90%, respectively.Single-center pilot study.Our findings suggest that DIA and FISH processing of EUS-guided FNA specimens provides higher diagnostic accuracy than RC does. These data suggest that these tumor markers incorporate generic targets as suggested by the high diagnostic sensitivity in this patient cohort with diverse pathologic conditions.Quantitative contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasonography for the discrimination of solid pancreatic masses.Contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasonography (CEH-EUS) for the assessment of microcirculation and the delineation of pancreatic tumors in order to characterize and stage them has only recently become available for commercial use, and few reports have been published. The purpose of the study was the qualitative and quantitative digital image analysis of pancreatic adenocarcinomas using conventional endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and CEH-EUS and the evaluation of whether contrast medium injection modified adenocarcinoma staging and patient management.In each of 30 prospectively examined patients with suspected pancreatic solid lesions, CEH-EUS was performed using the same quantity of the contrast agent SonoVue and a low mechanical index (0.3 - 0.4), followed by EUS-FNA. The histology, based on EUS-FNA or surgery and 9 months of follow-up, was: pancreatic adenocarcinoma (n = 15), pseudotumoral chronic pancreatitis (n = 12), neuroendocrine tumor (n = 1), common bile duct tumor (n = 1), lymph node metastases of gastric cancer (n = 1). The quantitative analysis was based on histograms obtained from each CEH-EUS video recording.CEH-EUS showed a hypoenhanced pattern in 14 cases of adenocarcinoma and in 10 cases of chronic pancreatitis. The index of the contrast uptake ratio was significantly lower in adenocarcinoma than in mass-forming chronic pancreatitis. A cut-off uptake ratio index value of 0.17 for diagnosing adenocarcinoma corresponded to an AUC (CI 95%) of 0.86 (0.67 - 1.00) with a sensitivity of 80%, a specificity of 91.7%, a positive predictive value of 92.8%, and a negative predictive value of 78%. The size of the pancreatic mass was assessed significantly more effectively by CEH-EUS but adenocarcinoma staging was not modified.The majority of cases of both pancreatic adenocarcinoma and chronic pancreatitis were hypoenhanced and visual discrimination was not possible. This is the first study about CEH-EUS for the quantitative assessment of uptake after contrast injection which has shown that it can aid differentiation between benign and malignant masses but cannot replace EUS-FNA. Neither tumor stage nor therapeutic management have changed after contrast medium injection during CEH-EUS.CT vs MRCP: optimal classification of IPMN type and extent.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) of the pancreas are being diagnosed with increased frequency. CT scanning commonly serves as the primary imaging modality before surgery. We hypothesized MRCP provides better characterization of IPMN type/extent, which more closely matches actual pathology.Of 214 patients treated with IPMN (1991-2006), 30 had both preoperative CT and MRCP. Of these, 18 met imaging study criteria. Independent readers performed retrospective, blinded analyses using standardized criteria for IPMN type and extent.A ductal connection was detected on 73% of MRCP scans and only 18% of CT. IPMN type was classified differently in seven (39%); four (22%) of which were read on CT as having main duct involvement where this was not appreciated on MRCP or found on surgical pathology. MRCP showed multifocal disease in 13(72%) versus only 9(50%) on CT. A different disease distribution was seen in 9(50%). Finally, 101 branch lesions were identified on MRCP compared to 46 on CT.CT falls short of MRCP in detecting a ductal connection, estimating main duct involvement, and identification of small branch duct cysts. These factors influence diagnostic accuracy, cancer risk stratification and operative strategy. MRCP should be employed for optimal management of patients with IPMN.Preoperative evaluation of pancreatic masses with positron emission tomography using 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose: diagnostic limitations.Identification of pancreatic cancer in patients presenting with an enlarged pancreatic mass is a major diagnostic problem. Positron emission tomography (PET) using the radiolabeled glucose analogue 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) has been suggested to provide excellent accuracy for noninvasive determination of suspicious pancreatic masses. We conducted a prospective study to verify these results. Forty-two patients admitted for pancreatic surgery underwent PET scanning. Image analysis was based on visual film evaluation and quantification of regional tracer uptake. PET imaging was visually analyzed by three observers blinded for the results of other diagnostic tests; they qualitatively graded the scans using a five-point scale (I = low to V = high) for the presence and intensity of focal FDG uptake. Diagnosis was proven by histology (n = 38) or follow-up (n = 4). Furthermore, the results of PET were compared with helical computed tomography (CT) and conventional ultrasonography (US), done during the routine diagnostic workup before pancreatic cancer surgery. Regarding only the results with scores of IV and V as positive for representing definite malignancy yielded a sensitivity of 71% and a specificity of 64% for film reading. Quantification of regional tracer uptake contributed no significant diagnostic advantage for differentiation between benign and malignant tumors. Helical CT revealed a sensitivity of 74% and a specificity of 45.5% and abdominal US 56% and 50%, respectively. We concluded that PET imaging provides only fair diagnostic accuracy (69%) for characterizing enlarged pancreatic masses. PET does not allow exclusion of malignant tumors. In doubtful cases, the method must be combined with other imaging modalities, such as helical CT. The results indicate that the number of invasive procedures is not significantly reduced by PET imaging.Intravoxel incoherent motion diffusion-weighted MR imaging for characterization of focal pancreatic lesions.To evaluate the diagnostic potential of apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC) and intravoxel incoherent motion (IVIM)-derived parameters for differentiation of common pancreatic tumors, chronic pancreatitis, and normal pancreas and for characterization of the malignancy potential of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs).The institutional review board approved this retrospective study, and informed consent was waived. Ninety-three consecutive patients with surgically resected and pathologically confirmed pancreatic tumors (39 pancreatic adenocarcinomas [PACs], 17 neuroendocrine tumors [NETs], and 37 IPMNs), seven patients with chronic pancreatitis, and 26 patients with a normal pancreas were included in this study. All patients underwent pancreatic 3.0-T magnetic resonance imaging, including IVIM diffusion-weighted imaging with 10 b values used (from 0 to 1000 sec/mm(2)). The ADC, slow component of diffusion (D(slow)), incoherent microcirculation (D(fast)), and perfusion fraction (f) were calculated. Steel-Dwass and Mann-Whitney U tests were used for comparison. The diagnostic performance of the parameters was evaluated by using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis with Bonferroni correction.Among ADC- and IVIM-derived parameters, D(fast) and f values of PACs were significantly lower than those of normal pancreas, chronic pancreatitis, and NETs (all P < .05 in post hoc analyses). For differentiation of PACs from NETs, f and D(fast) showed a significant difference (P < .0001 for both) and were more useful parameters than ADC and D(slow) in ROC analysis (all P < .05). Malignant IPMNs had significantly lower ADC and D(slow) values and higher D(fast) and f values when compared with benign IPMNs (all P < .05). In ROC analysis, f showed the highest area under the ROC curve value for distinguishing malignant from benign IPMNs.IVIM-derived perfusion-related parameters could be helpful for the differentiation of common malignant tumors in the pancreas and for distinguishing malignant from benign IPMNs. D(fast) and f were more valuable parameters in the differentiation of PACs from NETs than were ADC and D(slow).EUS, PET, and CT scanning for evaluation of pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Preoperative diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma can be difficult. Computed tomography (CT) is the standard, noninvasive imaging method for evaluation of suspected pancreatic adenocarcinoma, but it has limited sensitivity for diagnosis, local staging, and metastases. Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and fluoro-deoxyglucose/positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) are imaging methods that may improve diagnostic accuracy.Thirty-five patients with presumed resectable pancreatic adenocarcinoma were prospectively evaluated with helical CT, EUS, and FDG-PET.Sensitivity for the detection of pancreatic cancer was higher for EUS (93%) and FDG-PET (87%) than for CT (53%). EUS was more sensitive than CT for local vascular invasion of the portal and superior mesenteric veins. EUS diagnosis of vascular invasion was associated with poor outcome after surgery. EUS-guided, fine-needle aspiration allowed tissue diagnosis in 14 of 21 attempts (67%). FDG-PET diagnosed 7 of 9 cases of proven metastatic disease, 4 of which were missed by CT. Two of three metastatic liver lesions suspected by CT were indeterminate for metastases. FDG-PET confirmed metastases.EUS and PET improve diagnostic capability in pancreatic adenocarcinoma. EUS is useful in determining local vascular invasion and obtaining tissue diagnosis. FDG-PET is useful in identifying metastatic disease. Both techniques are more sensitive than helical CT for identification of the primary tumor. (Gastrointest Endosc 2000;52:367-71).A new criterion in differentiation of pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma: artery-to-vein ratio using the superior mesenteric vessels.Evaluation of infiltration of the superior mesenteric vein (SMV) and artery (SMA) fat planes has been considered in differentiating pancreatic carcinoma from pancreatitis. Some pancreatitis cases, however, can cause perivascular fat plane obliteration due to extension of the inflammatory process, mimicking appearances of carcinoma. This study investigated the diameters of SMV and SMA on CT scans, just caudal to the origin of SMA and portal confluens, in 68 pancreatitis and in 48 pancreatic carcinoma patients. SMA-to-SMV diameters (A/V diameter) were compared and ratios were obtained. In conclusion, it appears that when the A/V ratio is over 1.0, a malignant condition can be suspected. This may be used as a secondary criterion in the differential diagnosis of pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma.A triple approach for diagnostic assessment of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration in pancreatic solid masses and lymph nodes.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) has been becoming the standard tool for acquiring pancreatic lesion tissue. However, a single cytologic or histologic evaluation is not satisfactory for diagnosis. In this study, we evaluated the diagnostic yield of EUS-FNA for pancreatic solid masses and intra-abdominal lymph nodes using a triple approach.This study included patients undergoing evaluation for a solid pancreatic mass (n = 59) or intra-abdominal lymph nodes (n = 16) using EUS-FNA with a 22- or 25-gauge (G) needle, respectively. The specimens from each pass were analyzed by on-site cytology using Diff-Quick stain, cytology using Papanicolaou stain, and histology with immunohistochemical (IHC) staining.A total of 75 patients (49 males; mean age; 63.7 years) were included. The median number of needle pass for diagnosis of malignancy was 2.0, and there was no technical failure. The diagnostic accuracies with on-site cytology, cytology using Papanicolaou staining, and histology were 70.7, 80.0, and 80.0 %, respectively. The diagnostic accuracy using a triple approach was significantly greater than cytology using Papanicolaou staining alone (94.7 vs. 80.0 %; p = 0.007). In patients with malignant lesions, cytology identified 12 of 71 (16.9 %) malignant lesions that were not diagnosed by histology using IHC, and histology identified six (8.5 %) malignant lesions that were not diagnosed by cytology.On-site cytopathologic evaluation combined with cytologic and histologic analysis with IHC stain for one-pass specimen is considered to be able to increase the overall accuracy of EUS-FNA in pancreatic solid masses and lymph nodes.Interobserver agreement among endosonographers for the diagnosis of neoplastic versus non-neoplastic pancreatic cystic lesions.The aim of this study was to evaluate the degree of agreement among endosonographers for EUS diagnosis of neoplastic versus non-neoplastic pancreatic cystic lesions and the specific type of cystic lesion.Videotapes of EUS procedures from 31 consecutive cases of a range of histopathologically proven lesions, including mucinous cystic neoplasm, serous cystadenoma, neuroendocrine tumor, intraductal papillary mucinous tumor, and pseudocyst, were used to make a study videotape, which was reviewed by 8 experienced endosonographers. The reviewers, blinded to clinical and surgical histopathology results, reviewed each case for the presence or absence of the following features: abnormality of pancreatic duct and parenchyma, margins, solid component, debris, and septations. They were asked to identify each lesion as neoplastic or non-neoplastic and to give a specific diagnosis for each lesion.There was fair agreement between endosonographers for diagnosis of neoplastic versus non-neoplastic lesions (kappa = 0.24). Agreement for individual types of lesions was moderately good for serous cystadenomas (kappa = 0.46) but fair for the remainder. Agreement was moderately good for presence or absence of solid component (kappa = 0.43); fair for presence or absence of abnormal pancreatic duct (kappa = 0.29), debris (kappa = 0.21), and septations (kappa = 0.30); and slight for presence or absence of margins (kappa = 0.01) and abnormal pancreatic parenchyma (kappa = 0.01). Accuracy rates of EUS for the diagnosis of neoplastic versus non-neoplastic lesions ranged from 40% to 93%.There is little more than chance interobserver agreement among experienced endosonographers for diagnosis of neoplastic versus non-neoplastic, specific type, and EUS features of pancreatic cystic lesions.Diagnostic accuracy of quantitative EUS elastography for discriminating malignant from benign solid pancreatic masses: a prospective, single-center study.Recent data suggest that quantitative EUS elastography, a novel technique that allows real-time quantification of tissue stiffness, can accurately differentiate malignant from benign solid pancreatic masses.To externally validate the diagnostic utility of this technique in an independent cohort.Prospective, single-center study. PATIENTS, INTERVENTIONS, AND METHODS: A total of 104 patients with evidence of a solid pancreatic mass on cross-sectional imaging and/or endosonography underwent 111 quantitative EUS elastography procedures. Multiple elastographic measurements of the mass lesion and soft-tissue reference areas were undertaken, and the corresponding strain ratios (SRs) were calculated. The final diagnosis was based on pancreatic cytology or histology.The area under the receiver-operating characteristic curve, sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and overall accuracy of quantitative EUS elastography for discriminating malignant from benign pancreatic masses.The final diagnoses were primary pancreatic carcinoma (71.2%), neuroendocrine tumor (10.6%), metastatic cancer (1.9%), and pancreatitis (16.3%). Malignant masses had a higher SR (P = .01) and lower mass elasticity (P = .003) than inflammatory ones. The areas under the receiver-operating characteristic curve for the detection of pancreatic malignancy of both SR and mass elasticity (0.69 and 0.72, respectively) were less favorable than reported recently. At the cut points providing the highest accuracy in this cohort (4.65 for SR and 0.27% for mass elasticity), quantitative EUS elastography had a sensitivity of 100.0% and 95.7%, specificity of 16.7% and 22.2%, positive predictive value of 86.1% and 86.4%, negative predictive value of 100.0% and 50.0%, and overall accuracy of 86.5% and 83.8%, respectively.Relatively small number of patients with benign disease.In the largest single-center study to date, the diagnostic utility of quantitative EUS elastography for discriminating pancreatic masses was modest, suggesting that it may only supplement rather than supplant the role of pancreatic tissue sampling in the future.Retrospective digital image fusion of multidetector CT and 18F-FDG PET: clinical value in pancreatic lesions--a prospective study with 104 patients.Differential diagnosis of pancreatic lesions still remains a problem. Whereas CT provides high spatial resolution, PET detects malignant lesions with high sensitivity. The objective of this study was to evaluate the clinical benefit of PET/CT image fusion in the diagnostic workup of pancreatic cancer.One hundred four patients with suspected pancreatic lesion underwent triple-phase multidetector CT and (18)F-FDG PET scanning. Voxel-based retrospective registration and fusion of CT and PET were performed with recently developed software. CT, PET, and fused images were assessed by 2 radiologists with regard to the detection of malignancies, possible infiltration of adjacent tissue or lymph nodes, or distant metastases.Fusion of CT and PET images was technically successful in 96.2%. In 2 cases, paraaortic lymph node infiltration was detected only by image fusion; in a further 8 cases, lymph node metastases were confirmed with improved localization. In 5 patients, additional pancreatic tumors or distant metastases only suspected during PET scanning were confirmed. Image fusion improved the sensitivity of malignancy detection from 76.6% (CT) and 84.4% (PET) to 89.1% (image fusion). Compared with CT alone, image fusion increased the sensitivity of detecting tissue infiltration to 68.2%, but at the cost of decreased specificity.The most important supplementary finding supplied by image fusion is a more precise correlation with focal tracer hot spots in PET. Image fusion improved the sensitivity of differentiating between benign and malignant pancreatic lesions with no significant change in specificity. All image modalities failed to stage lymph node involvement.Role of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration in the diagnosis of solid pancreatic and peripancreatic lesions: is onsite cytopathology necessary?The reported median diagnostic yield from endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) fine-needle aspiration (FNA) cytology is 78% (range 39-93%). The aim of this study is to describe a single-centre experience in the diagnostic work-up of solid pancreatic and peripancreatic masses without the benefit of an onsite cytopathologist.In a consecutive series of 429 EUS examinations performed over a 12-month period by a single operator, 108 were on non-cystic pancreatic or biliary lesions. Data were collected prospectively and the accuracy of FNA was assessed retrospectively using either surgery or repeat imaging as the benchmark in the presence or absence of malignancy.Of the 108 FNAs, 102 (94%) were diagnostic, four were falsely negative (FN) and two were atypical and considered equivocal. There were 78 pancreatic lesions, of which 65 were true positives (TP), 11 true negatives (TN) and two FN, giving an overall accuracy of 97% (76/78). Of nine periampullary lesions, two were TP, six were TN and one was FN, giving an overall accuracy of 89% (8/9). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive value (NPV) and accuracy of EUS-FNA for pancreatic and periampullary lesions combined were 96%, 100%, 100% [95% confidence interval (CI) 95-100%], 85% (95% CI 62-97%) and 97%, respectively. There were 21 bile duct lesions, of which 10 were TP, eight TN, two atypical and one FN, giving an overall accuracy of 86% (18/21). The sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV and accuracy of EUS-FNA for biliary lesions were 91%, 100%, 100% (95% CI 69-100%), 91% (95% CI 59-100%) and 95%, respectively.The diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA for pancreatic lesions in our series was 97% and the PPV for the three subgroups of lesion type was 100%; these figures are comparable with the best rates reported in the literature, despite the absence of onsite cytopathology. These rates are potentially a direct result of high-volume practice, dedicated endosonography and cytopathology. These results show that it is possible to achieve high rates of accuracy in places where logistical issues make it impossible to maintain a cytopathologist in the endoscopy suite. In addition, our results contribute to the limited, collective global experience on the effectiveness of EUS-FNA in periampullary and biliary lesions.Integration of KRAS testing in the diagnosis of pancreatic cystic lesions: a clinical experience of 618 pancreatic cysts.With improvements in abdominal imaging, detection of incidental pancreatic cysts are becoming increasingly common. Analysis of pancreatic cyst fluid from fine-needle aspiration is particularly important in identifying intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) and mucinous cystic neoplasms (MCNs), which have significant implications in clinical intervention and follow-up. Previous controlled studies have shown that KRAS mutations in cyst fluid are highly specific for mucinous differentiation in pancreatic cysts; however, this has not been examined in the clinical setting. Over a 6-year study period, 618 pancreatic cyst fluids obtained by fine-needle aspiration at the time of endoscopic ultrasound were tested for KRAS mutations as part of routine evaluation for a cystic neoplasm. Of the 618 specimens, 603 (98%) from 546 patients were satisfactory for molecular analysis. Patients ranged in age from 17 to 90 years (mean, 63.9 years) and were predominantly female (68%). Pancreatic cysts were relatively evenly distributed throughout the pancreas and ranged in size from 0.6 to 11.0 cm (mean, 2.3 cm). Mutations in KRAS were detected in 232 of 603 (38%) aspirates. Although sufficient for molecular analysis, 320 of 603 (53%) specimens were either less than optimal (38%) or unsatisfactory (15%) for cytopathologic diagnosis. Surgical follow-up information was available for 142 (26%) patients and consisted of 53 KRAS-mutated and 89 KRAS-wild-type cysts. Overall, KRAS mutations had a specificity of 100%, but a sensitivity of 54% for mucinous differentiation. When stratified by cyst type, KRAS had a sensitivity of 67% and 14% for IPMNs and MCNs, respectively. In summary, KRAS mutations were highly specific for mucinous differentiation, but were inadequate in identifying MCNs. Future molecular studies and the combination of other fluid markers are required to improve the detection and classification of pancreatic mucinous neoplasms by endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspiration. Prospective pilot evaluation of a new needle prototype for endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration: comparison of cytology and histology yield.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) with the adjunct of EUS-guided fine needle aspiration has become an important diagnostic modality in gastroenterologic oncology. EUS-guided fine needle aspiration mainly relies on cytology; data are scarce that compare cytology and histology. While testing a 22-gauge prototype needle, we prospectively compared the yield for both.Forty-two consecutive patients (27 male, 15 female; mean age 59.2 years, range: 17-90 years) were included. In each patient we aimed to make two needle passes, and if the material acquired appeared insufficient macroscopically (no in-room cytopathology was available), further passes were done. The material was sent for cytological and histological assessment.A median number of two passes (range: 2-3) were uneventfully performed for pancreatic lesions (n=30), mediastinal and other lymph nodes/masses (n=8) and various other lesions (n=4) and yielded adequate material for cytology, histology or at least one of the two investigations in 62, 67 and 74% of patients, respectively. No false positive results were found (specificity 100%). Sensitivities were 58.6 and 65.5%, respectively, for cytology and histology alone; combined assessment increased sensitivity to 79.3%. When adjusted values were calculated, based only on those cases with adequate material, sensitivity was 89.5% for cytology and 85.7% for histology, and increased to 100% with combined assessment.The new needle achieves sensitivities similar to those previously reported with no significant differences in sensitivity between cytology and histology. More effective tissue acquisition methods must be sought to improve overall results.Determination of qualitative telomerase activity as an adjunct to the diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma by EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration.Telomerase activity is up-regulated in pancreatic cancer. Hence, measurement of telomerase activity in pancreatic needle-biopsy specimens could assist in establishing a positive diagnosis in specimens that are inadequate for cytology.To determine the sensitivity and specificity of telomerase activity for neoplasia in a series of EUS-guided fine-needle aspirate (EUS-FNA) biopsies of pancreatic mass lesions.Prospective, consecutive, non-randomized cohort.Academic hospital, tertiary referral center.Seventy-one patients with a pancreatic mass diagnosed by cross-sectional imaging.EUS-FNA of 52 solid and 18 cystic pancreatic lesions.(1) Cytologic diagnosis; (2) tissue telomerase activity by semi-quantitative polymerase chain reaction; (3) patient demographics; (4) clinical outcomes.Cytology results were positive for adenocarcinoma in 40 patients with a solid pancreatic mass; of these, telomerase activity was detected in 31. There were no telomerase false-positive results. Telomerase results were positive in 6 of the 7 patients (86%) who had negative cytology results and who eventually were found to have biopsy-proven adenocarcinoma. The sensitivity and specificity of telomerase activity for detecting pancreatic adenocarcinoma in solid masses was 79% (95% CI, 64%-89%) and 100% (95% CI, 55%-100%).Extremely high sensitivity and specificity of EUS-FNA cytology in solid lesions minimized the incremental benefit of telomerase.Telomerase activity can be measured readily in specimens obtained at EUS-FNA and accurately predicts malignancy. Used in combination with cytology, telomerase increased the sensitivity from 85% to 98% while maintaining the specificity at 100%. Lesions with negative cytology result and positive telomerase activity should be evaluated aggressively to exclude malignancy.Fine-needle aspiration cytology of intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas.Intraductal papillary mucinous tumors (IPMT) account for 5% of pancreatic neoplasms. Preoperative identification is important because of their frequent multifocal or diffuse involvement in pancreatic ducts, which makes extensive surgery necessary even in benign cases. To the authors' knowledge, the cytologic features of this entity in fine-needle aspiration biopsy (FNAB) specimens have seldom been described and are poorly standardized.Eleven consecutive cases of surgically proven IPMT with previous endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS)-guided FNAB were collected for retrospective analysis. EUS-FNAB had been performed with on-site attendance of a cytopathologist in all cases. Macroscopic and microscopic appearance of mucin, cellular type and arrangement, presence of nuclear grooves, and degree of nuclear atypia were recorded.Final diagnosis was benign IPMT (B) in four cases, borderline IPMT (Bo) in two cases, malignant IPMT (M) in one case, and IPMT associated with invasive carcinoma (Ca) in four. Retrospective analysis found moderate to high levels of extracellular mucin in 10 of the 11 cases. The other case (one Ca) showed a small amount of thick mucin. In all cases, epithelial cells were identified, although cellularity was very low in four cases (three B and one Bo). Atypia was absent in two cases (two B) slight in two cases (two B), moderate in three cases (one Bo and two Ca), and severe in four cases (one Bo, one M, and two Ca). Mucinous epithelium was found in nine cases and nonmucinous epithelium in five cases (one Bo and four Ca). Papillary structures were observed in five cases (two Bo and three Ca), sheets in eight cases (four B, one Bo, one M, and two Ca), single atypical cells in five cases (one Bo and four Ca), irregular clusters in three cases (one Bo and two Ca), and nuclear grooves in two cases (one B and one Bo).The most common features of IPMT were extracellular mucin and sheets of mucinous epithelium. Papillae and nuclear grooves were not consistently found. Nonmucinous epithelium, severe atypia, single atypical cells, and irregular clusters indicated a high probability of malignant transformation. Even in the absence of atypia, a clinically significant diagnostic orientation can be established in most cases on the basis of the characteristic cytologic picture.Clinical significance of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography for the diagnosis of cystic tumor of the pancreas compared with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and computed tomography.Cystic tumor of the pancreas has been investigated by a variety of imaging techniques. Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) is being widely used as a non-invasive diagnostic modality for investigation of the biliary tree and pancreatic duct system. The purpose of this study was to compare MRCP images with those of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) and computed tomography (CT) in order to clarify the diagnostic efficacy of MRCP for cystic tumor of the pancreas.We retrospectively studied 15 patients with cystic tumor of the pancreas that had been surgically resected and histopathologically confirmed. There were five cases of intraductal papillary adenocarcinoma, five of intraductal papillary adenoma, two of serous cyst adenoma, two of retention cyst associated with invasive ductal adenocarcinoma and one of solid cystic tumor.In all cases MRCP correctly identified the main pancreatic duct (MPD) and showed the entire cystic tumor and the communication between the tumor and the MPD. On the other hand, the detection rate by ERCP of the cystic tumor and the communication between the cystic tumor and the MPD was only 60%. Although the detection rates by CT for the septum and solid components inside the cystic tumor were 100 and 90.0%, respectively, those of MRCP for each were 58.3 and 20.0%.MRCP is capable of providing diagnostic information superior to ERCP for the diagnosis of cystic tumor of the pancreas. Although MRCP may provide complementary information about the whole lesion of interest, the characteristic internal features of cystic tumor of the pancrease should be carefully diagnosed in combination with CT.Frequency of major complications after EUS-guided FNA of solid pancreatic masses: a prospective evaluation.EUS-guided FNA is effective for establishing tissue diagnosis in suspected pancreatic cancer. However, data on the frequency of major complications following EUS-FNA are limited.To evaluate the frequency of major complications after EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses.Prospective cohort study.Tertiary University based referral center for pancreatico-biliary disorder.Consecutive patients who underwent EUS-FNA of a solid pancreatic over a 42-month period. All immediate complications were recorded by the endosonographer. Late complications were assessed at 72 hours and at 30-days after the procedure.Major complications were defined as acute pancreatitis, bleeding, infection, perforation, use of reversal medication, hospitalization or death.A total of 355 consecutive patients with a solid pancreatic mass underwent EUS FNA. Major complications were encountered in 9 patients (2.54%, 95% CI 1.17-4.76). Acute pancreatitis occurred in 3 of 355 (0.85 %, 95% CI 0.17-2.45); 2 patients were hospitalized, and 1 patient recovered with outpatient analgesics. Three patients were admitted for severe pain after the procedure; all were treated with analgesics and subsequently discharged with no sequela. Two patients (0.56%, 95% CI 0.07-2.02) developed fever and were admitted for intravenous antibiotics; 1 patient recovered with intravenous antibiotics and the other required surgical debridement for necrosis. One patient required the use of reversal medication. Overall, 1.97% (95% CI 0.80-4.02) of the patients were hospitalized for complications (range 1-16 days). None of the patients experienced clinically significant hemorrhage, perforation, or death. No clear predisposing risk factors were identified.Lack of surgical gold standard and referral to a tertiary center.EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses infrequently leads to major complications. Our results can be used by endosonographers to counsel patients before EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses.Diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration in patients with presumed pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine-needle aspiration (FNA) of the pancreas allows the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer to be established without exploratory surgery. We reviewed our recent experience with EUS-FNA in patients with presumed pancreatic cancer and report the diagnostic accuracy and complications of this procedure. Data were reviewed from all patients who presented with CT evidence of a pancreatic mass or a malignant biliary stricture and underwent EUS-FNA at our institution between November 1, 1999, and October 1, 2001. Based on the findings of contrast-enhanced, multislice CT scanning, patients were categorized as having resectable, locally advanced, or metastatic disease. EUS-FNA was performed in 233 patients. A final diagnosis of cancer was established in 216 patients (93%), 15 patients (6%) were found to have benign disease, and the final diagnosis remains unknown in two patients (1%). The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of EUS-FNA for diagnosis of a pancreatic malignancy were 91%, 100%, and 92%, respectively. For the 216 patients subsequently proven to have cancer, the results of EUS-FNA were diagnostic in 197 (91%); 96 (90%) of 107 patients with resectable disease, 62 (97%) of 64 with locally advanced disease, and 39 (87%) of 45 with metastatic disease. Four patients (2%) developed a clinically apparent complication that required hospital admission, including two patients who required surgery for duodenal perforation. There were no EUS-related deaths. We conclude that EUS-FNA can safely and accurately establish a cytologic diagnosis in patients with both early-stage and advanced pancreatic cancer. This enables consideration of all treatment options including protocol-based therapy.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration and multidetector spiral CT in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is now established as a valuable imaging test for diagnosing and staging pancreatic cancer. But, with significant recent improvements in spiral CT scanners, particularly higher resolution and ability to reconstruct 3D images, spiral CT is now increasingly accepted as being better for pancreatic cancer staging. The debate continues, however, about the best diagnostic test or combination of tests in patients with suspected pancreatic cancer. Spiral CT is more readily available than EUS-FNA and, therefore, more frequently used. In this study, we evaluated the use of EUS-FNA in conjunction with spiral CT for suspected pancreatic cancer.We retrospectively evaluated 81 consecutive patients who underwent EUS and EUS-FNA for clinical suspicion of a pancreatic cancer from November 2000 to November 2001. All patients had spiral CT with a multiphasic pancreatic protocol using multidetector spiral CT scanners. In all patients, EUS-FNA and spiral CT examinations were performed less than 3 wk apart.Overall, the accuracy of spiral CT, EUS, and EUS-FNA was 74% (n = 60/81, CI 63-83%), 94% (n = 76/81, CI 87-98%), and 88% (n = 73/81, CI 81-96%), respectively, for diagnosing pancreatic cancer. In patients without an identifiable mass on spiral CT, the diagnostic accuracy of EUS and EUS-FNA for pancreatic tumors was 92% (n = 23/25, CI 74-99%). Absence of a focal "mass" lesion on EUS reliably excluded pancreatic cancer irrespective of clinical presentation (NPV 100% n = 5/5, CI 48-100%). The negative predictive value of EUS-FNA was only 22% (n = 2/9, CI 3-60%) in patients with obstructive jaundice and biliary stricture. However, in patients without obstructive jaundice at initial presentation, EUS-FNA was highly accurate (accuracy 97%, n = 33/34, CI 85-100%) and was reliable for ruling out malignancy (NPV 89%, n = 8/9, CI 52-100%). Cytologic assessment of EUS-FNA specimens was 89% accurate for identifying malignancy in suspicious lesions visualized on EUS.The EUS with FNA can be a valuable adjunct to newer high-resolution multidetector spiral CT for diagnostic evaluation of patients with suspected pancreatic cancer.Differentiation of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma from other neoplastic solid pancreatic lesions: a tertiary oncology center experience.Pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma (PDAC), pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (pNET), and metastatic lesions (pMET) are the most common neoplastic solid pancreatic lesions (SPLs). Early diagnosis enables prompt treatment.To identify factors differentiating PDAC from non-PDAC lesions and assess the accuracy of EUS-guided FNA.Retrospective tertiary center.Consecutive patients referred for EUS evaluation of SPLs from 2004 to 2011.Pretest (preceding EUS-guided FNA [EUS-FNA]) predictors of PDAC among neoplastic SPLs and accuracy of EUS-FNA.A total of 1333 EUS scans with 1108 EUS-FNAs were performed for pancreatic lesions. Of the 672 patients with neoplastic SPLs, 528 had PDAC and 144 non-PDAC. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and accuracy of EUS-FNA for the diagnosis of PDAC were 97.3%, 99.3%, 99.8%, and 97.8%, respectively. Years of EUS experience significantly correlated with fewer needle passes (Rs = -0.18, P < .001). Controlling for all potential confounders, multivariable regression analysis demonstrated that patients with PDAC compared with pNETs and pMETs were older (odds ratio [OR] 4.42; 95% confidence interval [CI], 2.1-9.5; P < .001), had weight loss (OR 3.0; 95% CI, 1.6-5.4; P < .001), hyperbilirubinemia (OR 3.7; 95% CI, 1.8-7.5; P < .001), elevated CA19-9 (OR 6.9; 95% CI, 2.4-20.3; P < .01), evidence of arterial invasion (OR 6.5; 95% CI, 2.7-15.4; P < .001), and PD dilation (OR 3.3; 95% CI, 1.8-5.9; P < .001).Retrospective design, single center.When evaluating neoplastic SPLs, demographic, clinical, laboratory, and imaging characteristics can reliably discern and suggest PDAC. In addition, EUS-FNA is exceedingly sensitive and specific for PDAC.18FDG-positron emission tomography in pancreatic cancer.POSITRON EMISSION TOMOGRAPHY: Malignant cells present an increased glucose consumption compared to normal pancreatic tissue. Positron emission tomography with 18F fluoro-D-deoxyglucose is a new imaging tool to in vivo assess the amount of glucose metabolism. This method provides metabolic information on tumors rather than morphological information.In most PET centers a static emission scan of the upper abdomen is performed 45-60 minutes after intravenous administration of the radiotracer. To obtain quantitative parameter an additional transmission scan is necessary to correct for attenuation. Today, both visual analysis and semiquantitative parameters of glucose consumption as the Standardized Uptake Value (SUV) are used for image interpretation. To allow coregistration of the metabolic PET images and morphological imaging tools as CT or MRI external markers may be used. Following exact reorientation both the metabolic information (PET) and the morphologic information (MRI/CT) can be merged in one 3D data set (image fusion).In our series of patients the sensitivity for PET to detect pancreatic cancer was 85%, the specificity 84%. False negative results were obtained in patients with hyperglycemia, false positive results in patients with chronic active pancreatitis. Excluding hyperglycemic patients the sensitivity for PET increased to 98%. In a sample statistics of 305 euglycemic patients sensitivity, specificity and accuracy were 92%, 79%, and 87%, respectively. Image fusion of metabolic (PET) and morphologic data (MRI/CT) can help to better localize the focus of increased glucose consumption demonstrated with PET and to differentiate multifocal cancer from lymph node metastases.18FDG PET is a feasible diagnostic modality to differentiate benign and malignant pancreatic masses when morphological imaging is equivocal. Image fusion of PET and CT or MRI can combine the advantages of both modalities in one image-detailed anatomic information combined with accurate metabolic data.Prospective analysis of atypical epithelial cells as a high-risk cytologic feature for malignancy in pancreatic cysts.Pancreatic cysts are aspirated to assess whether a cyst is mucinous on one hand and malignant on the other. The authors' retrospective data have indicated that high-grade atypical epithelial cells (AECs) identified on cytology are a high-risk feature and a better threshold than "positive" for detecting malignancy. The objective of the current study was to assess the accuracy of AECs in predicting malignancy in pancreatic cysts.Cysts aspirated by endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNAs) obtained between January 2006 and June 2011 were evaluated. Cytologic, histologic, imaging, and cyst fluid analysis data were recorded. AECs were defined as cells that had an increased nuclear-to-cytoplasmic ratio and nuclear hyperchromasia with or without membrane abnormalities and with or without cytoplasmic vacuoles, but of insufficient quality and quantity for a "positive" interpretation. Malignancy included mucinous cysts with high-grade dysplasia and invasive carcinoma. Performance characteristics of cytology with AECs or worse (high-grade atypia [HGA]) for predicting malignancy were assessed.There were 70 FNAs that had histologic confirmation from 404 EUS-FNAs in 352 patients. Excluding 4 nondiagnostic FNAs, the study cohort consisted of 66 FNAs for analysis. There were 24 malignant cysts with 20 true-positive, 4 false-negative, 36 true-negative, and 6 false-positive results. For the detection of malignancy, HGA had 83% sensitivity, 86% specificity, a positive predictive value of 77%, a negative predictive value of 90%, and 85% overall accuracy. The lower threshold for malignancy with AECs resulted in a 12% increase in the detection of malignancy.A finding of AECs on cytology is a high-risk feature for malignancy and is an accurate triage threshold for resection. Cancer (Cancer Cytopathol) 2013;121:29-36 © 2012 American Cancer Society.Diagnostic usefulness of FDG PET for pancreatic mass lesions.The purpose of this study was to investigate the feasibility of [18F]2-deoxy-2-fluoro-D-glucose (FDG) positron emission tomography (PET) in patients with a pancreatic mass by comparing the results with those of X-ray computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance (MR) imaging.Eighty-six patients with pancreatic lesions, included 65 malignant tumors and 21 benign masses (55 masses were proven histologically and the others were diagnosed clinically), were studied. The diagnostic factors of CT and MR imaging were evaluated, and those of FDG PET were also evaluated for malignant and benign masses by visual interpretation and quantitative interpretation with the standardized uptake value (SUV) and SUVgluc which was designed to reduce the effects of a high blood sugar level. Visual interpretations were evaluated only in FDG PET images, and quantitative interpretations were evaluated by referring to CT and/or MR imaging. The correlation between SUV and the degree of histological differentiation in pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma was investigated.Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive value (NPV) and accuracy for CT imaging were 91, 62, 88, 68 and 84%, and for MR imaging 78, 70, 88, 54 and 76%, respectively. In visual interpretation of FDG PET images, the sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV and accuracy were 82, 81, 93, 59 and 81%, respectively. Significant differences between malignant and benign lesions existed in SUV and SUVgluc (p < 0.0001, each). With the cutoff value of SUV as 2.1 and SUVgluc as 2.2, the accuracy of diagnosis was maximal. With that cutoff value, the sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV and accuracy for SUV were 89, 76, 92, 70 and 86%, and for SUVgluc 91, 76, 92, 73 and 87%, respectively. The sensitivity and NPV of SUVgluc were higher than those of SUV, which suggests that SUVgluc may be more useful in reducing the number of overlooked malignant tumors. The specificity and PPV of FDG PET were superior to those of CT and MR imaging. There were no significant differences between the SUVs of moderately differentiated adenocarcinomas and those of well differentiated adenocarcinomas.To improve the diagnostic procedure for classifying masses, FDG PET with not only SUV but also SUV corrected by the blood sugar level is required in addition to morphological diagnosis by CT and/or MR imaging.Intraductal papillary-mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas. The findings and limitations of cytologic samples obtained by endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration.All clinically and ultrasonographically suspected examples of intraductal papillary-mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) aspirated during a 17-month period were reviewed and analyzed for follow-up. We identified 18 cases of suspected IPMN in patients 52 to 87 years old. All patients had dilated pancreatic ducts, with 3 showing sonographically apparent intraductal papillary lesions; 5 had adjacent cystic or solid pancreatic masses. Cytologic preparations showed thick, glistening, viscid, abnormal mucus in all cases. Aspirates from 13 lesions (72%) were acellular or sparsely cellular, but entrapped single or loosely cohesive neoplastic cells were identified in 16 cases (89%). Goblet cell morphologic features were common (6/18 [33%]), but papillary clusters and dysplastic changes were infrequent (3 [17%] each). In keeping with current therapeutic thinking, confirmatory histologic follow-up was available for only 4 patients (22%), as most people with lesions clinically, sonographically, and cytologically consistent with IPMN are elderly and often have comorbid conditions. Although endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration has important limitations, gross and cytologic findings can aid in confirming the suspected diagnosis, and integration of complete clinical, sonographic, and cytologic information may be the best way to reach the most accurate diagnosis possible.Usefulness of dual-phase 18F-FDG PET/CT for diagnosing small pancreatic tumors.The usefulness of dual-phase F-fluorodeoxyglucose (F-FDG) positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) for pancreatic tumors was investigated including numerous small tumors.Consecutive 116 patients with solid pancreatic tumors were subjected. Maximum standard uptake values (SUVmax) at 1 and 2 hours after FDG injection were defined as early and delayed SUVmax, respectively. Receiver operating characteristic curve was used to determine the optimal cutoff value of early SUVmax. Diagnostic accuracy of dual-phase FDG PET/CT was compared with that of single phase.The mean ± SD tumor size was 25 ±12 mm in diameter. The level of early SUVmax and proportion of elevated SUVmax in delayed phase were significantly higher in malignancy than those in benignancy for less than 25 mm tumors (4.1 ± 2.6 vs 1.9 ± 0.5, P < 0.001; 89% vs 17%, P < 0.0001) although they did not reach statistical significance for greater than or equal to 25 mm tumors. When diagnostic criteria of dual-phase FDG PET/CT for less than 25 mm tumors were determined as (1) early SUVmax greater than or equal to 2.1 and/or (2) delayed SUVmax greater than early SUVmax, sensitivity, specificity, and over all accuracy of dual-phase FDG PET/CT were better than that of single phase for less than 25 mm tumor (93%, 83%, and 91% vs 79%, 83%, and 80%, respectively).Dual-phase FDG PET/CT might be useful for diagnosing small pancreatic tumors.The usefulness of (18)F-FDG PET/MRI fusion image in diagnosing pancreatic tumor: comparison with (18)F-FDG PET/CT.This study aimed at demonstrating the feasibility of retrospectively fused (18)F FDG-PET and MRI (PET/MRI fusion image) in diagnosing pancreatic tumor, in particular differentiating malignant tumor from benign lesions. In addition, we evaluated additional findings characterizing pancreatic lesions by FDG-PET/MRI fusion image.We analyzed retrospectively 119 patients: 96 cancers and 23 benign lesions. FDG-PET/MRI fusion images (PET/T1 WI or PET/T2WI) were made by dedicated software using 1.5 Tesla (T) MRI image and FDG-PET images. These images were interpreted by two well-trained radiologists without knowledge of clinical information and compared with FDG-PET/CT images. We compared the differential diagnostic capability between PET/CT and FDG-PET/MRI fusion image. In addition, we evaluated additional findings such as tumor structure and tumor invasion.FDG-PET/MRI fusion image significantly improved accuracy compared with that of PET/CT (96.6 vs. 86.6 %). As additional finding, dilatation of main pancreatic duct was noted in 65.9 % of solid types and in 22.6 % of cystic types, on PET/MRI-T2 fusion image. Similarly, encasement of adjacent vessels was noted in 43.1 % of solid types and in 6.5 % of cystic types. Particularly in cystic types, intra-tumor structures such as mural nodule (35.4 %) or intra-cystic septum (74.2 %) were detected additionally. Besides, PET/MRI-T2 fusion image could detect extra benign cystic lesions (9.1 % in solid type and 9.7 % in cystic type) that were not noted by PET/CT.In diagnosing pancreatic lesions, FDG-PET/MRI fusion image was useful in differentiating pancreatic cancer from benign lesions. Furthermore, it was helpful in evaluating relationship between lesions and surrounding tissues as well as in detecting extra benign cysts.Accuracy of contrast-enhanced harmonic EUS with a second-generation perflutren lipid microsphere contrast agent (with video).EUS-FNA has limitations in cancer diagnosis/staging. New contrast agents, transducers, and processors have improved the potential of contrast-enhanced harmonic (CEH)-EUS.To determine optimal settings and preliminary accuracy of CEH-EUS by using a second-generation perflutren lipid microsphere contrast agent and a prototype linear echoendoscope.Prospective, comparative, pilot study.Tertiary-care medical center.This study involved patients with esophageal/pancreatic/liver tumors or adenopathy.Contrast agent was injected (10 μL/kg intravenously in 1-2 doses), and the mechanical index was optimized over 5 cases (0.3). Intermittent/continuous imaging was used with extended pure harmonic detection.Before-contrast and after-contrast predictions of neoplasia (5-point Likert scale). The reference standard was positive tissue or 6-month follow-up. Perfusion factors (sequence, pattern, washout) were noted, and phases were video recorded (arterial, venous, and postvenous).Thirty sites (7 nodes and 16 pancreatic and 7 nonpancreatic masses) were imaged in 21 patients; 21 of 30 had FNA, and 5 had surgery. Four cases (13.3%) were rated as undecided/indeterminate with EUS (vs 1 [3.3%] with CEH-EUS; P = .35). Twenty-four cases with confirmed diagnoses (12 malignant and 12 benign) were used for test performance: positive/negative predictive values for CEH-EUS were 80.0% (95% confidence interval, 51.9%-95.7%)/100.0% (95% confidence interval, 63.0%-100.0%) versus 84.6%/100.0% for EUS. Accuracies, counting "undecided" (1 in CEH-EUS and 4 in EUS) as incorrect, were 83.3% and 79.2%. In 2 cases, management would change significantly: (1) liver hemangioma, avoiding FNA; and (2) mediastinal "cyst" confirmed as solid.Small sample. Tissue not always available.CEH-EUS adds minimal imaging time and is accurate, with small improvement over EUS. Added information in vascular and cystic lesions can potentially change management.EUS for pancreas cysts: what should we be sampling?Pancreatic cancer detection with magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography: a prospective controlled study.Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) is a non-invasive and increasingly used procedure in cases involving biliary and pancreatic diseases. However, the accuracy of MRCP in differential diagnosis between pancreatic cancer and chronic pancreatitis has never been documented in a large prospective controlled study.124 patients were recruited for the study, selected from 141 consecutive patients with an average age of 55 years (range 19-80) who presented to our department between February, 1996, and January, 1998, with a strong clinical suspicion of pancreatic cancer. MRCP images were interpreted by a radiologist and a gastroenterologist who were unaware of the clinical diagnosis of patients. The exact diagnosis was based upon histological evidence from biopsy examination (surgical and fine needle biopsy) or a follow-up of at least 12 months.Of the 124 patients, 37 (30%) had pancreatic carcinoma; 17 (14%) had other neoplastic pancreatic diseases; 57 (46%) had chronic pancreatitis; 13 (10%) pancreatic ducts were clear. The sensitivity of MRCP with respect to diagnosing pancreatic cancer was 84% and its specificity 97%. The corresponding values for endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) were 70% and 94%, respectively.MRCP is as sensitive as ERCP when detecting pancreatic carcinomas. Furthermore, it is feasible to presume that the use of MRCP may prevent inappropriate explorations of the pancreatic and common bileducts in cases of suspected pancreatic carcinomas, where interventional endoscopic therapy (ie, palliative common-bileduct drainage) is unlikely.A prospective evaluation of an algorithm incorporating routine preoperative endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration in suspected pancreatic cancer.Whether tissue diagnosis is required in the preoperative evaluation of patients with suspected pancreatic cancer remains controversial. We prospectively evaluated the accuracy, safety, and potential impact on surgical intervention of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in the preoperative evaluation of suspected pancreatic cancer.All patients who underwent EUS-FNA at our institution (n = 547) over a 4.5-year period were enrolled. Patients underwent surgical exploration and resection based on their comorbidity status, evidence of resectability based on spiral computed tomography (CT) and EUS imaging reviewed in a multidisciplinary approach.Of 547 patients enrolled (median age 64 years, 60% male), 49% presented with obstructive jaundice. The operating characteristics of EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses were: sensitivity 95% (95% CI: 93.2-95.4), specificity 92% (95% CI: 86.6-95.7), positive predictive value 98% (95% CI: 97-99), negative predictive value 80% (95% CI: 74.9-82.7). The overall accuracy of EUS-FNA was 94.1% (95% CI: 92.0-94). Of the 414 true positive patients by EUS-FNA, 138 (33%) were explored. Of patients deemed operable by combined imaging, 42% had surgical resection. Eighty-two percent of true positive patients were ultimately found inoperable and received palliative therapy or chemotherapy. Of the 94 patients with true negative cytology based on extended follow-up, only 7 (7%) underwent surgical resection. Of those with false negative diagnoses (n = 24), 5 patients underwent exploration/resection based on detection of mass lesions by EUS. The remaining patients had unresectable disease. Mild self-limiting pancreatitis occurred in (0.91%).EUS-FNA is a safe and highly accurate method for tissue diagnosis in suspected pancreatic cancer. This approach allows for preoperative counseling of patients, minimizing surgeon's operative time in cases of unresectable disease, and avoids surgical biopsies in the majority of patients with inoperable disease. In addition, it allows for conservative management of patients with benign biopsies. We still, however, recommend exploration of patients with clinical scenario suspicious for pancreatic cancer, a mass found on EUS or CT, but inconclusive or negative cytology.Positron emission tomography/computed tomography influences on the management of resectable pancreatic cancer and its cost-effectiveness.Distinguishing benign from malignant intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas by imaging techniques.It is often difficult to differentiate benign from malignant intraductal papillary mucinous tumors (IPMTs). This study aimed to differentiate them using various imaging techniques.Receiver operating characteristic curves were used to establish optimal cutoff values to differentiate benign from malignant tumors in 121 patients with histologically confirmed IPMTs.For branch duct type, accuracy for malignancy was highest using endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) to measure the cyst diameter, and accuracy was 68.2% at a cutoff value of 33.9 mm. For main duct type, accuracy was highest, 71.1% at a cutoff value of 8.4 mm for main duct diameter, with magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography. For all imaging techniques and findings, accuracy was highest using EUS, 76.4% at a cutoff value of 5.4 mm for height of protrusion. Each imaging technique had a positive predictive value of 80% if the cut off value for the height of the protruding lesion was met.Malignancy can be strongly suspected when the height of protrusion exceeds the respective cutoff values. EUS was most effective to differentiate benign IPMTs from malignant tumors by assessing the height of protrusion.Added value of diffusion-weighted imaging to MR cholangiopancreatography with unenhanced mr imaging for predicting malignancy or invasiveness of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas.To investigate the added value of diffusion-weighted imaging (DWI) to magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) with unenhanced MR imaging for predicting the malignancy or invasiveness of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs).Following Institutional Review Board (IRB) approval, this retrospective study included 52 patients with surgically resected IPMNs and who underwent MRCP, unenhanced MRI, and DWI. Three blinded radiologists evaluated the two image sets, ie, MRCP with unenhanced MR images vs. the combined set with MRCP, unenhanced MR images, and DWI, and scored their confidence for malignancy or for invasiveness of IPMNs. The mean apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC) values of benign IPMNs and of intraductal mucinous carcinomas (IPMCs) were compared. The diagnostic accuracy was calculated using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis.The mean ADC of malignant IPMNs (2.05 ± 0.66 × 10(-3) mm(2) /sec) was significantly lower than that of benign IPMNs (2.95 ± 0.32 × 10(-3) mm(2) /sec, P < 0.0001). Invasive IPMCs (1.51 ± 0.32 × 10(-3) mm(2) /sec) showed significantly lower ADC than that of noninvasive IPMCs (2.67 ± 0.23 × 10(-3) mm(2) /sec, P = 0.0003). The area of diffusion restriction was more frequently seen in malignant IPMNs than in benign IPMNs (P < 0.00001). The addition of DWI to MRCP with unenhanced MRI did not show a significant improvement for predicting malignant IPMN (P> 0.05), but resulted in a tendency to improve the diagnostic accuracy for the prediction of invasive IPMN in two observers (P = 0.072, P = 0.085).The addition of DWI to MRCP with unenhanced MRI may improve the diagnosis of malignant IPMN and further increase the prediction of invasive IPMC.Optimal number of EUS-guided fine needle passes needed to obtain a correct diagnosis.The immediate assistance of a cytologist during EUS-guided FNA is not universal. The optimal number of fine needle passes during EUS-guided FNA has not been determined in a prospective study. The aim of this study was to determine the optimal number of passes required to obtain a correct diagnosis.Seven or more passes were made with a fine needle into a variety of lesions during EUS-guided FNA. Adequacy of the aspirate, diagnosis, and a "certainty score" were recorded after each pass and interpreted sequentially by a cytopathologist. Surgical histopathology and 1-year clinical follow-up were used as reference standards. The percentage of correctly diagnosed cases was calculated and stratified according to organ, disease group, and EUS characteristics of the lesion.Lesions from 95 patients were categorized into the following locations: pancreas, lymph node, and miscellaneous. The sensitivity and specificity for 7 passes from the pancreas and miscellaneous lesion groups were, respectively, 83% and 100%. The sensitivity and specificity for 5 passes from the lymph node group were, respectively, 77% and 100%.During EUS-guided FNA, at least 7 passes with a fine needle into pancreatic and miscellaneous lesions, and 5 passes into lymph nodes are needed to ensure a high degree of certainty for making a correct diagnosis.Imaging features of small (≤ 3 cm) pancreatic solid tumors on gadoxetic-acid-enhanced MR imaging and diffusion-weighted imaging: an initial experience.The objective was to determine imaging features that distinguish small (≤3cm) solid pancreatic adenocarcinoma, neuroendocrine tumor (NET) and solid pseudopapillary tumor (SPT) on gadoxetic-acid-enhanced magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and diffusion-weighed imaging (DWI).Twenty-four adenocarcinomas, 10 NETs and 8 SPTs were retrospectively included. Two radiologists analyzed morphologic features, signal intensity of the tumors on MR images including DWI (b=800) and dynamic enhancement pattern with consensus. Tumor-to-parenchyma ratio and tumor apparent diffusion coefficients (ADCs) were quantitatively assessed.All adenocarcinomas had an ill-defined margin and irregular shape, and more frequently had pancreatic duct dilatation compared with other tumors (P<.05). All SPTs and all but one of the adenocarcinomas (95.8%) had no arterial enhancement with progressively increased enhancement, whereas seven NETs (70%) had arterial enhancement with progressively decreased enhancement (P<.01). The mean value of tumor-to-parenchyma ratio on arterial and portal phases was significantly higher for NETs, and the mean value of tumor ADCs was significantly lower for SPTs than for other tumors (P<.05).Gadoxetic-acid-enhanced MRI may aid in differentiation between small adenocarcinomas, NETs and SPTs based on morphologic features with dynamic enhancement pattern in adenocarcinomas, dynamic enhancement pattern with tumor-to-parenchyma ration on arterial and portal phases in NETs, and dynamic enhancement pattern with lower ADC value in SPTs.Relative accuracy of CT and MRI in the differentiation of benign from malignant pancreatic cystic lesions.To assess the diagnostic accuracies of multidetector computed tomography (MDCT) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) for differentiating benign from malignant lesions and suggesting the specific diagnoses for pancreatic cystic lesions, and to assess whether review of both MDCT and MRI is beneficial.Patients with various neoplastic and non-neoplastic pancreatic cystic lesions that were identifiable by biopsy or surgery, who underwent both MRI and MDCT (n=63), were retrospectively reviewed by three reviewers. The likelihood of malignancy was recorded on a five-point scale, and a specific diagnosis was given. ROC analysis was performed and the sensitivity, specificity for the characterization of malignancy, and the accuracy of specific diagnoses were calculated.MDCT and MRI yielded comparable results for the characterization of malignancy (Az: 0.639, 0.735, 0.806 for MDCT and 0.732, 0.753, 0.792 for MRI, for each reviewer). The accuracies of specific diagnosis based on MDCT or MRI were 61.9 versus 55.6% for reviewer 1; 76.2 versus 76.2% for reviewer 2; and 65.1 versus 61.9% for reviewer 3. There was a trend toward better prediction of malignancy (Az: 0.787, 0.745, 0.849 for each reviewer), and better accuracy in suggesting a specific diagnosis (77.8, 73, and 73% for each reviewer) for MDCT+MRI over MDCT or MRI alone, although it was statistically significant for one reviewer in the comparison of MDCT versus MDCT+MRI for the prediction of malignancy, and MRI versus MDCT for suggesting a specific diagnosis.MDCT and MRI have equivalent accuracy for characterizing pancreatic cystic lesions as benign or malignant, and suggesting a specific diagnosis. Combined review of MDCT and MRI was not significantly better but may have the potential to improve diagnostic accuracy in equivocal cases.18-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography enhances computed tomography diagnosis of malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas.To assess the reliability of 18-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (18-FDG PET) in distinguishing benign from malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) of the pancreas and its contribution to surgical decision making.Pancreatic IPMNs are increasingly recognized, often as incidental findings, especially in people over age 70 and 80. Computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance (MR) are unreliable in discriminating a benign from a malignant neoplasm. 18-FDG PET as imaging procedure based on the increased glucose uptake by tumor cells has been suggested for diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer.From January 1998 to December 2005, 64 patients with suspected IPMNs were prospectively investigated with 18-FDG PET in addition to conventional imaging techniques [helical-CT in all and MR and magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) in 60]. 18-FDG PET was analyzed visually and semiquantitatively using the standard uptake value (SUV). The validation of the diagnosis was made by a surgical procedure (n = 44), a percutaneous biopsy (n = 2), main duct cytology (n = 1), or follow-up (n = 17). Mean and median follow-up times were 25 and 27.5 months, respectively (range, 12-90 months).Twenty-seven patients (42%) were asymptomatic. Forty-two patients underwent pancreatic resection, 2 palliative surgery, and 20 did not undergo surgery. An adenoma was diagnosed in 13 patients, a borderline tumor in 8, a carcinoma in situ in 5, and an invasive cancer in 21; in 17 patients a tumor sampling was not performed and therefore the histology remained undetermined. Positive criteria of increased uptake on 18-FDG PET was absent in 13 of 13 adenomas and 7 of 8 borderline IPMNs, but was present in 4 of 5 carcinoma in situ (80%) and in 20 of 21 invasive cancers (95%). Conventional imaging technique was strongly suggestive of malignancy in 2 of 5 carcinomas in situ and in 13 of 21 invasive carcinomas (62%). Furthermore, conventional imaging had findings that would be considered falsely positive in 1 of 13 adenomas (8%) and in 3 of 8 borderline neoplasms (37.5%). Therefore, positive 18-FDG PET influenced surgical decision making in 10 patients with malignant IPMN. Furthermore, negative findings on 18-FDG PET prompted us to use a more limited resection in 15 patients, and offered a follow-up strategy in 18 patients (3 positive at CT scan) for the future development of a malignancy.18-FDG PET is more accurate than conventional imaging techniques (CT and MR) in distinguishing benign from malignant (invasive and noninvasive) IPMNs. 18-FDG PET seems to be much better than conventional imaging techniques in selecting IPMNs patients, especially when old and asymptomatic, for surgical treatment or follow-up.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration or fine needle biopsy: the beauty is in the eye of the beholder.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas: cytologic features predict histologic grade.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) is an increasingly recognized cystic neoplasm of the pancreas, histologically classified by the degree of epithelial atypia and by the presence or absence of invasion of the cyst wall. To the authors' knowledge, the cytologic features of this neoplasm are poorly characterized, especially with respect to tumor grade.Thirty-three endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided pancreatic fine-needle aspiration biopsy (FNAB) samples and 1 pancreatic duct brush specimen from 25 patients with a histologically confirmed IPMN were retrospectively reviewed. Blinded to tumor grade, background mucin, inflammation, necrosis, overall cellularity, the presence of gastrointestinal-contaminating epithelium, architecture of cell clusters, and nuclear and cellular morphology were evaluated. In cases in which special stains for mucin were performed, the diagnostic utility of these stains was assessed. These cytologic features were subsequently correlated with the histologic diagnosis.The 34 cytology samples represented 4 adenomas, 15 IPMN-moderate dysplasias, 7 intraductal carcinomas, and 8 IPMNs with invasive carcinoma. Extracellular mucin was present in 97% of all cases; 53% had thick, viscous, "colloid-like" mucin. Special stains for mucin were positive in 6 of 11 cases (54%), helping to identify thin mucin in only 2 cases. Gastrointestinal contamination did not appear to create diagnostic difficulty due to an apparent dual (dysplastic-nondysplastic) epithelial population, but only 4 adenomas were evaluated in this study. Necrosis distinguished IPMN with carcinoma from IPMN-adenomas and IPMN with moderate dysplasia (P < .00001), and was more often observed with invasion than IPMN-carcinoma in situ (P < .05). Tight epithelial cell clusters with hyperchromatic nuclei and a high nuclear to cytoplasmic ratio was more significant in IPMN of at least moderate dysplasia (P = .03). Pale nuclei with parachromatin clearing was found to be a nuclear feature that was suspicious for at least carcinoma in situ (P < .001). In addition, significant background inflammation (neutrophils and histiocytes) was found to be more characteristic of IPMN with at least carcinoma in situ (P = .002).The presence of thick, "colloid-like" mucin is noted in half of the IPMN cases, but was not found to be specific to grade. The absence of such mucin does not exclude an IPMN. The presence of tight epithelial cell clusters is consistent with a neoplasm of at least moderate dysplasia, and abundant background inflammation and parachromatin clearing correlated with the presence of at least carcinoma in situ. Necrosis was the only feature found to be strongly suggestive of invasion.Diagnostic value of priming the endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration needle with heparin to improve specimen quality.Invasive carcinomas originating from intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas: conspicuity and primary sites of the solid masses on triple-phase dynamic CT imaging.To assess the conspicuity of invasive carcinomas (solid masses) originating from pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (invasive IPMNs) and the primary sites of the solid masses on thin-slice dynamic CT.Twenty patients with pathologically proven invasive IPMNs underwent triple-phase dynamic CT examinations (arterial, portal, and delayed phases). Qualitative and quantitative analyses of conspicuity of the solid masses were performed for all phases. The primary sites [branch duct and/or main pancreatic duct (MPD)] of the solid masses were evaluated on CT in comparison to the pathologic findings.The qualitative and quantitative analyses of the conspicuity of the solid masses showed that the arterial phase images were superior to those of the portal and delayed phases. The primary sites of the solid mass were histopathologically diagnosed as branch ducts in 6 (30%) patients, MPD in 13 (65%), and both branch ducts and the MPD in one (5%). The sensitivity and specificity of the CT evaluation of the primary sites were 100% for the branch ducts, and for the MPD 93% and 100%, respectively.Arterial phase images are useful for the diagnosis of invasive IPMNs, and attention should be paid to pancreatic parenchyma surrounding the MPD when detecting invasive carcinomas.Efficacy of endoscopic ultrasound in characterizing mass lesions in chronic pancreatitis.The aim of this study is to determine the influence of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) in the detection of chronic pancreatitis and identification of pancreatic masses suspected by other radiographic imaging modalities in such a clinical background.Retrospective analysis was performed on 105 consecutive pancreatic EUS examinations in an 18-month period at a single tertiary care referral center. Analysis included 75 patients with a suspected pancreatic mass by computerized axial tomography, magnetic resonance imaging, ultrasound, or endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreotography. All patients underwent EUS examination and if a mass was visualized, fine-needle aspiration biopsy was performed. Patients underwent either surgical exploration or clinical and radiographic follow-up for 6 months to confirm EUS findings.Chronic pancreatitis was suspected in 53 individuals by clinical or radiographic methods. Using standard EUS parenchymal and ductal criteria, chronic pancreatitis was confirmed in 41 (77%) of patients. In 33 patients with chronic pancreatitis detected by EUS, initial referral was for pancreatic mass. Twenty-eight (85%) patients had an actual mass and the remainder were false-positive clinical findings. Thirty-two percent of pancreatic masses in chronic pancreatitis were found to be malignant adenocarcinoma and the rest were inflammatory in nature. Subset analysis showed EUS-fine-needle aspiration of solid lesions to have a sensitivity and specificity of 87.9% and 100%, respectively. Detection of cystic lesions had a sensitivity and specificity of 88.5% and 100%, respectively.EUS is superior to other radiographic modalities in the determination of chronic pancreatitis and detection of mass lesions.Optimal interpretation of FDG PET in the diagnosis, staging and management of pancreatic carcinoma.This study had two purposes: to optimize the semiquantitative interpretation of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) PET scans in the diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma by analyzing different cutoff levels for the standardized uptake value (SUV), with and without correction for serum glucose level (SUV(gluc)); and to evaluate the usefulness of FDG PET when used in addition to CT for the staging and management of patients with pancreatic cancer.Sixty-five patients who presented with suspected pancreatic carcinoma underwent whole-body FDG PET in addition to CT imaging. The PET images were analyzed visually and semiquantitatively using the SUV and SUV(gluc). The final diagnosis was obtained by pathologic (n = 56) or clinical and radiologic follow-up (n = 9). The performance of CT and PET at different cutoff levels of SUV was determined, and the impact of FDG PET in addition to CT on patient management was reviewed retrospectively.Fifty-two patients had proven pancreatic carcinoma, whereas 13 had benign lesions, including chronic pancreatitis (n = 10), benign biliary stricture (n = 1), pancreatic complex cyst (n = 1) and no pancreatic pathology (n = 1). Areas under receiver operating characteristic curves were not significantly different for SUV and SUV(gluc). Using a cutoff level of 3.0 for the SUV, FDG PET had higher sensitivity and specificity than CT in correctly diagnosing pancreatic carcinoma (92% and 85% versus 65% and 61%). There were 2 false-positive PET (chronic pancreatitis, also false-positive with CT) and 4 false-negative PET (all with true-positive CT, abnormal but nondiagnostic) examinations. There were 5 false-positive CT (4 chronic pancreatitis and 1 pancreatic cyst) and 18 false-negative CT (all with true-positive FDG PET scans) examinations. FDG PET clarified indeterminate hepatic lesions or identified additional distant metastases (or both) in 7 patients compared with CT. Overall, FDG PET altered the management of 28 of 65 patients (43%).FDG PET is more accurate than CT in the detection of primary tumors and in the clarification and identification of hepatic and distant metastases. The optimal cutoff value of FDG uptake to differentiate benign from malignant pancreatic lesions was 2.0. Correction for serum glucose did not significantly improve the accuracy of FDG PET. Although FDG PET cannot replace CT in defining local tumor extension, the application of FDG PET in addition to CT alters the management in up to 43% of patients with suspected pancreatic cancer.Pancreatic cystic lesions: clinical predictors of malignancy in patients undergoing surgery.Despite advances in cross-sectional imaging and the use of molecular markers, distinguishing between benign and malignant cysts remains a clinical challenge.To identify both preoperative clinical and cyst characteristics at the time of EUS that predict malignancy.A retrospective analysis was performed on consecutive patients with pancreatic cysts who underwent endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and surgical resection from May 1996 to December 2007 at a tertiary centre. Clinical history, EUS characteristics, cytology, tumour markers and surgical histology were collected. Predictors of malignancy were determined by univariate and multivariate analysis using logistic regression.A total of 153 patients underwent a EUS and subsequent surgical intervention.Of the 153 patients, 57 (37%) had a histological diagnosis of malignancy. On univariate analysis, older age (P < 0.001), male gender (P = 0.010), jaundice (P = 0.039), history of other malignancy (P = 0.036), associated mass in cyst (P = 0.004) and malignant cytology (P < 0.001) were found to be associated with malignancy. History of pancreatitis (P = 0.008) and endoscopist impression of pseudocyst (P = 0.001) were found to be associated with benign cysts. Multivariate analysis found that only older age [Odds ratio (OR), 1.04; 95% confidence interval (CI), 1.01-1.08], male gender (OR, 2.26; 95% CI, 1.08-4.73) and malignant cytology (OR, 6.60; 95% CI, 2.02-21.58) were independent predictors of malignancy.Older age, male gender and malignant cytology from EUS predict malignancy at surgical resection. These characteristics may be used to estimate the probability of malignancy in a cyst and aid in management.[Malignancy predictive factors in pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm].Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) is a premalignant lesion of the pancreas. Its natural history is not well known. We evaluated the characteristics and predictor factors of malignancy of IPMN.A retrospective analysis was performed in 88 patients diagnosed with IPMN between January 1997 and December 2008. The diagnosis was done by abdominal computed tomography (CT), pancreatic-magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and/or endoscopic ultrasound (EUS). Gender, age, symptoms, origin, location, CA 19.9 serum levels, size of tumours and nodules by imaging techniques, type of surgery, malignancy and survival were evaluated. Nine pre-surgical variables were selected, and univariate and multivariate analysis to identify independent prognostic factors of malignancy were performed.The mean age was 64 years and 53% were men. 39% of tumours were incidental. 50% had their origin on the main pancreatic duct, 37% on collateral branchs and 13% were multifocal. 68% patients were operated: 42% had malignant neoplasms (32% carcinoma in situ and 68% invasive). Twelve patients died (1 benign, 1 in situ and 10 invasive). Univariate and multivariate analysis identified the symptoms and the tumour size (≥ 22 mm [median of our serie] and ≥ 30 mm [size accepted in literature]) as independent predictor factors of malignancy.Many IPMN are incidental findings. The presence of symptoms and size of the tumour are independent prognostic factors of malignancy and they should be considered to decide therapeutic actions.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy coupled with a KRAS mutation assay using allelic discrimination improves the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.Mutation of the KRAS oncogene is present in 75% to 95% of pancreatic cancer tissues. This study aimed to evaluate whether endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA), combined with analysis of the KRAS mutation, improves the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer in cases of inconclusive or doubtful cytopathologic analysis.We prospectively included 186 patients with a pancreatic mass (103 men; mean age: 62 y). Cytopathology and KRAS mutations, using TaqMan MGB allelic discrimination, were performed on EUS-FNA material. A final diagnosis was obtained from EUS-FNA analysis and/or a subsequent biopsy if necessary, and/or surgery, and follow-up: these were pancreatic adenocarcinoma (n=104), other malignant pancreatic tumors (n=22), and benign lesions (n=60, including 35 cases of chronic pancreatitis).Inconclusive or doubtful (low-grade dysplasia or atypia) cytopathology was found in 68 cases. Of these, 29 patients who had adenocarcinoma were subsequently diagnosed, including 19 cases with a former KRAS mutation. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and overall accuracy of cytopathology alone to diagnose adenocarcinoma were 73%, 100%, 100%, 75%, and 85%, respectively. When KRAS mutation analysis was combined with pathology, these values reached 88%, 99%, 99%, 89%, and 93%, respectively. The performance of EUS-FNA to diagnose malignancy was similarly improved after the KRAS-mutation assay (negative predictive value increased from 67% to 88%; accuracy increased from 85% to 94%).EUS-FNA plus KRAS-mutation analysis, using allelic discrimination, is accurate and improves the diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma when pathology is inconclusive or doubtful.[Characterization and diagnostic accuracy of serous cystadenomas and mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas with multi-slice helical computed tomography].To evaluate the feasibility of using multi-slice helical computed tomography (MS-CT) to accurately distinguish serous cystadenomas from mucinous cystadenomas or cystadenocarcinomas of the pancreas and to determine their radiographic appearances that can be applied for differentiative diagnosis.We performed a single-blind retrospective analysis of CT images of 30 patients with pathologically proven primary cystic pancreatic neoplasms (12 cases of serous cystadenomas, 14 cases of mucinous cystadenomas, and 4 cases of mucinous cystadenocarcinomas) to reach a diagnosis of either serous cystadenoma or mucinous cystic tumor. CT features such as tumor location, septations, presence of calcification, features of cystic wall, papillary excrescences, and size of the largest cyst were recorded. Statistical analysis was performed to evaluate the efficacy of certain CT findings in the differentiation of serous cystadenomas and mucinous neoplasms.Totally 9 (75.0%) serous cystadenomas and 16 (88.9%) mucinous tumors were correctly diagnosed. Three serous cystadenomas were misdiagnosed as mucinous cystadenomas, while 2 mucinous neoplasms were misdiagnosed as serous cystadenomas. And 9 (75.0%) serous cystadenomas were located at the pancreatic head and neck areas, while 12 (66.7%) mucinous neoplasms were located at the pancreatic body and tail areas (P < 0.05). The presence of calcification, especially central calcification, had statistical significance in differentiating serous cystadenoma from mucinous neoplasms (P < 0.05). The size of the largest cyst over 2 cm was positive associated with mucinous neoplasms (P < 0.05).CT characteristics between serous cystadenomas and mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas have distinct difference, which validates the values of CT in differentiating these tumors. However, atypical CT appearances may compromise its diagnostic accuracy.[Computed tomographic-guided fine-needle biopsy of the pancreas for histology determination].Computed tomography-guided fine-needle biopsies of the pancreas were performed in 54 patients. In 46/54 biopsies, the material obtained permitted a histological diagnosis despite the small external needle diameter of only 0.95 mm. The only complication was due to laceration of an artery of the transverse mesocolon. The prevalence of malignant tumors was 67%. Adenocarcinoma was diagnosed in more than 80% of all biopsies; rare findings were malignant carcinoid or centroblastic lymphoma. Benign tumors included mucinous adenocystoma and serous microcystic adenoma. Within the group of patients where pathologic-anatomic evaluation was possible, the sensitivity of fine-needle biopsy for malignant tumors was 87% and the specificity 100%. A positive needle biopsy diagnosis for a malignant tumor reduces the number of exploratory laparotomies needed and is helpful in the planning of surgery.Rapid on-site evaluation by endosonographer during endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration for pancreatic solid masses.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is an established diagnostic method for patients with suspected pancreatic ductal carcinoma. Rapid on-site evaluation (ROSE) has been reported to improve the accuracy. However, an on-site cytopathologist is not routinely available in many institutions. One of the solutions may be ROSE by endosonographer. The aim was to examine whether diagnostic accuracy increases through ROSE by endosonographer using our cytological criteria.Patients who underwent EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses from January 2006 to August 2009 (n = 53, period 1) and September 2009 to April 2011 (n = 85, period 2) were retrospectively identified. Before initiating ROSE at the start of period 2, two endosonographers underwent training for cytological interpretation, which was focused on four cytological features of pancreatic ductal carcinoma: anisonucleosis, nuclear membrane irregularity, overlapping, and enlargement. During EUS-FNA in period 2, endosonographers classified the Diff-Quik smears under three atypical grades and evaluated the adequacy. All diagnoses were made by one pathologist without knowledge of clinical information.The rate of "inconclusive" diagnoses, interpreted as "suspicious," "atypical," and "inadequate for diagnosis" was reduced from 26.4% in period 1 to 8.2% in period 2 (P = 0.004). Moreover, diagnostic accuracy was increased from 69.2% in period 1 to 91.8% in period 2 (P < 0.001).This cytological grading system used in ROSE by endosonographers is invaluable for the diagnosis of pancreatic solid masses.Cyst fluid carcinoembryonic antigen concentration and cytology by endosonography-guided fine needle aspiration in predicting malignant pancreatic mucinous cystic neoplasms.To assess the value of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) level and cytology examination obtained by endosonography-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in predicting the malignancy of pancreatic mucinous cystic neoplasm (MCN).The data of patients with pancreatic MCN who underwent EUS-FNA in Changhai Hospital, Second Military Medical University (Shanghai, China) from November 2005 to April 2010 were collected and analyzed. The area under receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve of cyst fluid CEA, sensitivity, specificity, positive (PPV) and negative predictive value (NPV) of the cytology as well as cyst fluid CEA were determined.Of the 20 MCNs confirmed by surgical pathology, 10 were malignant and the remainder were premalignant. Cytology had some value in differentiating malignant from premalignant MCN with a sensitivity of 60.0%, specificity of 100.0%, PPV of 100.0% and NPV of 71.4%. CEA of > 692.8 ng/mL was able to predict malignancy (P = 0.007) with sensitivity of 80.0%, specificity of 90.0%, PPV of 88.9% and NPV of 81.8%, and its area under ROC curve was 0.855.Cyst fluid CEA level and cytology obtained by EUS-FNA are useful for predicting the malignancy of pancreatic MCN.Advantage of EUS Trucut biopsy combined with fine-needle aspiration without immediate on-site cytopathologic examination.Endoscopic ultrasonographically guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is a safe and accurate method for obtaining diagnostic material from lesions within and immediately adjacent to the upper GI tract.To determine whether EUS Trucut biopsy (EUS-TCB) (Quickcore, Wilson-Cook, Winstom Salem, NC) can increase the accuracy of EUS-guided tissue sampling when combined with FNA when no cytopathologist is present.Retrospective case review.University-based referral practice.All patients who had lesions that were accessible through the esophagus or stomach and that were greater than 20 mm and amenable to Trucut biopsy were included.A total of 41 patients underwent both EUS-FNA and TCB with a separate pathologist evaluating each specimen.The diagnostic performance of FNA, TCB, and its combination were compared.The overall accuracy in our series was as follows: FNA, 76%; TCB, 76% (P not significant); and combination of FNA and TCB, 95% (P = .007). In the 26 patients with malignant diagnoses, the accuracy of combination was 100% versus 77% for FNA (P = .03). The median number of passes with the FNA and TCB was 4.4 (range 2-8) and 2.8 (range 2-5), respectively. One patient in the series had fever and chest pain after EUS biopsy.Retrospective study.In our series EUS-TCB accuracy was equal to FNA when no on-site cytopathologist is present. TCB was helpful in the diagnosis of pancreatic masses, gastric submucosal lesions, lymphoma, and necrotic tumors. A 100% accuracy of FNA + TCB was seen in patients with malignant diseases and in patients who had failed or been refused biopsy by other modalities in the past. More data are needed before the exact role of TCB in the absence of on-site cytopathology can be accurately defined.Feasibility and yield of a novel 22-gauge histology EUS needle in patients with pancreatic masses: a multicenter prospective cohort study.The option of obtaining tissue samples for histological examination during endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) has theoretical and practical advantages over cytology alone. The aim of this study was to evaluate the feasibility, yield, and diagnostic accuracy of a new EUS 22-G fine-needle biopsy (FNB) device in patients with solid pancreatic masses in a multicenter, prospective study.All consecutive patients who underwent EUS-guided fine-needle biopsy (EUS-FNB) using a newly developed 22-G FNB needle between September 2010 and October 2010 were enrolled in the study. The EUS-FNB technique was standardized among the participating endoscopists. Only a single needle pass was performed.A total of 61 patients (35 males, mean age 64.2 ± 12.4 years) with solid pancreatic masses with a mean size of 32.4 ± 8.5 mm (range 13-90 mm) participated. EUS-FNB was performed through the duodenum in 35 cases (57.4 %) and was technically feasible in all but one of the 61 (98.4 %) patients without complications. Tissue samples for histological examination were obtained from 55 patients (90.2 %) and were deemed adequate in 54 of the cases (88.5 %). The diagnoses established by EUS-FNB were adenocarcinoma (39 patients), neuroendocrine tumors (5), chronic focal pancreatitis (5), sarcoma (2), lymphoma (1), acinar cellular tumor (1), and pancreatic metastasis from renal cell carcinoma (1). In an intention-to-treat (ITT) analysis, sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy for the histologic diagnosis of a pancreatic mass were 87.5, 100, 100, 41.7, and 88.5 %, respectively.EUS-FNB was technically feasible in 98 % of patients with a solid pancreatic mass. A suitable sample for histological evaluation was obtained in 88.5 % of the cases after only one single needle pass. The apparently low negative predictive value is likely to be improved by increasing the number of needle passes.Diagnostic value of quantitative EUS elastography for malignant pancreatic tumors: relationship with pancreatic fibrosis.EUS elastography has been used to facilitate the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer, but as yet the interpretation of this procedure has been largely subjective. The present study has been designed to validate a quantitative approach for the analysis of EUS elastography, and to assess its relationship with pancreatic fibrosis.86 patients with malignant pancreatic masses and 28 control subjects without any evidence of pancreatic diseases were examined by EUS elastography. EUS video sequences were subjected to a quantitative analysis based on mean hue histogram analysis. Pancreatic fibrosis was determined by quantitative morphometry in tissue specimens from 36 patients.The mean RGB (red, green, blue) value was significantly higher in the cancer patients compared to the controls (14.0 ± 0.4 vs. 11.5 ± 0.9; p = 0.0085), albeit with significant overlap between the groups. In contrast, a much sharper separation between the groups was obtained based on the individual color values for blue, green and red (p < 0.0001, respectively). By these means, 100 % sensitivity and specificity for the distinction between tumor and normal tissue was obtained for the blue color value, while the red and green color values were less discriminative. The fractional fiber content of the tumors was unrelated to the respective hue histogram color values.Quantitative EUS elastography allows for clear differentiation between malignant pancreatic tumors and normal tissue. Using this approach, we demonstrated that the stiffness of pancreatic tumors is largely independent of their fiber content.Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography: image quality, ductal morphology, and value of additional T2- and T1-weighted sequences for the assessment of suspected pancreatic cancer.To assess image quality and duct morphology on magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and also the value of additional T2- and T1-weighted sequences for differentiation of benignity and malignancy in patients with suspected pancreatic tumors.One-hundred-and-fourteen patients received MRCP and unenhanced and contrast material-enhanced MR imaging. MR results were analyzed independently by two blinded readers, and subsequently correlated with the results from surgery, biopsy, and follow-up. Assessment included the evaluation of image quality, duct visualization and morphology, and the differentiation of pancreatic lesion status (benign versus malignant).Overall, 49 patients had benign final diagnoses, while 65 had a malignant diagnosis. Image quality of single-shot thick-slab MRCP was rated significantly better than the MIP images of multisection MRCP. With MRCP alone, the two readers' accuracy in the assessment of pancreatic lesion status was 72% (95% CI, 64% to 83%) and 69% (95% CI, 56% to 77%), respectively; with the addition of T2- and T1-weighted images the accuracy significantly improved to 89% (95% CI, 82% to 95%) and 84% (95% CI, 77% to 92%) for readers 1 and 2, respectively.Single-shot thick-slab MRCP and multisection MRCP provide complementary results; however, single-shot MRCP had superior image quality. Moreover, assessment of ductal morphology with MRCP alone facilitated the diagnosis of different pathologic conditions of the pancreatobiliary system in the majority of patients. However, with the addition of T2- and T1-weighted sequences the overall diagnostic accuracy was significantly improved and thus we consider that a comprehensive MR approach should comprise both MRCP techniques and parenchymal sequences.EUS-FNA with rescue fluorescence in situ hybridization for the diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma in patients with inconclusive on-site cytopathology results.Detection of chromosomal abnormalities by fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) analysis has not been well-studied in FNA samples of pancreatic masses. Selective use of FISH in patients with inconclusive on-site cytopathology results may improve the sensitivity of EUS for malignancy.To determine the sensitivity and specificity of FISH analysis in patients with inconclusive on-site cytopathology results.Consecutive patients with suspected pancreatic malignancy, nonrandomized cohort study. Final diagnosis was based on either surgical biopsy or disease progression on extended follow-up or death.Academic center, tertiary-care referral cancer center.A total of 212 EUS examinations were performed in 206 patients for solid pancreatic lesions over a 24-month period (January 2009-December 2010). FISH analysis was done for 69 patients with inconclusive or nonavailable on-site cytology results.EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) of solid pancreatic masses with cytology and FISH analysis for polysomy of chromosomes 3, 7, and 17 and deletion of 9p21.Sensitivity/specificity of cytology, FISH, and a composite of cytology and FISH.Patients with positive on-site cytology (110), neuroendocrine tumors (22), insufficient follow-up (1), FISH not obtained (3), and renal cancer with pancreatic metastasis (1) were excluded. Sixty-nine patients comprised the study cohort, 54 with malignancy and 15 with benign disease. Sensitivity for malignancy of cytology, FISH analysis, and the combination were 61%, 74%, and 85%, respectively (P = .009). FISH detected an additional 13 cases of pancreatic adenocarcinoma missed by cytology. There was no false-positive FISH analysis in 15 patients with benign disease. No major complications occurred from EUS-FNA.Single center, selected patients underwent FISH analysis, limited number of patients with benign disease.In patients with suspected pancreatic cancer, FISH analysis can detect additional cases missed by cytology without compromising specificity. FISH analysis to detect polysomy of chromosomes 3, 7, and 17 and deletion of 9p21 should be considered when cytology is negative for malignancy in patients with a known pancreatic mass.Focal pancreatic mass: distinction of pancreatic cancer from chronic pancreatitis using gadolinium-enhanced 3D-gradient-echo MRI.To determine the accuracy of MRI including T1-weighted gadolinium (Gd)-enhanced three-dimensional-gradient-echo (3D-GE) sequences to distinguish pancreatic cancer from chronic pancreatitis in patients with pancreatic mass or focal enlargement.The study included 22 patients (15 males and seven females; mean age +/- SD, 56.2 +/- 11.5 years) with pancreatic mass or focal enlargement. Fourteen had pancreatic carcinoma and eight had chronic pancreatitis based on the histopathological and clinical findings. MRI examinations of all patients were retrospectively evaluated by two independent reviewers for the predetermined imaging findings of carcinoma and chronic pancreatitis. The accuracy of MRI for differentiating pancreatic carcinoma from chronic pancreatitis was determined. MRI findings of both entities were compared using t-tests, chi-squared tests, and logistic regression analyses for the differentiation of these two entities. The extent of agreement between two reviewers was determined with Kappa statistics.The sensitivity and specificity of MRI including T1-weighted 3D-GE sequences for differentiating pancreatic carcinoma from chronic pancreatitis were 93% (13/14) and 75% (6/8), respectively. The most discriminative finding for pancreatic carcinoma was relative demarcation of the mass compared to background pancreas in contrast to chronic pancreatitis on post-Gd 3D-GRE sequences (P < 0.05).MRI including Gd-enhanced T1-weighted 3D-GE sequences can differentiate pancreatic carcinoma from chronic pancreatitis successfully in most cases.Predictive factors associated with malignancy of intraductal papillary mucinous pancreatic neoplasms.To identify preoperative predictive factors associated with malignancy of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) of the pancreas.Between April 1995 and April 2010, 129 patients underwent surgical resection for IPMNs at our institute and had confirmed pathologic diagnoses. The medical records were retrospectively reviewed and immunohistochemical staining for mucin (MUC) in pancreatic tissues was performed.Univariate analysis showed that the following five variables were closely associated with malignant IPMNs preoperatively: absence of extrapancreatic malignancy; symptoms; tumor size > 4 cm; main pancreatic duct (MPD) size > 7 mm; and lymph node enlargement on preoperative computed tomography (CT). Multivariate analysis revealed that the following two factors were significantly associated with malignant IPMNs preoperatively: MPD size > 7 mm [odds ratio (OR) = 2.50]; and lymph node enlargement on preoperative CT (OR = 3.57). No significant differences in the expression of MUC1, MUC2 and MUC5AC were observed between benign and malignant IPMNs.MPD size > 7 mm and preoperative lymph node enlargement on CT are useful predictive factors associated with malignancy of IPMNs.Cystic tumours of the pancreas.Cystic pancreatic tumours may be misdiagnosed as pseudocysts.From August 1990 to January 1998, 21 patients (16 women) with a median age of 60 years underwent operation for a cystic mass in the pancreas with histological confirmation of neoplasia (six serous cystadenoma (SCA), three mucinous cystic adenoma (MCA), ten mucinous cystadenocarcinoma (MCAC), one ductal adenocarcinoma with cystic degeneration, one cystic islet cell tumour).While the lesion had been labelled as a pseudocyst in eight patients, only one patient (MCA in the pancreatic head) had had acute pancreatitis previously. In seven patients the computed tomogram (CT) lacked suspicious neoplastic features, while endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, angiography and percutaneous cyst fluid analysis were unhelpful or misleading in 16 of 18 investigations with respect to differentiating tumour from pseudocyst. Attempted operation for cure was performed in 18 patients despite diagnostic delays of up to 6 years and initial treatment with cystenterostomy in two cases.Retrospective review revealed that all 21 cystic neoplasms could be diagnosed before operation by a history excluding previous pancreatitis (20 of 21 patients) or a CT suspicious for neoplasia (14 of 21). The diagnosis relies more on absence of previous pancreatitis and a suspicious clinician who errs on the side of resecting a pseudocyst rather than watching or draining a cystic neoplasm.Can EUS alone differentiate between malignant and benign cystic lesions of the pancreas?The aim of this study was to evaluate the ability of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) alone to predict and differentiate malignant from benign cystic lesions of the pancreas.From January, 1995, to August, 1999, 98 cases of pancreatic cystic lesions were evaluated by EUS; all of these were originally imaged by cross-sectional modalities that were not diagnostic. Among these, surgical/pathological correlation was available in 48 patients. The original endosonographic images were reviewed by two endosonographers who were blinded to each other's interpretation and to the surgical and pathological interpretation. The EUS images were assessed for the presence or absence of the following characteristics: 1) wall, 2) solid component, 3) septae, 4) lymphadenopathy, and 5) number of cysts. These characteristics were then correlated with the surgical and pathological findings and were assessed to determine if any were predictors of the lesion being benign or malignant.For reviewer A, the presence of a solid component by EUS was the only statistically significant predictor of malignancy (odds ratio = 4.73, 95% CI = 1.13-19.68, p = 0.03). However, 61% of patients with benign lesions were also interpreted by EUS to have a solid component. For reviewer B, none of the features were found to be significant predictors of a malignant lesion. When the results of both reviewers were combined, the presence of a solid component was not found to be a statistically significant predictor of malignancy (odds ratio = 1.046, 95% CI = 0.99-1.09, p = 0.07).Endosonographic features cannot reliably differentiate between benign and malignant cystic lesions of the pancreas after a nondiagnostic cross-sectional modality.[Endosonography in the assessment of pancreatic tumors. A comparison of the endosonographic findings of carcinomas and segmental inflammatory changes].To examine the value of endoscopic ultrasonography in distinguishing malignant and benign tumours of the pancreas.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) was performed on 130 consecutive patients (35 women and 95 men; mean age 56.6 [38-71] years), 61 with carcinoma of the pancreas (CP), 69 with segmental inflammatory (pseudotumorous) lesions of the pancreas (SILP). The diagnosis was confirmed by histology in 41 cases of CP, by autopsy in 4, by clinical follow-up (4-56 weeks, mean of 7 months) in 16. It was confirmed histologically in 39 cases of SILP, by clinical follow-up in 30 (12-93 weeks, mean of 12 months). All EUS findings were performed and recorded according to a standardized protocol and subsequently compared.There were no significant differences in EUS findings between CP and SILP. Statistical analysis between the two groups revealed any differential diagnostic relevance only with regard to some individual findings: coarse echo-dense deposits were seen by EUS in 16 of SILP cases (23%), but in only 4 of those with CP (7%), and then only in the face of similar changes in the rest of the organ or if there was additional chronic pancreatitis. Absence of demarcation from the duodenal or gastric wall was recorded in 18 cases of CP (30%), but in only 5 of SILP (7%). Lack of demarcation from the portal vein, splenic vein or coeliac artery was noted in 17 cases of CP (28%) and 6 of SILP (9%). Extension of tumour into vessel lumens was seen only in CP, but even here in only 7 cases (11%).Despite the high resolution of EUS it does not provide reliable differentiation of benign and malignant lesions of the pancreas in the individual case.Retrospective analysis of the utility of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in pancreatic masses, using a 22-gauge or 25-gauge needle system: a multicenter experience.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is now performed routinely in many advanced endoscopy centers and has enhanced the ability to diagnose pancreatic masses. However, there is uncertainty about which needle size is optimal for EUS-FNA of pancreatic masses. We aimed to evaluate the performance of the 22-gauge and 25-gauge needles in obtaining cytologic diagnosis of pancreatic masses.All cases that were referred for EUS-FNA for pancreatic masses between February 2001 and June 2007 were reviewed, and patients who underwent EUS-FNA using the 22-gauge and 25-gauge needle system were identified. In patients who underwent surgery, operative histopathological findings were compared with the cytopathological findings from EUS-FNA.A total of 842 patients with pancreatic masses detected on computed tomography (CT) and/or magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and confirmed by EUS underwent EUS-FNA with the 22-gauge needle (n = 540) or the 25-gauge needle (n = 302). Results of EUS-FNA cytology findings were compared with the gold standard of surgical histopathological findings or long-term clinical follow-up. The sensitivity, specificity, PPV, and NPV of FNA were respectively 84%, 100%, 100%, and 73% [corrected] for the 22-gauge needle compared with 92%, 97%, 98%, and 87%, [corrected] respectively for the 25-gauge needle. No complications were noted in the 25-gauge needle group, compared with pancreatitis in 2% of the 22-gauge needle group.This retrospective comparative study shows that EUS-FNA with a 25-gauge needle system is a safe and reliable method for tissue sampling in pancreatic masses. The system is more sensitive and has a slightly [corrected] higher NPV than the standard 22-gauge needle. Our study suggests that perhaps the smaller caliber FNA needle causes less trauma during EUS-FNA and hence less complications. Further studies including randomized trials are needed.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided tissue sampling by combined fine needle aspiration and trucut needle biopsy: a prospective study.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) has a diagnostic accuracy of 70-90%, depending on the site under evaluation. In order to improve EUS-guided tissue sampling a novel 19-gauge trucut-type needle has been designed to obtain core biopsies during EUS. We prospectively evaluated the safety and accuracy of EUS-FNA alone versus combined EUS-FNA and trucut needle biopsy (TNB) in patients referred to our Unit over a 3-year period.A total of 159 patients underwent EUS-FNA alone (lesions<2 cm) or the combination of both sampling modalities (lesions>or=2 cm). The adequacy of sampling, sensitivity, specificity and overall accuracies of EUS-FNA or EUS-TNB alone and combined EUS-FNA/TNB were determined.Adequate samples were obtained by EUS-FNA, EUS-TNB and EUS-FNA/TNB in 91%, 88% and 97% of patients, respectively. From the pancreas (n=83), adequate samples were obtained by FNA in 94% and by TNB in 81%, compared with 87% and 92% from non-pancreatic sites (n=76), respectively. The combination of both techniques resulted in more adequate samples from non-pancreatic cases than EUS-FNA alone (P=0.044). The specificity was 100%. Overall accuracy for EUS-FNA alone was 77%, for EUS-TNB alone 73% and for EUS-FNA/TNB 91% (P=0.008). For pancreatic sampling, the accuracy of EUS-FNA alone was 77%, for EUS-TNB alone 56% and for EUS-FNA/TNB 83%. For non-pancreatic sampling, the accuracy for EUS-FNA alone was 78%, for EUS-TNB alone 83% and for EUS-FNA/TNB 95% (P=0.006). The complication rate was 0.6%.Combined EUS-FNA/TNB for lesions>or=2 cm improves adequacy of sampling and diagnostic accuracy compared with either technique alone and is safe.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration of the pancreas: cytomorphological evaluation with emphasis on adequacy assessment, diagnostic criteria and contamination from the gastrointestinal tract.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) has been proved to be safe, efficient and reliable in the diagnosis of pancreatic lesions. This study evaluated specimen adequacy, diagnostic criteria of various pancreatic neoplasms and contamination from the gastrointestinal (GI) tract.EUS-guided FNA of the pancreas and subsequent surgical resections performed at the University of California Irvine Medical Center during February 1996-October 2000 were retrospectively selected. Modified Papanicolaou staining method was used for immediate evaluation and cell block prepared.A total of 267 cases were available for review, including 147 (55.1%) positive/suspicious, 10 (3.7%) atypical, 96 (36.0%) negative and 14 (5.2%) unsatisfactory cases. Eighty-six (58.5%) positive/suspicious cases had histological confirmation and 12 (8.3%) had lymph node or distant metastases by cytology. Three atypical, two negative, and two unsatisfactory cases proved to have adenocarcinoma. Contamination from duodenum, stomach or pancreas was found in 77 positive/suspicious, three atypical and 90 negative cases. The sensitivity, specificity, diagnostic accuracy, positive and negative predictive values were 94.6%, 100%, 95.6%, 100%, 82% respectively.EUS FNA is efficient and accurate in the diagnosis of pancreatic neoplasms in adequate samples. Contamination from the GI tract should be well recognized to avoid misinterpretation.The differential diagnosis of pancreatic cysts by MR imaging.The usefulness of magnetic resonance imaging (MR imaging) in the differential diagnosis of cystic lesions of the pancreas was assessed.Pseudocyst was present in 9 patients, retention cyst in 4, simple cyst in 2, serous cystadenoma in 1, mucinous cystadenoma in 6, mucinous cystadenocarcinoma in 6. The relative signal intensity (SI) of each cystic lesion on MR imaging was assessed in comparison with that of the liver.It was difficult to distinguish the cystic types from each other based on the SI on MR images. Insofar as mucinous cystic tumors, those containing gelatinous mucin showed higher SI on T1-weighted images than those containing mucinous but watery fluid. five of the 6 mucinous cystic tumors containing gelatinous mucin were histologically malignant, whereas all except one those containing watery fluid were benign.Our results suggest that the SI on T1-weighted images may be useful in distinguishing malignant from benign mucinous cystic tumors.Immunohistochemical analysis of p53 and MIB-1 in tissue specimens obtained from endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy for the diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses.Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy (EUS-FNAB) has been shown to be a highly accurate technique for distinguishing benign from malignant pancreatic masses. In this study, we examined p53 immunohistochemical analysis in FNAB specimens obtained from solid pancreatic diseases, and prospectively evaluated clinical applications for the diagnosis of malignancy in combination routine histological examination. Tissue specimens obtained from 62 pancreatic masses (51 pancreatic cancers and 11 chronic pancreatitis) by EUS-FNAB were evaluated by routine histological examination and p53 immunostaining. The conventional EUS-FNA diagnostic test statistics for the pancreatic masses were as follows: 76% sensitivity, 91% specificity and 79% accuracy. p53 protein overexpression was observed in 67% patients with pancreatic cancer, but not in patients with chronic pancreatitis. If the diagnosis of malignancy was made using the combination of p53 protein overexpression and conventional histological examination, the diagnostic test statistics changed as follows: 90% sensitivity, 91% specificity and 92% accuracy. p53 immunostaining in combination with routine histological examination of EUS-FNAB may improve the diagnostic accuracy for pancreatic cancer.Histopathologic findings of multifocal pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms on CT.The criteria for resection of solitary pancreatic side-branch intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) have been well described by the Sendai consensus statement. However, the management of multiple pancreatic cystic lesions is less certain, with no clear guidelines in the literature to date. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the histopathologic findings in pancreatic IPMNs in patients with multiple (≥ 4) pancreatic cysts.The CT scans of all patients with a pathologically proven IPMN at our institution were reviewed, and a total of 52 patients with four or more pancreatic cysts were found. Each case was reviewed for the number of cysts and the presence of signs of invasive malignancy including a coexistent solid pancreatic mass, pancreatic ductal dilatation, and mural nodularity.A total of 52 patients (19 men, 33 women; mean age, 71.8 years) were found to have multifocal IPMNs, defined as four or more cysts, on CT. Of these 52 patients, nine also had evidence of a solid pancreatic mass on CT. Retrospective review of the pathologic results for the remaining 43 patients (17 men, 26 women; mean age, 71.76 years) showed 18 cases of an IPMN with either high-grade dysplasia or a coexistent invasive carcinoma. Most important, 37% (7/19 patients) had no CT findings of an invasive malignancy according to the Sendai criteria (i.e., cysts ≥ 3 cm in the axial plane, main pancreatic ductal dilatation ≥ 6 mm, or mural nodularity within a cyst) but were found to have an IPMN with either high-grade dysplasia or invasive carcinoma. When the pancreas contained 10 or more cysts, high-grade dysplasia or invasive carcinoma tended to be more likely than low- or intermediate-grade dysplasia (odds ratio, 3.83; 95% CI, 0.87-16.8; p = 0.075).The presence of multiple pancreatic cysts should be looked on with suspicion, particularly when there are a large number of cysts, even when none of the cysts individually meet the imaging criteria for resection according to the Sendai consensus recommendations. At the very least, these patients need to be followed very closely.Efficacy, safety, and predictive factors for a positive yield of EUS-guided Trucut biopsy: a large tertiary referral center experience.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided trucut biopsy (EUS-TCB) technique has the advantage of obtaining tissue for histological examination rather than for cytology alone. However, the diagnostic yield may depend on factors related to both technical aspects and the lesions sampled. Safety of EUS-TCB is yet to be established in a large number of procedures. The aim of the study was to determine factors predicting a positive diagnostic yield, and safety for EUS-TCB in a large tertiary referral center-based service.All patients were referred for EUS-guided tissue sampling as a part of their diagnostic workup. Linear-array echoendoscope (GF-2000-OL5, KeyMed) with a 19-gauge trucut needle (Quick-Core, Wilson-Cook) was used by two operators to obtain tissue samples. Clinical data, details of the EUS-TCB, post-procedure complications, and histology were prospectively collected between May 2002 and February 2008.In total, 247 patients (143 men) aged 57-73 (median 66) had EUS-TCB performed. Lesions sampled were in the pancreas (113), esophagogastric wall (34), and extra-pancreatic areas (100) (lymph nodes: 52). The maximum diameter of the lesion/wall thickness ranged from 0.6 to 5.4 cm (median 3). One to five passes were made (median 3) to obtain tissue cores 2-18 mm (median 10) in length. The procedure failed in 6% of cases. The overall diagnostic accuracy was 75%. The overall complication rate was 2% (bronchopneumonia, minor hemoptysis, minor hematemesis, mucosal tear, retropharyngeal abscess) with no procedure-related deaths. Site of lesion (pancreatic vs. extra-pancreatic, P<0.032), site of biopsy (stomach vs. duodenum vs. esophagus, P<0.001), and number of passes (< or =2 vs.>2, P<0.013) were predictors of a positive diagnostic yield in univariate analysis. However, only the site of biopsy (P<0.001, 95% CI: 0.58-2.32) and number of passes (P=0.05) were independent predictors in multinominal logistic regression.Diagnostic yield of EUS-TCB is higher when lesion is approached through the stomach and better when more than two passes were made. In this large series, the complication rate of 2% associated with EUS-TCB was similar to that reported with EUS-fine needle aspiration technique.The efficacy and safety of single-session endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography for evaluation of pancreatic masses.There have been limited studies evaluating single-session EUS-FNA and ERCP for evaluation of pancreatic masses. The aim of this study was to determine the safety of single-session EUS-FNA and ERCP, and to compare the diagnostic accuracies of cytodiagnosis by EUS-FNA, ERCP, and their combination.A total of 100 patients with pancreatic masses were prospectively enrolled. All patients underwent single-session EUS-FNA and ERCP. The main outcome measurement was frequency of post-procedural complications. Another measurement was diagnostic accuracy of cytodiagnosis by EUS-FNA, ERCP, and their combination.Procedure-related pancreatitis occurred in 10 patients, but all patients were conservatively managed. Cytodiagnosis by EUS-FNA was significantly superior to ERCP in accuracy. In patients with a pancreatic head mass, 3 cases of false negative EUS-FNA were positive on ERCP. The combination procedures improved accuracy compared with EUS-FNA alone. By contrast, in the subgroup of the pancreatic body or tail mass, the combination of EUS-FNA and ERCP did not improve cytodiagnosis compared to that with EUS-FNA alone.Single-session EUS-FNA and ERCP appears to be as safe as performing each procedure separately. EUS-FNA should be considered the principal procedure for cytodiagnosis. ERCP has only a complementary role in patients with pancreatic head mass.Endoscopic ultrasound guided fine-needle aspiration core biopsy: comparison between an automatic biopsy device and two conventional needle systems.endoscopic ultrasound guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) allows cytologic and/or histologic diagnosis of lesions within or adjacent to the gastrointestinal tract. However, the amount of tissue obtained with a regular 22 gauge needle is not always satisfactory. With the development of a needle XNA-10J-KB (Shot-Gun) that resembles the automatic liver biopsy needle, it is expected that significant samples be obtained more frequently (core biopsy), optimizing histological analysis.to compare samples obtained with EUS-FNA using 3 different needle systems: GIP, NA-10J-1 and Shot-Gun.19 patients underwent EUS-FNA for diagnosis (5) or tumor staging (14). Mean age was 58.9 years (range 27-82), being 50% men. All patients were submitted to EUS-FNA with the 3 needle models. The Shot-Gun model was "shot" when its tip was near the target inside the lesion, followed by aspiration. Samples were submitted for cytologic and histologic examination.mean lesion size was 3.0 cm (range 0.8-5.5 cm). Final diagnoses were made after surgery or intra-operative biopsy: 13 pancreatic tumors (12 adenocarcinomas and 1 neuroendocrine tumor), 4 chronic pancreatitis, 1 acute pancreatitis, and 1 cholangiocarcinoma. Specimens adequate for cytologic diagnosis were obtained in 13/19 (68. 4%) patients using GIP model, in 14/19 (73.7%) with NA10J-1 model, and in 17/19 (89.5%) with ShotGun, model (p=0.039). Histologic analysis was possible in 10/19 (52.6%) patients using the GIP model, in 14/19 (73.7%) with NA10J-1, and in 17/19 (89.5%) with Shot-Gun, model (p=0.005). Adequate samples for cytologic or histologic assessment in 16/19 (84.2%) patients using the GIP model, in 17/19 (89.5%) with NA10J-1, and in 18/19 (94.7%) with Shot-Gun, model (p=0.223). In two cases biopsies were negative due to very hard tumors.the Shot-Gun needle obtained better samples for histological diagnosis than NA10J-1 needle and GIP.Indications for endoscopic ultrasound and diagnosis on fine-needle aspiration and cytology.To determine common indications for requesting Endoscopic Ultrasound (EUS) and to describe the diagnosis made after endoscopic ultrasound/Fine-Needle Aspiration and Cytology (FNAC) during two years at a tertiary gastrointestinal unit.Cross-sectional descriptive study.The study was carried out in Gastrointestinal Department of Military Hospital, Rawalpindi, from March 2006 to February 2008.One hundred and eighty nine patients who underwent EUS during study period at Military Hospital were included in the study. Patients too ill (hypoxemic/hypotensive) to undergo procedure safely and those with complete esophageal blockage at upper end by tumour not allowing scope/EUS probe to advance beyond were excluded. EUS was done with Olympus Exera EUS 160, linear or radial scope, as required. EUS findings were recorded against indications as enlarged lymph nodes, tumour, staging, normal or incomplete. Fine-Needle Aspiration (FNA) was done as per findings on EUS using 21-22 G needle. An on-site cytopathologist made the provisional cytopathological diagnosis. Final cytology/histopathology report was given after review of slides by consultant histopathologists at Armed Forces Institute of Pathology (AFIP), Rawalpindi, and were documented as tuberculosis, malignancy, chronic pancreatitis or reactive hyperplasia. Data was analyzed for documentation of patients' age, gender, common indications, findings on EUS/FNAC, using SPSS version 10. Percentages and frequencies were calculated for the presence of these above-mentioned variables.Of the 189 patients, 145 (77%) were male and 44 (23%) female. Age was 18-80 years (mean 49 years). Major indications for referral were lymphadenopathy in 92 (49%), suspected growth pancreas in 57 (28%), growth of stomach in 20 (11%) and a heterogeneous group included esophageal, liver, retroperitoneal masses, rectal and other pathologies. Findings on EUS included lymphadenopathy in 76, mostly in sub-carina and AP window. Mass in pancreas was seen in 36, followed by stomach tumour in 17 and esophagus in 9. FNAC was done in 142 out of 189 patients. Final diagnosis out of 67 FNAC/histopathology of lymph nodes were tuberculosis in 26 and malignant lesions in 23. These included metastatic adenocarcinoma in 8, lymphoproliferative disorder in 7, metastatic squamous cell carcinoma in 5, small cell carcinoma in 2 and anaplastic in 1. Pancreatic tumours were adenocarcinoma in 16, poorly differentiated in 3 and neuroendocrine in 2. Stomach tumours were found in 11, and included lymphomas 5, GIST 3, carcinoids 2, metastatic choriocarcinoma 1 and adenocarcinoma in 1. Therapeutically, 3 celiac blocks and one pancreatic pseudocyst drainage was done.The main indication of EUS and pathology of mediastinal and celiac nodes were metastatic malignancy and tuberculosis. Pancreatic adenocarcinoma was another common cause for asking EUS.Macroscopic on-site quality evaluation of biopsy specimens to improve the diagnostic accuracy during EUS-guided FNA using a 19-gauge needle for solid lesions: a single-center prospective pilot study (MOSE study).Although rapid on-site cytologic evaluation provides high efficacy of EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA), its availability is limited. Alternatively, macroscopic on-site quality evaluation (MOSE) may increase the efficacy of EUS-FNA.To assess the efficacy of MOSE in estimating the adequacy of histologic core specimens obtained by EUS-FNA using a standard 19-gauge needle (19GN) for solid lesions.A prospective pilot study.Tertiary-care referral center.One hundred patients with solid lesions (n = 111 lesions).EUS-FNA using 19GN MAIN OUTCOME MEASUREMENTS: The relation of a macroscopic visible core (MVC) in the FNA specimens on MOSE with histologic core and the diagnostic yields were studied.The feasibility of EUS-FNA using a 19GN was 99%. The final diagnoses were malignancy in 83 lesions and benign in 28. MOSE revealed MVC in 91.1% with the median length of 8 mm. Histologic core was confirmed in 78.9%. The receiver-operating characteristic curve of the length of MVC for the presence of histologic core showed the cut-off MVC length of 4 mm with area under the curve of .893. Comparisons of per-pass diagnostic yields showed significantly superior histologic, cytologic, and overall diagnostic yields in MVC ≥ 4 mm as compared with <4 mm. The multivariate analysis for false-negative pass identified lesion in the pancreas and MVC < 4 mm as significant risk factors. No adverse events were seen.Single center, limited operatorsMVC of ≥4 mm on MOSE can be an indicator of specimen adequacy and can improve diagnostic yield; however, additional FNA may be recommended for pancreatic lesions. (UMIN000010417.).Morphological analysis and differentiation of benign cystic neoplasms of the pancreas using computed tomography and magnetic resonance imaging.To evaluate morphologic characteristics and establish a standardized diagnostic algorithm to differentiate benign cystic pancreatic tumors (CPTs) in non-pancreatitis patients using multidetector computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI).Patients with histopathologically proven CPTs who had undergone MRI and/or CT and subsequent tumor resection in our institution were retrospectively identified. Images were analyzed for morphology and enhancement patterns by three independent blinded observers. Preoperative image findings were correlated with histopathological results. Based on the evaluated morphologic parameters, a standardized diagnostic algorithm was designed to help characterize the lesions.A total of 62 consecutive patients with 64 CPTs were identified from the surgical database (21 intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms; 10 mucinous cystic neoplasms; 12 serous microcystic adenomas; 3 serous oligocystic adenomas; 6 solid pseudopapillary tumors; 12 neuroendocrine neoplasms). The overall averaged accuracy for the 3 observers was 89.9 % for CT and 93.1 % for MRI with increasing overall accuracy in relation to the experience of the observer (88.2 %, 91.5 %, and 93.8 %, respectively). Overall, the generalized kappa value was 0.69 (CT, 0.64; MRI, 0.76); p < 0.001). The accuracy of the standardized diagnostic algorithm was 91.1 %.It is possible to characterize benign CPTs with MRI and CT, while MRI appears to be superior to CT. Diagnostic accuracy depends on the observer's experience. The standardized algorithm can aid in the differential diagnosis but still needs to be tested in other patient populations.Characterization of cystic pancreatic masses: relative accuracy of CT and MRI.The objective of our study was to determine the role and relative accuracy of CT and MRI in the characterization of cystic pancreatic masses.We retrospectively identified 58 patients with histopathologically proven cystic pancreatic masses at our institution who underwent preoperative CT (n = 40), MRI (n = 6), or both (n = 12). Two radiologists independently recorded their leading diagnoses with levels of diagnostic certainty (0-100%), their estimates of overall likelihood of malignancy (0-100%), and the morphologic characteristics of the tumors. Data were analyzed to determine relative accuracy in the diagnosis of malignancy, relationship between diagnostic certainty and accuracy, and frequency of malignancy in unilocular thin-walled cysts smaller than 4 cm.Twenty-one (36%) of 58 masses were malignant. CT and MRI were equally accurate in establishing the diagnosis of malignancy (area under the receiver operating characteristic curve [A(z)] = 0.91 and 0.85 for reviewers 1 and 2 at MRI vs 0.82 and 0.76 at CT, respectively; p > 0.05). The leading diagnosis given by reviewers 1 and 2 was correct in 46% (32/70) and 43% (30/70) of the studies, respectively. When reviewer diagnostic certainty was 90% or more, the corresponding values were not significantly (p > 0.05) improved at 55% (12/22) and 48% (10/21), respectively. Two (15%) of 13 unilocular thin-walled cysts smaller than 4 cm were frankly malignant.CT and MRI are reasonably and similarly accurate in the characterization of cystic pancreatic masses as benign or malignant; limitations include a substantial rate of misdiagnosis even when reviewer certainty is high and a moderate frequency of malignancy in small morphologically benign-appearing cysts.Relative accuracy of CT and MRI for characterization of cystic pancreatic masses.Usefulness of EUS combined with contrast-enhancement in the differential diagnosis of malignant versus benign and preoperative localization of pancreatic endocrine tumors.Pancreatic endocrine tumors (PETs) develop in relatively few patients, but they are often difficult to diagnose because of their small size and various clinical symptoms.The aim of this study was to investigate the usefulness of EUS combined with contrast enhancement (CE-EUS) in the preoperative localization of PETs and the differentiation between malignant and benign PETs.Single-center retrospective study.Sixty-two pathologically certified PETs of 41 patients who underwent EUS, multiphasic multidetector computed tomography (MDCT), and transabdominal US at our institute since 2001.Intravenous injection of US contrast media.Comparison of EUS, MDCT, and US in the preoperative identification of PETs, and the characteristic findings of EUS with malignancy.EUS showed high sensitivity (95.1%) in identifying PETs compared with MDCT (80.6%) and US (45.2%). Multivariable logistic regression analysis showed that heterogeneous ultrasonographic texture was the most significant factor for malignancy (OR = 53.33; 95% CI, 10.79-263.58). Most heterogeneous hypoechoic areas and anechoic areas corresponded to hemorrhage or necrosis on pathologic examination. They were identified as filling defects in CE-EUS and were more clearly recognized than in conventional EUS.Retrospective study.EUS has higher sensitivity in preoperative localization of PETs compared with MDCT and US. The characteristics of EUS and CE-EUS findings in malignant PETs were clarified, and they will improve the diagnostic accuracy of PETs.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas: differentiation of malignant and benign tumors by endoscopic ultrasound findings of mural nodules.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs)have a wide pathologic spectrum and it is difficult to differentiate malignant from benign tumors. The aim of this study was to identify predictors of malignancy using contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasound (CE-EUS).In our institute, main duct type and mixed type IPMNs, branch duct type IPMNs with mural nodules, and IPMNs with coexistent invasive ductal cancer were indications for surgery. Eighty-seven IPMNs (14 main duct, 25 mixed, and 48 branch duct type) were resected and CE-EUS findings were compared with pathologic findings. Twelve clinicopathological variables and CE-EUS morphologic findings were assessed.Mural nodules defined as blood flow supplied protrusions were classified into 4 types: type I: low papillary nodule, type II: polypoid nodule, type III:papillary nodule, and type IV: invasive nodule.Forty-two, 26, 16, and 3 were pathologically diagnosed as adenoma,noninvasive carcinoma, invasive IPMNs, and coexistent invasive ductal cancer, respectively. Multivariable logistic regression analysis showed that types III/IV mural nodule (odds ratio = 10.8; 95% confidential intervals = 2.75-56.1) and symptomatic IPMNs (odds ratio = 4.31; 95% confidential intervals = 1.37-14.7) were significant for malignancy. For mural nodule diameter, invasive IPMNs were significantly larger, but types III and IV mural nodules were more frequently associated with malignancy, particularly invasive cancer, at 88.9% and 91.7%, respectively. The diagnosis of IPMNs with types III or IV mural nodule as malignant resulted in a sensitivity of 60%, specificity of 92.9%, and accuracy of 75.9%.In conclusion, new morphologic criteria were useful to identify the malignant potentials of IPMNs.FDG-PET is able to detect pancreatic carcinoma in chronic pancreatitis.2-(18F)-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) is an imaging technique which enables detection of malignancies. FDG-PET has been established as a tool for the diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma (CA). Early detection is mandatory as cure can only be achieved in non-advanced disease. This is, however, very difficult with conventional radiological techniques. Patients with chronic pancreatitis (CP) are at risk of developing CA. A simple, reliable screening method for malignant degeneration is highly desirable. We set out to investigate whether FDG-PET is able to detect CA in the setting of CP and can fulfil a potential role in the early detection of CA in CP.FDG-PET was performed in 77 CP patients and in six patients with CP complicated by CA (CP + CA). We included 26 CA patients as a positive control. A positive scan was defined as focal FDG accumulation in the pancreas region.In 67 of the 77 CP (87%) patients, pancreatic FDG accumulation was absent. Six patients had significant accumulation. In CA, 24/26 patients had a positive PET. Five out of the six patients with CP + CA had focal uptake, while minor uptake was seen in one patient. FDG-PET was positive in almost all CA patients and CP + CA patients. FDG-PET was negative in the large majority (87%) of CP patients, which suggests that a positive PET scan in CP patients must lead to efforts to exclude a malignancy.These data suggest that FDG-PET has a potential role as a diagnostic tool for detecting CA in longstanding CP.Performance of endosonography-guided fine needle aspiration and biopsy in the diagnosis of pancreatic cystic lesions.Preoperative diagnosis of cystic lesions of the pancreas remains difficult despite improvement in imaging modalities and cystic fluid analysis. The aim of our study was to assess the performance of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and EUS-guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) in the diagnosis of pancreatic cystic lesions.Data from a series of 127 consecutive patients with pancreatic cystic lesions were prospectively studied. EUS and EUS-guided FNA were performed in all patients, and cystic material was used for cytological and histological analysis as well as for biochemical and tumor markers analysis. Performance of EUS diagnosis, biochemical and tumor markers, and FNA diagnosis were compared with the final histological diagnosis obtained at surgery or postmortem examination. Sixty-seven patients underwent surgery and therefore constituted our study group.EUS provided a tentative diagnosis in 113 cases (89%). Cytohistological FNA provided a diagnosis in 98 cases (77%). When the results of EUS and EUS-guided FNA were compared with the final diagnosis (67 cases), EUS correctly identified 49 cases (73%), whereas FNA correctly identified 65 cases (97%). Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of EUS and EUS-guided FNA to indicate whether a lesion needed further surgery were 71% and 97%, 30% and 100%, 49% and 100%, and 40% and 95%, respectively. Carbohydrate antigen 19-9 > 50,000 U/ml had a 15% sensitivity and a 81% specificity to distinguish mucinous cysts from other cystic lesions, whereas it had a 86% sensitivity and a 85% specificity to distinguish cystadenocarcinoma from other cystic lesions.EUS-guided FNA is a valuable tool in the preoperative diagnostic assessment of pancreatic cystic lesions.Comparison of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration for focal pancreatic lesions in patients with normal parenchyma and chronic pancreatitis.The clinical value of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) of pancreatic lesions is uncertain in patients with normal parenchyma and chronic pancreatitis. The aim of this study was to analyze the diagnostic yield and influence of EUS-FNA on the clinical management of patients with pancreatic lesions, in the presence (CP) or absence (NP) of chronic pancreatitis.A total of 207 consecutive patients with NP (n = 133) and CP (n = 74) were examined using linear array echo endoscopes for the procedure and 22-gauge needles.Adequate specimens were obtained from 200 lesions. A correct final diagnosis was established at histology (n = 108), bacteriology (n = 9), and clinical follow-up (n = 83). Cytology gave 17 false-negative EUS-FNA results (overall sensitivity: 85%). In patients with NP, 60 solid adenocarcinomas were detected, 32 other malignancies, and 38 benign lesions, with 11 false-negative results (sensitivity: 89%). In patients with CP, only seven of 13 malignancies (all solid adenocarcinomas) were identified using FNA (sensitivity: 54%). Overall, malignancy was identified in 116 patients, 32 of whom (27%) had lesions other than primary solid adenocarcinomas. Management was altered in 25 of these patients, which changed the surgical approach in 21%. EUS-FNA influenced the therapeutic approach in 44% of the total patient group.EUS-FNA was especially useful in patients with a focal pancreatic lesion with normal parenchyma. Its sensitivity in patients with CP was unacceptably low, and resection of the tumor using standard surgical techniques was still usually required to confirm the correct diagnosis. Diagnostic EUS-FNA influenced clinical management in nearly half of patients.Evaluation of fine needle aspiration vs. fine needle capillary sampling on specimen quality and diagnostic accuracy in endoscopic ultrasound-guided biopsy.To compare percutaneous and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided biopsy techniques.From July 2005 to February 2006, all patients referred for EUS-guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) were considered. If inclusion criteria were met, the first 2 biopsy passes were performed without suction (fine needle capillary [FNC] sampling). Two additional passes were performed using the same needle with 10 mL of applied suction (FNA). A single blinded pathologist later retrospectively evaluated each set of slides. Fifty-three patients met inclusion criteria. The study group comprised pancreatic masses (23), lymph nodes (26), subepithelial masses (3) and liver lesion (1). There were 38 malignant and 15 benign lesions.No statistically significant differences were found with the scoring systems considered in the study. In the subgroups of patients with pancreatic masses, lymph nodes, benign disease and malignant disease, no statistically significant outcomes were noted.No difference exists between quality and diagnostic accuracy of specimens obtained from EUS-guided tissue acquisition via FNC and FNA. The decision to use FNC or FNA should be left to the discretion of the individual endosonographer.Additional value of FDG PET/CT to contrast-enhanced CT in the differentiation between benign and malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas with mural nodules.This study aimed at determining the additional value of FDG PET/CT to contrast-enhanced CT in the differentiation between benign and malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) of the pancreas with mural nodules.This retrospective review of medical records was approved by our institutional review board. The preoperative PET/CT images of 16 non-diabetic patients with surgically proven IPMN, where mural nodules of 3 mm or larger were shown by preoperative contrast-enhanced CT, were retrospectively evaluated. The 16 patients were divided into two groups: 7 patients with benign IPMN [adenoma (n = 1) and borderline tumor (n = 6)] and 9 patients with malignant IPMN [carcinoma in situ (CIS) (n = 8) and invasive carcinoma (n = 1)]. Nuclear medicine physician blinded to the pathologic assessment of malignancy of IPMN set a spherical volume of interest (VOI) over the mural nodules on PET/CT images and recorded the peak standardized uptake value (SUV(max)) in the VOI, referring the contrast-enhanced CT images. Statistical differences in the size of mural nodule, the diameter of main pancreatic duct (MPD), and SUV(max) of the tumors between benign IPMNs and malignant IPMNs were compared using the Mann-Whitney U test. Statistical significance was set at p < 0.05. Additionally, the diagnostic accuracy of FDG PET for the detection of malignancy was calculated.The SUV(max) of the malignant IPMNs with mural nodules of 3 mm or larger was higher than that of benign IPMNs (2.7 ± 0.6 vs. 1.9 ± 0.3, p < 0.01). Meanwhile, there was no significant difference in mural nodule diameter and MPD diameter between the two groups. FDG PET/CT showed an excellent diagnostic accuracy for the differentiation between malignant and benign IPMNs with mural nodules: the sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV, and accuracy in malignant IPMN with mural nodule of FDG PET/CT were 77.8, 100, 100, 77.8, and 87.5 for the cutoff value of 2.3; and 100, 57.1, 75.0, 100, and 81.3 for the cutoff value of 2.0, respectively.The result of this study indicates that FDG PET/CT can provide additional information for the differentiation between benign and malignant IPMNs of the pancreas with mural nodules.Is positron emission tomography using 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose and 11C-acetate valuable in diagnosing indeterminate pancreatic masses?It can be impossible to differentiate a mass forming chronic pancreatitis from adenocarcinoma of the pancreas using standard anatomical imaging. Positron emission tomography using 2-[18F] fluoro-2deoxy-D-glucose (18FDG-PET) and 1-[11C]-acetate (11C-acetate-PET) are methods taking advantage of the metabolic differences between benign and malignant tissues.To determine the diagnostic accuracy of 18FDG-PET and 11C-acetate-PET in indeterminate pancreatic masses.Twenty patients with an indeterminate mass of the head of the pancreas were prospectively studied. All patients underwent 18FDG-PET and eighteen of them 11C-acetate-PET. Scans were evaluated qualitatively and quantitatively; the later by using regional standardised uptake value (SUV). Final diagnosis was established using histopathologic evaluation of resected specimen or biopsy.Adenocarcinoma was diagnosed in twelve patients and chronic pancreatitis in eight. Qualitative evaluation of 18FDG-PET imaging revealed three false negative and one false-positive results. The sensitivity, specificity, and diagnostic accuracy were 75 %, 88 %, and 80 %, respectively. The cut-off SUV to differentiate malignant from benign disease was 3,5 demonstrating a sensitivity of 91.7 % and a specificity of 75 %.18FDG-PET imaging could not confirm or exclude malignancy in indeterminate masses of the head of the pancreas with high sensitivity and diagnostic accuracy. 11C-acetate-PET provided no additional diagnostic benefits.Usefulness of PET/CT for the differentiation and characterization of periampullary lesions.At present, there is no ideal imaging modality for the diagnosis of periampullary lesions. We prospectively evaluated the preoperative diagnostic usefulness of PET/CT for differentiating malignant from benign periampullary lesions.A total of 62 patients aged 27-86 years with periampullary lesions scheduled for surgical resection were consecutively recruited. Dual-phase (18)F-FDG PET/CT was performed in all patients. An additional 3'-deoxy-3'-[(18)F]fluorothymidine (FLT) scan was performed in 21 patients (33.9%). The relationship of visual interpretation, SUV, and lesion to background ratio (LBR) with surgical histopathology diagnosis was evaluated.There were 36 patients with malignancies, 15 with benign neoplasms, and 11 with benign non-neoplasms. Using visual analysis, FDG PET/CT had good sensitivity (86.1%; 31/36), lower specificity (57.7%; 15/26), and fair accuracy (74.2%; 46/62). Regional lymph node metastases were identified in 7 of 11 patients by FDG PET/CT and only in 1 patient by abdominal CT. On the other hand, hepatic metastasis was detected in 1 patient by FDG PET/CT. Dual-phase FDG (P < 0.001) and FLT (P < 0.05) SUV(max) and LBR were significantly higher in malignant than in benign lesions, and in malignant neoplasms than in benign neoplasms. Although average FLT SUV(max) was significantly lower than the average FDG SUV(max) (P < 0.001), the specificity and accuracy of the former were significantly better.FDG PET/CT may help identify patients with periampullary malignancy. FDG SUV(max) and LBR appear to aid in the differential diagnosis and add diagnostic confidence. In addition, higher specificity and diagnostic accuracy may be achieved by additional FLT PET/CT.Preoperative multidetector row computed tomography for evaluation and assessment of resection criteria in patients with pancreatic masses.preoperative assessment of pancreatic masses is still challenging as regards the characterization and assessment of irresectability. The opportunities of modern multidetector computed tomography (MDCT) with image postprocessing can be expected to enhance the diagnostic performance if accurate criteria are elaborated.to estimate the accuracy of MDCT and multiplanar image reconstructions with the use of standardized imaging criteria for preoperative evaluation of pancreatic masses with respect to irresectability.a total of 105 consecutive patients who underwent exploratory laparoscopy or pancreatic resection and had preoperative 3-phase MDCT (4-64 rows) were enrolled retrospectively. First, transverse sections and secondly additional 3Ds were reviewed by two independent blinded observers (O1/O2). Preoperative imaging findings were correlated with intraoperative and histopathologic results.among all 105 patients, 70 malignant pancreatic tumors and 35 benign pancreatic diseases were found (accuracy of 93% for O1 and 91% for O2). For arterial tumor invasion, receiver operator characteristic (ROC) analysis (values averaged from the results of O1 and O2) revealed an area under the curve (AUC) of 0.931 for transverse sections and 0.986 for 3Ds. Regarding irresectability, positive predictive values were 97% (with 3Ds, 97%) for O1/O2; negative predictive values were 84% (with 3Ds, 89%) for O1 and 86% (with 3Ds, 91%) for O2.MDCT with 3Ds was highly accurate for evaluation and assessment of irresectability criteria in patients with pancreatic masses. However, due to the limited specificity regarding arterial tumor infiltration, the indication for surgical exploration should be made generously in case of inconclusive findings.[Ultrafast magnetic resonance tomography changes the standard in pancreas diagnosis].Since the introduction of MRI, including imaging of the hepato-pancreatic duct system (MRCP) and 3D-MR angiography (3D-MRA), new pancreatic diagnostic procedures have been developed.We report on 143 patients with benign and malignant diseases of the pancreas, who only received MRI preoperatively. All radiologic findings were confirmed intraoperatively.For resectability, MRI obtained sensitivity of 96.0% and specificity of 89.5% and for classification sensitivity of 99.1% and specificity of 95.2%.Based on our experience, the benign vs malignant nature of the disease, MRI is a safe and reliable method for pancreatic tumors being able to become the standard diagnostic procedure in the future.F-18 fluorodeoxyglucose PET in vivo evaluation of pancreatic glucose metabolism for detection of pancreatic cancer.To evaluate positron emission tomography (PET) with fluorine-18-labeled fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) for detection of pancreatic cancer compared with computed tomography (CT) and ultrasonography (US).Forty patients with suspected pancreatic cancer underwent static PET after intravenous injection of 150-300 MBq FDG. Focal FDG accumulation was regarded as a sign of malignancy and was quantitated by calculating differential uptake ratios (DURs) and tumor-liver ratios (TLRs).Malignancy was histologically proved in 27 patients. PET helped correctly classify 25 of 27 malignant conditions and 11 of 13 benign disorders. DUR and TLR were statistically significantly higher in malignant compared with benign disease (P < .01). False-negative findings were obtained in patients with insulin-dependent diabetes. False-positive findings were noted in a patient with retroperitoneal fibrosis and in one with pancreas divisum with chronic pancreatitis. PET was superior to CT and US in detection of lymph node metastases (13 of 17 vs three of 17 or one of 15, respectively.FDG PET has the potential to improve the detection of lymphadenopathy and the differential diagnosis of pancreatic masses.Prediction of malignancy with endoscopic ultrasonography in patients with branch duct-type intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm.We evaluated the accuracy of a new endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) scoring system to predict malignancy in branch duct-type intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (BD-IPMNs).We performed a retrospective multicenter study of patients who underwent EUS within 3 months before surgery and were diagnosed as having BD-IPMNs by postoperative pathologies at 8 hospitals in Korea from August 2002 to December 2011. To predict the malignancy, we applied the EUS scoring system consisting of pancreatic cyst size, height of mural nodules, main duct dilatation, septal thickening, and patulous orifice. We evaluated the diagnostic accuracy of the new EUS scoring system and compared it with previous individual risk factors.Eighty-four patients (male-to-female ratio, 55:29; mean [SD] age, 64.7 [7.1] years) had 68 benign BD-IPMNs and 16 malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms. The EUS scoring system showed 75.0% sensitivity and 94.1% specificity at 7 points. This system (area under the curve, 0.939; 95% confidence interval, 0.884-0.994) resulted in a more accurate prediction than the previous known other factors including Sendai criteria, dilatation of ducts, size of the cyst, and presence of septal thickening and mural nodules.The EUS scoring system predicted BD-IPMN malignancy more accurately than the Sendai criteria and individual risk factors.[Hydrospiral CT of the pancreas in thin section technique].To evaluate a new technique for imaging the pancreas (spiral hydro-CT) based on a combination of pharmacological intestinal paralysis and water distension of the stomach and duodenum with specific reference to tumor detection rate, differentiation of malignant versus benign tumors, differential diagnosis and assessment of tumor resectability.In an open prospective study, 151 patients with a suspected pancreatic neoplasm based on clinical, laboratory or other imaging data were examined between May 94 and October 95. Our newly developed Hydro-CT methodology included intravenous injection of 40 mg N-butylscopolaminium bromide (Buscopan) for intestinal paralysis, gastric and duodenal wall distension by oral administration of an average of 1.51 warm tap water, 30 degrees RAO patient positioning, an individualized contrast injection technique as determined beforehand by time-to-peak measurement in the portal vein and thin-slice spiral CT (3 mm increment, 6 mm table feed and 3 mm secondary reconstruction). A detailed evaluation form was used to assess (1) tumor detection rate, (2) differentiation of malignant versus benign disease, (3) differential diagnosis, and (4) accuracy of assessment of resectability by identification of infiltration into adjacent organs and vessel structures relevant for resectability such as splenic, superior mesenteric, portal vein and celiac trunk, superior mesenteric, splenic and hepatic arteries. As the gold standard for positive tumor detection surgery and microscopic diagnosis were used, and for negative tumor detection an event-free survival of 6 months.Almost all examinations were well tolerated. In only 4% was on-site administration of a gastric tube required because of vomiting. In 2% of the patients a slight allergic reaction to the contrast medium was seen. The prevalence of a pancreatic neoplasm was 38%. In tumor detection Hydro-CT reached an overall accuracy of 97.4% with a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 95.9%. In the differentiation of benign versus malignant disease Hydro-CT reached an overall accuracy of 89.7% with a sensitivity of 92.5% and a specificity of 83.3%. The prevalence of a pancreatic carcinoma was 24%; 4% other malignant tumors were found (distal common bile duct carcinoma, cystadenocarcinoma). Fifty-eight patients underwent surgical exploration. In those assessment of resectability reached an overall accuracy of 95% with a sensitivity of 90.5% and specificity of 100%.The new technique of Hydro-CT based on thin slice and spiral methodology, including pharmacological intestinal paralysis and water distension, results in a high tumor detection rate and increases sensitivity and specificity of tumor differential diagnosis and of assessment of resectability.Agreement between rapid onsite and final cytologic interpretations of EUS-guided FNA specimens: implications for the endosonographer and patient management.The practice of onsite cytology interpretation varies across endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) programs in the United States and Europe. The value, reliability, and agreement of rapid onsite evaluation (ROSE) compared with final interpretation and its impact on patient management remain largely unknown. We compared agreement between ROSE of EUS-FNA (endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration) specimens with final cytology interpretation and their respective operating characteristics.We prospectively evaluated consecutive EUS-FNA specimens obtained by a single endosonographer in the presence of an attending cytopathologist (July 2000-November 2002). The "agreement" between ROSE and final cytology interpretation was assessed by the "kappa" statistic. The frequency and possible reasons for discrepancy between ROSE and final cytologic interpretation were determined.A total of 540 patients (median age 63 yr, 77% white) underwent EUS-FNAs of 656 lesions. These included lymph nodes (LNs, N = 248), solid pancreatic masses (SPMs, N = 229), cystic pancreatic masses (CPM, N = 57), mural lesions (41), bile duct/gallbladder (N = 28), liver (N = 17), mediastinum/lung (N = 17), adrenal (N = 15), spleen (N = 3), and kidney (N = 1). Data were available for onsite evaluation in 607 lesions. Initial cytology was benign (N = 243), atypical (N = 23), suspicious (24), malignant (300), and indeterminate (N = 17). Out of the 243 benign lesions interpreted by onsite evaluation, five lesions (2.1%) were upgraded to be malignant or suspicious for malignancy on final cytology report. Of the 300 lesions initially reported malignant on ROSE, 294 (98%) remained malignant on the final cytology. There was an excellent agreement between ROSE and final cytologic evaluation (kappa = 84.0%, 95% CI 80.2-87.7), Compared with the true final status, accuracy for final interpretation was slightly higher than for ROSE but was not statistically significant (95.8%vs 93.9%). Scant cellularity remained the most frequent reason for discrepancy, accounting for 21 of 51 discrepancies (41%). Other reasons for discrepancy included: cases requiring an intradepartmental consultation (22%), cases requiring ancillary studies (12%), intra-observer variability (10%), and challenging diagnosis (10%). In three cases, (6%) we were unable to determine the possible reason for discrepancy.ROSE of EUS-FNA specimens is highly accurate compared with final cytologic evaluation. Because the diagnosis of malignancy rarely changes, informing our patients and their families and our referring physicians of a cancer diagnosis significantly reduces physician work load and expedites patient management. The majority of discrepancies are related to the nature of the lesion either because it sheds few cells, has challenging morphology, and/or requires additional ancillary studies.Differential diagnosis of benign and malign pancreatic masses with 18F-fluordeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography recorded with a dual-head coincidence gamma camera.Metabolic imaging using 18F-fluordeoxyglucose and a ring-positron emission tomography camera is an established method in the differential diagnosis of pancreatic masses. Ring-positron emission tomography cameras, however, are expensive and available in only few specialized centres. The aim of this study was to investigate how far 18F-fluordeoxyglucose scan with a conventional dual-head gamma-camera could differentiate between benign and malign pancreatic masses.Forty-one patients (male/female: 25/16; mean age: 64.0 years; range: 41-86 years) with a pancreatic mass detected by ultrasound, computed tomography or MRI were included. In all patients 18F-fluordeoxyglucose scan was performed after overnight fasting and injection of 4 mCi 18F-fluordeoxyglucose using an ADAC Vertex MCD dual head gamma-camera (ADAC; Milpitas, California, USA), equipped with a 5/8-inch NaI-crystal. Images were acquired through a 180 degrees grade rotation in the three dimensional mode. The chosen matrix was 128 x 128 x 16, a Butterworthfilter (ADAC) was used and data were transferred into visible sinograms via Fourier-Rebinning. Coronar, sagittal and transversal slices of 3.9 mm thickness each were acquired. Focal tracer enhancement was suspicious for a malignoma and therefore regarded as positive, diffuse or no tracer uptake was suspicious for a benign process and was regarded as negative for cancer. DEFINITION OF GOLD STANDARDS: A diagnosis of cancer had to be confirmed histologically by specimens obtained by 18G-needle biopsy, surgical resection or at autopsy. A diagnosis of an inflammatory mass was considered proven, if no carcinoma could be found histologically in the surgically resected mass or at autopsy, or if there was no progression of the disease during a follow-up of at least 12 months.In 22 patients carcinoma was diagnosed (pancreatic cancer: n=17; endocrine tumour: n=3; carcinoma of the common bile duct: n=2). 18F-fluordeoxyglucose scan showed a focal tracer enhancement in 19 of these 22 patients (sensitivity: 86.4%). False negative results were acquired in two patients with cancer of the common bile duct and in one patient with poorly controlled insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus. In 19 patients the final diagnosis was an inflammatory pancreatic mass. 18F-fluordeoxyglucose scan showed a diffuse tracer enhancement in 15 of these 19 patients (specificity: 78.9%). False positive results were acquired in three patients whose blood tests showed signs of an acute episode of chronic pancreatitis. Positive and negative predictive values of 18F-fluordeoxyglucose scan were 82.6% and 83.3%, respectively.18F-fluordeoxyglucose scan with a conventional dual-head gamma-camera is a highly sensitive and specific method in the differential diagnosis of benign and malign pancreatic masses.Accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound in the evaluation of cystic pancreatic neoplasms: a community hospital experience.Reports on the use of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) in differentiating benign, premalignant, and malignant pancreatic lesions have been widely variable, particularly with cystic neoplasms. We evaluated the use of EUS for cystic pancreatic lesions in a community hospital setting.All patients who underwent EUS for cystic pancreatic neoplasms from 2007 to 2010 were reviewed. A final EUS diagnosis was determined based on the examiner's impression and fine-needle aspiration results if available. Lesions were stratified as benign, premalignant, or malignant. Patients underwent surgical resection, serial imaging studies, or medical oncology/palliative care consultation as indicated.One hundred eighteen patients with cystic pancreatic lesions underwent EUS during the study period. Endoscopic ultrasound diagnoses included 75 benign (63.6%), 35 premalignant (29.7%), and 8 malignant (4.2%) lesions. Thirty-eight patients (32.2%) underwent surgery, 77 (65.3%) were monitored with imaging, and 3 (2.5%) had unresectable malignancies. Elevated carcinoembryonic antigen levels showed a trend toward predicting mucinous cysts (P = 0.062). Accuracy, sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value for cystic lesions were 87.3%, 86.8%, 87.5%, 76.7%, and 93.3%, respectively.Endoscopic ultrasound is a valuable diagnostic modality in the evaluation of cystic pancreatic neoplasms in a community hospital setting.Periductal hypoechoic sign: an endosonographic finding associated with pancreatic malignancy.Despite advances in imaging, differentiating benign from malignant causes of pancreatic duct dilation is difficult.The aim of our study was to assess the accuracy of the periductal hypoechoic sign (PHS), defined as patchy hypoechoic areas adjacent to a dilated pancreatic duct, for the diagnosis of pancreatic malignancy.Single-center, retrospective analysis.Tertiary care university hospital.All patients who underwent EUS from 2006 to 2008 for evaluation of pancreatic pathology were identified. Those with pancreatic duct dilation of 4 mm or more in the head of the pancreas or 3 mm or more in the body or tail were included. Digitally recorded EUS images were analyzed for PHS by 1 endoscopist blinded to final results. The final diagnosis was based on pathology results or clinical follow-up.During the study period, 84 of 427 patients who underwent EUS for pancreas pathology had dilated pancreatic ducts. Of these, 42 patients had benign disease and 42 had pancreatic malignancy. The PHS was noted in 31 (73.8%) of 42 patients with malignancy compared with 6 (14.3%) of 42 patients with benign disease (P < .001). The PHS had a sensitivity of 73.8%, a specificity of 85.7%, and an accuracy of 79.8% for the diagnosis of pancreatic malignancy. After adjusting for age, patients with the PHS were 17 times more likely to have a malignancy (odds ratio 16.66; 95% CI, 5.01-55.44). Pancreatic duct diameter or dilation of both bile and pancreatic ducts were not predictive of malignancy.A retrospective design.The PHS was an accurate and independent predictor of pancreatic malignancy in patients with a dilated pancreatic duct.Diagnosing pancreatic cancer: the role of percutaneous biopsy and CT.To determine the sensitivity and complications of percutaneous biopsy of pancreatic masses, and whether typical computed tomography (CT) features of adenocarcinoma can reliably predict this diagnosis.A 5 year retrospective analysis of percutaneous core biopsies of pancreatic masses and their CT features was undertaken. Data were retrieved from surgical/pathology databases; medical records and CT reports and images.Three hundred and three patients underwent 372 biopsies; 56 of 87 patients had repeat biopsies. Malignancy was diagnosed in 276 patients, with ductal adenocarcinoma in 259 (85%). Final sensitivity of percutaneous biopsy for diagnosing pancreatic neoplasms was 90%; for repeat biopsy it was 87%. Complications occurred in 17 (4.6%) patients, in three of whom the complications were major (1%): one abscess, one duodenal perforation, one large retroperitoneal bleed. CT features typical of ductal adenocarcinoma were: hypovascular pancreatic mass with bile and/or pancreatic duct dilatation. Atypical CT features were: isodense or hypervascular mass, calcification, non-dilated ducts, cystic change, and extensive lymphadenopathy. Defining typical CT features of adenocarcinoma as true-positives, CT had a sensitivity of 68%, specificity of 95%, positive predictive value (PPV) of 98%, and negative predictive value of 41% for diagnosing pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Final sensitivity of percutaneous biopsy for establishing the diagnosis was 90%. CT features typical of pancreatic adenocarcinoma had high specificity and PPV. On some occasions, especially in frail patients with co-morbidity, it might be reasonable to assume a diagnosis of pancreatic cancer if CT features are typical, and biopsy only if CT shows atypical features.Cyst fluid carcinoembryonic antigen is an accurate diagnostic marker of pancreatic mucinous cysts.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) may offer a diagnostic tool through the combination of imaging and guided fine-needle aspiration of pancreatic cysts. The purpose of this investigation was to determine the most accurate test for differentiating mucinous from nonmucinous cysts.The results of EUS imaging, cytology, and cyst fluid biochemical markers were prospectively collected and compared in a large single-center study (776 patients) using histology or malignant cytology as the final diagnostic standard in 198 patients.The mean cyst fluid carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) was greater in mucinous cysts (4703.0 ng/mL) compared with nonmucinous cysts (25.8 ng/mL) (P = 0.008). When using the optimal cutoff value of 109.9 ng/mL, the CEA was more accurate (86%, receiver operating characteristic area = 0.928) than EUS imaging (48%) and cytology (58%) in predicting a mucinous cyst (P < 0.0001). Malignant cysts had a mean cyst fluid CEA value (2558.2 ng/mL) similar to benign cysts (4700.2 ng/mL). Cytology (75%) more accurately diagnosed malignant cysts than EUS (66%) and CEA (62%) (P < 0.05).Cyst fluid CEA concentration provides a highly accurate test for the diagnosis of a mucinous cyst, but does not distinguish benign from malignant cysts. Cytology is the most accurate test for the diagnosis of a malignant cyst.Cyst fluid analysis obtained by EUS-guided FNA in the evaluation of discrete cystic neoplasms of the pancreas: a prospective single-center experience.Accurate assessment of pancreatic cystic neoplasms is imperative before selecting available treatment options, such as surgical resection, drainage, or conservative therapy. Available modalities, CT and magnetic resonance imaging, have been inconsistent in diagnosis. Reports involving EUS and cyst fluid analysis have been encouraging, including studies of EUS features and/or cyst fluid analysis, which may differentiate pancreatic cystic neoplasms.To retrospectively determine cyst fluid characteristics that differentiate cystic neoplasms.Patient evaluation included (1) EUS features (reported elsewhere) and (2) cyst fluid analysis (carcinoembryonic antigen [CEA], carbohydrate antigen 19-9 [CA 19-9], amylase and lipase, viscosity [VIS], mucin stain, and cytology). Exclusion criteria included the following: intraductal papillary mucinous tumor lesions, bloody cyst aspirate, neuroendocrine tumors, and patients without surgical histopathology.Pancreatic Biliary Center, St Luke's Medical Center, Milwaukee, Wisconsin.A total of 102 patients (60 women, 42 men; age, 23-76 years) presented for evaluation of pancreatic cystic neoplasm; 71 underwent surgical resection.Seventy-one of 102 patients who underwent surgery presented the following histopathologic correlates: 23 pseudocysts (PC), 13 serous cystadenoma (SCyA), 21 mucinous cystadenoma (MCyA), and 14 mucinous cystadenocarcinoma (MCyA-CA). Cyst fluid analysis of these patients showed the following: VIS was lower in PC (mean, 1.3) and SCyA (1.27) when compared with MCyA (1.84) and MCyA-CA (1.9). All mucinous neoplasms had VIS >1.6, whereas only 2 mucinous cystic neoplasms (MCN) had VIS = 1.6 (both PC). The CEA level was significantly higher in MCyA (adenoma [878 ng/mL], carcinoma [27,581 ng/mL]) vs PC (189 ng/mL), and SCyA (121 ng/mL). Amylase levels were higher in PC (7210 U/L) compared with cystic neoplasm (SCyA, 679 U/L; MCyA, 1605 U/L; MCyA-CA, 569 U/L).Differential diagnosis of pancreatic cystic neoplasm is significantly enhanced by cyst fluid analysis. Elevated CEA (> or =480 ng/mL) and VIS (>1.6) accurately predict MCN from SCyA and PC. Malignant from benign MCN can be differentiated by CEA levels > or =6000 ng/mL.Application of contrast-enhanced ultrasound in the diagnosis of solid pancreatic lesions--a comparison of conventional ultrasound and contrast-enhanced CT.To explore the diagnostic value of contrast-enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) by comparison with conventional ultrasound (US) and contrast-enhanced CT (CECT) in solid pancreatic lesions.Ninety patients with solid pancreatic focal lesions were enrolled, including 36 cases of pancreatic carcinoma, 28 cases of pancreatitis, 6 cases of pancreatic neuroendocrine tumor, 12 cases of solid pseudopapillary tumor of the pancreas, 6 cases of pancreatic metastases, 1 case of cavernous hemolymphangioma and 1 case of lymphoma. US and CEUS were applied respectively for the diagnosis of a total of 90 cases of solid pancreatic lesions. The diagnostic results were scored on a 5-point scale. Results of CEUS were compared with CECT.(1) 3-score cases (undetermined) diagnosed by CEUS were obviously fewer than that of US, while the number of 1-score (definitely benign) and 5-score (definitely malignant) cases diagnosed by CEUS was significantly more than that of US. There was a significant difference in the distribution of final scores using the two methods (p<0.001). The overall diagnostic accuracies of the 90 cases for CEUS and US were 83.33% and 44.44%, respectively, which indicated an obvious advantage for CEUS (p<0.001). (2) The diagnostic consistency among three ultrasound doctors: the kappa values calculated for US were 0.537, 0.444 and 0.525, compared with 0.748, 0.645 and 0.795 for CEUS. The interobserver agreement for CEUS was higher than that for US. (3) The sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of the diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma with CEUS and CECT were 91.7% and 97.2%, 87.0% and 88.9%, and 88.9% and 92.2%, respectively, while for the diagnosis of pancreatitis, the corresponding indices were 82.1% and 67.9%, 91.9% and 100%, and 88.9% and 90%, respectively, showing no significant differences (p>0.05).CEUS has obvious superiority over conventional US in the general diagnostic accuracy of solid pancreatic lesions and in the diagnostic consistency among doctors. The performances of CEUS are similar to that of CECT in the diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma and focal pancreatitis.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA): experience of an academic centre in the USA.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) has become widely accepted as an effective modality for obtaining tissue for primary diagnosis and staging. We have been using EUS-FNA since July 2001 and herein we summarize our experience over a 5-year period.A computer-based search for in-house EUS-FNA was performed in the pathology database from July 2001 to October 2006. To calculate the sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of EUS-FNA, the cytology diagnosis was compared with the surgical follow-up.A total of 951 EUS-FNAs were performed during the study period and included 279 pancreatic solid lesions, 186 pancreatic cyst lesions, 249 lymph node aspirations, 111 gastrointestinal (GI) tract submucosal lesions, and 126 miscellaneous lesions. EUS-FNA had a very high sensitivity and accuracy for solid pancreatic lesions (94.7 and 97.7%, respectively), low sensitivity and accuracy but high specificity (47, 64.8 and 95%, respectively) for cystic lesions. Cyst fluid carcinoembryonic (CEA) levels were significantly higher in mucinous neoplasms than non-neoplastic cysts. EUS-FNA also had very high sensitivity and specificity for detecting metastatic carcinoma in lymph nodes (95 and 100%, respectively). GI submucosal spindle cell tumours were further classified with immunohistochemical stains performed either on a cell block or a core biopsy obtained via EUS guidance.EUS-FNA has a very high sensitivity and accuracy for pancreatic solid lesions, but the sensitivity for cystic lesions is generally low. Cyst fluid chemical analysis for CEA is helpful, but the overlap between mucinous neoplasm and non-neoplastic cysts is significant. Recognizing GI contamination is important and immunohistochemical stains are useful for GI submucosal spindle cell lesions.Telomerase activity is a useful marker to distinguish malignant pancreatic cystic tumors from benign neoplasms and pseudocysts.Pancreatic serous cystadenoma, mucinous cystic neoplasms, ductal adenocarcinoma with cystic change, and pseudocysts are a spectrum of pancreatic cystic lesions. Their management strategy and prognosis are extremely diverse. Imaging study, cytology, and analysis of the tumor markers of cyst fluid are not always reliable in differentiation of these disease entities.Fifteen patients with pancreatic cystic neoplasms (including six mucinous cystadenocarcinomas, two mucinous cystic neoplasms with borderline malignancy, two mucinous cystadenomas, and five serous cystadenomas), 4 patients with pancreatic ductal adenocarcinomas with cystic change, and 10 patients with pseudocysts were studied. Echo-guided or computed tomography-guided biopsies of pancreatic cystic lesions and their normal counterparts were conducted on all patients prior to operation or other management. The specimens were assayed for telomerase activity by using TRAP (telomere repeat amplification protocol). The level of telomerase activity in each specimen was semiquantitated as strong, moderate, weak, and none. The final diagnoses were made from histopathological examination of surgically resected or biopsied specimens. The efficacy of telomerase activity as a tumor marker to predict malignancy of pancreatic cystic lesions was evaluated.Three of the four pancreatic ductal adenocarcinomas with cystic change had strong or moderate telomerase activity; four of the six mucinous cystadenocarcinomas had moderate or weak telomerase activity; one of the two mucinous cystadenomas with borderline malignancy had weak telomerase activity; and none of their normal counterparts had detectable telomerase activity. In contrast, none of the two mucinous cystadenomas, five serous cystadenomas, and 10 pseudocysts had detectable telomerase activity. Based on these results, the sensitivity of telomerase activity for prediction of malignancy or premalignancy of pancreatic cystic lesions was 67%, the specificity was 100%, and the positive and negative predictive values were 1.0 and 0.81, respectively. The overall accuracy was 86%.The differential expressions of telomerase activity have been detected specifically in malignant and premalignant pancreatic cystic tumors, but not in benign cystic neoplasms or pseudocysts. The implications of these results are that telomerase activation takes part in the malignant transformation of pancreatic cystic neoplasms and that telomerase activity is a useful marker to distinguish malignant pancreatic cystic tumors from benign neoplasms and pseudocysts.Diagnostic yield of malignancy during EUS-guided FNA of solid lesions with and without a stylet: a prospective, single blind, randomized, controlled trial.Use of a stylet during EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) is believed to improve the quality and diagnostic yield of specimens.To compare samples obtained by EUS-FNA with (S+) and without (S-) a stylet for diagnostic yield of malignancy and cytological characteristics.Randomized, controlled trial.Tertiary referral center.Consecutive patients referred for EUS-FNA of solid lesions.EUS-FNA; the number of passes was determined by lesion site (6 pancreas/others and 4 lymph nodes).Diagnostic yield of malignancy and degree of cellularity, specimen adequacy, contamination, and amount of blood.One hundred patients were prospectively enrolled in this randomized, controlled trial and the sites of EUS-FNA were the pancreas, 58; lymph node, 25; and other, 17. The overall diagnosis was malignancy in 56, benign in 30, suspicious/atypical in 7, and inadequate specimen in 7 lesions. There were 550 passes made (275 with a stylet and 275 without a stylet). Interim analysis demonstrated no difference in the diagnostic yield of malignancy (94 passes with a stylet [34.2%] vs 110 without a stylet [40%], P = .2) and in the proportion of inadequate specimens (57 with a stylet [20.7%] vs 64 without a stylet [23.3%], P = .2). There was no difference with regard to cellularity (P = .83), contamination (P = .31), number of cells (P = .25), and amount of blood (P = .6). Similar results were noted in a subgroup analysis based on lesion site. Applying the rules of futility, the study was terminated.Subjectivity in cytopathologists' assessment, endosonographer not blinded.There was no difference in the diagnostic yield of malignancy or proportion of inadequate specimens between passes with and without a stylet. These results suggest that the use of a stylet does not confer any advantage during EUS-FNA.[The role of multi-detector-row computed tomograph in the diagnosis of intraductal papillary-mucinous tumors of the pancreas in comparison to endoscopic retrograde pancreatography, endoscopic ultrasonography, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography].Thirty patients with intraductal papillary-mucinous tumor (IPMT) of the pancreas underwent multidetector-row CT (MD-CT) in addition to endoscopic retrograde pancreatography (ERP), and, in 27 cases magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS). The usefulness of MD-CT was investigated by comparing various imaging methods of the communication from the main pancreatic duct (MPD) to patulous/bulging papilla in addition to the indices for benign or malignant disease, the degree of dilation of the MPD, localization and size of cystic lesions, and presence or absence of neoplastic lesions, such as thickened walls and septa, intramural nodule, solid mass. With MD-CT, dilation of the MPD and localization and size of cystic lesions were accurately assessed, even in patients with obstruction of the main pancreatic duct in whom ERP was difficult to perform regardless of the presence or absence of massive amount of mucus. MD-CT with reconstructive imaging, such as MPR imaging and CPR imaging, allowed us to assess communication with the MPD and patulous/bulging papilla easier than MRCP. In our study, MD-CT was useful in the evaluation of thickened walls and septa that are predictive factors of malignancy in IPMT.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms with associated invasive carcinoma of the pancreas: imaging findings and diagnostic performance of MDCT for prediction of prognostic factors.The purpose of this study was to assess the diagnostic accuracy of MDCT for determining the prognostic factors, including the T category, lymph node metastasis, tumor size, and perineural invasion, in surgically proven intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) with an associated invasive carcinoma (IPMC) and to investigate the imaging findings.Our study group consisted of 38 patients with surgically proven IPMC who underwent preoperative dynamic CT. Two radiologists retrospectively assessed the morphologic type of IPMN, size of the cyst, size of the main pancreatic duct, and presence or absence of mural nodules. The radiologists also assessed the T category, lymph node metastasis, and perineural invasion. They graded the perineural invasion using a 3-point scale as follows: 1, normal; 2, streaky and strandlike structure in fat tissue as well as a fine, reticular pattern; and 3, irregular masses adjacent to the lesions. Statistical analyses were performed using receiver operating characteristic analysis, the McNemar test, and Fisher exact test. Kappa statistics were used to determine interobserver agreement.The morphologic types of IPMC included the main-duct type (n=11, 29%), combined type (n=18, 47%), and branch-duct type (n=9, 24%). The diagnostic accuracy for the T category was 73.7% (n=28) and 68.4% (n=26) and for the lymph node metastasis was 68.4% (n=26) and 76.3% (n=29), respectively, for the two readers, with moderate interobserver agreement (κ=0.636 and 0.708). The areas under the receiver operating characteristic curve for perineural invasion were 0.868 and 0.821. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive predictive value were 100%, 71.4%, 55.5%, and 90%, 71.4%, 52.9%, respectively. Interobserver agreement was moderate (κ=0.659). The tumor size seen on CT was not statistically different from the tumor size determined on pathology (3.9±[SD] 2.7 cm vs 3.8±2.1 cm, p=0.582). The main duct size was 11.5+6.2 mm. Mural nodules were detected in 74% (n=28) of our study patients.CT might be useful for preoperatively evaluating the T category, lymph node metastasis, tumor size, and perineural invasion of IPMC. Main pancreatic duct dilatation and the presence of mural nodules are common findings of IPMC.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration for solid pancreatic masses. Optimizing the diagnostic yield.Modern imaging methods versus clinical assessment in the evaluation of hospital in-patients with suspected pancreatic disease.Various modern imaging procedures such as endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), computed tomography (CT), and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) have been shown to be highly accurate in the diagnosis of specific disorders of the pancreas. However, prior information often causes bias in the interpretation of these results. Little information is available concerning the value of these examinations in the primary and differential diagnosis of suspected pancreatic disease-particularly in comparison with clinical evaluation, including laboratory tests and transabdominal ultrasound (TUS).Clinical and imaging information (EUS, ERCP, and CT) was collected for 184 inpatients who were referred over a 5-yr period for evaluation of suspected pancreatic disease. On the basis of patient history, laboratory tests, and the results of routine TUS, one gastroenterologist, who was unaware of any of the other procedures or the final diagnosis, made a presumptive clinical diagnosis. CT and ERCP images and EUS videotapes were then analyzed by three different and independent examiners, who had the same clinical information except for the TUS results, but were completely blinded to the results of the other examinations and the patients' diagnoses. The final diagnoses were obtained by surgery, histology, and cytology, plus a follow-up of at least 1 yr (mean 35 months) in all noncancer cases.The final diagnoses were: normal pancreas (n = 36), chronic pancreatitis without a focal inflammatory mass (n = 53) or with a focal inflammatory mass (n = 18), and pancreatic malignancy (n = 77). Clinical evaluation, including ultrasonography, achieved a sensitivity for pancreatic disease of 94% but a specificity of only 35%. The figures for the sensitivity and specificity of the three imaging procedures were 93% and 94%, respectively, for EUS; 89% and 92% for ERCP; and 91% and 78% for CT (p < 0.05 for the specificity of clinical assessment vs all three imaging tests, p > 0.05 for comparison of the three imaging procedures). In the differential diagnosis between cancer and chronic pancreatitis as well as between malignant and inflammatory tumors, there was no difference among clinical assessment and the three imaging tests.In a group of patients with a high suspicion of pancreatic disease, little additional sensitivity in the diagnosis of pancreatic disease is provided by sophisticated imaging procedures such as EUS, ERCP, and CT, in comparison with clinical assessment including laboratory values and TUS. However, the specificity can be substantially improved. To confirm the diagnosis, one of the three examinations is needed, depending on the suspected disease and local expertise. The imaging procedures should be performed in a stepwise fashion for specific purposes, such as exclusion of pancreatic disease and the planning of treatment in chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic cancer.Endosonography-guided, fine-needle aspiration cytology extending the indication for organ-preserving pancreatic surgery.Organ preserving pancreatic resections are considered whenever malignant disease is ruled out. In tumors of low malignant potential such as cystadenomas and neuroendocrine tumors, the diagnosis is rarely established preoperatively. We studied the feasibility of cytodiagnosis using endosonography-guided fine-needle aspiration in determining the operative approach.A total of 78 patients (16 female, 62 male; mean age 61.4 yr, range 31-82 yr) with focal pancreatic lesions underwent EUS-FNA. Final diagnosis was confirmed by histology, cytology, or clinical follow up (>9 months). Patients with tumors of low malignant potential were managed by customized pancreatic resections.Final diagnosis was malignant tumors in 36 patients, tumors of low malignant potential in nine (six, neuroendocrine, two, borderline mucinous cystadenomas, one, borderline adenocarcinoma), and benign in 31 (two inadequate smears). No complications occurred. With six false-negative and no false-positive results, the accuracy, sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values were 92%, 84%, 100%, 100%, and 86%, respectively. Five patients with low malignant tumors underwent duodenum-preserving pancreatic head resection, three mid segment resection, and one pylorus-preserving pancreatoduodenectomy.EUS-FNA is useful in the preoperative cytodiagnosis of pancreatic tumors of low malignant potential. It extends the indication for organ-preserving pancreatic resections and avoids the unnecessary sacrifice of adjacent organs.Safety and efficacy of cytology brushings versus standard FNA in evaluating cystic lesions of the pancreas: a pilot study.Cystic neoplastic lesions of the pancreas (CNLP) are increasingly detected and are associated with a potential for malignant transformation. Diagnostic assessment of these lesions is often limited by the cystic nature and focality of neoplastic progression of these lesions. EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) of cyst fluid and exfoliated cells is one of the most accurate methods of diagnosis but still has limited sensitivity. A new, through-the-needle cytologic brush system has recently been approved for use during EUS evaluation of cystic lesions of the pancreas.To evaluate the cytologic yield and safety profile of the new cytobrush compared with conventional FNA in evaluating CNLP.Ten consecutive patients with CNLP were included. All cysts were sampled by standard EUS-FNA (0.5 of cyst volume) followed by brush cytology, then by aspiration of the remaining fluid. Fluid samples were separately submitted (standard FNA and cytobrushings FNA) but were read by the same pathologist. Complications were assessed during the immediate postprocedure period (2-3 hours) and by a telephone call conducted approximately 30 days after the procedure to inquire about any new symptoms, including abdominal pain, melena, hematochezia, hematemesis, fever, nausea, and vomiting.High-volume EUS referral center.Ten consecutive patients with CNLP that measured at least 20 mm in maximal dimension were included.Cellularity and presence of diagnostic cells on the FNA.In 7 of 10 cases, the EchoBrush specimen was superior to FNA in terms of cellularity and detection of diagnostic cells. Two cases had complications: 1 major and 1 minor intracystic bleed. No infection or pancreatitis was observed.The interpreting pathologist for the case was not blinded to the results of either of the samples. In addition, this pilot study represents only a single-center experience.This study suggests that brush cytology specimens obtained at the time of EUS are superior to conventional FNA because of the higher yield of epithelial cells. It is unclear whether bleeding is more common after EchoBrush sampling; however, caution should be taken in patients who require anticoagulation until further data are available.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration of pancreatic cystic lesions provides inadequate material for cytology and laboratory analysis: initial results from a prospective study.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is considered a valuable and safe technique for further investigation of pancreatic cystic lesions. In the framework of a prospective study on the accuracy of EUS-FNA we report our initial technical results regarding puncture access, sample adequacy, and complicationsConsecutive patients with indeterminate pancreatic cystic lesions underwent EUS and EUS-FNA. Pancreatic cyst fluid was collected for cytopathological analysis and measurement of amylase, carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), and carbohydrate antigen 19.9 (CA 19.9) levels. Main outcome parameter for this analysis was the percentage of samples adequate for cytologic and laboratory analysis.Of 143 patients (median age 63 years; median cyst size 2.8 cm) who underwent EUS, FNA was performed in 128 (90 %). The various reasons for not doing FNA included large distance between transducer and cystic lesion (n = 9), cyst not seen or too small (n = 2), and evident diagnosis not requiring FNA (n = 3). FNA was not possible in four patients (technical failures). Cyst fluid sent for cytology provided adequate cellular material in 44 cases only, accounting for an intention-to-diagnose yield of 31 % (44/143). Sufficient fluid for biochemical analysis was obtained in 68 cases (49 %). Complications occurred in three patients (2.4 %).Although EUS-guided FNA was technically feasible in the majority of patients with pancreatic cystic lesions (87 %), it was possible to obtain a classifying cytopathologic diagnosis and a chemical analysis in only a third and a half of cases, respectively.Histologic and imaging features of mural nodules in mucinous pancreatic cysts.Mural nodules predict malignancy within pancreatic cysts, but it is not clear whether endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and computed tomography (CT) accurately identify nodules. We assessed images and the histology of mural nodules in branch duct intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (BD-IPMNs) and mucinous cystic neoplasms (MCNs) and identified criteria to distinguish mural nodules from mucus.We reviewed pathology specimens and EUS and CT images from consecutive patients with resected BD-IPMNs or MCNs. A blinded interobserver study of the EUS images was then conducted to identify features that distinguished nodules from mucus. After education about these features, the raters interpreted the EUS images again.On the basis of histologic analysis, 22 of 57 cases had epithelial nodules. Cancer or high-grade dysplasia was found in 23% of cysts with nodules versus 3% without nodules (P = .02). On the basis of reports, EUS detected epithelial nodules with 75% sensitivity and 83% specificity, whereas these values were 24% and 100%, respectively, for CT. Mucus accounted for 65% of intracystic lesions detected by EUS and was often diagnosed by using change in body position and fine-needle aspiration. Interobserver analysis identified 3 features that were detected by EUS (echogenicity, edge, and rim) that distinguished mucus from epithelial nodules. The diagnostic accuracy of the raters improved from a mean of 57% to 79% after education about these features (P = .004); accuracy was 90% when all 3 features of mucus were present.Malignancy is associated with epithelial nodules in BD-IPMNs and MCNs, but most echogenic lesions detected in cysts by EUS are mucus. Knowledge of features that discriminate mucus from mural nodules improves the diagnostic accuracy of EUS.Factors predicting the number of EUS-guided fine-needle passes for diagnosis of pancreatic malignancies.The factors that affect the number of needle passes needed to diagnose pancreatic malignancies using endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) -guided fine-needle aspiration are unknown.Patient and endosonographic data were prospectively recorded on 121 consecutive patients with pancreatic malignancy. Of these, 110 underwent EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration. A cytopathologist was in attendance for all aspiration procedures.Initial EUS detected a pancreatic mass in 96% of cases; 23% of these were not seen by computed tomography. EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration was performed in 109 of 110 (99%) patients, including 95 masses, 7 lymph nodes, and 7 hepatic metastases. EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration provided a cytologic diagnosis of malignancy in 104 of 110 (95%). Only tumor differentiation and the site of aspiration affected the number of passes.With the participation of a cytopathologist, EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration can diagnose pancreatic malignancies with a high degree of accuracy. Only the aspiration site (mass versus node/liver metastasis) can be used to direct the number of passes if a cytopathologist is not present. Without a cytopathologist in attendance, 5 to 6 passes should be made for pancreatic masses and 2 to 3 for liver metastases or lymph nodes; however, this approach will be associated with a 10% to 15% reduction in definitive cytologic diagnoses, extra procedure time, increased risk and additional needles.Differential diagnosis of groove pancreatic carcinomas vs. groove pancreatitis: usefulness of the portal venous phase.To clarify if the portal venous phase is helpful for the differential diagnosis of groove pancreatic carcinomas and groove pancreatitis.MDCT and MRI of groove pancreatic carcinomas (n=7) and groove pancreatitis (n=15) were retrospectively reviewed by two radiologists independently. The signal intensity on T2-weighted images was subjectively assessed. The presence or absence of common bile duct (CBD) and main pancreatic duct (MPD) strictures, calcifications, and cystic lesions was evaluated. Additionally, the appearance of groove pancreatic carcinoma and that of groove pancreatitis in the portal venous phase on dynamic MDCT and MRI were compared.There were no significant differences in the signal intensity on T2-weighted images and in the presence or absence of CBD and MPD strictures, calcifications, and cystic lesions between groove pancreatic carcinomas and groove pancreatitis. However, patchy focal enhancement in the portal venous phase was more commonly observed in groove pancreatitis than groove pancreatic carcinoma (Reviewers 1 and 2: 14/15 [93.3%] vs. 1/7 [14.3%], P<0.0001). In addition, peripheral enhancement was only seen in groove pancreatic carcinomas (Reviewer 1: 4/7 [57.1%] vs. 0/15 [0%], P<0.005, and Reviewer 2: 3/7 [42.9%] vs. 0/15 [0%], P<0.05).The portal venous phase may be helpful for the differential diagnosis of groove pancreatic carcinomas and groove pancreatitis.18Fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography in the management of patients with suspected pancreatic cancer.To assess the accuracy and clinical impact of 18fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography (18FDG-PET) on the management of patients with suspected primary or recurrent pancreatic adenocarcinoma, and to assess the utility of 18FDG-PET in grading tumor response to neoadjuvant chemoradiation.The diagnosis, staging, and treatment of pancreatic cancer remain difficult. Small primary tumors and hepatic metastases are often not well visualized by computed tomographic scanning (CT), resulting in a high incidence of nontherapeutic celiotomy and the frequent need for "blind resection." In addition, the distinction between local recurrence and nonspecific postoperative changes after resection can be difficult to ascertain on standard anatomic imaging. 18FDG-PET is a new imaging technique that takes advantage of increased glucose metabolism by tumor cells and may improve the diagnostic accuracy of preoperative studies for pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Eighty-one 18FDG-PET scans were obtained in 70 patients undergoing evaluation for suspected primary or recurrent pancreatic adenocarcinoma. Of this group, 65 underwent evaluation for suspected primary pancreatic cancer. Nine patients underwent 18FDG-PET imaging before and after neoadjuvant chemoradiation, and in eight patients 18FDG-PET scans were performed for possible recurrent adenocarcinoma after resection. The 18FDG-PET images were analyzed visually and semiquantitatively using the standard uptake ratio (SUR). The sensitivity and specificity of 18FDG-PET and CT were determined for evaluation of the preoperative diagnosis of primary pancreatic carcinoma, and the impact of 18FDG-PET on patient management was retrospectively assessed.Among the 65 patients evaluated for primary tumor, 52 had proven pancreatic adenocarcinoma and 13 had benign lesions. 18FDG-PET had a higher sensitivity and specificity than CT in correctly diagnosing pancreatic carcinoma (92% and 85% vs. 65% and 62%). Eighteen patients (28%) had indeterminate or unrecognized pancreatic masses on CT clarified with 18FDG-PET. Seven patients (11%) had indeterminate or unrecognized metastatic disease clarified with 18FDG-PET. Overall, 18FDG-PET suggested potential alterations in clinical management in 28/65 patients (43%) with suspected primary pancreatic adenocarcinoma. Of the nine patients undergoing 18FDG-PET imaging before and after neoadjuvant chemoradiation, four had evidence of tumor regression by PET, three showed stable disease, and two showed tumor progression. CT was unable to detect any response to neoadjuvant therapy in this group. Eight patients had 18FDG-PET scans to evaluate suspected recurrent disease after resection. Four were noted to have new regions of 18FDG-uptake in the resection bed; four had evidence of new hepatic metastases. All proved to have metastatic pancreatic adenocarcinoma.These data confirm that 18FDG-PET is useful in the evaluation of patients with suspected primary or recurrent pancreatic carcinoma. 18FDG-PET is more sensitive and specific than CT in the detection of small primary tumors and in the clarification of hepatic and distant metastases. 18FDG-PET was also of benefit in assessing response to neoadjuvant chemoradiation. Although 18FDG-PET cannot replace CT in defining local tumor resectability, the application of 18FDG-PET in addition to CT may alter clinical management in a significant fraction of patients with suspected pancreatic cancer.The string sign for diagnosis of mucinous pancreatic cysts.Pancreas cyst fluid analysis does not provide optimal discrimination between mucinous and nonmucinous cysts. The aim of this study was to assess the performance characteristics of the "string sign" - a test performed at the time of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA), for the diagnosis of mucinous pancreatic cysts (branch duct intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms [bIPMN] and mucinous cystic neoplasms).Patients undergoing EUS-FNA of pancreatic cystic lesions at one referral center between 2003 and 2012 were included. The string sign was performed prospectively, and was considered positive if ≥ 1 cm string formed in cyst fluid and lasted for ≥ 1 second. Performance characteristics of the string sign and a sequential cyst fluid test interpretation model were assessed.For 98 histologically proven cases, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of the string sign for diagnosis of mucinous cysts were 58 % (95 % confidence interval [CI] 44 % - 70 %), 95 % (83 % - 99 %), 94 % (81 % - 99 %), and 60 % (46 % - 72 %), respectively. When string sign results and carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) concentration (≥ 200 ng/mL) were combined, diagnostic accuracy improved from 74 % and 83 %, respectively, to 89 % (P ≤ 0.03). Among bIPMN, a positive string sign was associated with gastric and intestinal epithelial subtypes. The sequential cyst fluid test interpretation model (including cytology, mucin stain, CEA, and string sign) yielded an overall sensitivity for mucinous lesions of 96 %, with a specificity of 90 %.The string sign is highly specific for diagnosis of mucinous pancreatic cysts, and improves overall diagnostic accuracy of pancreatic cyst fluid analysis. Sequential cyst fluid test interpretation yields high diagnostic sensitivity and specificity for mucinous cysts.Influence of on-site cytopathology evaluation on the diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) of solid pancreatic masses.The aim of this study was to evaluate the influence of on-site cytopathological evaluation on the diagnostic yield of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) for the differential diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses in an unselected series of consecutive patients.Patients undergoing EUS-guided FNA of solid pancreatic lesions over a 2-year study period were included. Samples were either evaluated on site by a cytopathologist or processed by the endoscopist and sent to the pathology department for evaluation. Diagnostic accuracy for malignancy, number of needle passes, adequate-specimen collection rate, cytological diagnosis, and final diagnosis, and complication rate according to the presence or absence of on-site cytopathologist were evaluated.A total of 182 patients were included. An on-site cytopathologist was available in 95 cases (52.2%). There was no difference between groups in terms of age, sex, location, and size of the lesions. A significantly higher number of needle passes was performed when an on-site cytopathologist was not available (3.5±1.0 vs. 2.0±0.7; P<0.001). The presence of an on-site cytopathologist was associated with a significantly lower number of inadequate samples (1.0 vs. 12.6%, P=0.002), and a significantly higher diagnostic sensitivity (96.2 vs. 78.2%; P=0.002) and overall accuracy (96.8 vs. 86.2%; P=0.013) for malignancy. Three patients developed complications (two acute pancreatitis, one local bleeding), all of them belonging to the group without on-site cytopathology.On-site cytopathological evaluation improves the diagnostic yield of EUS-guided FNA for the cytological diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses. This is associated with a significantly lower number of inadequate samples and a lower number of needle passes.Endoscopic diagnosis and staging of mucinous cystic neoplasms and intraductal papillary-mucinous tumors.The number of patients with cystic neoplasms of the pancreas as detected using various types of imaging techniques has been steadily increasing. Among the cystic neoplasms, mucinous cystic neoplasms (MCNs) and intraductal papillary-mucinous tumors (IPMTs) were comparatively more frequently encountered. We used imaging techniques to focus on the differential diagnosis of MCNs and IPMTs, and tumor staging.Fifteen patients with MCNs with ovarian-like stroma and 109 patients with IPMTs were experienced. We examined the image findings for the differential diagnosis and stage diagnosis of these two types of cystic neoplasms.Endoscopic ultrasonography could reveal detailed images of internal structure and was effective for the diagnosis of MCNs. Other endoscopic imaging modalities could not give specific findings for MCNs. Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP; including duodenoscopic findings and pancreatogram) and pancreatoscopy showed the characteristic and specific findings of IPMTs. Also, endoscopic ultrasonography and intraductal ultrasonography were found to have high sensitivity and diagnostic accuracy for their differential diagnosis of neoplastic/nonneoplastic and invasive/noninvasive lesions in IPMTs.Endoscopic imaging techniques are capable of revealing the detailed structure of pancreatic cystic lesions. They are effective for differential diagnosis, for assessing the degree of malignancy, and for deciding upon an appropriate treatment in patients with IPMTs.Value of EUS in early detection of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinomas in patients with intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms.Pancreatic ductal adenocarcinomas (PDAC) sometimes arise in patients with intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs). This study examined the incidence of PDACs concomitant to or derived from branch duct IPMNs. The usefulness of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) relative to other imaging methods for detecting these tumors was also assessed.This retrospective study used data from clinical records and imaging studies that were collected prospectively. During 2001-2009, 167 consecutive patients with IPMNs underwent EUS, ultrasonography, computed tomography (CT), and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). The 102 patients whose branch duct IPMNs lacked mural nodules/symptoms and thus did not qualify for resection were followed up by semiannual EUS and annual ultrasonography, CT, and MRI. The sensitivity and specificity with which the four modalities detected IPMN-derived and -concomitant PDACs at the first examination and throughout the study period were evaluated. The rate of PDAC development during follow-up was analyzed by the Kaplan-Meier method.A total of 17 IPMN-derived and 11 IPMN-concomitant PDACs were diagnosed at the first examination. Lesions that did not qualify for resection or chemotherapy were followed up for a median of 42 months. Seven IPMN-concomitant PDACs and no IPMN-derived PDACs were detected during follow-up. The 3- and 5-year rates of IPMN-concomitant PDAC development were 4.0% and 8.8%, respectively. At the first examination, EUS was superior to other imaging modalities in terms of IPMN-derived and -concomitant PDAC detection. Throughout the study period, including follow-up, EUS was significantly better at detecting IPMN-concomitant PDACs than the other modalities.IPMN-concomitant PDACs are quite often found at diagnosis and during follow-up. EUS examination of the whole pancreas plays an important role in the management of IPMNs as it allows the early detection of these small invasive carcinomas.Long-term follow-up of patients with clinically indeterminate suspicion of pancreatic cancer and normal EUS.EUS often is performed because of a clinical suspicion of pancreatic cancer when the results of other noninvasive diagnostic tests are indeterminate. The aim of this study was to determine the true negative predictive value of a normal EUS in a cohort of patients with an indeterminate suspicion of pancreatic cancer by obtaining long-term follow-up information.Patients referred for EUS of the pancreas for the following indications were identified: elevated carbohydrate-associated antigen (CA 19-9) without other definitive evidence of pancreatic cancer, subtle abnormalities on CT of the pancreas, and unexplained abdominal pain and/or weight loss. Endoscopy procedure reports, as well as inpatient and outpatient records were obtained. In addition, referring physicians, as well as patients, were contacted to acquire adequate follow-up information.A total of 80 patients were included in the study. Follow-up of at least 6 months was obtained for 76 (95%) patients (mean follow-up 23.9 months). No patient with a normal EUS of the pancreas developed pancreatic cancer or required pancreatic surgery during the follow-up period. One patient in whom a diagnosis of chronic pancreatitis was made by EUS subsequently was found to have pancreatic cancer at surgery.A normal EUS of the pancreas in the setting of subtle radiologic findings, serologic abnormalities, and/or nonspecific symptoms definitively rules out the presence of pancreatic cancer.Measurement of the apparent diffusion coefficient in intraductal mucin-producing tumor of the pancreas by diffusion-weighted echo-planar MR imaging.We investigated whether diffusion-weighted echo-planar magnetic resonance (MR) imaging can help differentiate intraductal mucin-producing tumors of the pancreas from other cystic lesions.Diffusion-weighted echo-planar MR imaging was performed in patients with mucin-producing tumors (n = 19), pseudocysts (n = 9), chronic pancreatitis with diffuse main pancreatic dilatation (n = 5), and serous cystadenomas (n = 2). Images were obtained with diffusion sensitizing gradients of 30, 300, and 900 s/mm2. The apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC) was calculated.The mean (+/- standard deviation) ADCs of mucin-producing tumors (2.8 x 10(-3) mm2/s +/- 1.0 x 10(-3)), pseudocysts (2.9 x 10(-3) mm2/s +/- 1.2 x 10(-3)), dilated main pancreatic duct in chronic pancreatitis (3.3 x 10(-3) mm2/s +/- 1.2 x 10(-3)), serous cystadenomas (2.9 x 10(-3) and 2.6 x 10(-3) mm2/s), and cerebrospinal fluid (3.5 x 10A(-3) mm2/s +/- 1.1 x 10(-3)) were not statistically different.It is difficult to differentiate between mucin-producing tumors and other cystic lesions by ADC measurements when using diffusion-weighted echo-planar MR imaging.Prospective evaluation of reader performance on MDCT in characterization of cystic pancreatic lesions and prediction of cyst biologic aggressiveness.Our objective was to evaluate the accuracy of MDCT features of pancreatic cystic lesions in cyst characterization and in predicting cyst biologic aggressiveness.In this prospective study, 114 patients (40 men and 74 women; age range, 23-89 years) with 130 cystic lesions (size range, 31-160 mm) in the pancreas underwent contrast-enhanced dual-phase (n = 92) and portal phase (n = 22) examinations with 16- or 64-MDCT scanners. Using defined morphologic features of cystic lesions on MDCT, two readers performed blinded evaluations for cystic characterization and predicting biologic aggressiveness (invasive lesions, carcinoma in situ, and moderate grade dysplasias) before pancreatic surgery. Receiver operating characteristic analysis was performed to assess the accuracy of MDCT using pathologic evaluation of the surgical specimen as a reference standard.On the basis of MDCT features, the radiologic accuracy (reader 1 and reader 2) for stratifying lesions into mucinous and nonmucinous subtypes was 85% and 82% and for recognizing cysts with aggressive biology was 86% and 85%, respectively. Predictive values of MDCT were superior for lesions > 30 mm and nonmucinous lesions. Features favoring aggressive biology were main pancreatic duct dilation > 10 mm (p < 0.0001), biliary obstruction (p=0.01), mural nodule (p < 0.0001), main-duct intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (p < 0.0001), and advanced age (p = 0.0001). Sensitivity of detecting morphologic features was higher with the dual-phase pancreatic protocol CT.Morphologic features of pancreatic cystic lesions on MDCT allow reliable characterization into mucinous and nonmucinous subtypes and enable prediction of biologic aggressiveness.Accuracy of cytologic interpretation of pancreatic neoplasms by fine needle aspiration and pancreatic duct brushings.To investigate the accuracy of fine needle aspiration (FNA) specimens and pancreatic duct brushings in the detection of pancreatic lesions and to compare the results with follow-up biopsy and/or surgical interpretation.We reviewed a total of 57 specimens (37/20), 37 FNA specimens and 20 pancreatic duct brushings, from 45 patients treated at Froedtert Memorial Lutheran Hospital, affiliated with the Medical College of Wisconsin, Milwaukee, over a 4-year period. The FNA and brushing samples were categorized as follows: positive for malignancy (21/3 = 24), suspicious for malignancy (8/7 = 15) and atypical (8/10 = 18). The results were then correlated with the tissue diagnosis.The 24 cytologic samples positive for malignancy included 23 (20/3) pancreatic ductal carcinoma (CA) and 1 (1/0) neuroendocrine CA; in the suspicious category, 11 (6/5) were pancreatic ductal CA; 2 (0/2) mucinous neoplasms and (2/0) neuroendocrine neoplasms; in the atypical category; 2 (2/0) suggestive of mucinous neoplasia, 1 (1/0) suggestive of serous neoplasia and 9 (2/7) favor reactive; and 6 (3/3) without further categorization. Tissue diagnoses were available in 26 cases: 12 (10/2) cases positive for malignancy, 8 (5/3) suspicious for malignancy and 6 (5/1) atypical. The 12 cytologically positive cases confirmed by histology showed 10 ductal CA, 1 neuroendocrine CA and 1 negative. All 8 cases (100%) suspicious for malignancy revealed positive results, including 5 ductal CA, 1 neuroendocrine neoplasm, 1 mucinous cystic neoplasm and 1 lymphoma. Of the 6 atypical lesions, 1 showed ductal CA, 2 mucinous cystic neoplasm and 3 chronic pancreatitis.Pancreatic FNA and duct brushings [table: see text] are accurate methods in identifying pancreatic lesions, particularly ductal CA. Accuracy can be improved in the case of mucinous and other lesions with adequate cellularity of the smear and recognizing the limitations of brush samples in the case of mucinous cystic lesions. False negative results may occur in cases of poor representation of malignant cells or poor sampling.Positron emission tomography does not add to computed tomography for the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer.Positron emission tomography (PET) has been proposed for pancreatic cancer diagnosis and staging.112 patients with suspected pancreatic cancer underwent 18F-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose gamma camera PET and computed tomography (CT), of whom 62 also had laparoscopic ultrasonography and 70 underwent abdominal exploration for potential resection. The final diagnosis was malignancy in 78 and benign disease in 34 patients (25 with chronic pancreatitis).The diagnostic sensitivity and specificity for PET were 73 and 60% compared to 89 and 65% for CT respectively (Cohen's kappa = 0.59). In 30 patients CT was equivocal with cancer in 14 and benign disease in 16. PET correctly diagnosed 13 of these patients (cancer in 6 and benign disease in 7), interpreted 4 as equivocal (cancer in 3 and benign disease in 1) but was incorrect in the remaining 13 patients (cancer in 5 and benign disease in 8). The sensitivity and specificity for detecting small volume metastatic disease were 20 and 94% for CT and 22 and 91% for PET, respectively.PET had a similar accuracy to that of CT for imaging pancreatic cancer but it did not provide any additional information in patients with equivocal CT findings and currently would seem of little benefit for the staging of pancreatic cancer.Diagnosis of pancreatic cystic neoplasms: a report of the cooperative pancreatic cyst study.Cysts of the pancreas display a wide spectrum of histology, including inflammatory (pseudocysts), benign (serous), premalignant (mucinous), and malignant (mucinous) lesions. Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) may offer a diagnostic tool through the combination of imaging and guided, fine-needle aspiration (FNA). The purpose of this investigation was to determine the most accurate test for differentiating mucinous from nonmucinous cystic lesions.The results of EUS imaging, cyst fluid cytology, and cyst fluid tumor markers (CEA, CA 72-4, CA 125, CA 19-9, and CA 15-3) were prospectively collected and compared in a multicenter study using histology as the final diagnostic standard.Three hundred forty-one (341) patients underwent EUS and FNA of a pancreatic cystic lesion; 112 of these patients underwent surgical resection, providing a histologic diagnosis of the cystic lesion (68 mucinous, 7 serous, 27 inflammatory, 5 endocrine, and 5 other). Receiver operator curve analysis of the tumor markers demonstrated that cyst fluid CEA (optimal cutoff of 192 ng/mL) demonstrated the greatest area under the curve (0.79) for differentiating mucinous vs. nonmucinous cystic lesions. The accuracy of CEA (88 of 111, 79%) was significantly greater than the accuracy of EUS morphology (57 of 112, 51%) or cytology (64 of 109, 59%) (P < 0.05). There was no combination of tests that provided greater accuracy than CEA alone (P < 0.0001).Of tested markers, cyst fluid CEA is the most accurate test available for the diagnosis of mucinous cystic lesions of the pancreas.Intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas: features with multimodality imaging.The radiologic diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous tumor (IPMT) of the pancreas is important to establish because of its malignant potential and in order to determine the site of tumor origin and its extent. These pancreatic tumors are recognized more often now than previously because of the increasing use of imaging modalities such as computed tomography and magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography. The main features of IPMT are given in this pictorial essay, with illustrations provided from a series of 50 patients with a surgically proven diagnosis of IPMT.Differential diagnosis of pancreatic cancer from normal tissue with digital imaging processing and pattern recognition based on a support vector machine of EUS images.EUS can detect morphologic abnormalities of pancreatic cancer with high sensitivity but with limited specificity.To develop a classification model for differential diagnosis of pancreatic cancer by using a digital imaging processing (DIP) technique to analyze EUS images of the pancreas.A retrospective, controlled, single-center design was used.The study took place at the Second Military Medical University, Shanghai, China.There were 153 pancreatic cancer and 63 noncancer patients in this study.All patients underwent EUS-guided FNA and pathologic analysis.EUS images were obtained and correlated with cytologic findings after FNA. Texture features were extracted from the region of interest, and multifractal dimension vectors were introduced in the feature selection to the frame of the M-band wavelet transform. The sequential forward selection process was used for a better combination of features. By using the area under the receiver operating characteristic curve and other texture features based on separability criteria, a predictive model was built, trained, and validated according to the support vector machine theory.From 67 frequently used texture features, 20 better features were selected, resulting in a classification accuracy of 99.07% after being added to 9 other features. A predictive model was then built and trained. After 50 random tests, the average accuracy, sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value for the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer were 97.98 ± 1.23%, 94.32 ± 0.03%, 99.45 ± 0.01%, 98.65 ± 0.02%, and 97.77 ± 0.01%, respectively.The limitations of this study include the small sample size and that the support vector machine was not performed in real time.The classification of EUS images for differentiating pancreatic cancer from normal tissue by DIP is quite useful. Further refinements of such a model could increase the accuracy of EUS diagnosis of tumors.A prospective diagnostic accuracy study of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography, multidetector row computed tomography, and magnetic resonance imaging in primary diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer.To prospectively compare the accuracy of combined positron emission tomography/computed tomography using F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG-PET/CT), multidetector row computed tomography (MDCT), and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the evaluation of patients with suspected pancreatic malignancy.FDG-PET/CT imaging is increasingly used for staging of pancreatic cancer. Preliminary data suggest a significant influence of FDG-PET/CT on treatment planning, although its role is still evolving.Thirty-eight consecutive patients with suspicion of pancreatic malignancy were enrolled. Patients underwent a protocol including FDG-PET/CT, MDCT, and MRI combined with magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography, all of which were blindly evaluated. The findings were confirmed macroscopically at operation and/or by histopathologic analysis (n = 29) or follow-up (n = 9). Results of TNM classification of different imaging methods were compared with clinical TNM classification.Pancreatic adenocarcinoma was diagnosed in 17 patients, neuroendocrine tumor in 3, mass-forming pancreatitis in 4, cystic lesion in 6, and fibrosis in 2. Six patients had a finding of a normal pancreas. The diagnostic accuracy of FDG-PET/CT for pancreatic malignancy was 89%, compared with 76% and 79% for MDCT and MRI, respectively. In the differential diagnosis of suspected malignant biliary stricture at endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreaticography (n = 21), FDG-PET/CT had a positive predictive value of 92%. In 17 patients with advanced pancreatic adenocarcinoma, FDG-PET/CT had a sensitivity of 30% for N- and 88% for M-staging. Both MDCT and MRI had sensitivities of 30% for N- and 38% for M-staging. Furthermore, the clinical management of 10 patients (26%) was altered after FDG-PET/CT.FDG-PET/CT was more sensitive than conventional imaging in the diagnosis of both primary pancreatic adenocarcinoma and associated distant metastases. In contrast, the sensitivity of FDG-PET/CT was poor in detecting local lymph node metastasis, which would have been important for an assessment of resectability. We recommend the use of FDG-PET/CT in the evaluation of diagnostically challenging cases, especially in patients with biliary strictures without evidence of malignancy in conventional imaging.[Assessment of neoplastic pancreatic focal injury by multidetector computed tomography].pancreatic focal neoplastic lesions (PFNL) should be characterized through image methods to differentiate from no neoplastic lesions, suggesting one or more probable diagnosis, and staging of malignant lesions, in order to help define the estrategy of medial or surgical management. The multidetector computed tomography (MDCT) offers multiple properties and advantages that enable adequate characterization of the PFNL. The objective of this study is to evaluate de usefulness of MDCT in characterizing PFNL.a descriptive, retrospective caseseries study has been conducted. It consisted of reviewing MDCT studies in which PFNL were found, over a period of 4 years 11 months from January 2006 to November 2010.we obtained 54 cases of PFNL which were characterized by MDCT; 75.9% for a specific diagnosis, and were categorized as indeterminate 24.1%, considering more than one possible diagnosis. The most frequent PFNL type was pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma in 51.9%. Pancreatic cystic neoplasms accounted for 16.7%.MDCT is useful for identifying and characterizing LFNP, this means the possibility of establishing one or more diagnostic possibilities and guide medical management.[Intraductal papillary-mucinous tumor of the pancreas: difficulties and mistakes of diagnostics and treatment].15 patients with intraductal papillary-mucinous tumors (IPMT) of the pancreas were observed. Clinical manifestation corresponded with chronic pancreatitis. Ultrasound study, including endosonography, contrast-enhanced computer and magnetic resonance tomography were used in complex observation of the patients. Dilation of main or lateral pancreatic ducts, connection of tumor with pancreatic duct system and absence of septal calcinosis are typical signs in radiodiagnostics of IPMT. Visualization of parietal papillary proliferations and their contrast enhancement are undeniable signs f or neoplastic character of pancreatic duct dilation. Sensitivity of CT, MRТ and endoUS amounted accordingly 66, 83 and 88%. All patients were operated. Extent of operation was determined by morphological character, localization and size of the tumor (pylorus-preserving pancreaticoduodenal resection was carried out to 6 patients, distal resection including robot-assisted - to 7 patients, midline resection - to 1 patient, duodenum-preserving resection of head and body of pancreas - to 1 patient). Intraoperative urgent histologic study of pancreatic section was carried out by all means. Tumors with borderline degree of malignancy were detected in 4 cases.Value of contrast-enhanced 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography in detection and presurgical assessment of pancreatic cancer: a prospective study.Positron Emission Tomography (PET) using (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) associated with computed tomography (CT) is increasingly used for the detection and the staging of pancreatic cancer, but data regarding its clinical added value in pre-surgical planning is still lacking. The aim of this study is to investigate the performance of FDG PET associated with contrast-enhanced CT in detection of pancreatic cancer.We prospectively evaluated FDG PET/CT studies obtained in patients with suspicion of operable pancreatic cancer between May 2006 and January 2008. Staging was conducted according to a standardized protocol, and findings were confirmed in all patients by surgical resection or biopsy examination.Forty-five patients with a median age of 69 (range 22-82) were included in this study. Thirty-six had malignant tumors and nine had benign lesions (20%). The sensitivity of enhanced versus unenhanced PET/CT in the detection of pancreatic cancer was 96% versus 72% (P=0.076), the specificity 66.6% versus 33.3% (P=0.52), the positive predictive value 92.3% versus 80% (P=0.3), the negative predictive value 80% versus 25% (P=0.2), and the accuracy 90.3% versus 64% (P=0.085).Our preliminary data obtained in a limited number of patients shows that contrast-enhanced FDG PET/CT offers good sensitivity in the detection and assessment of pancreatic cancer, but at the price of a relatively low specificity. Enhanced PET/CT seems to be superior to unenhanced PET/CT. Further larger prospective studies are needed to establish its value for pre-surgical diagnosis and staging in pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided real-time fine-needle aspiration biopsy of the pancreas in cancer patients with pancreatic lesions.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is an important new tool in the staging of pancreatic malignancies. Using new curved linear-array instruments, real-time fine-needle aspiration biopsy (RTFNA) of pancreatic lesions can be performed.Forty-five patients with pancreatic lesions (22 males and 23 females) underwent staging with the Olympus EUM-20 (Olympus America Corp, Melville, NY) followed by EUS-RTFNA with the Pentax FG-32PUA (Pentax-Precision Instrument Corp, Orangeburg, NY) and the 22-gauge GIP needle (GIP Medizin Technik, Grassau, Germany).EUS tumor stages were as follows: TO, n = 1; T1, n = 8; T2, n = 9; and T3 n = 27. Aspiration attempts were unsuccessful in four patients (two technical failures and two inadequate specimens). The remaining 41 lesions (mean size, 3.3 cm) were aspirated under EUS guidance (median passes, three) and the cytologic diagnoses were 25 definite adenocarcinoma, five suspicious for adenocarcinoma (three subsequently confirmed and two clinical course consistent with adenocarcinoma), and 11 negative for malignancy. Of 11 negatives, two were found to have adenocarcinoma, seven were confirmed benign at surgery (four cystadenomas and three inflammatory), one had a benign pseudocyst, and one had abundant inflammatory cells on RTFNA and follow-up time greater than 12 months with computed tomographic (CT) scans consistent with resolving inflammation. There were no false-positive RTFNAs. There were no procedure-related complications. Among those with diagnostic EUS-RTFNA (91%), the sensitivity for malignancy (confirmed plus suspicious) was 94% and negative predictive value 82%.EUS-guided RTFNA is a safe and accurate method for performing pancreatic biopsy. It should be considered in patients with suspected pancreatic malignancies in whom a tissue diagnosis is required or when other modalities have failed. EUS-RTFNA allows for local staging and tissue diagnosis in one procedure.Kras mutation analysis of fine needle aspirate under EUS guidance facilitates risk stratification of patients with pancreatic mass.The accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-fine needle aspiration cytology (EUS-FNAC) for the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer is suboptimal. Mutational activation of the kras oncogene is almost universally present in pancreatic cancer tissue. We, therefore, investigated if analysis for mutant kras gene in the EUS-FNAC aspirates supplements cytopathology for the diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma (PAC).EUS-FNAC specimens obtained from 74 patients with pancreatic masses were analyzed for the presence of kras mutation on codon 12 using polymerase chain reaction-restriction fragment length polymorphism and MvaI restriction enzyme. Definitive diagnosis was based on surgical pathology or long-term follow-up (median 27.8 mo); 57 patients had PAC, 11 patient's chronic pancreatitis, and 9 patient's nonfunctioning neuroendocrine tumors.Analysis of mutant kras gene in addition to cytopathology allowed the detection of PAC in 4 additional patients as compared with cytopathology alone. Cytopathology and kras mutant analysis were negative for PAC in 17 patients of whom 6 patients (35%) had PAC. The respective sensitivity (90.9% vs. 82.5%), specificity (47.6% vs. 97.9%), positive predictive value (89.5% vs. 83.8%), negative predictive value (98.1% vs. 94.1%), accuracy (89.2% vs. 58.8%) of cytopathology plus kras mutation versus cytopathology were numerically superior but did not reach statistical significance.Analysis for the presence of mutant kras gene supplements conventional cytopathology for the diagnosis of PAC even without a cytopathologist in attendance and using only 3 needle passes. Among patients with negative cytopathology, the presence of kras mutation represents pancreatic cancer while the absence of kras mutation increases the possibility of benign lesion.Diagnostic impact of 18F-FDG PET-CT evaluating solid pancreatic lesions versus endosonography, endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography with intraductal ultrasonography and abdominal ultrasound.This prospective single-centre phase II trial assessed the diagnostic impact of (18)F-FDG PET-CT in the evaluation of solid pancreatic lesions (phi >or= 10 mm) compared to endosonography (EUS), endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography (ERCP) with intraductal ultrasound (IDUS), abdominal ultrasound (US) and histopathological reference.Forty-six patients (32 men/14 women, phi 61.7 years) with suspected pancreatic neoplasms underwent PET-CT with contrast-enhanced biphasic multi-detector CT of the upper abdomen followed by a diagnostic work-up with EUS, ERCP with IDUS and US within 3 weeks. PET-CT data sets were analysed by two expert readers in a consensus reading. Histology from surgery, biopsy/fine-needle aspiration and/or clinical follow-up >or=12 months served as standard of reference.Twenty-seven pancreatic malignancies were histopathologically proven; 19 patients had benign diseases: 36/46 lesions (78%) were detected in the head of the pancreas, 7/46 and 3/46 in the body and tail region, respectively. Sensitivity and specificity of PET-CT were 89% and 74%, respectively; positive predictive value (PPV) and negative predictive value (NPV) were 83% and 82%, respectively. Sensitivity (81-89%), specificity (74-88%), PPV (83-90%) and NPV (77-82%) achieved by EUS, ERCP and US were not significantly different. PET analysis revealed significantly higher maximum mean standardised uptake values (SUV(max) 6.5+/-4.6) in patients with pancreatic malignancy (benign lesions: SUV(max) 4.2+/-1.5; p<0.05). PET-CT revealed cervical lymphonodal metastasis from occult bronchogenic carcinoma and a tubular colon adenoma with intermediate dysplasia on polypectomy, respectively.(18)F-FDG PET-CT achieves a comparably high diagnostic impact evaluating small solid pancreatic lesions versus conventional reference imaging modalities. Additional clinical diagnoses are derived from concomitant whole-body PET-CT imaging.Can endosonographers evaluate on-site cytologic adequacy? A comparison with cytotechnologists.On-site determination of cytologic adequacy increases the accuracy of EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA); however, on-site cytotechnologists are not available to all endosonographers. We hypothesize that experienced endosonographers can accurately assess whether an on-site FNA specimen is adequate.To determine the accuracy of on-site cytopathology interpretation of EUS-FNA specimens by comparing endosonographers with a cytotechnologist.Prospective double-blind controlled trial.Academic medical center with a high-volume EUS practice.Consecutive patients undergoing EUS-FNA of lymph nodes or pancreas tumors.Accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity of 3 endosonographers and 1 cytotechnologist for interpretation of cytologic specimen adequacy and diagnosis compared with a criterion standard of a board-certified cytopathologist.There were 59 lymph node, 49 pancreas, and 9 liver specimens (117 total). For determination of adequacy, none of the endosonographers were statistically equivalent to the cytotechnologist (P=.004). For determination of suspicious/malignant versus benign specimens, all 3 endosonographers were inferior (P<.001) to the cytotechnologist.This study represents a small group of trained endosonographers in a high-volume practice and may not be applicable to other settings. The sample size does not allow an accurate evaluation of different biopsy sites (eg, pancreas vs lymph node).Even trained endosonographers have variable and, in some cases, inferior abilities to interpret on-site cytologic adequacy compared with cytotechnologists.[Clinicopathological and CT features of mucinous cystic neoplasms of the pancreas].To evaluate the clinicopathological and CT features of mucinous cystic neoplasms (MCNs) of the pancreas and analyze the correlative risk factors for malignant pancreatic mucinous cystic neoplasms.Ninety-eight patients who underwent curative resection for mucinous cystic neoplasms of the pancreas at PLA General Hospital from April 1994 to January 2013 were included in this study. All clinicopathological data available were retrospectively analyzed. All patients were divided into benign tumors + premalignant lesion group (70 patients) and malignant tumor group (28 patients). Clinicopathological and CT features of the mucinous cystic neoplasms of the pancreas and risk factors of malignant pancreatic mucinous cystic neoplasms were analyzed.Mucinous cystic neoplasms were seen mostly in perimenopausal women (71.4%, 70/98 cases,), and 51.0% (50/98 cases) of the patients had obvious clinical signs, mostly non-specific abdominal pain, but jaundice was present only in cases of malignant mucinous cystic neoplasms. Benign mucinous cystic neoplasms were mostly located in the distal pancreas (74.3%) and characterized with septa and thin cystic wall, while more malignant mucinous cystic neoplasms were located at the proximal pancreas (57.1%) and characterized with thick cystic wall and solid components. Univariate analysis showed that findings associated with malignancy gender, age ≥ 60, presence of symptoms, jaundice, weight loss, tumor location, margin, wall thickness, solid components and dilation of the main pancreatic duct were significantly correlated with malignant tumor development (P < 0.05 for all). The results of multiple logistic regression analysis showed that thick wall and solid components were independent prognostic factors for malignancy (OR = 31.417 and 34.976, P < 0.05 for both).Gender, age ≥ 60, presence of symptoms, jaundice, weight loss, tumor location, margin, wall thickness, solid components and dilation of the main pancreatic duct are important diagnostic indices of malignant mucinous cystic tumors of the pancreas, while thick wall and solid components are independent risk factors of malignant pancreatic mucinous cystic neoplasms.Pancreatic cancer: FDG-PET is not useful in early pancreatic cancer diagnosis.Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy of suspected pancreatic cancer.In many institutions, computed tomography (CT)-guided percutaneous fine-needle aspiration (FNA) has become the procedure of choice for biopsies of pancreatic mass lesions. This method of biopsy and others, such as endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) cytology, are problematic because of a substantial false-negative rate.To investigate the yield of endoscopic ultrasonography-guided FNA biopsies in patients who had negative results on CT-guided biopsy or negative cytologic findings on ERCP sampling.Prospective cohort study.Tertiary care university medical center.102 patients (median age, 65 years; 58 men and 44 women) with suspected pancreatic cancer who fulfilled the above criteria were prospectively identified and underwent endoscopic ultrasonography-guided FNA biopsy.The operating characteristics of endoscopic ultrasonography-guided FNA for diagnosing pancreatic masses were determined. Surgical pathology or long-term follow-up (median, 24 months) was used to identify false-positive or false-negative results.Median mass size was 3.5 cm x 2.7 cm. A median of 3.4 passes were performed. Cytologic results on endoscopic ultrasonography-guided FNA biopsy were positive in 57 patients, negative in 37, and inconclusive or nondiagnostic in 8. No false-positive results were observed. A diagnosis of pancreatic cancer was subsequently confirmed in 3 patients who had tested negative (false-negative results) and 1 of the 8 patients with nondiagnostic results. Of these 4 patients, 3 had cytologic evidence of chronic pancreatitis on endoscopic ultrasonography-guided FNA biopsy. The 95% CI for the likelihood ratio for a positive test result contained all values greater than or equal to 9.7. The likelihood ratio for a negative test result was 0.05 (CI, 0.02 to 0.15). The posterior probability of pancreatic cancer after a definitely positive result was at least 93.5% by a conservative lower 95% confidence limit; after a definitely negative test result, it was 6.9%. The prevalence of pancreatic cancer was 59.8% (61 of 102 patients). Self-limited complications occurred in 3 of the 102 patients (2.9% [CI, 0.6% to 8.4%]).Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided FNA biopsy may play a valuable role in the evaluation of a pancreatic mass when results on other biopsy methods are negative but pancreatic cancer is suspected.Endoscopic ultrasound in pancreatic tumor diagnosis.In a prospective study from 1988 to 1990, 132 patients with suspected pancreatic tumor were examined with endoscopic ultrasound (EUS), transabdominal ultrasound (US), computed tomography (CT), and ERCP. The final diagnosis of 102 pancreatic tumors of different origin (76 malignant and 26 inflammatory tumors) and the exclusion of a pancreatic tumor in 30 patients was made by operation (N = 47), puncture (N = 36), autopsy (N = 3), or follow-up of a mean of 51 weeks (N = 46). Sensitivity and specificity in pancreatic tumor diagnosis were significantly higher for EUS (99% and 100%) than for US (67%/40%) and CT (77%/53%) and equal to ERCP (sensitivity 90%). This was even more obvious in small pancreatic tumors of 3 cm and less. However, as with the other imaging procedures, EUS was not able to differentiate reliably malignant from inflammatory pancreatic masses (accuracy 76% for malignancy and 46% for focal inflammation). From analysis of the endosonographic pattern of pancreatic tumors, no consistent morphologic features were identified which could have been specifically attributed to malignant or inflammatory masses. Our results show that EUS is superior to US and CT and equal to ERCP in pancreatic tumor diagnosis. In contrast to the indirect evidence obtained by ERCP, EUS provides direct visualization of tumor size and shape in almost all patients examined. Thus, EUS should be considered early in the evaluation of patients with suspected pancreatic tumors.Impact of endoscopic ultrasound with fine-needle aspiration on the surgical management of pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) with EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) enables one to visualize the pancreas and surrounding structures and can provide access for FNA of those structures that appear suspicious for tumor.From 1993 to 1995, 50 patients suspected of having pancreatic cancer underwent EUS/EUS-FNA and abdominal computed tomography (CT). Malignancy was found in 30 (60%) cases, which included 24 (48%) pancreatic adenocarcinomas.Endoscopic ultrasound/EUS-FNA identified 26 of the 30 malignancies (85%) and 21 of the 24 pancreatic adenocarcinomas (88%), with no false positives. Thirteen of the 24 pancreatic cancer patients had lymph nodes that were sampled with EUS/EUS-FNA. Seven of these 13 patients (62%) were found to have metastatic spread to lymph nodes. Operations were performed on 11 of the pancreatic cancer patients. Of these 11, the 5 that were predicted to be resectable by EUS/EUS-FNA underwent successful resection. Of the 6 predicted to be unresectable, 5 had palliative biliary bypasses, and 1 had a grossly positive margin of resection.Endoscopic ultrasound/EUS-FNA can identify patients for curative surgical resection. It can also preoperatively identify patients with regional nodal disease for inclusion in appropriately designed clinical trials.Pancreatic cystic lesions: discrimination accuracy based on clinical data and high resolution CT features.To determine the accuracy of high-resolution computed tomography in discriminating among pancreatic cystic lesions with and without clinical history.Multiphasic high-resolution computed tomographic scans of 100 proven cystic pancreatic lesions were retrospectively reviewed by 2 blinded imagers. Before and after a history of pancreatitis was revealed, readers classified lesions as either nontumor-related or tumor-related. Reviewers also classified lesions as benign or malignant and finally categorized each lesion as serous, mucinous, or other lesion. Diagnostic performance parameters for classification were calculated for each reader with and without history.Sixty-two lesions were tumor-related and 38 were not. Accuracy for classifying tumor-related from unrelated cysts for both reviewers increased (83%-92%, 85%-91%) when unblinded to pancreatitis history. Specificity also significantly increased (66%-88% and 84%) for both reviewers.Pancreatic-phase computed tomography enabled more than 80% accuracy in discriminating between tumor-related and unrelated lesions and increased with information of pancreatitis history.Cystic lesions of the pancreas: more reliable differentiation with in situ high-resolution optical imaging?[Endoscopic ultrasonography in diagnosis of surgical treatment of pancreas].Results of endoscopic ultrasonography at 137 patients suspected for pancreas pathology are analyzed. Methodology of endoscopic ultrasonography, semiotics of pancreas surgical diseases, advantages over other diagnostic methods are described. Endosonography is informative method for final diagnosis of different disease of pancreas. Diagnostic value of method and area of its clinical application are described.Prospective evaluation of new 22 gauge endoscopic ultrasound core needle using capillary sampling with stylet slow-pull technique for intra-abdominal solid masses.The aim of this study was to evaluate the adequacy and diagnostic yield of the histologic core obtained with a 22 G endoscopic ultrasound histology needle using capillary sampling with stylet slow-pull technique without on-site cytopathologist.No standard technique for new EUS histology needle has been established.A total of 125 consecutive patients with intra-abdominal solid masses were enrolled prospectively between October 2011 and March 2013. EUS-guided fine needle biopsy (EUS-FNB) with a 22 G histology needle using capillary sampling with stylet slow-pull technique was performed.A total of 133 EUS-FNB procedures targeting the pancreas, lymph node, retroperitoneal mass, ampulla of Vater, gallbladder, common bile duct, duodenum, and liver were performed in 125 patients. EUS-FNB was technically feasible in all cases, and a visible core was obtained in 128 cases (96%). Histologic core specimens suitable for pathologic assessment were reported in 111 cases (83%). There were no procedure-related adverse events. According to the determinants of malignancy with EUS-FNB, the sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy were 85%, 98%, 99%, 77%, and 89%, respectively. In addition, histologic architecture with or without immunohistochemical staining of the core biopsy specimens was useful for pathologic confirmation in 101 cases (76%).A 22 G EUS-FNB using capillary sampling with stylet slow-pull technique showed a high diagnostic yield and histologic core acquisition for the histologic diagnosis of various intra-abdominal masses without an on-site cytopathologist. Furthermore, a histologic core with or without immunohistochemical staining was helpful for clinical decision making in 76% of the intra-abdominal solid masses.Does preoperative cross-sectional imaging accurately predict main duct involvement in intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm?Main pancreatic duct (MPD) involvement is a well-demonstrated risk factor for malignancy in intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN). Preoperative radiographic determination of IPMN type is heavily relied upon in oncologic risk stratification. We hypothesized that radiographic assessment of MPD involvement in IPMN is an accurate predictor of pathological MPD involvement. Data regarding all patients undergoing resection for IPMN at a single academic institution between 1992 and 2012 were gathered prospectively. Retrospective analysis of imaging and pathologic data was undertaken. Preoperative classification of IPMN type was based on cross-sectional imaging (MRI/magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and/or CT). Three hundred sixty-two patients underwent resection for IPMN. Of these, 334 had complete data for analysis. Of 164 suspected branch duct (BD) IPMN, 34 (20.7%) demonstrated MPD involvement on final pathology. Of 170 patients with suspicion of MPD involvement, 50 (29.4%) demonstrated no MPD involvement. Of 34 patients with suspected BD-IPMN who were found to have MPD involvement on pathology, 10 (29.4%) had invasive carcinoma. Alternatively, 2/50 (4%) of the patients with suspected MPD involvement who ultimately had isolated BD-IPMN demonstrated invasive carcinoma. Preoperative radiographic IPMN type did not correlate with final pathology in 25% of the patients. In addition, risk of invasive carcinoma correlates with pathologic presence of MPD involvement.Dynamic fast-gradient echo MR imaging of pancreatic tumours.The purpose of this study was to determine the diagnostic utility of dynamic magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) of the pancreas. Twenty-eight adult patients with known or suspected pancreatic tumours were examined. Pre- and post-gadolinium (GdDTPA-BMA) scans were obtained in combination with an oral negative contrast medium (ferristene) to mark the gastrointestinal tract. In 6 cases a more precise diagnosis could be made by dynamic MRI compared to unenhanced MRI. Surgery could confirm the MR diagnosis based on contrast enhancement in 83% compared to 78% for CT. The results of signal intensity (SI) measurements show that a combination of differences in baseline values before enhancement and the slope of enhancement within the first 20 s is a reliable criterion to distinguish between normal pancreas and hypovascular tumours. These tumours already show lower SI values before as well as lower slopes after early enhancement. Mainly two effects facilitate the final MRI diagnosis: (1) the delineation of the pancreas from the duodenum by the negative contrast medium, and (2) the enhancement pattern of pancreatic tumours by gadolinium-enhanced dynamic MRI compared to normal tissue within the early enhancement after contrast injection.Improving the diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration using microRNAs.Solid pancreatic lesions: characterization by using timing bolus dynamic contrast-enhanced MR imaging assessment--a preliminary study.To assess the feasibility of postprocessing dynamic contrast material-enhanced (DCE) magnetic resonance (MR) imaging timing bolus data by using a three-dimensional radial gradient-echo technique with k-space-weighted image contrast (KWIC) for the characterization of solid pancreatic diseases.This retrospective study was approved by the institutional review board, and informed consent was waived. A total of 45 patients suspected of having biliary or pancreatic disease underwent pancreatic MR examination with a 3.0-T imager with a low-dose (2 mL gadopentetate dimeglumine) timing bolus by using the radial KWIC technique. There were 24 patients with pancreatic cancers, eight with pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (PNETs), three with chronic pancreatitis, and 10 with a normal pancreas. By using a dedicated postprocessing software program for DCE MR imaging, the following perfusion parameters were measured for tumor and nontumorous parenchyma: volume transfer coefficient (K(trans)) and extracellular extravascular volume fraction; the rate constant (k(ep)) and initial area under the concentration curve in 60 seconds (iAUC) were then generated. The perfusion parameters acquired on DCE MR images were compared among the groups by using the analysis of variance test.K(trans), k(ep), and iAUC values in patients with pancreatic cancer (0.042 min(-1) ± 0.023 [standard deviation], 0.761 min(-1) ± 0.529, and 2.841 mmol/sec ± 1.811, respectively) were significantly lower than in patients with a normal pancreas (0.387 min(-1) ± 0.176, 6.376 min(-1) ± 2.529, and 7.156 mmol/sec ± 3.414, respectively) (P < .05 for all). In addition, k(ep) values of PNETs and normal pancreas also differed (P < .0001), and K(trans), k(ep), and iAUC values of pancreatic cancers and PNETs differed significantly (P < .0001, P = .038, and P < .0001, respectively).Results of timing bolus DCE MR imaging with the radial KWIC sequence from routine examinations can be postprocessed to yield potentially useful perfusion parameters for the characterization of pancreatic diseases.Prospective comparison of endoscopic ultrasound and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the preoperative assessment of masses in the pancreatic head.To compare the diagnostic value of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the differentiation of malignant from benign masses in the pancreatic head.Within 14 months 95 prospective patients with masses in the pancreatic head were assigned for preoperative EUS and ERCP. Both procedures were performed and recorded according to a standardized protocol. Based on intraoperative findings and histology, 50 patients (53%) suffered from malignant and 45 patients (47%) from benign (inflammatory) tumors.Success rates were 96% for EUS and 95% for ERCP. The overall results for EUS and ERCP to predict malignant masses were, respectively: sensitivity 78 and 81%, specificity 93 and 88%, positive predictive value 93 and 89%, negative predictive value 78 and 80%, and diagnostic accuracy 85 and 84%. When EUS and ERCP were taken together, the sensitivity was 92% (specificity 85%), but the diagnostic accuracy (89%) was not significantly enhanced. The results for EUS to diagnose lymph node metastases preoperatively were: sensitivity 55%, specificity 91%, positive predictive value 69%, negative predictive value 84%, and accuracy 81%.EUS and ERCP have similar diagnostic accuracies to separate malignant from benign masses in the pancreatic head. Combination of both procedures is not superior to the use of one modality alone. Abnormal lymph nodes visualized on EUS in patients with inflammatory masses in the pancreatic head due to chronic pancreatitis should be interpreted cautiously.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of pancreas: multi-detector row CT with 2D curved reformations--correlation with MRCP.To retrospectively compare accuracy of multi-detector row computed tomography (CT), combined with two-dimensional (2D) curved reformations, and that of magnetic resonance (MR) cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) for characterization of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) as malignant, with pathologic examination as reference standard.Institutional review board approval was obtained, informed consent was waived, and study was HIPAA compliant. Twenty-five patients (12 women, 13 men; age range, 44-88 years) with pathologically proved IPMN were examined with dual-phase CT with 1.25-mm-thick sections for pancreatic phase; 2D curved reformations along main pancreatic duct (MPD) were generated. T2-weighted MRCP included thick- and thin-slab single-shot fast spin-echo imaging and transverse fast spin-echo imaging. Two radiologists, blinded to surgical and pathologic findings, evaluated images for lesion location, septa, mural nodules, communication with MPD, extent and diameter of MPD dilatation, calcifications, and vascular encasement. Malignancy was suspected when one of the following was present: MPD diameter larger than 10 mm, mural nodules, vascular encasement, peripancreatic lymphadenopathy, or metastases. Sensitivity and specificity values for prediction of malignancy were calculated for CT and MRCP. Interobserver variability was determined (kappa analysis).Excellent correlation between modalities was observed. Cyst communication was seen in 20 and 21 of 24 branch pancreatic duct (BPD) IPMNs with CT and MRCP, respectively. Sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy for detection of malignancy were 70%, 87%, and 76% (CT) and 70%, 92%, and 80% (MRCP), respectively. Interobserver agreement was good to perfect for both readers in all comparisons (overall, kappa = 0.70-1.00).CT combined with 2D curved reformation can provide imaging details of IPMN, including communication of BPD IPMN with MPD, that are almost equivalent to those provided at MRCP. Presence of mural nodules, dilated MPD (>10-mm diameter), or thick septa at CT or MRCP may be used as independent predictors of malignancy.Preoperative GNAS and KRAS testing in the diagnosis of pancreatic mucinous cysts.Management guidelines for pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMN) and mucinous cystic neoplasms (MCN) are based on the assumption that mucinous cysts can be accurately distinguished from other pancreatic cystic lesions. Previous studies using surgical material have identified recurrent mutations in GNAS and KRAS in pancreatic mucinous neoplasms. Yet, the diagnostic utility of testing for both genes in pancreatic cyst fluid obtained by endoscopic ultrasound-fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) remains unclear.GNAS and KRAS testing was performed on EUS-FNA pancreatic cyst fluid from 91 pancreatic cysts: 41 IPMNs, 9 IPMNs with adenocarcinoma, 16 MCNs, 10 cystic pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (PanNET), 9 serous cystadenomas (SCA), 3 retention cysts, 2 pseudocysts, and 1 lymphoepithelial cyst.Mutations in GNAS were detected in 16 (39%) IPMNs and 2 (22%) IPMNs with adenocarcinoma. KRAS mutations were identified in 28 (68%) IPMNs, 7 (78%) IPMNs with adenocarcinoma, and 1 (6%) MCN. Mutations in either gene were present in 34 (83%) IPMNs, 8 (89%) IPMNs with adenocarcinoma, and 1 (6%) MCN. No mutations were found in cystic PanNETs, SCAs, retention cysts, pseudocysts, and a lymphoepithelial cyst. GNAS and KRAS mutations had 100% specificity [95% confidence interval (CI), 0.83-1.00] but 65% sensitivity (95% CI, 0.52-0.76) for mucinous differentiation. Among IPMNs, mutations in either gene had 98% specificity (95% CI, 0.86-1.00) and 84% sensitivity (95% CI, 0.70-0.92).The combination of GNAS and KRAS testing was highly specific and sensitive for IPMNs; however, the lack of sensitivity for MCNs highlights the need for additional markers to improve the detection of pancreatic mucinous neoplasms.The role of endoscopic ultrasound and endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration in distinguishing pancreatic cystic lesions.Distinguishing mucinous from nonmucinous cystic lesions of the pancreas often constitutes a diagnostic dilemma. The clinical management differs between such lesions; therefore it is important to make an accurate preoperative diagnosis. Various centers have reported conflicting results regarding their ability to detect mucin-producing neoplastic cells and appropriately reach a diagnosis based on endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) guided FNA. The aim of this study is to assess the ability of EUS-FNA cytology to diagnose and differentiate mucinous from nonmucinous pancreatic cystic lesions. We reviewed records of patients who underwent EUS of pancreatic cystic lesions. If FNA was performed and mucinous neoplasm was suspected, aspirate was evaluated for cytomorphology and presence of mucin. FNA results were compared to final histologic diagnosis if surgery was performed. Cytologic diagnosis was provided for 28/30 (93%). By comparing EUS-FNA diagnoses with final surgical pathology, FNA accurately diagnosed in 10/11 cases with sensitivity and specificity for detection of malignancy of 100 and 89, respectively, while the accuracy for identification of mucinous cystic neoplasms was 100%. Our results indicate that in the appropriate clinical and imaging setting, EUS-FNA cytology with analysis for mucin production by tumor cells is an important test in distinguishing pancreatic cystic lesions and guiding further management.Usefulness of contrast-enhanced transabdominal ultrasonography in the diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas.The differentiation of benign from malignant intraductal papillary mucinous tumors (IPMT) is often difficult even by various examination methods. We evaluated the qualitative and quantitative diagnostic ability of contrast-enhanced transabdominal ultrasonography (CE-US), mainly in differentiating benign from malignant tumors in patients with IPMT.There were 21 patients with IPMT who underwent CE-US and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS). Surgery was performed in all 21 patients. Pathological findings were 4 with carcinoma and 17 with adenoma. CE-US was performed using a contrast agent (Levovist; Tanabe, Osaka, Japan) consisting of galactose microbubbles and a small (0.1%) admixture of palmitic acid, and the following items were evaluated by the following procedure. (1) Two reviewers with experienced sonographic and endosonographic ability evaluated CE-US images before and after contrast enhancement and classified the enhancement effects into three grades. In addition, the presence or absence of enhancement effects by CE-US was compared with that of mural nodules visualized by EUS. (2) In all 21 patients, changes in intensity after contrast enhancement were quantitatively measured using an HDI Lab. HDI Lab was provided by ATL (Philips; Bothell, WA) and these software tools rapidly quantify image characteristics within multiple ROI (regions of interest) and make comparisons between several areas or images. In both the early and late phases, the post-enhancement intensity, difference between pre- and post-enhancement intensity, and the percentage change ((post-enhancement value-pre-enhancement value)/pre-enhancement value) were compared between malignant and benign lesions, and the ability of CE-US to differentiate between benign and malignant lesions was evaluated in comparison with the ability of EUS to diagnose the degree of malignancy.(1) In both the early and the late phases, both reviewers observed enhancement effects in all 21 patients. And both reviewers observed mural nodules by EUS in all 21 patients. (2) In all 21 patients who underwent resection of IPMT, the intensity increased in both the early and late phases. When the patients with carcinoma were compared with those with adenoma, the post-enhancement intensity was significantly higher, and the difference between pre- and post-enhancement intensity and the percentage change in the early phase and the late phase was significantly more marked in the carcinoma group (p= 0.019, p= 0.002, p= 0.015, p= 0.012, and p= 0.039, respectively).CE-US was useful for qualitatively diagnosing tumor lesions in patients with IPMT. Moreover, quantitative changes in intensity can be a parameter for the differential diagnosis of benign and malignant tumors.[Value of CT enhancement degree in differential diagnosis between pancreatic carcinoma and inflammatory pancreatic mass].To compare the CT enhancement degree in pancreatic carcinoma (PC) and inflammatory pancreatic mass (IPM), and to study the diagnostic value of CT to these two diseases.Eighty-five patients with PC or IPM, 47 males and 38 females, aged 62 (37-79), underwent plain CT scanning and enhanced CT scanning in pancreatic phase and delay phase. The CT values of the pancreatic mass and relative normal pancreatic tissue were measured. The diagnosis of PC and IPM was verified by operation, biopsy, etc. Sixty persons without pancreatic diseases were used as controls.Among the 85 patients, 66 were proved to be with PC, and 19 patients were proved to be with IPM. In plain CT scanning, pancreatic-phase CT enhancement, and delay-phase CT enhancement, the CT values of PC were (34+/-7) HU, (54+/-10) HU, and (61+/-14) HU respectively; and the CT values of the relatively normal pancreatic tissue were (42+/-6) HU, (105+/-12) HU, and (77+/-10) HU respectively. In plain CT scanning, pancreatic-phase CT enhancement, and delay-phase CT enhancement, the CT values of IPM were (37+/-6) HU, (58+/-17) HU, and (64+/-10) HU respectively; and the CT values of the relatively normal pancreatic tissue were (40+/-8) HU, (85+/-10) HU, and (72+/-9) HU respectively. The pancreatic-phase enhanced CT values of the mass in the PC group and the IPM group showed no remarkable differences (P>0.05). The pancreatic-phase enhancement intensity of the relatively normal pancreatic tissue is greater in PC than in IPM (P<0.01).There is a certain limit for CT enhancement in differentiating between PC and IPM. Comprehensive analysis is necessary in diagnosis of PC and IPM.Mucinous cystic neoplasm of the pancreas: is surgical resection recommended for all surgically fit patients?Surgical removal of mucinous cystic neoplasms (MCNs) is usually recommended because of the risk of malignancy. However, increased experience of MCNs suggests that the incidence of invasion is lower than had been thought. This study was designed to establish more reasonable surgical indications for MCN through re-assessment using strict pathologic diagnostic criteria.Ninety-four patients who underwent surgical removal of MCNs at Seoul National University Hospital from 1991 to 2012 were retrospectively analyzed. Pathologic results were re-evaluated by an experienced pathologist. Medical records and radiologic images were reviewed to determine factors predicting malignancy.Of the 94 patients, 4 were found to have intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs). Of the 90 MCNs, 60 (66.7%) were low-grade, 21 (23.3%) were intermediate-grade, and 5 (5.5%) were high-grade dysplasias; and 4 (4.4%) were invasive carcinoma. Mural nodules on CT scan (p = 0.005) and abnormal serum CA19-9 concentration (p = 0.029) were significant predictors of malignancy. All MCNs less than 3 cm in size with normal serum tumor markers were benign and all malignant MCNs had cyst fluid CA19-9 over 10,000 units/ml. The five year disease specific survival rates were 98.8% for all patients and 75.0% for those with invasive MCNs.MCNs had a low prevalence of malignancy. Regardless of the histological grade, long-term outcome was excellent. Therefore, in the absence of specific symptoms, surgery may not be indicated for MCNs <3 cm without mural nodules or elevated serum tumor markers. Validation by a prospective study with very careful design is needed.Dynamic MDCT of the pancreas: is time-density curve morphology useful for the differential diagnosis of solid lesions? A preliminary report.CT perfusion has been proposed for pancreatic lesion characterization. However, scan and analysis protocols influence numerical data. To overcome this, the purpose of our study is to evaluate the use of time-density curves obtained from MDCT perfusion of the pancreas for the characterization of normal parenchyma, adenocarcinoma, chronic pancreatitis and endocrine tumors.31 patients with solid pancreatic lesions and 21 patients with renal cell carcinoma underwent 64-row MDCT perfusion of the pancreas after injection of 50 cc of a 370 mg I/ml solution at 5 cc/s. 63 time-density curves were obtained from normal parenchyma (21 patients), adenocarcinoma (25), endocrine tumors (4) and atrophic parenchyma (13). Two readers independently categorized the 63 time-density curves into 4 different morphologies: normal wash-in and wash-out (A), low wash-in followed by plateau (B), low wash-in followed by faint wash-out (C) and high wash-in and wash-out (D). Interobserver agreement was calculated with kappa statistics. Fisher test was used to calculate sensitivity, specificity, positive (PPV) and negative (NPV) predictive values for each type of curve.Interobserver agreement was very good (Kappa=0.849). Curve A had 94.4% sensitivity, 91.1% specificity, 80.95% PPV, 97.6% NPV for 'normal parenchyma'. Curve B had 74.19% sensitivity, 93.75% specificity, 92% PPV, 78.95% NPV in diagnosing 'adenocarcinoma'. Curve C had 45.45% sensitivity, 84.62% specificity, 38.46% PPV, 88% NPV for 'chronic pancreatitis'. Curve D had 100% sensitivity, 98.33% specificity, 75% PPV, 100% NPV for 'endocrine tumor'.The morphology of MDCT perfusion time-density curves appears to be useful in characterizing pancreatic lesions, and might help overcome the differences in scan and postprocessing techniques.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided real-time fine-needle aspiration: clinicopathologic features of 60 patients.Diagnosis of lesions of the gastrointestinal tract and adjacent structures is possible using an imaging modality, endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS). Fine-needle aspiration (FNA) is a suitable and cost-effective technique for obtaining cytohistologic material to confirm the diagnosis. EUS is capable of both characterizing the lesion and then guiding the FNA under real-time (RT) ultrasound guidance using a through-the-scope needle aspiration system. The goal of this study was to determine the diagnostic accuracy of this technique and to describe the clinicopathologic features. Sixty patients underwent EUS-guided RTFNA of 64 lesions, including pancreas (n = 45), periluminal lymph nodes (n = 12), mediastinal and retroperitoneal masses (n = 4), and hepatobiliary masses (n = 3). Follow-up data were obtained by surgery, histopathology, or clinical course. Thirty-one lesions were malignant, eight were atypical/suspicious, 16 were non-neoplastic, and nine were non-diagnostic. Of the 55 lesions with sufficient material for interpretation, 54 had follow-up confirmation of the RTFNA diagnosis. The calculated sensitivity and specificity for malignancy was 90% and 100%, respectively. Diagnostic accuracy for malignancy was excellent for gastrointestinal associated lymph nodes (100%), mediastinal and retroperitoneal masses (100%), somewhat less so for pancreatic tumors (94%), and poor for hepatobiliary lesions (33%). EUS-guided RTFNA is accurate for sampling small gastrointestinal tract-associated lesions. EUS-guided RTFNA should be considered as a procedure of choice in selected patients when the results will influence management decisions.Detection of B7-H4 and p53 in pancreatic cancer: potential role as a cytological diagnostic adjunct.This study compared p53 expression with B7-H4, a novel cancer biomarker, in pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma (PDA) resection specimens and in a pilot series of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspirations (EUS-FNAs).B7-H4 and p53 expression were evaluated by immunoperoxidase methods in 36 PDA and 15 EUS-FNA specimens and were scored for intensity and proportion of positive cells; cases were then assigned a final sum score.B7-H4 was detected in 33 (92%) of 36 PDA sections, 8 (89%) of 9 cytologically positive EUS-FNAs, and 1 (20%) of 5 cytologically negative EUS-FNAs. p53 was detected in 30 (83%) of 36 PDA sections, 4 (44%) of 9 cytologically positive EUS-FNAs, and 1 (20%) of 5 cytologically negative cases. One EUS-FNA case that was cytologically atypical but not diagnostic of malignancy expressed B7-H4 and p53. Some benign tissue components (intercalated cells/ducts, main pancreatic ducts, and acinar cells) were also positive for B7-H4 and/or p53. Overall expression of B7-H4 in benign tissues, however, was relatively low compared with that seen in most carcinoma cases.B7-H4 was expressed more often in PDA than was p53. Despite potentially problematic expression in benign/normal cells, the 2 markers target different cellular components and demonstrate potential diagnostic use for detection of PDA in resected and EUS-FNA specimens.A prospective, comparative trial to optimize sampling techniques in EUS-guided FNA of solid pancreatic masses.There is no standardization of the use of suction during puncturing of a target in pancreatic EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA). It is also debatable whether expressing aspirates from the needle by the traditional method of reinserting the stylet is more effective than by air flushing, which is easier and safer.To optimize sampling techniques in pancreatic EUS-FNA.Prospective, comparative trial.Tertiary-care referral center.Eighty-one consecutive patients with solid pancreatic masses.Four punctures were performed for each mass in random order by a 2 × 2 factorial design. Sample quality and diagnostic yield were compared between samples with suction (S+) versus no suction (S-) and expressed by reinserting the stylet (RS) versus air flushing (AF).Sample quality by the number of diagnostic samples, cellularity, bloodiness, and air-drying artifact; diagnostic yield by accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity.The number of diagnostic samples (72.8% vs 58.6%; P = .001), cellularity (odds ratio [OR] 2.12; 95% confidence interval [CI], 1.37-3.30; P < .001), bloodiness (OR 1.46; CI, 1.28-1.68; P < .001), accuracy (85.2% vs 75.9%; P = .004), and sensitivity (82.4% vs 72.1%; P = .005) were higher in S+ than in S-. Bloodiness was lower in AF than in RS (OR 1.16; CI, 1.03-1.30; P = .017).Single-center trial, 2 kinds of needle gauges, and no immediate cytopathology evaluation.Puncturing with suction and expressing by air flushing may be used preferentially in pancreatic EUS-FNA because they were more effective and convenient techniques. (NCT01354795.).Specialized DNA arrays for the differentiation of pancreatic tumors.Malignant tumors of the pancreas are frequently indistinguishable from inflammatory tumors arising in the context of a chronic pancreatitis with the use of conventional imaging techniques. Thus, cytologic analysis of cells obtained by abdominal ultrasound, computed tomography, or endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy is required for diagnosis. However, the reliability of cytologic analyses of pancreatic fine needle aspirates remains unsatisfactory, with a diagnostic accuracy of < or =80%. The purpose of the current study was therefore to develop a novel diagnostic approach based on expression profiling of biopsy material using a specialized diagnostic cDNA array.Previous gene expression profiling studies were reevaluated to design a 558-feature diagnostic array. Minimal amounts of residual material from pancreatic cytology samples as well as surgically resected tumor and control tissue specimens were analyzed using the diagnostic array and a newly developed statistical classification system.Our diagnostic approach resulted in 95% accurate differentiation between ductal adenocarcinomas and nonmalignant tumors of the pancreas. The diagnostic array, in conjunction with conventional diagnostic procedures, is thus suitable to significantly improve the reliability of pancreatic cancer diagnostics and can be expected to become a valuable new tool in the routine workup of suspect masses in the pancreas.Characteristic magnetic resonance features of focal autoimmune pancreatitis useful for differentiation from pancreatic cancer.To identify characteristic magnetic resonance (MR) features of focal autoimmune pancreatitis (f-AIP) useful for differentiation from pancreatic cancer (PC).We retrospectively analyzed MR imaging findings of 20 f-AIP lesions and 40 PC lesions smaller than 40 mm in diameter. On fat-suppressed T2-weighted images and dynamic contrast-enhanced fat-suppressed T1-weighted images (DCE-T1WI), we classified MR features of internal signal intensity for each lesion into homogeneous, speckled, or target type. We assessed the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of these findings in the diagnosis of f-AIP. We also investigated the incidence of previously reported findings for differentiation between f-AIP and PC.Speckled enhancement within a hypointense or isointense lesion on pancreatic phase DCE-T1WI (speckled type) was observed more frequently in f-AIP than in PC, with high sensitivity, high specificity, and high accuracy. Hypointensity to hyperintensity surrounding a less enhanced focal area on DCE-T1WIs (target type) and upper stream main pancreatic duct dilatation were observed more frequently in PC than in f-AIP.Speckled enhancement inside an f-AIP lesion on pancreatic phase DCE-T1WI was useful for differentiation from PC.MDCT of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas: evaluation of features predictive of invasive carcinoma.The purpose of our study was to evaluate factors predictive of the presence of invasive carcinoma associated with intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) of the pancreas on MDCT.Preoperative MDCT of 36 consecutive patients (23 men, 13 women; mean age, 66.6 years) who had undergone surgical resection and had a pathologic diagnosis of IPMN were retrospectively assessed. CT was performed with a 4-MDCT scanner with 120 mL of IV contrast material at an injection rate of 3 mL/sec. Arterial and venous phase images were acquired at 25 and 50-60 sec from the start of IV contrast administration. Type of ductal involvement, location, tumor size in branch duct type and combined type lesions, caliber of the main pancreatic duct, caliber of the common bile duct or common hepatic duct, and solid appearance of the lesion were assessed on CT and correlated with pathologic findings for invasive carcinoma.Pathologic analysis revealed carcinoma in situ in seven patients (19%) and invasive carcinoma in 15 patients (42%) arising from the IPMN. With invasive carcinoma, the size of the tumor in branch duct type and combined type, and the caliber of the main pancreatic duct were significantly larger compared with the lesions without invasive carcinoma (4.7 +/- 1.7 cm vs 2.6 +/- 1.4 cm [p = 0.0007] and 9.3 +/- 5.5 mm vs 4.6 +/- 4.1 mm [p = 0.006], respectively). A solid mass (p < 0.001), dilatation of the common bile duct or common hepatic duct (> or = 15 mm), and the presence of a stent (p = 0.0004) were correlated with the presence of associated invasive carcinoma.MDCT helped to predict invasive carcinoma associated with IPMN.The role of fluorodeoxyglucose and positron emission tomography in the evaluation of pancreatic disease.The difficulties involved in the timely and accurate diagnosis of pancreatic disease are well known. The usual imaging modalities usually identify abnormalities but may not always differentiate malignancy from other condition such as scar tissue or chronic inflammation. The purpose of our study was to determine if fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (FDG PET) can accurately diagnose pancreatic disease.The records of 15 patients presenting with pancreatic disease were retrospectively reviewed. The diagnosis suspected by imaging modalities was compared with the final tissue diagnosis. Two patients were excluded because no tissue was obtained.Adenocarcinoma was diagnosed in 9 patients. A mass consistent with this diagnosis was seen in 8 of 9, 6 of 9, 6 of 8, and 5 of 5 patients by PET, computed tomography (CT), endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS), respectively. Chronic pancreatitis (CP) was diagnosed in 2 patients. The unique appearance on FDG PET made the diagnosis in both these patients. Both patients with CP were thought to have a malignancy by CT and EUS and 1 of 2 by ERCP. Neuroendocrine tumors were diagnosed in 2 other patients. One of 2 was seen by FDG PET and both by CT.FDG PET can accurately differentiate a pancreatic adenocarcinoma from chronic pancreatitis in a patient with a suspicious pancreatic mass. Thus, FDG PET may help in establishing a diagnosis and subsequently managing a patient with pancreatic disease.Macrocystic pancreatic cystadenoma: The role of EUS and cyst fluid analysis in distinguishing mucinous and serous lesions.Benign pancreatic serous cystadenoma usually is morphologically distinguishable from mucinous cystadenomas, which require resection because of their malignant potential. A macrocystic variant of serous cystadenoma recently has been described, rendering this important distinction more difficult. The aim of this study was to determine the EUS and tumor marker characteristics of mucinous cystadenoma compared with macrocystic serous cystadenomas.Medical records for consecutive patients seen between 1995 and 2002, with a histopathologic diagnosis of mucinous cystadenoma or macrocystic serous cystadenoma after surgery, who had undergone a detailed EUS examination, including EUS-guided FNA, were retrospectively reviewed.A resection specimen was available for 32 mucinous cystadenomas and 9 macrocystic serous cystadenomas. No significant differences were observed with regard to clinical data (age, gender, presence of symptoms), lesion size, and location within the pancreas. All mucinous cystadenomas had a discernible cyst wall (thickened, 66%; focal parietal nodules, 25%) compared with 56% of macrocystic serous cystadenomas (p<0.0001). A thick echo content also was more frequent in mucinous cystadenoma (56% vs. 11%; p=0.04; statistical significance removed by the Bonferroni correction). Microcysts were only observed in macrocystic serous cystadenomas (44%; p=0.0008). The combination of a cyst wall that is thickened and the absence of microcysts had a sensitivity of 100% and specificity of 78% for the diagnosis of mucinous cystadenoma compared with macrocystic serous cystadenoma. Although intracystic carbohydrate-associated antigen 72-4 and mucins M1 were non-discriminatory, low carcinoembryonic antigen (<5 ng/mL) and carbohydrate-associated antigen 19-9 (<50,000 U/mL) values were found in macrocystic serous lesions (respectively, 100% and 100%; p=0.0002 and p=0.0002).Although there is considerable overlap, helpful EUS characteristics that differentiate mucinous cystadenoma from macrocystic serous cystadenoma include a thick cyst wall and microcysts. These features, coupled with analysis of aspirated fluid for tumor markers (especially carcinoembryonic antigen), should help to confirm the diagnosis.Role of (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography in the characterization of pancreatic masses: experience from tropics.Early detection and differentiation of malignant from benign pancreatic tumors is very essential as mass-forming pancreatitis is a frequently encountered problem. Positron emission tomography (PET) has a role in establishing the diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma when the conventional imaging modalities or biopsies are nondiagnostic. In this prospective study, the utility of fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG)-PET/computed tomography (CT) in the characterization of mass-forming lesions of the pancreas was reported.(18)F-FDG-PET/CT was prospectively performed in 87 patients diagnosed to have periampullary or pancreatic mass. Lesions with focally increased FDG uptake in PET/CT were considered malignant, whereas those with diffuse or no FDG uptake were considered benign. Semiquantitative analysis with maximum standardized uptake value (SUVmax) was also calculated. The PET/CT results were compared with histopathological results in all patients.Based on the FDG uptake pattern, sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy for FDG-PET/CT in characterizing the periampullary and pancreatic masses into benign and malignant lesions were 93%, 90%, 95%, 87%, and 92% respectively. Receiver operating characteristics curve analysis of the SUVmax of the lesions yielded a cut-off value of 2.8, with a sensitivity and specificity of 87.5% and 45% respectively.The FDG uptake pattern in PET/CT can differentiate malignant from benign mass-forming lesions of the pancreas with high accuracy and a discrete cut-off value of SUVmax could not be defined for the same as even lesions with pancreatic tuberculosis showed very high FDG uptake. Hence, in patients with a suspicion of malignancy in the pancreas, a focally increase FDG uptake in PET/CT suggests the diagnosis of malignancy.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas: performance of pancreatic fluid analysis for positive diagnosis and the prediction of malignancy.The preoperative diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMN) of the pancreas must be as reliable as possible because large or even total pancreatectomy may be necessary. Early diagnosis of malignant forms is important to improve prognosis. The diagnostic accuracy of fluid analysis using endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) has been confirmed in cystic lesions of the pancreas. It is not known if these results can be applied to IPMN.To determine the levels of biochemical and tumor markers in fluid from EUS-FNA in patients with IPMN and to assess the impact on the diagnosis of IPMN.In total, 41 patients (14 men, median age 64 yr) underwent EUS-FNA before surgical resection of IPMN in our center. Levels of amylase, lipase, carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), carbohydrate antigen (CA) 19.9, and CA 72.4 were measured in the cyst fluid. The performance of the markers was retrospectively evaluated for: (a) a positive diagnosis of IPMN, using cutoffs validated in the literature for mucinous pancreatic lesions and (b) an assessment of malignancy (i.e., high-grade dysplasia or invasive carcinoma) compared with the final pathological examination of the surgical specimen.EUS-FNA was performed in dilated branch ducts (BD) in 39 cases and in the main pancreatic duct in 2 cases. No serious complications occurred. The median fluid levels of amylase, lipase, CEA, CA 19.9, and CA 72.4 were 20,155 U/mL, 59,500 U/mL, 173 ng/mL, 6,400 U/mL, and 11.5 U/mL, respectively. A CEA level >200 ng/mL and a CA 72.4 >40 U/mL had a 44% and a 39% sensitivity, respectively, for the diagnosis of IPMN. The levels of CEA, CA 19.9, and CA 72.4 were significantly different between benign and malignant IPMN. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive (PPV) and negative predictive values (NPV) of a CEA level >200 ng/mL for the diagnosis of malignant IPMN were 90%, 71%, 50%, and 96%, respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, PPV, and NPV of a CA 72.4 level >40 U/mL for this purpose were 87.5%, 73%, 47%, and 96%, respectively.CEA and CA 72.4 in pancreatic cyst fluid have excellent NPVs in the preoperative differential diagnosis of benign versus malignant IPMN, and might reinforce the decision of not to operate on patients with BD-type without predictive factors of malignancy.Effect of dedicated and supervised training on achieving competence in EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic lesions.The diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) has been suggested as a benchmark of quality performance in EUS. However, there is paucity of data on the training requirement for competency in EUS-FNA of the pancreas. KO commenced the service without prior formal training in EUS-FNA. A formally trained colleague (MN) who underwent a fellowship in the same unit was appointed to a substantive post in 2007. The aims of the study were to assess if a dedicated training program in pancreaticobiliary (PB) EUS-FNA of solid lesions: (1) produced better results at the outset of independent practice than produced at the initiation of service without formal training and (2) produced results comparable with those of an experienced endosonographer.This is a retrospective review comparing the first 80 consecutive cases at the onset of practice of operator KO1 (2003/2004) and MN (2007/2008) as well as consecutive cases of operator KO2 (2007/2008) in the same time frame as the initial cases of operator MN.There was a significant difference in EUS-FNA sensitivity for pancreatic malignancy between operator KO1 (56%) and operator MN (77%) p < 0.05. There was no significant difference in test performance between operator KO2 (82%) and MN (77%) (p > 0.05).Our data show that formal training in PB EUS produces test performance at the outset of independent practice that is comparable with an experienced endosonographer, in line with the published standards for EUS-FNA of the pancreas and significantly better than that achieved without training.K-ras oncogene mutations indicate malignancy in cystic tumors of the pancreas.To evaluate clinical parameters, presurgical diagnostic tests, histologic findings, and the presence of K-ras oncogene mutations in cystic tumors of the pancreas to determine which best predict malignancy.Because presurgical, intraoperative, and final pathologic differentiation is difficult in cystic tumors of the pancreas, it would be a major benefit to identify markers that accurately predict malignancy in these rare tumors. The role of K-ras oncogene mutations as an indicator of malignancy has not been determined in these tumors.Nineteen patients with cystic tumors of the pancreas were evaluated, including K-ras mutation analysis based on polymerase chain reaction and restriction digestion assays and direct DNA sequencing, to screen for parameters that accurately predict malignancy.All malignant cystic pancreatic tumors (five cystadenocarcinomas and three mucin-producing adenocarcinomas) harbored K-ras mutations at codon 12 or 13. K-ras mutations were also detected in the percutaneous fine-needle aspirates of two of these patients. In contrast, none of nine benign cystadenomas or the solid-papillary neoplasm had K-ras mutations. None of the patients with a benign tumor carrying K-ras wild-type sequences developed recurrent disease after a mean follow-up of 50 months. Seven of the 8 malignant cystic pancreatic tumors, but none of the 11 benign tumors, showed dilatation of the main pancreatic duct on computed tomography or endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.K-ras mutation analysis seems to be a powerful tool to determine the malignant potential of cystic pancreatic tumors before and after surgery. Dilatation of the main pancreatic duct on computed tomography or endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography is highly suggestive for malignancy in these rare tumors.Dynamic quantitative evaluation of contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasonography in the diagnosis of pancreatic diseases.This study aimed to investigate the usefulness of contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) with time-intensity curve (TIC) in differentiating pancreatic diseases.Patients who underwent contrast-enhanced EUS between January 2007 and June 2009 were analyzed retrospectively, including 48 with pancreatic ductal cancer (PC), 14 with autoimmune pancreatitis (AIP), 13 with mass-forming pancreatitis (MFP), and 16 with pancreatic endocrine tumor (PET). After intravenous injection of contrast agent, contrast imaging pattern, TIC-based quantitative evaluation, and diagnostic ability of EUS in combination with TIC to diagnose benignancy or malignancy were assessed.Hypovascular and heterogeneous pattern (42/48) in PC, isovascular and homogenous (21/27) in AIP and MFP, and hypervascular and rapid stained (16/16) in PET were observed. The echo intensity reduction rate from the peak at 1 minute was the greatest in PC followed by MFP, AIP, and PET (P < 0.05). The diagnostic accuracies based on contrast imaging pattern (84.0%) and TIC (88.0%) were higher than those based on B-mode imaging (82.6%) and dynamic computed tomography (81.3%). In EUS in combination with TIC, sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy rose up to 95.8%, 92.6%, and 94.7%, respectively.Contrast-enhanced EUS with the dynamic quantitative analysis preparing TIC increased the diagnostic accuracy for pancreatic diseases.Use of multidetector-row computed tomography to evaluate branch duct type intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas: influence on surgical decision-making.The purpose of this study was to evaluate factors predictive of the malignant grade associated with branch duct type intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (BD-IPMN) using multidetectorrow computed tomography (MDCT).We reviewed the morphological features of 26 BDIPMNs using MDCT. Tumor size, caliber of the main pancreatic duct, number of mural nodules, diameter of the largest mural nodule and volume of the largest mural nodule were assessed and correlated with the pathological findings.By multiple- and single-regression analyses and Mann-Whitney U test, significant differences in the caliber of the main pancreatic duct and number of mural nodules were observed between adenoma and non-invasive carcinoma and in the number of mural nodules between adenoma and invasive carcinoma. No significant differences were observed between non-invasive carcinoma and invasive carcinoma. Based on the differential diagnostic criterion of 1 or more mural nodules for distinguishing adenoma from non-invasive carcinoma and invasive carcinoma, the sensitivities were 60% and 100%, respectively, and the specificity was 93% for both.Although it was impossible to distinguish non-invasive carcinoma from invasive carcinoma, MDCT was reliable for distinguishing adenoma from non-invasive carcinoma and invasive carcinoma.Endoscopic ultrasound may be unnecessary in the preoperative evaluation of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm.Several imaging modalities are commonly performed during work-up of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN), but guidelines do not suggest any one technique. The aim of this study was to evaluate tumour and duct measurements by computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and their ability to predict high-grade dysplasia (HGD) and cancer within pancreatic IPMN.Patients with IPMN who underwent preoperative CT and EUS between 2001 and 2009 were selected. Data were gathered retrospectively from medical records.The study group was comprised of 52 patients, 33% (17/52) of whom had HGD or cancer. On fine needle aspirate (FNA), neither carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) >200 nor cytological analysis correlated with malignancy. In multivariate analysis, duct size ≥ 1.0 cm (P= 0.034) was a significant predictor of HGD or cancer, and diameter on CT scan (P= 0.056) approached significance. Lesion diameter of ≥ 2.5 cm on CT scan identified malignancy in 71% (12/17) of patients (P= 0.037). When analysed, all patients with HGD or cancer had a lesion diameter ≥ 2.5 cm and/or a duct diameter ≥ 1.0 cm by CT scan.The use of radiographic criteria on CT including lesion size ≥ 2.5 cm and/or pancreatic duct diameter ≥ 1.0 cm appears to reliably identify patients with either HGD or invasive cancer. High-resolution CT scanning may obviate the need for EUS and FNA in patients with suspected IPMN.The utility of F-18 fluorodeoxyglucose whole body PET imaging for determining malignancy in cystic lesions of the pancreas.Previous studies have suggested that whole body positron-emission tomography (PET) can distinguish between benign and malignant cysts of the pancreas. Patients were identified (n = 68) who had undergone whole body PET imaging for a cystic lesion of the pancreas between Jan. 1997 and May 2005. Cross-sectional imaging studies were reviewed by a single blinded radiologist, and positive PET studies were reviewed by a blinded nuclear medicine physician. Operative resection was performed in 21 patients (31%), and 47 patients were managed with radiographic follow-up. F-18 Fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG)-avid lesions were identified in eight of the 68 patients (12%). Within the resected group of patients (n=21), four of the seven patients (57%) with either in situ or invasive malignancy (adenocarcinoma: 3 of 5, papillary mucinous carcinoma: 1 of 2) had positive PET imaging (mean SUV, 5.9; range 2.5-8.0), and 2 of the 14 patients (14%) with benign lesions had positive PET imaging (serous cystadenoma, n=1, SUV=3.3; pseudocyst n=1, SUV=2.7). All lesions proven to be malignant with increased FDG uptake had highly suspicious findings on cross-sectional imaging. Within the group of resected patients, the sensitivity of PET for identifying malignant pathology was 57%, and the specificity was 85%. The sensitivity and specificity of PET for malignancy in this study was lower than previously reported, and PET findings did not identify otherwise occult malignant cysts. We do not believe whole body FDG-PET to be essential in the evaluation of cystic lesions of the pancreas.Atypical cytologic diagnostic category in EUS-FNA of the pancreas: follow-up, outcomes, and predictive models.The objective of this study was to assess how atypical diagnostic category (ADC) is followed up, its outcomes, and the predictors that are associated with subsequent diagnosis of neoplasm/malignancy.We reviewed pancreatic endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) with ADC and compared the rate of detection of neoplasms after a repeat FNA, a biopsy/resection, or a clinical follow-up following ADC. Logistic regression was used to determine the factors associated with the diagnosis of a neoplastic or a malignant lesion following ADC. Predictive probability for each case was calculated on the basis of the significant predictors, and whether it improved diagnostic performance was assessed.Of 3832 cases that received pancreatic EUS-FNAs, 187 (4.9%) were ADC. A total of 93 neoplasms (55%), including 61 carcinomas (36%), were detected after an atypical cytologic diagnosis. Similar rates of detecting neoplasms were observed after repeat FNA or biopsy/resection but higher than after clinical follow-up. The presence of a mass, history of alcohol use, and absence of a history of pancreatitis were significant predictors of a higher rate of diagnosis of neoplasm. Weight loss and bile flow obstruction were more likely to be associated with higher rates of carcinoma. Predictive probability demonstrated a wide range of risk and changed the ambiguous diagnosis to informative in 30% of cases.ADC of pancreas is associated with a high risk of benign and malignant neoplasms regardless of the method of follow-up. The presences of a mass, alcohol use, and absence of a history of pancreatitis are significant predictors of a diagnosis of neoplasm, whereas weight loss and bile duct obstruction are significant predictors of ductal carcinoma following an ADC.Gene expression signature of advanced pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma using low density array on endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration samples.The purpose of this study was to investigate the clinical feasibility and utility of low-density array analysis on samples obtained from endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy in locally advanced and/or metastatic pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma and chronic pancreatitis.In this prospective multicenter study, we quantified candidate gene expression in biopsies sampled from 44 locally advanced and/or metastatic pancreatic carcinoma and from 17 pseudotumoural chronic pancreatitis using dedicated low-density array microfluidic plates.We first demonstrated that 18S gene expression is stable and comparable in normal pancreas and pancreatic cancer tissues. Next, we found that eight genes (S100P, PLAT, PLAU, MSLN, MMP-11, MMP-7, KRT7, KRT17) were significantly over expressed in pancreatic cancer samples when compared to pseudotumoural chronic pancreatitis (p value ranging from 0.0007 to 0.0215): Linear discriminative analysis identified S100P, PLAT, MSLN, MMP-7, KRT7 as highly explicative variables. The area under receiver operating curve establishes the clinical validity of the potential diagnostic markers identified in this study (values ranging from 0.69 to 0.76). In addition, combination of S100P and KRT7 gave better diagnosis performances (Area Under Receiver Operating Curve 0.81, sensitivity 81%, specificity 77%).We demonstrate that molecular studies on EUS-guided FNA material are feasible for the identification and quantification of markers in PDAC patients diagnosed with non-resectable tumours. Using low-density array, we isolated a molecular signature of advanced pancreatic carcinoma including mostly cancer invasion-related genes. This work stems for the use of novel biomarkers for the molecular diagnosis of patient with solid pancreatic masses.Evaluation of the diagnostic accuracy of the endoscopic ultrasonography results in the patients examined in a period of three years.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is a well-established method of evaluating patients with gastrointestinal diseases, especially malignancies. EUS is like other similar endoscopy techniques, based on high frequency ultrasonography. This high level technology allows examination of tissue to almost microscopic level, not only in digestive system but its surrounding structures.The aim of this study was to determine the contribution of endoscopic experience, based on the number of endosopic ultrasonography examination performed in the three years period, to obtain 80% diagnostic accuracy with staging of the disease in order to achieve a 30-60% change rate in treatment decisions which is accepted standard.First group with 210 patients was examined in the first year of work; 325 examined in the second year of work and 295 in the third year.Accuracy in the first year of work, were 45% (p<0.001 for the choledocholithiasis; p=0.197 for the pancreatic cancer; p=0.195 for LN detection in the gastric cancer). In the second year of work diagnostic accuracy were 78%/p=0.550 for the choledocholithiasis; p=0.228 for the pancreatic cancer; p=0.503 for LN detection in the gastric cancer/. Diagnostic accuracy in the third year of work were 81%/p<0.001 for the choledocholithiasis; p=0.018 for the pancreatic carcinoma; p=0.042 LN detection in the gastric cancer/.Application of Endoscopic ultrasonography in diagnostics, based on number of EUS examination performed, after three years of work, achieved 80% diagnostic accuracy, compared to standard imaging methods and results of surgery in staging of the disease. EUS results made a change in treatment decisions in 30-60% of patients which is world standard and completely justify use of endoscopic ultrasonography in clinical practice.Does onsite cytotechnology evaluation improve the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy?Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is the preferred modality for the cytological diagnosis of various cancers. Onsite cytopathology interpretation is not available in most centres.To assess whether the the adequacy of tissue sampling assessed by an onsite cytotechnologist improves the diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA.The present study is a retrospective review of all patients undergoing solid mass EUS-FNA between September 2005 and August 2007. Patients in group I (September 2005 to August 2006) had cytology slides prepared by an endoscopy nurse. Patients in group II (September 2006 to August 2007) had cytology slides prepared, stained and assessed for adequacy of tissue sampling by a cytotechnologist in the endoscopy suite. The final cytopathological diagnosis (definitely positive, definitely negative or inconclusive) was compared between the two groups.A total of 49 EUS-FNA procedures were performed in 47 patients in group I and 60 EUS-FNA procedures in 55 patients in group II. Pancreatic masses were the most common target site in both groups. The total number of needle passes was 105 in group I (mean 2.14 passes per patient; range one to five needle passes) and 158 in group II (mean 2.63 passes per patient; range one to four needle passes). The difference in the number of needle passes was not statistically significant between groups. The final diagnosis was definite in 53% in group I compared with 77% in group II (P=0.01). The percentage of inconclusive diagnoses was 47% in group I and 23% in group II (P=0.001).Onsite cytotechnologist interpretation of adequacy of tissue sampling significantly improves the diagnostic yield of EUS-FNA. This appears to be independent of the total number of needle passes undertaken for tissue sampling.Pancreatic carcinoma versus chronic pancreatitis: dynamic MR imaging.To determine if dynamic gadolinium-enhanced magnetic resonance (MR) imaging can distinguish chronic pancreatitis from pancreatic carcinoma.A retrospective review of MR and pathology examination findings was performed for 24 patients with pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma and seven with chronic pancreatitis who underwent dynamic gadolinium-enhanced breath-hold spoiled gradient-echo imaging. Arterial, portal, and delayed phase images were obtained after injection of gadopentatate dimeglumine. The MR images of 14 patients without clinical evidence of pancreatic disease were also reviewed as controls. Signal intensity (SI) was measured on the precontrast (pre) and gadolinium-enhanced (post) images of the area of the pancreas sampled at biopsy and of the nontumorous pancreas. Percentage enhancement was defined as SIpre/SIpost x 100.Normal pancreas showed rapid enhancement that peaked in the arterial or portal phase. For both diseases, T1-weighted images showed hypointense masses with progressive enhancement (differences were significant [P < .05] on only delayed fat-saturated images). Differences in enhancement between either disease state and normal pancreas were significant for at least one phase. Nontumorous pancreas in patients with carcinoma showed gradual enhancement that was significantly different from that of normal pancreas.Chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma show abnormal pancreatic enhancement, but the two were not distinguished on the basis of degree and time of enhancement.Comparison between multislice CT and MR imaging in the diagnostic evaluation of patients with pancreatic masses.This study compared the results of multislice computed tomography (MSCT) and high-field magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the diagnostic evaluation of pancreatic masses.Forty patients with clinical and ultrasonographic evidence of pancreatic masses underwent MSCT and MRI. The majority of patients (31/40, 78%) had proven malignant pancreatic tumours (24 ductal adenocarcinoma, six mucinous cystadenocarcinoma, one intraductal papillary mucinous carcinoma), whereas the remaining patients (9/40, 22%) were found to have benign lesions (eight chronic pancreatitis, one serous cystadenoma). Results of the imaging studies were compared with biopsy (n=33) and/or histology (n=7) findings to calculate sensitivity, specificity, accuracy and positive (PPV) and negative (NPV) predictive value for correct identification of tumours and evaluation of resectability of malignancies.Both for tumour identification and resectability, MSCT and MRI had comparable diagnostic accuracy, with no statistically significant differences between them. Tumour identification CT/MRI: accuracy 98/98%, sensitivity 100/100%, specificity 88/88%, PPV 97/97%, NPV 100/100%; tumour resectability CT/MRI: accuracy 94/90%, sensitivity 92/88%, specificity 100/100%, PPV 100/100%, NPV 78/70%.MRI represents a valid diagnostic alternative to CT in the evaluation of patients with pancreatic masses, both for correct identification and characterisation of primary lesions and to establish resectability in the case of malignancies. New high-field MRI equipment allows optimal imaging quality with good contrast resolution in evaluating the upper abdomen.Differential diagnosis of benign or malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas by multidetector row helical computed tomography: evaluation of predictive factors by logistic regression analysis.The purpose of this study is to evaluate predictive factors for discriminating benign from malignant intraductal mucin-producing neoplasm (IPMN) of the pancreas on multidetector row computed tomography (MDCT).Fifty-three patients with IPMN underwent MDCT, and the imaging and pathological findings were evaluated. In patients with branch duct-type tumors, sex and age of the patient, location, shape, size and multiplicity of the cystic lesion, presence of mural nodule, and maximum diameter of main pancreatic duct (MPD) dilatation were evaluated by logistic regression analysis.Tumors were classified as main duct-type (n = 7) and branch duct-type (n = 46). Among main duct-type tumors, all 7 lesions were diagnosed as malignant. Among 46 lesions of branch-type IPMN, 8 lesions were malignant, and 38 lesions were benign. On adjusted logistic regression analysis, combination factor of main duct dilatation and mural nodule or large cystic size had statistical significance for the risk of malignancy in branch duct-type IPMN.Main duct-type IPMN is highly suggestive for malignancy. Combination factors of main ductal dilation and mural nodule, and main ductal dilation, and large cystic tumor size are thought to be predictive factors for malignant branch-type IPMN.Intraductal papillary mucinous tumor of the pancreas demonstrated by MR cholangiopancreatography.The role of EUS and EUS-FNA in the management of pancreatic masses: five-year experience.The efficacy of endoscopic ultrasound with fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic malignancy is quite well established. The aim of this study is to describe a single-centre's experience.Data were collected retrospectively on all patients with solid pancreatic masses undergoing EUS-FNA from January 2006 to March 2011. In tumor cases, TNM staging using EUS was compared with the results of histopathological staging.EUS-FNA of pancreatic lesions was performed in 125 patients. Of these patients, data of 75 were available (69% men, mean age 59.97±11.12 (SD) years); 58 (76%) of the lesions were ductal adenocarcinoma, 11 (14.5%) were chronic pancreatitis, 4 (%5) were intraductal papillary mucinous carcinoma (IPMN) and 2 (%3) were insulinoma. Diagnostic yield of the EUS-FNA procedure was 74.7% (56/75). Specimens from six patients were inadequate. In multivariate analysis, lesion diameter below 2cm was an independent predictor for the inadequacy of material (p=0.04).In patients with pancreatic mass with suspected malignancy, EUS-FNA provided a diagnosis with accuracy rate of 75%. Inadequate material with EUS-FNA was significantly more frequent in lesions below 2cm.Negative predictive value of positron emission tomography/computed tomography in patients with a clinical suspicion of pancreatic cancer.The aim of this study was to determine the negative predictive value of positron emission tomography (PET)/computed tomography (CT) in patients with lesions suggestive of pancreatic cancer.A retrospective review from January 2005 to August 2008 of all patients who underwent a PET/CT to evaluate a lesion suggestive of pancreatic cancer based on prior imaging. One hundred eighty-four patients underwent PET/CT, of which 60 patients had a negative PET scan. Of these 60 patients, 56 patients (30 women, 26 men) had endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration or surgical pathology for clinical correlation. The Fisher exact test was used for statistical analysis.The negative predictive value of PET/CT was 75%. Eighteen patients had a benign lesion, 24 patients had a premalignant lesion, and 14 patients had a malignant lesion. In the cystic group, 72.4% of the PET/CT-negative lesions were premalignant compared with the solid group that was only 5.9%. This was in contrast to the solid group, where 64.7% was malignant versus 6.9% in the cystic group. Two of 14 patients with malignancy had metastatic disease.The negative predictive value of PET/CT in pancreatic lesions suggestive of pancreatic cancer was 75%. A negative PET/CT does not exclude pancreatic cancer, and further workup of these PET-negative lesions is warranted.Accuracy of preoperative imaging methods in a retrospective series of 14 patients with operated intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas.Accuracy of preoperative imaging methods for the diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous tumor of the pancreas (IPMT) is not well known.To compare diagnostic accuracy of various preoperative imaging methods with pathology data following surgical resection.Fourteen consecutive patients underwent pancreatic surgical resection for IPMT between January 1988 and May 2002. Imaging methods included endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and/or magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and/or endoscopic ultrasonography. Results of preoperative morphological examinations were compared with histopathological findings from surgical specimens.IPMT was located to the pancreatic head or body in 72% of patients and involved the main pancreatic duct (MPD) in 79% of cases Carcinoma was diagnosed in 35% of the cases. Sensitivity of imaging methods varied from 64 to 80% to accurately locate the tumor and from 73 to 80% in distinguishing between types involving the MPD or the accessory ducts. Planned surgical resection based on preoperative imagery correlated with final surgery in 57% of the patients. Histological study of whole pancreas specimens revealed lesions in undilated ducts, and also dilated ducts without histological lesions.The sensitivity of preoperative imaging methods is moderate in defining intraductal extension of IPMT. Duct dilatation is not predictive of histological involvement by tumors and ducts may be pathological without dilatation.Clinical implication of serum carcinoembryonic antigen and carbohydrate antigen 19-9 for the prediction of malignancy in intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of pancreas.Little is known about the prognostic significance of serum carbohydrate antigen (CA) 19-9 and carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) concentrations for predicting malignancy in patients with intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) of pancreas.The study cohort consisted of 367 patients with surgical biopsy proven IPMN at Seoul National University Hospital. Preoperative serum tumor markers were evaluated and compared with other clinical variables.Malignant pathology (high grade dysplasia [HGD] and invasive IPMN) was identified in 117 (31.9%) patients. Elevated serum CA19-9 was more frequent in patients with malignant (34.2%, P < 0.001; invasive IPMN vs. HGD 47.9% vs. 11.4%, P < 0.001) and main duct type (40.0%, P = 0.003) IPMN. Multivariate analysis showed main pancreatic duct (MPD) >5 mm (P < 0.001), mural nodules (P < 0.001), and elevated serum CA19-9 (P < 0.001) were independent predictors of malignancy. The sensitivity, specificity and accuracy were 34.2%, 92.4%, and 73.8%, respectively, for elevated serum CA19-9; 63.3%, 78.0%, and 73.3%, for MPD >5 mm; and 59.0%, 86.4%, and 77.7%, for mural nodules.Serum CA19-9 is significantly higher in patients with malignant IPMN, especially in patients with invasive and main duct type IPMN. The diagnostic power of serum CA19-9 in predicting malignancy is comparable to that of MPD >5 mm and mural nodules.Accuracy of EUS for detection of intraductal papillary mucinous tumor of the pancreas.Patients with intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas (IPMT) present with symptoms similar to those of chronic pancreatitis. This study assessed the accuracy of EUS for detection of IPMT and identified features that discriminate IPMT from chronic pancreatitis.EUS accuracy for detecting IPMT was determined with characteristic findings by endoscopic retrograde pancreatography as the reference standard. To determine EUS features characteristic of IPMT, EUS images from patients with IPMT were compared with those from patients (similar age, gender) with chronic pancreatitis.Thirty-eight patients (23 men, 15 women; age range 40-90 years) with IPMT were identified between 1994 and 2001. For EUS, the sensitivity was 86%, specificity 99%, positive predictive value 78%, and negative predictive value 99% for detection of IPMT. When compared with patients with chronic pancreatitis, the EUS features of dilation of pancreatic duct (89% vs. 42%, p < 0.0001), cysts (45% vs. 11%, p = 0.002), and pancreatic atrophy (32% vs. 3%, p = 0.002) were more common, whereas parenchymal features of chronic pancreatitis were less common with IPMT (21% vs. 97%, p < 0.0001). By multivariate analysis, the presence of no more than one parenchymal feature of chronic pancreatitis suggested the diagnosis of IPMT (odds ratio 43.84; 95% CI [4.13, 465.74]).EUS may be useful in the initial evaluation of patients suspected to have IPMT. Paucity of parenchymal features of chronic pancreatitis is important in differentiating IPMT from other causes of chronic pancreatitis.Searching for indicators of malignancy in pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms: the value of 18FDG-PET confirmed.Malignancy in intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMN) of the pancreas may be predicted on the basis of a number of clinical and radiologic features, which have raised sensitivity but result in a specificity as low as 20-50%. We sought to confirm the additional value of (18)F-18-fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography ((18)FDG-PET) in diagnostic accuracy of imaging-based IPMN malignancy assessment.This prospective uncontrolled case series contained 44 patients with IPMN undergoing comprehensive diagnostic evaluation, including magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and (18)FDG-PET. Average follow-up time was 39.3 months (range 3-97 months). Diagnostic performance regarding the diagnosis of malignancy was evaluated for the classic preoperative assessment, including clinical signs, CA 19-9, imaging (computed tomography and magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography), and International Consensus Guidelines criteria, as well as (18)FDG-PET scan.Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy were 100, 22, 32, 100, and 43%, and 83, 100, 100, 94, and 96%, respectively, for comprehensive assessment without and with (18)FDG-PET [maximum standardized uptake value (SUV(max)) cutoff of 2.5 MBq]. Elevated CA 19-9 values and positive PET scan were the only independent prognostic factors for malignancy (odds ratio 2.11, 95% confidence interval 1.15-2.74 and 5.49, 95% confidence interval 3.98-21.44, respectively).(18)FDG-PET is useful for detection of malignancy in IPMN, improving the differential diagnosis with benign cases by functional data. The choice of SUV(max) cutoff should maximize specificity.[The value of computer tomography and sonography in the investigation of the pancreas (author's transl)].Three hundred and five patients were examined by computer tomography and sonography. In 117 patients no abnormalities were found in the pancreas. The accuracy of computer tomography was 87%, of sonography 85%. In 41 patients the presence of a carcinoma of the pancreas was confirmed histologically. In this group the sensitivity of computer tomography was 83%, of sonography 85%. Thirty-four patients suffered from acute pancreatitis. In this group sensitivity of the two methods was equal at 79%. 113 patients had changes of chronic pancreatitis. Sensitivity of computer tomography was 84%, of sonography 70%. Computer tomography is better at demonstrating calcification in the pancreas. Atrophy of the pancreas cannot be diagnosed by sonography.18F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography in management of pancreatic cystic tumors.To evaluate the effectiveness of PET in differentiating malignant from benign pancreatic cystic tumors.Between 2009 and 2010, all patients with pancreatic cystic tumors who had PET, triple phase contrast computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) were reviewed. Clinicopathological characteristics and final histology were correlated with preoperative PET, CT and EUS to assess the value of each modality in detecting malignant from benign lesions for clinical decision-making.Twenty of a total of 116 patients with pancreatic cystic tumors had 18F-FDG PET because of diagnostic difficulties after evaluation with conventional modalities. Sensitivity and specificity of PET in differentiating malignant from benign pancreatic cystic tumors were 100% and 93.75%, with an accuracy of 95%. PET had the best sensitivity, specificity and accuracy for detecting malignant cystic tumors compared with CT and EUS. In 5 cases, the PET results altered the treatment options completely to follow-up instead of surgery (n=2), limited resection instead of Whipple's resection (n=1), and surgery instead of follow-up (n=2).PET is an accurate, non-invasive method to distinguish malignant from benign pancreatic cystic tumors and can be used as an adjunct to facilitate clinical decision making.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas: assessment of the likelihood of invasiveness with multisection CT.To evaluate the capabilities of multisection computed tomography (CT) in determining the likelihood of invasiveness of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN).The institutional review board approved this research and waived informed consent from the patients. Two radiologists blinded to the pathologic assessment of malignancy or parenchymal invasion of IPMN retrospectively evaluated CT images of 61 consecutive surgically resected tumors (26 adenomas, 15 noninvasive carcinomas, and 20 invasive carcinomas) in patients who underwent multiphase contrast material-enhanced CT with 0.5- or 1-mm collimation. The findings were statistically analyzed by using univariate and multivariate analyses, with the optimal cutoff levels of each continuous parameter determined by generating receiver operating characteristic curves.The following findings showed significant differences among the three groups: maximum diameter of the main pancreatic duct (MPD), size (length of major axis) of the largest mural nodule in the MPD or in any associated cystic lesion, abnormal attenuating area in the surrounding parenchyma, calcification in the lesion, protrusion of the MPD into the ampulla of Vater, and bile duct dilatation. An MPD diameter of 6 mm or larger, a mural nodule of 3 mm or larger, and an abnormal attenuating area were independently predictive of malignancy. A mural nodule of 6.3 mm or larger in the MPD and an abnormal attenuating area were independently predictive of parenchymal invasion. According to these criteria, the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy for identifying malignancy were 83%, 81%, and 82% and for identifying parenchymal invasion were 90%, 88%, and 89%, respectively.Multisection CT is useful for distinguishing among adenoma, noninvasive carcinoma, and invasive carcinoma in patients with IPMN.Three-dimensional contrast-enhanced ultrasonography of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas: a comparison with magnetic resonance imaging.The objective of this study was to prospectively compare the diagnostic accuracy of 3-dimensional contrast-enhanced ultrasonography (3D-CEUS) with that of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the study of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) of the pancreas.Thirty consecutive patients with IPMN were studied.Three patients (10.0%) did not undergo diagnostic 3D-CEUS because of technical problems. Three dimensional CEUS identified 12 (44.4%) main-duct IPMNs versus no cases by MRI (P < 0.001). Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm localization showed poor agreement between 3D-CEUS and MRI (κ = 0.058), whereas good agreement was found in detecting the pancreatic calcifications (κ = 1.000). Significant differences between 3D-CEUS and MRI were found regarding the number of lesions detected (1.4 ± 0.8 vs 3.8 ± 3.6; P < 0.001), the detection of mucinous plugs (3.7% vs 50.0%; P < 0.001), chronic pancreatitis (7.4% vs 26.7%; P = 0.031), pancreatic atrophy (0% vs 50.0%; P < 0.001), thick septa (22.2% vs 53.3%; P = 0.004), and mural nodules (25.9% vs 3.3%; P = 0.016). Three dimensional CEUS showed similar results as compared with MRI in evaluating IPMNs smaller than 1 cm of diameter or greater than 2 cm.Even if MRI remains the criterion standard technique for the diagnosis of IPMNs, 3D-CEUS can be safely used to follow patients with IPMNs of less than 1 cm.Role of repeated endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration in small solid pancreatic masses with previous indeterminate and negative cytological findings.Despite advances in imaging techniques, the differentiation between pancreatic cancer and benign lesions remains difficult. Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is an effective method for providing tissue diagnosis, but problems occur when lesions are small or the cytological diagnosis is indeterminate.To prospectively evaluate the utility of EUS-FNA in patients with small solid pancreatic lesions and those with initial indeterminate or negative cytological diagnosis.During the study period we performed a total of 119 EUS-FNA procedures on 46 patients (mean age 56.3 years) for 47 small solid pancreatic lesions (range 7-30 mm, mean 17.2 mm in diameter). FNAs were performed in the presence of a cytopathologist. If cytological diagnoses were indeterminate, EUS-FNA was repeated within 3 weeks. Diagnoses were confirmed histologically or by follow-up (clinical and imaging: EUS +/- FNA and CT).Localization of the lesions: head 28 (60%), uncinate process 4 (9%), body 11 (23%) and tail 4 (9%). On average, 3.7 passes were performed. We observed no complications. Initial cytological findings were: malignant 17 (36%), benign 21 (45%), and indeterminate 9 (19%). 8 (78%) of the indeterminate findings were confirmed to be malignant on repeated procedures. A diagnosis of pancreatic cancer was subsequently confirmed in 1 patient who had a benign cytological finding. 19 patients underwent surgery. Histology confirmed a neoplasm in all cases. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and diagnostic accuracy were 68, 100, 100, 73 and 83%, respectively. After repeated EUS-FNAs of indeterminate findings sensitivity, negative predictive value and diagnostic accuracy rose to 92, 77 and 96%, respectively.EUS-FNA is a highly effective method for providing tissue diagnosis in patients with small solid pancreatic masses. Repeated procedures enhanced diagnostic accuracy in indeterminate findings, among which was high percentage of malignancies. EUS-FNA reduced the number of operations in patients with pancreatic solid masses.Evaluation of positron emission tomography with 2-[18F]fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose for the differentiation of chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic cancer.The clinical presentation of patients with pancreatic cancer may resemble the clinical picture of chronic pancreatitis. A definitive preoperative diagnosis is not always obtained in patients with a history of chronic pancreatitis despite the use of modern imaging techniques. Operative strategy therefore remains unclear before operation in these patients.Positron emission tomography (PET) with 2-[18F]fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG) was introduced recently into clinical oncology because of its ability to demonstrate metabolic changes associated with various disease processes. The impact of FDG-PET on the differentiation of chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic cancer was investigated. FDG-PET was performed in 48 patients with chronic pancreatitis (n = 12), acute pancreatitis (n = 3) and pancreatic cancer (n = 27), and in controls (n = 6). Histological examination was undertaken in all cases except controls. The FDG-PET results were obtained without knowledge of results of other imaging procedures. The results were then compared with those of computed tomography, ultrasonography, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreaticography, operative findings and histology. PET images were analysed semiquantitatively by calculating a standard uptake value (SUV) 90-120 min after application of the tracer.Cut-off values were validated as follows: SUV greater than 4.0 for pancreatic cancer, SUV of 3.0-4.0 for chronic pancreatitis, and SUV of less than 3.0 for controls. Sensitivity and specificity of PET imaging were 0.96 and 1.0 for pancreatic cancer, and 1.0 and 0.97 for chronic pancreatitis. In five cases only FDG-PET led to the correct preoperative diagnosis.The results give further evidence that FDG-PET is an important non-invasive method for the differentiation of chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic cancer. Delayed image acquisition in the glycolysis plateau phase permits improved diagnostic performance. This imaging technique is extremely helpful before operation in patients with an otherwise unclear pancreatic mass, despite its costs.Correlation between spiral computed tomography, endoscopic ultrasonography and findings at operation in pancreatic and ampullary tumours.Spiral computed tomography (CT) allows high-resolution examination of the pancreas, surrounding vascular structures, lymph nodes and liver. Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) also allows high-resolution imaging of the pancreas and adjacent structures but is an invasive procedure. With the availability of spiral CT, the role of EUS in the investigation of patients with suspected pancreatic or ampullary tumours is unclear.Forty-eight patients with clinical suspicion of a pancreatic or ampullary tumour underwent both spiral CT and EUS. Thirty-four patients had surgical exploration, of whom 17 underwent pancreatic resection and 17 had biliary and gastric bypass. The results of spiral CT and EUS were compared with the operative findings.The final histological diagnosis was ductal adenocarcinoma (24 patients), ampullary carcinoma (six), serous cystadenoma (two) and chronic pancreatitis (two). EUS demonstrated 33 and spiral CT 26 of the 34 primary lesions. EUS was particularly useful in the assessment of small resectable tumours missed by spiral CT. The sensitivity and specificity of EUS and spiral CT for detecting involvement by the tumour of the superior mesenteric vein, portal vein and lymph nodes were similar, but EUS was less effective at evaluating the superior mesenteric artery.EUS is an important additional investigation after spiral CT in patients with a suspected pancreatic or ampullary tumour.Utility of EUS in the evaluation of cystic pancreatic lesions.Preoperative differentiation of benign and malignant/potentially malignant pancreatic cystic lesions is problematic. Data to support the role of EUS and EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) are limited. This study assessed the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of EUS, cytopathology, and analysis of cyst fluid for pancreatic cystic lesions.Retrospectively, 111 consecutive patients were identified (54 men, 57 women; mean age 59 years, range 18-79 years) who underwent EUS from July 1997 to September 2000 because of known or suspected pancreatic cystic lesions based on CT or transabdominal US. Thirty-four patients (16 men, 18 women; mean age 55 years, 25-79 years) who underwent surgery formed the basis for this analysis. EUS diagnosis was compared with surgical pathology. Selected patients underwent EUS-FNA to obtain specimens for cytopathologic analysis and for determination of carcinoembryonic antigen levels. Based on surgical pathology, cysts were classified as benign (simple cyst, pseudocyst, serous cystadenoma) or malignant/potentially malignant (mucinous cystadenoma, intraductal papillary mucinous tumor, cystic islet cell tumor, cystic adenocarcinoma).EUS-FNA with cytopathologic assessment of cyst fluid was performed for 18 of the 34 patients; carcinoembryonic antigen level was determined in 11 cases. For EUS, cytopathology, and carcinoembryonic antigen, sensitivity was, respectively, 91%, (p = 0.01 vs. cytology), 27%, and 28%; specificity was, respectively, 60%, 100%, and 25%; and, accuracy was, respectively, 82%, 55%, and 27%. The sensitivity of EUS in all 13 patients with cystic islet cell tumor, intraductal papillary mucinous tumor, or cystic adenocarcinoma was 100%. Combining EUS, cytopathology, and carcinoembryonic antigen results did not improve accuracy. There were no complications related to the EUS or EUS-FNA.EUS alone is sensitive and accurate in identifying malignant/potentially malignant pancreatic cystic lesions. EUS-FNA to obtain specimens for cytopathologic analysis and determination of carcinoembryonic antigen levels, although safe, does not enhance diagnostic yield.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration of solid pancreatic masses with rapid on-site cytological evaluation by endosonographers without attendance of cytopathologists.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) with rapid on-site evaluation (ROSE) has been reported to provide a more accurate diagnosis than EUS-FNA without such evaluation. However, even endosonographers can evaluate ROSE regarding sample adequacy. The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA with ROSE by endosonographers compared to ROSE by cytopathologists in patients with solid pancreatic masses.Between September 2001 and October 2005, of the 73 EUS-FNA procedures with the final diagnoses, 38 procedures after the introduction of ROSE by endosonographers (September 2001-September 2003, period 1), and 35 procedures after the introduction of ROSE by cytopathologists (October 2003-October 2005, period 2) were included. The specimens were stained with Diff-Quik stain and assessed. When the on-site assessors (endosonographers or cytopathologists) indicated that the amounts of cell samples were adequate, the procedure was stopped.Results are presented with 95% confidence limits. The average numbers of needle passes were 4.0 +/- 1.6 and 3.4 +/- 1.5 in periods 1 and 2, respectively (P = 0.06). The specimen collection rates were 97.4 and 97.1% in periods 1 and 2, respectively (P = 0.51). Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy for malignancy and benign were 92.9, 100, 100, 83.3, and 94.7%, respectively, in period 1, and 93.1, 100, 100, 75.0, and 94.3%, respectively, in period 2 (P = 0.97, P = 1.0, P = 1.0, P = 0.65, P = 0.93, respectively). No complications were seen.For accurate diagnosis, ROSE should be performed during EUS-FNA by the endosonographer, if no cytopathologist is available.Endoscopic ultrasound-fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) for pancreatic lesions: effectiveness in clinical practice.Diagnosis of pancreatic masses is often difficult. Endoscopic ultrasound-fine needle aspiration has been proposed as the best single-step strategy.To prospectively evaluate feasibility, effectiveness and safety of endoscopic ultrasound-fine needle aspiration of pancreatic masses in a consecutive study of unselected patients.Two hundred ninety-three patients were enrolled in two referral Hospitals in Northern Italy. All patients were referred either due to the presence of imaging test abnormalities (suspected or evident masses, or features indirectly suggesting the presence of a mass) or due to clinical or biochemical findings suggesting pancreatic cancer in the absence of positive imaging. All patients underwent linear array endoscopic ultrasound and, when indicated, fine needle aspiration. All procedures were recorded prospectively. The final diagnosis was established at the end of follow-up or when the patients underwent surgery or died.Fine needle aspiration was indicated in 246 of 293 cases (84%), considered technically feasible in 232 of 246 cases (94%) and gave adequate samples for histopathological diagnosis in 204 of 232 cases (88%). Endoscopic ultrasound sensitivity, specificity and accuracy were 79, 60 and 72%, respectively; the corresponding figures for endoscopic ultrasound-fine needle aspiration were 80, 86 and 82%. There was good agreement with final diagnosis for endoscopic ultrasound-fine needle aspiration (kappa 0.673, 95%CI 0.592-0.753), greater than that for endoscopic ultrasound alone (kappa 0.515, 95%CI 0.425-0.605). There was one case of intracystic haemorrhage and one case of transient hyperthermia (0.3%).Endoscopic ultrasound-fine needle aspiration of pancreatic masses seems to be feasible, effective and safe in this consecutive study of patients.Diagnostic efficacy of endoscopic ultrasound tomography in pancreatic cancer and cholestasis.By direct access to the target organs and by improved detail resolution, endoscopic ultrasound tomography (EUT) broadens the range of sonographic diagnostics. In this preliminary study, the accuracy of EUT was tested in 34 patients with suspected pancreatic carcinoma and/or painfree jaundice. In all 10 patients with pancreatic carcinoma and in all 6 patients with chronic pancreatitis, the diagnosis made by EUT was correct. Three patients with benign tumors of the pancreas were also diagnosed correctly. The diagnostic sensitivity of EUT in pancreatic cysts was in 4 of 5 cases 80%, in dilatations of the main pancreatic duct in 10 of 11 cases 91%, and in cholestasis in 14 of 15 cases 93%. All 5 common bile duct concrements and all 3 tumors of the papilla Vateri were diagnosed by EUT. The differential diagnosis between pancreatic tumor and pancreatitis was improved by EUT in 1 of 18 cases. In the region of the papilla Vateri, EUT was superior to conventional UT in the diagnosis of ampullary concrements and papillary tumors in 6 of 8 cases (4/5 and 2/3, respectively). EUT could become an important complementary diagnostic method for disorders of the pancreas and the common bile duct with a particular sensitivity for the region of the papilla Vateri.Predictors of cancer in patients with suspected pancreatic malignancy without a tissue diagnosis.The aim of this study was to identify predictive factors for malignancy in patients undergoing surgery for suspected pancreatic cancer without a preoperative tissue diagnosis.Patients were identified by International Classification of Diseases Ninth Revision and current procedural terminology codes, respectively, for pancreatic cancer and pancreaticoduodenectomy at a single tertiary referral center between January 1998 and May 2004. Data were collected retrospectively by chart review. Multivariate analysis of potential predictive factors was performed.A total of 150 patients underwent surgery for documented or suspected pancreatic malignancy; 102 did not have a preoperative tissue diagnosis of cancer. Of these, 75 had neoplastic disease at surgery. Average weight loss was greater for those with malignancy (13.5 vs. 4.8 lbs; P = .014) as was mean bilirubin (6.1 vs. 3.3 mg/dL; P = .006). In multivariate analysis, a combination of weight loss >20 lbs, bilirubin >3 mg/dL, and CA 19-9 >37 U/mL had both a specificity and positive predictive value of 100% for predicting malignancy regardless of bile duct abnormalities or mass lesions on endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography or endoscopic ultrasound, respectively. The positive predictive value decreased to 89.5% when any 2 of these findings were present. The presence of a mass on CT or EUS alone had a sensitivity of 84%; however, no other single finding had a sensitivity >65%.In patients suspected of having a pancreatic malignancy, weight loss, hyperbilirubinemia, and increased CA 19-9 level may be predictive of a final cancer diagnosis. Surgical exploration should be considered in these patients even in the absence of a preoperative tissue diagnosis.Performance characteristics of molecular (DNA) analysis for the diagnosis of mucinous pancreatic cysts.Diagnosis of mucinous pancreatic cysts (MPCs) is challenging due to the poor sensitivity of cytology provided by EUS-guided-FNA (EUS-FNA).To quantify the test characteristics of molecular (DNA) analysis in suspected low-risk MPCs.A prospective cohort study performed in between 2008 and 2011.Academic referral center.Consecutive patients who underwent EUS-FNA of suspected MPCs.EUS-FNA and molecular (DNA) analysis of cyst fluid.The sensitivity and specificity of molecular analysis in the diagnosis of MPCs using the criterion standard of surgical pathology in resected cysts.Patients with suspected MPCs underwent EUS-FNA and cyst fluid DNA analysis. Surgical resection was performed in 48 patients (17%), confirming a mucinous pathology in 38 (79%). In this group, molecular analysis had a sensitivity of 50% and a specificity of 80% in identifying MPCs (accuracy of 56.3%). The combination of molecular analysis with cyst fluid carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and cytology resulted in higher MPC diagnostic performance than either one of its individual components, with a sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of 73.7%, 70%, and 72.9%, respectively. There was no significant difference in accuracy between molecular analysis and CEA/cytology in this group.Single-center experience.Molecular analysis aids in the diagnosis of MPCs when cytology is nondiagnostic or cyst fluid is insufficient for CEA or its level is indeterminate. Our results do not support the routine use of molecular analysis, which should be used selectively after review of imaging findings and cyst fluid studies. Further studies are needed to assess DNA's performance in malignant cysts.Management of branch duct-type intraductal papillary mucinous tumor of the pancreas based on magnetic resonance imaging.We assessed the usefulness of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in identifying nonmalignant intraductal papillary mucinous tumors (IPMTs) of the pancreas.Thirty-three patients with branch duct-type IPMT diagnosed by endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography were prospectively examined with magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography followed by dynamic gadolinium-enhanced MRI examinations, and patients with no findings suggestive of malignancy, including a solid mass, mural nodules, a main pancreatic duct wider than 5 mm in diameter, and stenosis of the main pancreatic duct, were prospectively followed up with sequential MRI examinations once or twice a year.Twenty-six (79%) patients showed no findings suggestive of malignancy in the initial MRI examination. The diameter (mean +/- standard error) of the main pancreatic duct was 3.9 +/- 0.7 mm and that of the ectatic branch pancreatic duct was 36.0 +/- 9.1 mm. Twenty-three patients were prospectively followed for more than 36 months and 22 of them showed no findings suggestive of malignancy during follow-up periods ranging from 39 to 77 months (mean = 55 months).MRI was useful to identify nonmalignant IPMTs of the branch duct type, and close follow-up observation with serial MRI examinations may be appropriate in the management of such patients.Endoscopic ultrasound guided fine-needle aspiration cytology of pancreatic carcinoma: a 3-year experience and review of the literature.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy (EUS-FNAB) of small pancreatic lesions that are undetectable by computed tomography has gained wide acceptance for the procurement of cells for diagnostic purposes. However, this technique is not without difficulty. The authors examined the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values (PPV and NPV, respectively) of this technique in the evaluation of patients with pancreatic biliary duct strictures/masses. The authors were interested in reviewing their cases of pancreatic adenocarcinoma of ductal type and finding the sources of their false-negative cases.A computer search was performed between January 1998 and July 2001. For the last 3 years, a total of 80 cases of suspected ductal adenocarcinoma of the pancreas was identified. Thirty-four patients (42%) underwent a subsequent Whipple procedure or biopsy. Cytologic and histologic correlation was performed in these cases. The rest of the 23 patients (29%) considered to be positive and the 23 patients (29%) considered to be negative underwent no subsequent biopsy and were followed clinically. Cases termed "suspicious" on cytology were considered positive and those termed "atypical cytology" were considered negative in the authors' final calculation. The causes of the false-negative diagnoses were evaluated carefully.Of the 34 cases followed with subsequent tissue biopsy or surgery; 12 were confirmed to be positive, 12 were confirmed to be negative, and 10 were considered to be false-negative. Previously identified cytomorphologic features of malignancy were used to review all cases. These features were: loss of the honeycomb pattern (100%), anisonucleosis (100%), nuclear contour irregularity (100%), a high nuclear/cytoplasmic ratio (100%), paranuclear chromatin clearing (77%), and the presence of prominent nucleoli in the absence of inflammatory cells (77%). The causes of the 10 false-negative cases were technical difficulty of procuring material in 6 cases, the nature of the lesion in 2 cases, and the scarcity of lesional tissue in 2 cases.Using strict cytoarchitectural and cytomorphologic criteria of malignancy for ductal pancreatic lesions previously described in the literature, the sensitivity of this technique at the study institution was 78% with a specificity of 100%. The PPV and NPV of this technique were 100% and 78%, respectively. The most common causes of the false-negative results in descending order were the technical aspect of the procedure, the size and nature of the lesion, and the scarcity of lesional tissue.[Significance of ultrasound examination and computed tomography in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer].The diagnostic sensitivity of USI for localization of a tumor of the pancreatic head was 89.3%, specificity--69.7%, exactness--84.4%. When the tumor was localized in the body-tail these indices were 85.7%, 73.4% and 78.7% respectively. The sensitivity of CT in cases when the localization of the tumor was in the head of the pancreas was 84.9%, specificity--72.2%, exactness--76.5%. When the tumors were localized in the body-tail these indices were 89.5%, 75.4% and 80.9% respectively. An associated analysis of information of the ultrasound and CT concerning the structure of the pancreas made the exactness of the diagnosis of malignization as high as 87.6%, specificity as high as 81.3%, sensitivity as high as 93.7%. The informative value of USI and CT depended on the tumor size, the presence of an inflammatory reaction of the pancreas, the character of a complication, if any, or of their combinations, localization and size of the pathological focus. In the investigation no alterations in the pancreas characteristic only of cancer were found. Thus, a comparison of diagnostic potentials of USI and CT has shown that one method does not exclude, but only supplements the other. CT gives more reliable results in the assessment of the process spread to the surrounding tissues and regional lymph nodes, especially when the tumor is localized in the area of the pancreas tail. USI helps to make more exact assessment of the involvement in the process of the common bile duct, pancreatic duct, and of the visceral vessels by the Doppler examination.EUS-guided pancreatic cyst brushing: a comparative study in a tertiary referral centre.Fluid analysis obtained by EUS guided FNA is used to aid in diagnosis and management of cystic lesions in the pancreas. Complementing fluid aspiration with brushing of cyst wall may increase the cellular yield.To compare cellular yield of pancreatic cyst FNA with and without wall brushing.Comparative study.Tertiary referral centre.Fifty-one patients with cystic pancreatic lesions referred for EUS-guided aspiration/sampling were included (median age 69 years; interquartile range: 49-77 years).Comparing adequacy of cellular yield between EUS-guided aspiration alone vs. EUS-guided aspiration and cyst wall brushing.EUS-guided FNA and/or wall brushing (aspiration only: No. 27; brushing: No. 24).There was no significant difference in age (P=0.496) cyst size (P=0.084) or cyst location (P=0.227) between groups. Overall 29.5%; (15/51) of samples were acellular/insufficient with no significant difference between the two groups (22.2% in the aspiration only group vs. 37.5% in the brushing group; P=0.356). The remaining samples were adequate for cytological evaluation (77.8% vs. 62.5%; aspiration only vs. brushing groups). Seventeen cases were neoplastic (8 benign, 9 malignant). The diagnostic accuracy was 61.9% and 55.0% in aspiration only and brushing groups, respectively. Two out of 4 (50.0%) patents were diagnosed as having cancer in the brushings group compared to 1/5 (20.0%) in the FNA only group (P=0.524).Non-randomised series.The cellular yield was similar in FNA and brushing group. Greater proportion of patients with malignant cystic pancreatic lesions diagnosed by EUS sampling was in the brushing group, but this did not reach statistical significance.Appropriate indications of initial endoscopic ultrasound evaluation for detecting mural nodules in branch duct intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas.The presence of mural nodules is a strong predictor of malignancy in patients with branch-duct intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (BD-IPMNs). Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is the most sensitive imaging for the detection of mural nodules. The aim was to evaluate whether initial EUS evaluation is necessary to detect mural nodules in all patients with BD-IPMNs.We reviewed retrospectively the medical records of all 104 patients with BD-IPMNs diagnosed by EUS from January 2008 to December 2011. Of the 104 patients, 13 (12.5%) had mural nodules (MN-positive group) and 91 (87.5%) did not (MN-negative group).Patients in the MN-positive group were significantly older (69 years vs. 61 years, p = 0.013), had larger-sized cysts on EUS (24.1 ± 8.3 mm vs. 16.2 ± 8.0 mm, p = 0.001), a higher rate of main pancreatic duct dilatation (30.8% vs. 3.3%, p = 0.004), and higher serum CA 19-9 concentrations (67.8 ± 109.4 U/mL vs. 17.5 ± 27.0 U/mL, p = 0.012), than patients in the MN-negative group. Cyst sizes measured by EUS, CT, and MRCP did not differ significantly. Multivariate logistic regression analysis showed that cysts ≥16 mm in size on CT (odds ratio [OR], 9.84; 95% confidential interval [CI], 1.08-89.93; p = 0.043) and main pancreatic duct dilatation (OR, 12.65; 95% CI, 1.62-98.99; p = 0.016) were independent predictors of mural nodules.Patients with BD-IPMNs, cyst size ≥16 mm, and main pancreatic duct dilatation should be further evaluated by EUS for the presence of mural nodules.Expression of glucose transporters in human pancreatic tumors compared with increased FDG accumulation in PET study.Although overexpression of GLUT-1 glucose transporter has already been reported in human cancers, the mechanism of glucose entry into pancreatic cancers remains unknown. To evaluate the relationship between GLUT glucose transporters and FDG uptake, FDG-PET was performed in 34 preoperative patients (mean age, 60.9 yr) with suspected pancreatic tumors, including 28 malignant and 6 benign tumors.FDG uptake at 50 min after injection of 185 MBq of [18F]FDG with >5 hr of fasting was semiquantitatively analyzed as standardized uptake values (SUVs). The GLUT expression was studied by immunohistochemistry of paraffin sections from these tumors after operation using anti-GLUT-1, -2, -3, -4 and -5 antibodies to obtain immunohistochemical grading ("strong," "weak" and "negative") by three experienced physicians.Of 26 malignant tumors proved by histological examination, 23 (88%) tumors were positive for the expression of GLUT-1 glucose transporter, and 17 (61%) showed strong expression. On the other hand, 13 (46%), 0 (0%), 9 (36%) and 13 (46%) malignant tumors were positive for the expression of GLUT-2, -3, -4 and -5 glucose transporters, respectively. Three of six benign tumors showed strong GLUT-1 expression. Concerning GLUT-2, -3, -4 and -5, only one benign tumor showed positive GLUT-5 expression. Thus, GLUT-1 showed relatively high sensitivity but low specificity (50%) for detecting malignant tumors, whereas GLUT-2, -3, -4 and -5 had lower sensitivities but higher specificities. Correlations between SUVs and grading of GLUT immunoreactivity were significant in GLUT-1 (strong, 4.49 +/- 2.95; weak, 3.42 +/- 1.21; negative, 2.52 +/- 0.84) (p < 0.05) but not in the remaining four GLUT transporters.These data indicate that GLUT-1 has a significant role in the malignant glucose metabolism and may contribute to the increased uptake of FDG in PET imaging in patients with pancreatic tumor.[Accuracy of imaging techniques and tumor markers in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer].The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of: a) three imaging techniques: ultrasonography (US), computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), and b) the serum tumor markers CEA, CA 19-9 and CA 125, in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.A total of 137 patients were prospectively evaluated. Pancreatic cancer was diagnosed in 25 patients; chronic pancreatitis in 24; acute pancreatitis in 22; extrapancreatic malignancies in 24, and benign digestive disease in 42. The reference interval for each marker was determined in 36 healthy volunteers. Diagnostic accuracy was determined using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves. Each diagnostic test was used in order: a) to diagnose pancreatic cancer when the disease was clinically suspected, and b) to differentiate between pancreatic cancer and chronic pancreatitis.CT (0.976-0.888) and US (0.857) diagnostic accuracy resulted greater than the best serum tumor marker CA 19-9 (0.755-0.786) (p = NS), in both diagnostic conditions. To obtain a diagnostic specificity of 90% in pancreatic cancer, the CA 19-9 cutoff level should increase up to 3 and 7.5 folds being in this case better than CEA and CA 125 (p < 0.05).CT scan offers the greatest accuracy in the diagnosis of PC. Among the tumor markers, CA 19-9 offers the best accuracy in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.Differentiation of chronic focal pancreatitis from pancreatic carcinoma by in vivo proton magnetic resonance spectroscopy.To determine the differences between the in vivo proton magnetic resonance spectroscopy (H-MRS) features of chronic focal pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma and to evaluate the possibility of discriminating chronic focal pancreatitis from pancreatic carcinoma by analysis of in vivo H-MR spectra.The H-MR spectra from 36 human pancreases were evaluated in vivo. This series included 15 cases of chronic focal pancreatitis and 21 cases of pancreatic carcinoma. All cases were confirmed histopathologically after surgical resection. The ratios of the peak area (P) of all peaks at 1.6-4.1 ppm to lipid (0.9-1.6 ppm) (P [1.6-4.1 ppm]/P [0.9-1.6 ppm]) in the chronic focal pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma groups were evaluated, and the results were compared. The sensitivity and specificity of the analysis were also evaluated by in vivo H-MR spectra for discriminating between chronic focal pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma.In vivo H-MR spectra showed significantly less lipid in chronic focal pancreatitis than in pancreatic carcinoma. The ratio of P (1.6-4.1 ppm)/P (0.9-1.6 ppm) in chronic focal pancreatitis was significantly higher than that in pancreatic carcinoma (P < 0.05) because of a decreased peak area of lipids. The means +/- SDs of P (1.6-4.1 ppm)/P (0.9-1.6 ppm) in the chronic focal pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma groups were 2.78 +/- 1.67 and 0.51 +/- 0.49, respectively. Using a value of <2.5 as positive for pancreatic cancer, the sensitivity and the specificity for pancreatic cancer were 100% and 53.3%, respectively.Chronic focal pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma can be distinguished from each other by analysis of in vivo H-MR spectra, and in vivo H-MRS can be a useful method for making a differential diagnosis between chronic focal pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma.Values of CA 19-9 in the serum, pure pancreatic juice, and aspirated pancreatic material in the diagnosis of malignant pancreatic tumor.The diagnostic accuracy of the measurement of CA 19-9 in the serum, pure pancreatic juice, and aspirated pancreatic fluid in the diagnosis of pancreatic tumors was assessed in 32 patients with malignant pancreatic tumors and 19 patients with pancreatitis. Pure pancreatic juice was collected from the pancreatic duct by endoscopic cannulation with a duodenofiberscope after intravenous administration of secretin. Pancreatic material was obtained by percutaneous fine-needle aspiration biopsy under ultrasonic guidance. Abnormally high CA 19-9 levels in the serum were significantly more frequent in patients with malignant pancreatic tumors than in those with pancreatitis: they were elevated in 71.9% of the patients with pancreatic tumors. High CA 19-9 levels were found primarily in patients with a tumor of the head of the pancreas, in those with a tumor greater than 3 cm in its greatest diameter, and in those with an unresectable cancer. Only 57.1% of seven patients with a tumor of less than 3 cm in its greatest diameter showed an increase in CA 19-9 level. The CA 19-9 levels in pure pancreatic juice were significantly higher in patients with pancreatic tumors than in patients with pancreatitis without pancreatic stone. However, it was not useful for differentiating pancreatic tumors from pancreatitis with pancreatolithiasis. The CA 19-9 level in pancreatic materials obtained by aspiration biopsy was significantly higher in patients with malignant pancreatic tumors than in those with pancreatitis. Eight patients (80%) with pancreatic tumors had values above 1000 U/ml, whereas all five patients with pancreatitis had values of less than 30 U/ml. Although CA 19-9 levels in pancreatic materials was useful only when cytologic examination did not provide any evidence of malignancy, the combination of the CA 19-9 assay and the cytologic study of specimens obtained by percutaneous fine-needle aspiration biopsy of the pancreas increased the diagnostic rate to 100%.Clinical factors associated with accuracy of EUS-FNA for pancreatic or peripancreatic solid mass without on-site cytopathologists.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUSFNA) is a safe and effective technique for tissue diagnosis in patients with pancreatic or peripancreatic solid masses. However, the procedure is difficult to accomplish without an on-site cytopathologist. The aims of this study were to examine the outcomes of EUS-FNA for pancreatic or peripancreatic solid masses without an on-site cytopathologist and to determine the factors associated with diagnostic accuracy.From December 2005 to November 2011, 230 patients with pancreatic or peripancreatic solid masses had 240 EUS-FNAs performed without an on-site cytopathologist. The medical records of the 230 patients from a single tertiary center were retrospectively reviewed.Among the 230 patients who underwent EUS-FNA, 201 patients (88%) had malignancy, which included 171 adenocarcinomas (74%). Assuming that the cytopathological malignancy was positive or suspicious for malignant cells with cytology, the accuracy without an on-site cytopathologist was 67.9%. However, the accuracy increased from 40.0% for the first 30 cases (from 2006 to 2008) to 83.3% for the last 30 cases (in 2011) and was constantly over 80.0% starting from the sixth octile onwards for every 30 cases (in 2011). From the analysis of factors associated with the accuracy of the diagnosis using logistic regression analysis, the number of needle passes and the experience of endosonographer were statistically associated with the diagnostic accuracy.In the case of performing EUS-FNA for pancreatic or peripancreatic solid masses without an on-site cytopathologist, the experience of the endosonographer, and the number of needle passes were associated with the diagnostic accuracy.Endoscopic ultrasonography in suspected pancreatic malignancy and indecisive CT.In the assessment of patients with a clinical suspicion of malignant pancreatic disease, computed tomography (CT) findings are sometimes negative or inconclusive.To determine whether endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) with or without fine needle aspiration (EUS÷FNA) was conclusive in patients with a clinical suspicion of pancreatic malignancy, in whom CT scan was negative or inconclusive.Retrospective case series in a tertiary referral centre. From February 2006 to December 2007, EUS÷FNA was performed in all patients suspected of having malignant pancreatic disease with negative or inconclusive CT findings. Main outcome measurement was the diagnostic yield of EUS in these patients.34 patients had a negative (n=11) or inconclusive (n=23) CT scan. EUS÷FNA established a correct diagnosis in 30÷34 cases (88%). Malignancy was diagnosed in 19÷34 patients and nonmalignant disease in 8÷34 cases. In 3÷34 patients no lesions were found and no malignant disease developed during follow-up (mean=728 days). EUS÷FNA was inconclusive in 4÷34 patients.In patients with a clinical suspicion of pancreatic malignancy with negative or inconclusive CT findings, EUS÷FNA was able to establish a diagnosis in 88% of cases. EUS should therefore be considered a diagnostic modality in this complex group of patients.Differential diagnosis of benign and malignant intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas: MR cholangiopancreatography and MR angiography.To compare the usefulness of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and MR angiography (MRA) in differentiating malignant from benign intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas (IPMTs), and to determine the findings which suggest malignancy.During a 6-year period, 46 patients with IPMT underwent MRCP. Morphologically, tumor type was classified as main duct, branch duct, or combined. The diameter of the main pancreatic duct (MPD), the extent of the dilated MPD, and the location and size of the cystic lesion, septum, and communicating channel were assessed. For all types of IPMTs, enhanced mural nodules and portal vein narrowing were evaluated at MRA.Combined-type IPMTs were more frequently malignant (78%) than benign (42%) (p < 0.05). Compared with benign lesions, malignant lesions were larger, and the caliber of the communicating channel was also larger (p < 0.05). Their dilated MPD was more extensive and of greater diameter (p < 0.05), and the presence of mural nodules was more frequent (p < 0.001).Combined MRCP and MRA might be useful for the differential diagnosis of malignant and benign IPMTs of the pancreas.Comparative diagnostic evaluation with MR cholangiopancreatography, ultrasonography and CT in patients with pancreatobiliary disease.The aim of this study was to directly compare the results of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) with those of ultrasonography (US) and multislice computed tomography (MSCT) in the diagnosis of pancreaticobiliary diseases.A total of 70 patients (41 men, 29 women) aged 22-89 years were studied either before (n=59) or after cholecystectomy (n=11) for biliary lithiasis. Clinical signs and symptoms were jaundice (n=15), abdominal pain (n=37) and proven biliary lithiasis (n=18). MRCP was performed in all patients, whereas abdominal US was performed in 55 (group 1) and MSCT in 37 (group 2) patients. A regional evaluation of the main structures of the pancreaticobiliary system was performed: gallbladder and cystic duct, intra- and extrahepatic bile ducts and main pancreatic duct. Histology (n=27), biopsy (n=5), endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) (n=28) and/or clinical-imaging follow-up (n=10) were considered standards of reference. In particular, patients were classified as showing benign (n=47) or malignant (n=12) lesions or normal biliary anatomy (n=11).In group 1, the results of MRCP and US were concordant in the majority (92%) of cases; however, statistically significant discordance (p<0.01) was found in the evaluation of the extrahepatic ducts, with nine cases (16%) of middle-distal common bile duct stones being detected on MRCP only. In group 2, the results of MRCP and MSCT were also concordant in most cases (87%). However, findings were significantly discordant when the intra- and extrahepatic ducts were analysed, with seven (19%) and six (16%) cases, respectively, of lithiasis being detected on MRCP only (p<0.01 for both).The results of our study confirm the diagnostic potential of MRCP in the study of the pancreaticobiliary duct system. In particular, the comparison between MRCP and US and MSCT indicates the superiority of MRCP in evaluating bile ducts and detecting stones in the common bile duct.Cystic tumours of the pancreas: a diagnostic dilemma.Cystic neoplasm of the pancreas is an uncommon entity that encompasses a range of tumours with varying potential for malignancy. These tumours are frequently misdiagnosed as pseudocysts and are inappropriately managed.A retrospective review was undertaken of 18 cases of cystic tumours of the pancreas over an 8-year period in two large hospitals in Singapore.All patients were Asian, with a younger age group (mean 43.5 years) and a lesser degree of female predominance (3.5:1 ratio) compared to other series. Pain was the most common symptom. Pre-operative diagnosis using ultrasound and computed tomography was not diagnostic in half of the cases and misdiagnosed as pseudocyst in a sixth. There were five serous cystadenomas, four mucinous cystadenomas, two mucinous cystadenocarcinomas, one mucinous cystadenocarcinoma with cystic degeneration in a ductal adenocarcinoma, three Frantz tumours, one acinar cell tumour, one glucagonoma, and one benign epithelial cyst. Two-thirds of tumours were malignant or had the potential to become malignant. Resection was curative in all cases, and no recurrence was noted at a mean follow-up of 34.5 months.The difficulties with pre-operative diagnosis, the high incidence of tumours with potential malignancy, and the good outcome with resection, suggest that all suspected cystic tumours of the pancreas should be resected.Incidence and clinical significance of hyperamylasemia after endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) of pancreatic lesions: a prospective and controlled study.Acute pancreatitis as a complication of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) of pancreatic lesions is rarely observed. However, there is little information on the incidence of hyperamylasemia after EUS-FNA of the pancreas and its clinical significance. This study aimed to supply this lack of information.Patients who underwent EUS-FNA of a pancreatic lesion between October 2004 and October 2005 were studied prospectively. Exclusion criteria were: (i) platelet count under 50,000/mm (3) and/or prothrombin time < 50 %; (ii) performance of surgery, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), a percutaneous biopsy attempt, or another invasive procedure within 7 days before EUS-FNA; (iii) lack of informed consent. Serum amylase levels were determined before and 8 and 24 h after the procedure. Hyperamylasemia was defined by amylase levels above 104 UI/L (and higher than baseline levels) 8 h after the procedure. Acute pancreatitis was defined by upper abdominal pain (with or without nausea and/or vomiting) accompanied by elevation of serum amylase or lipase to at least twice baseline levels.A total of 100 patients underwent EUS-FNA of a pancreatic lesion (58 men, 42 women; mean age 60 +/- 13 years). Eleven patients (11 %) showed hyperamylasemia 8 h after the puncture (298 +/- 293 UI/L, range 105 - 1044 UI/L), but only two of them developed acute mild pancreatitis after EUS-FNA. Hyperamylasemia was not related either to the type of lesion (cystic or solid) or to its location, the duration of the procedure, or the number of passes performed.Pancreatitis after pancreatic EUS-FNA occurs in 2 % of patients, with some more cases of silent hyperamylasemia. This complication may have to be included in the information given to patients for their informed consent.Application of Contrast-Enhanced Ultrasound in Cystic Pancreatic Lesions Using a Simplified Classification Diagnostic Criterion.Objective. Classification diagnosis was performed for cystic pancreatic lesions using ultrasound (US) and contrast-enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) to explore the diagnostic value of CEUS by comparison with enhanced CT. Methods. Sixty-four cases with cystic pancreatic lesions were included in this study. The cystic lesions of pancreas were classified into four types by US, CEUS, and CT: type I unilocular cysts; type II microcystic lesions; type III macrocystic lesions; and type IV cystic lesions with solid components or irregular thickening of the cystic wall or septa. Results. Eighteen type I, 7 type II, 10 type III, and 29 type IV cases were diagnosed by CT. The classification results by US were as follows: 6 type I; 5 type II; 4 type III; and 49 type IV cases. Compared with the results by enhanced CT, the kappa value was 0.36. Using CEUS, 15, 6, 12, and 31 cases were diagnosed as types I-IV, respectively. The kappa value was 0.77. Conclusion. CEUS has obvious superiority over US in the classification diagnostic accuracy in cystic pancreatic lesions and CEUS results showed substantial agreement with enhanced CT. CEUS could contribute to the differential diagnosis of cystic pancreatic diseases. Conventional versus contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration for diagnosis of solid pancreatic lesions: A prospective randomized trial.Contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasonography (CEH-EUS) has been used to diagnose solid pancreatic lesions (SPLs). The aim of this study was to investigate the efficacy of CEH-EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration (CEH-EUS-FNA) compared with that of conventional EUS-FNA for the diagnosis of SPLs.Forty patients with solid pancreatic lesions who visited Fukushima Medical University between September 2013 and June 2014 were recruited for this prospective study. Twenty patients underwent CEH-EUS-FNA, and 20 patients underwent conventional EUS-FNA. The sampling rate, sensitivity, accuracy, and number of needle passes required to obtain sufficient samples were compared between the two groups.Patient characteristics, sampling rate, accuracy, and sensitivity were not significantly different between the two groups. The final diagnosis of patients who underwent CEH-EUS-FNA was pancreatic cancer in 19 and intraductal papillary mucinous carcinoma in one. Nineteen patients who underwent conventional EUS-FNA were finally diagnosed with pancreatic cancer and one was diagnosed as cancer of the common bile duct. There was a significant difference in the number of needle passes required. A sufficient sample was obtained on one needle pass in 60% (12/20) of CEH-EUS-FNA group compared with 25% (5/20) of the conventional EUS-FNA group.Fewer needle passes were required to obtain samples from solid pancreatic lesions using CEH-EUS-FNA than those required using conventional EUS-FNA. Therefore, CEH-EUS-FNA may be more efficient and safer than conventional EUS-FNA for the diagnosis of solid pancreatic lesions.Impact of biliary stents on EUS-guided FNA of pancreatic mass lesions.Few studies have evaluated the impact of biliary stents on EUS-guided FNA.To compare diagnostic yield of EUS-FNA in patients with or without biliary stents.Retrospective study.Tertiary referral center.Patients with obstructive jaundice secondary to solid pancreatic mass lesions who underwent EUS-FNA over 5 years.The primary objective was to compare the diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA in patients with or without biliary stents and between patients with plastic stents or self-expandable metal stents (SEMSs). Secondary objectives were to assess the technical difficulty of EUS-FNA by comparing the number of passes required to establish diagnosis and to identify predictors of a false-negative diagnosis.Of 214 patients who underwent EUS-FNA, 150 (70%) had biliary stents and 64 (30%) had no stents in place. Of 150 patients with biliary stents, 105 (70%) were plastic and 45 (30%) were SEMSs. At EUS-FNA, the diagnosis was pancreatic cancer in 155 (72%), chronic pancreatitis in 17 (8%), other cancer in 31 (14%), and indeterminate in 11 (5%). There was no difference in rates of diagnostic accuracy between patients with or without stents (93.7% vs 95.3%; P = .73) and between plastic or SEMSs (95.2% vs 95.5%, P = .99), respectively. Median number of passes to diagnosis was not significantly different between patients with or without stents (2 [interquartile ratio range (IQR) = 1-3] vs 2 [IQR = 1-4]; P = .066) and between plastic or SEMS (2.5 [IQR = 1-4] vs 2 [IQR = 1-4], P = .69), respectively. On univariate analysis, EUS-FNA results were false-negative in patients with large pancreatic masses (>3 cm vs <3 cm, 9.35% vs 0.93%, P = .005) that required more FNA passes (<2 vs >2 passes, 0% vs 11.8%, P < .0001).Retrospective study.The presence or absence of a biliary stent, whether plastic or metal, does not have an impact on the diagnostic yield or technical difficulty of EUS-FNA.Next generation sequencing improves the accuracy of KRAS mutation analysis in endoscopic ultrasound fine needle aspiration pancreatic lesions.The use of endoscopic ultrasonography has allowed for improved detection and pathologic analysis of fine needle aspirate material for pancreatic lesion diagnosis. The molecular analysis of KRAS has further improved the clinical sensitivity of preoperative analysis. For this reason, the use of highly analytical sensitive and specific molecular tests in the analysis of material from fine needle aspirate specimens has become of great importance. In the present study, 60 specimens from endoscopic ultrasonography fine needle aspirate were analyzed for KRAS exon 2 and exon 3 mutations, using three different techniques: Sanger sequencing, allele specific locked nucleic acid PCR and Next Generation sequencing (454 GS-Junior, Roche). Moreover, KRAS was also tested in wild-type samples, starting from DNA obtained from cytological smears after pathological evaluation. Sanger sequencing showed a clinical sensitivity for the detection of the KRAS mutation of 42.1%, allele specific locked nucleic acid of 52.8% and Next Generation of 73.7%. In two wild-type cases the re-sequencing starting from selected material allowed to detect a KRAS mutation, increasing the clinical sensitivity of next generation sequencing to 78.95%. The present study demonstrated that the performance of molecular analysis could be improved by using highly analytical sensitive techniques. The Next Generation Sequencing allowed to increase the clinical sensitivity of the test without decreasing the specificity of the analysis. Moreover we observed that it could be useful to repeat the analysis starting from selectable material, such as cytological smears to avoid false negative results. A comparison of electronic radial and curvilinear endoscopic ultrasonography in the detection of pancreatic malignant tumor.There is no comparative study of electronic radial endoscopic ultrasonography (ER-EUS) and electronic curvilinear EUS (EC-EUS). The aim of this study was to compare the accuracy of ER-EUS and EC-EUS for detecting pancreatic malignancies.This was a retrospective review of the patients who had EUS assessment from September 2008 to December 2011 for suspicious pancreatic tumors. Sensitivity, specificity, and area under the ROC curve to detect pancreatic malignancies were calculated and compared between the ER-EUS and EC-EUS cohort. The final diagnosis of pancreatic malignancy was based on pathology, or the consensus of patient's clinical course and multimodal imaging tests.Two hundred twenty-one patients were included and divided into two cohorts: ER-EUS (n = 139) and EC-EUS (n = 82) cohorts. With propensity score matching method, 70 cases in each cohort were selected for the comparison. There was no significant difference in sensitivity, specificity, and area under the ROC curve to detect pancreatic malignancy between ER-EUS and EC-EUS cohort (88.5 vs. 100%, 88.6 vs. 90.9%, 0.8855 vs. 0.9545).ER-EUS and EC-EUS provided similar accuracy for the detection of pancreatic malignancies. In view of similar diagnostic results of ER-EUS and EC-EUS for the detection of pancreatic malignancy, and the advantage of being able to perform FNA with EC-EUS, EC-EUS may be the preferred choice.Fine-needle aspiration of cystic pancreatic mucinous tumor: oncotic cell as an aiding diagnostic feature in paucicellular specimens.In juxtaposition with imaging studies, endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration has gained popularity in the initial evaluation of pancreatic masses, especially cystic lesions of pancreas. Cystic pancreatic mucinous tumors include mucinous cystic neoplasm and intraductal papillary mucinous tumor, both of which have been known to have a low malignant potential and a high rate of association with invasive adenocarcinoma. As such, preoperative diagnosis is of great significance in guiding patient management. Although fine-needle aspiration cytological diagnosis of pancreatic tumor in cellular specimens has been well described, as with other cystic lesions, the yield of diagnostic cells from needle aspiration of cystic pancreatic mucinous tumors is typically low. Cytological diagnosis from these paucicellular specimens remains challenging. An additional compounding problem is the high frequency of gastrointestinal mucin and epithelial contamination. The diagnostic morphology and criteria in these paucicellular specimens have not been well addressed in the literature. The cytopathologists' ongoing efforts tend to improve the diagnostic accuracy. In this current study, oncotic cells, characterized by cytoplasmic swelling and karyolysis, were analyzed from 17 cases of cystic pancreatic mucinous tumor, of which the diagnosis was either confirmed by surgical resection or supported by cell block and/or increased CEA. Oncotic cells were found in variable amounts in almost all the cystic pancreatic mucinous tumors in this series. None of the five fine-needle aspirations intended for aspirations of hypoechoic nonlesional pancreas, which yielded either gastrointestinal tract material only or admixture of gastrointestinal and normal pancreatic components, was found to contain oncotic cells, evidencing the utility of oncotic cell as a surrogate morphologic marker in aiding the diagnosis of cystic pancreatic mucinous tumor as well as its differentiation from gastrointestinal contaminant, particularly in paucicellular specimens.Improved differentiation of pancreatic tumors using contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasound.Endoscopic ultrasound is a widely accepted imaging method for staging of ductal adenocarcinoma and the localization of neuroendocrine tumors of the pancreas. We prospectively evaluated conventional color Doppler imaging and contrast-enhanced endoscopic Doppler ultrasound (CE-EDUS) as a new imaging technique for further characterization and differentiation of solid pancreatic tumors.From 300 patients with pancreatic lesions investigated using contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasound we could finally include 93 patients with an undetermined, solitary, predominantly solid, lesion 40 mm or less, and a definite histologically proven diagnosis. After bolus injection of the contrast agent SHU 508A 4 g (400 mg/dL) the vascular pattern of the lesion during the arterial phase was compared with the vascularity of the residual pancreatic parenchyma.Color Doppler imaging did not reveal vascularity of the pancreatic parenchyma in any of the patients, and therefore tumor hypovascularity could not be determined in contrast to all CE-EDUS-examined patients revealing at least some degree of parenchymal vascularity. Fifty-seven of 62 patients with ductal adenocarcinoma of the pancreas showed a hypovascularity of the tumor using CE-EDUS. All other pancreatic lesions revealed an isovascular or hypervascular pattern using contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasound (20 neuroendocrine tumors, 10 serous microcystic adenomas, and 1 teratoma). Hypovascularity as a sign of malignancy in contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasound obtained 92% (82%-97%) sensitivity and 100% specificity (89%-100%).Contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasound is effective in differentiating small solid pancreatic tumors of different origin in most cases. Hypovascularity indicates malignancy of pancreatic tumors.Clinical impact of K-ras mutation analysis in EUS-guided FNA specimens from pancreatic masses.EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) is considered optimal for differentially diagnosing pancreatic masses. However, the sensitivity of EUS-FNA ranges from 65% to 95%, respectively, which requires improvement.To evaluate clinical impact of K-ras mutation analysis in EUS-FNA specimens from pancreatic masses.Prospective registration, single-center study.Tertiary referral center.This study involved 394 consecutive patients with pancreatic masses (307 pancreatic ductal adenocarcinomas [PDACs], 47 pancreatic inflammatory lesions, and 40 other types of tumors) who underwent EUS-FNA and analysis of K-ras mutations.EUS-FNA, Cycleave polymerase chain reaction.Improvement of the diagnostic accuracy by K-ras mutation analysis; absence of K-ras mutations in non-PDAC masses.K-ras mutations were detected in 266 of 307 PDAC aspirates (87%) and in 3 of 87 non-PDAC masses (3%). K-ras mutations were detected in 18 of 39 patients (46%) who remained cytohistopathologically undiagnosed. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy of cytohistopathological and K-ras mutation analyses alone were 87%, 100%, 100%, 54%, and 89%, respectively, and, when combined, were 93%, 100%, 100%, 68%, and 94%, respectively. Adding K-ras mutation analysis to standard cytohistopathological assessment increased the sensitivity and accuracy of EUS-FNA by 6% (P < .001) and 5% (P < .001), respectively.Single-center study.K-ras mutation analysis may be helpful in patients with suspected PDAC yet inconclusive EUS-FNA findings. K-ras mutations were extremely rare in pancreatic inflammation and other pancreatic tumors.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration cytology in the diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas. A study of 8 cases.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) is an increasingly recognized neoplasm of the pancreas, accounting for 5% of pancreatic neoplasms, it is considered difficult to diagnose by fine-needle aspiration (FNA) cytology.The aim of this study was to investigate the role of EUS-guided FNA cytology in the diagnosis of IPMN of the pancreas.Eight cases of surgically proven IPMN with pre-operative endoscopic ultrasound-guided (EUS-guided) FNA cytology were collected for retrospective analysis.EUS-FNA cytology was performed with the on-site attendance of a cytopathologist in all cases. EUS/clinical findings, macroscopic/microscopic features of cell blocks and smears, and immunocytochemical stains accompanied by histopathologic diagnosis were recorded and studied.EUS revealed hypoechoic masses in the head of pancreas (n=6) and in the body/tail (n=2), measuring from 16.6 to 35.8 mm. In all cases, the hypoechoic mass had a distinctive distribution, involving the main pancreatic duct and/or the associated large branch ducts while intraductal nodules or multiple cysts were detected. Cytological specimens were characterized by a background containing abundant mucin in all cases and rarely by inflammation (neutrophils and histiocytes) (n=4). Neoplastic cells were entrapped in a mucinous background either single or loosely cohesive, and forming papillae in 7 cases. Mucinous epithelium was observed in all cases. Single atypical and irregular clusters were found in 3 cases (which were cytologically described as highly suggestive malignant IPMNs, and were histologically confirmed). Two cases were diagnosed as benign IPMN and, in 3 cases, the biological behavior was not easy to determine by cytology alone (histologically diagnosed as borderline). The histological diagnosis confirmed the FNA cytology diagnosis: 3 malignant IPMNs, 2 benign IPMNs and 3 borderline IPMNs. Immunostains were available in 5 out of 8 cases. Mucin 1 (MUC-1) was positive in 2 cases of malignant IPMN (histologically classified as null type ad intestinal type), mucin 2 (MUC-2) was positive in 3 cases (2 malignant both of the intestinal type, and 1 benign of the intestinal type I) and c-erbB2 was positive in 3 cases (2 benign - null and intestinal type - and 1 malignant null type).The characteristic pre-operative EUS findings and cytomorphologic features, in addition to the immunocytochemical profile, were accurate indications and coincided with the final/post-operative histological diagnosis of IPMN.Detection and tumor staging of malignancy in cystic, intraductal, and solid tumors of the pancreas by EUS.EUS can provide detailed imaging of pancreatic malignancies and direct fine needle aspiration (FNA) of pancreatic masses. The ability of EUS to detect and stage malignancy in cystic and intraductal lesions has not been investigated. Our aim was to determine the sensitivity and specificity of EUS imaging and FNA in detecting and staging of malignancy in solid, cystic, and intraductal lesions of the pancreas.The records of 96 patients (46 solid, 26 cystic, 24 intraductal lesions) who underwent EUS followed by surgical exploration over a 3-year period were reviewed. The accuracy of EUS for detecting and staging malignancy was calculated based on the results of surgery and histology.EUS-guided FNA provided evidence of malignancy in solid, cystic, and ductal lesions with sensitivities of 59.5%, 50%, and 60%, respectively. The accuracy of staging by EUS was significantly less for intraductal lesions (47%), compared with cystic (100%) and solid lesions (85%) (p < 0. 05).EUS can be used to detect malignancy in cystic and intraductal tumors of the pancreas.Characterization of small solid tumors in the pancreas: the value of contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasonography.Contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasonography (CH-EUS), a novel technology, visualizes parenchymal perfusion in the pancreas. This study prospectively evaluated how accurately CH-EUS characterizes pancreatic lesions and compared its diagnostic ability with that of contrast-enhanced multidetector-row computed tomography (MDCT) and endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA).A total of 277 consecutive patients with pancreatic solid lesions that were detected by conventional EUS underwent CH-EUS for evaluation of vascularity. After infusing an ultrasound contrast, CH-EUS was performed by using an echoendoscope and a specific mode for contrast harmonic imaging. On the basis of the intensity of enhancement, the lesions were categorized into four patterns: nonenhancement, hypoenhancement, isoenhancement, and hyperenhancement. For comparison, all patients underwent MDCT. The ability of CH-EUS to differentiate ductal carcinomas from the other solid tumors, particularly small lesions (≤2 cm in diameter) was assessed, and compared with the differentiating abilities of MDCT and EUS-FNA.In terms of reading the CH-EUS images, the κ-coefficient of the interobserver agreement test was 0.94 (P<0.001). CH-EUS-depicted hypoenhancement diagnosed ductal carcinomas with a sensitivity and specificity of 95.1% (95% confidence interval (CI) 92.7-96.7%) and 89.0% (95% CI 83.0-93.1%), respectively. For diagnosing small carcinomas by CH-EUS, the sensitivity and specificity were 91.2 % (95% CI 82.5-95.1%) and 94.4% (95% CI 86.2-98.1%), respectively. CH-EUS-depicted hypervascular enhancement diagnosed neuroendocrine tumors with a sensitivity and specificity of 78.9% (95% CI 61.4-89.7%) and 98.7% (95% CI 96.7-98.8%), respectively. Although CH-EUS and MDCT did not differ significantly in diagnostic ability with regard to all lesions, CH-EUS was superior to MDCT in diagnosing small (≤2 cm) carcinomas (P<0.05). In 12 neoplasms that MDCT failed to detect, 7 ductal carcinomas and 2 neuroendocrine tumors had hypoenhancement and hyperenhancement on CH-EUS, respectively. When CH-EUS was combined with EUS-FNA, the sensitivity of EUS-FNA increased from 92.2 to 100%.CH-EUS is useful for characterizing conventional EUS-detected solid pancreatic lesions. EUS equipped with contrast harmonic imaging may play an important role in the characterization of small tumors that other imaging methods fail to depict and may improve the diagnostic yield of EUS-FNA.Efficacy of computed tomography of the abdomen--early results.Our experience with 153 CT scans of the abdomen and pelvis over the first eight months of availability at our institution has been analyzed. The efficacy in terms of contribution to the diagnosis in each patient was assessed and accuracy determined. CT was found to have made a significant contribution to the diagnosis in patients with diseases of the pancreas, aorta, retroperitoneal structures, and in cases of abdominal and pelvic masses and abcesses. It has been somewhat less helpful in evaluation of liver and renal diseases. Overall, CT scanning appears to be a significant new diagnostic modality in the evaluation of patients with abdominal and pelvic diseases.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas: correlation of helical CT features with pathologic findings.To evaluate the CT features of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas (IPMNs), and to compare with pathological findings in order to identify CT features that can be helpful in differentiating benign IPMNs from malignant IPMNs.The CT findings in 25 patients were reviewed for tumor location, tumor type, dilatation of the main pancreatic duct (MPD), MPD involvement, mural node or solid attenuating component, tumor size in branch duct or mixed duct type, dilatation of common bile duct (CBD) and invasion of surrounding structures. The data was subjected to Chi-Square Tests or Fisher's Exact Test using SPSS13.0 software with p value<0.05 indicating significant statistical difference.Presence of mural node or solid enhancing component, size of mural node or solid enhancing component ≥7mm, dilatation of CBD was more common in malignant IPMNs (p<0.05). None of tumor location, tumor type, dilatation of MPD, MPD involvement, tumor size, and invasion of surrounding structures was statistically significant in differentiating benign from malignant IPMNs.CT features suggestive of malignant or invasive IPMNs include presence of mural node or solid enhancing component, size of mural node or solid enhancing component ≥7mm, and dilatation of CBD.Yield of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy in patients with suspected pancreatic carcinoma.Although atypical or suspicious cytology may support a clinical diagnosis of a malignancy, it is often not sufficient for the implementation of therapy in patients with pancreatic carcinoma. Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy (EUS-FNAB) is a relatively new method for obtaining cytology samples, and one that may decrease the number of atypical/suspicious diagnoses. The goals of the current study were to prospectively evaluate the yield of EUS-FNAB in the diagnosis of patients presenting with solid pancreatic lesions and to evaluate the significance of atypical, suspicious, and false-negative aspirates.All patients who presented with a solid pancreatic lesion and underwent EUS-FNAB over a 13-month period were included in the current study. One endoscopist performed all EUS-FNABs. On-site evaluation of specimen adequacy by a cytopathologist was available for each case. Follow-up included histologic correlation (n = 21) and clinical and/or imaging follow-up (n = 80), including 38 patients who died of the disease.EUS-FNABs were obtained from 101 patients (mean age, 62 +/- 11.8 years; age range, 34-89 years). The male-to-female ratio was 2:1. Sixty-five percent of the lesions were located in the head of the pancreas, 12% were located in the uncinate, 17% were located in the body, and 6% were located in the tail. The mean size of the tumors was 3.3 cm (range, 1.3-7 cm). A median of 4 needle passes were performed (range, 1-11 needle passes). Sixty-two biopsies (61.4%) were interpreted as malignant on cytologic evaluation, 5 (5%) as suspicious for a malignancy, 6 (5.9%) as atypical/indeterminate, and 26 (25.7%) as benign processes. Of the 76 malignant lesions, 71 were adenocarcinomas, 3 were neuroendocrine tumors, 1 was a lymphoma, and 1 was a metastatic renal cell carcinoma. All except one of the suspicious/atypical aspirates were subsequently confirmed to be malignant. Agreement was complete for the atypical cases. Among the suspicious cases, 2 of the 5 were identified as carcinoma by one cytopathologist and as suspicious lesions by the other, yielding a 40% disagreement rate between the 2 cytopathologists. Therefore, for the 10 atypical or suspicious cases that later were confirmed to be malignant, the final diagnosis of malignant disease was not made due to scant cellularity that could be attributed to sampling error in 8 cases and to interpretative disagreement in 2 cases (20%). All four false-negative diagnoses were attributed to sampling error. Two percent of all biopsies were inadequate for interpretation. Of the 99 adequate specimens, 72 yielded true-positive results, 23 yielded true-negative results, and 4 yielded false-negative results. No false-positives were encountered. Therefore, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of EUS-FNAB for solid pancreatic masses were 94.7% (95% confidence interval [CI], 89.7-99.8%), 100%, 100%, and 85.2% (95% CI, 71.8-98.6%), respectively.EUS-FNAB is a safe and highly accurate method for tissue diagnosis of patients with solid pancreatic lesions. Patients with suspicious and atypical EUS-FNAB aspirates deserve further clinical evaluation.Advanced endosonographic diagnostic tools for discrimination of focal chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma--elastography, contrast enhanced high mechanical index (CEHMI) and low mechanical index (CELMI) endosonography in direct comparison.New tools have recently emerged that further improve the diagnostic performance of high-end endosonography. Whilst elastography has been available for a while, contrast-enhancing techniques are still very young with little experience existing in this field. The latest development is contrast enhanced low mechanical index endosonography (CELMI-EUS) which became commercially available at the beginning of 2010. This technique requires contrast-specific software whereas the pre-existing technique of contrast-enhanced high mechanical index endosonography (CEHMI-EUS) does not. The aim of this study was to compare these techniques in discriminating between focal chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma. Included in the study were 58 patients with a pancreatic lesion (19 pancreatic cancer and 39 chronic pancreatitis) with a mean age of 60±15 years. All patients were examined by one investigator (MH). All methods were performed within one examination and the result of each technique was noted before using the next. The gold standard was pathology following surgery, endoscopic fine-needle puncture, or one-year follow-up when chronic pancreatitis was suspected. The consecutive results of specificity and sensitivity were 73.7% and 61.5% for B-mode endosonography; 94.7% and 33.4% for elastography; 84.2% and 76.9% for CELMI-EUS; and 89.5% and 92.3% for CEHMI-EUS. A combination of 3 of those methods could not improve on the result of CEHMI-EUS alone. This study shows that, despite the availability of new technologies, CEHMI-EUS is still the most reliable method for the differentiation of focal chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma. However, understanding the advantages of the different methods might help to find the optimal indications for the use of the new techniques.Mucinous cystic neoplasm of the pancreas. Estimation of grade of malignancy with imaging techniques and its surgical implications.The results of diagnostic imaging procedures, macroscopic and microscopic findings and clinical follow up data of 20 mucinous cystic neoplasms of the pancreas were retrospectively reviewed to determine the grade of malignancy and its surgical implications. The largest mean diameter was 8.9 cm for 10 malignant cases, 5.0 cm for two premalignant cases, and 3.1 cm for eight benign tumours. Ultrasonography or computed tomography or both, corresponded well with macroscopy. The 10 malignant and two premalignant lesions had intracystic mural nodules or extracystic solid components, while the eight benign specimens had neither nodules nor solid portions. Structural complexity seen on ultrasonography or computed tomography, which reflected the irregularity in size and shape of the cysts, internal septa, walls, and solid components, was severe in the 10 malignant and two borderline tumours and mild or moderate in the eight benign lesions. Angiography showed that five of the nine malignant tumours were hypervascular, while the two premalignant and four benign lesions were all avascular. Five of 10 patients with malignant tumours died of local recurrence or remote hematogenous metastases, and one with malignant disease was still alive with liver metastases at the time of writing. We propose that a careful preoperative estimate of the malignant potential of such cysts should be made based on the size of the tumour, the presence of mural nodules and solid areas, and the structural complexity on ultrasonography or computed tomography, as well as the amount of vascularity seen on angiography. Attention should be paid at follow up to the presence of local recurrence and haematogenous metastases in cases of malignant disease.Targeted cyst wall puncture and aspiration during EUS-FNA increases the diagnostic yield of premalignant and malignant pancreatic cysts.Characterization of pancreatic cysts by using EUS-FNA includes chemical and cytologic analysis.To evaluate whether material obtained from FNA of the cyst wall increases diagnostic yield.Prospective series.Tertiary referral center.Consecutive patients with pancreatic cysts referred for EUS-FNA between March 2010 and March 2011.FNA was performed with aspiration of cyst fluid for carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and cytology, followed by cyst wall puncture (CWP). CWP is defined as puncturing the far wall of the cyst and moving the needle back and forth through the wall to sample the wall epithelium.The diagnostic yield for mucinous cystic pancreatic neoplasms by CEA and cytology obtained from cyst fluid compared with cytology obtained from CWP. CEA ≥192 ng/mL was considered mucinous.A total of 69 pancreatic cysts from 66 patients were included. Adequate amounts of fluid were aspirated for CEA, amylase, and cytology in 60 cysts (81%). Cellular material adequate for cytologic assessment from CWP was obtained in 56 cysts (81%). Ten (30%) of 33 cysts with CEA <192 ng/mL and negative results of cyst fluid cytology had a mucinous diagnosis from CWP; 6 of 9 (67%) cysts with an insufficient amount of fluid for CEA analysis and cyst fluid cytology had a mucinous diagnosis from CWP. Furthermore, 4 malignant cysts were independently diagnosed by CWP cytology. The incremental diagnostic yield of CWP for mucinous or malignant cysts was therefore 29% (20 of 69 cysts, P = .0001). An episode of pancreatitis (1.45%) occurred.Lack of surgical criterion standard.CWP during EUS-FNA is a safe and effective technique for improving the diagnostic yield for premalignant and malignant pancreatic cysts.Diagnosis of pancreatic cysts: EUS-guided, through-the-needle confocal laser-induced endomicroscopy and cystoscopy trial: DETECT study.The diagnosis of pancreatic cystic neoplasms (PCNs), which now depends on morphology, cytology, and fluid analysis, is still challenging. A novel confocal laser endomicroscopy probe that can be inserted through a 19-gauge FNA needle allows needle-based confocal laser endomicroscopy (nCLE), and the feasibility of nCLE has been reported in PCNs. The combination of cystoscopy by using a through-the-needle fiberoptic probe in combination with nCLE under EUS guidance may improve the diagnosis of PCNs.To assess the feasibility, safety, and diagnostic yield of the combination of cystoscopy and nCLE in the clinical diagnosis of PCNs.A prospective feasibility study.An academic tertiary referral center.Thirty patients with PCNs.EUS-guided dual through-the-needle imaging (cystoscopy and nCLE) for PCNs.Technical feasibility and safety. Associations of cystoscopy and nCLE findings with clinical diagnosis of PCNs.The procedure was technically successful with the exception of 1 probe exchange failure. In 2 patients (7%), postprocedure pancreatitis developed. Specific features associated with the clinical diagnosis of mucinous cysts were identified: mucin on cystoscopy and papillary projections and dark rings on nCLE. The sensitivity of cystoscopy was 90% (9/10), and that of nCLE was 80% (8/10), and the combination was 100% (10/10) in 18 high-certainty patients.A single-center study and lack of complete pathologic correlation.The combination of dual through-the-needle imaging (cystoscopy and nCLE) of pancreatic cysts appears to have strong concordance with the clinical diagnosis of PCN. (NCT01447238.).[Utility of rapid on-site cytology in endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine needle aspiration of pancreatic masses].Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is a safe and effective method for obtaining samples for cytological diagnosis. Pancreatic cancer is extremely serious and often extremely aggressive, so early detection and diagnosis is important. Therefore, we actively perform EUS FNA for pathological diagnosis of cancer of digestive organs, especially the pancreas.EUS-FNA was performed in 67 patients (39 male, 28 female, median age 63.3 years) from January 2007 to December 2010 in Kyoto University Hospital. To eliminate both quantitatively and qualitatively inadequate samples, we performed EUS-FNA with rapid on-site cytology. Two squash preparations of the collected cells from biopsy were retrieved. One was stained on-site with Giemsa for rapid cytology to evaluate the quantity and quality of the cell collection. If necessary, second or third trials were carried out to obtain appropriate samples for final cytology diagnosis. The other was wet-fixed and used for Papanicolaou staining.All 11 cases of inflammatory disease were diagnosed as negative on cytology. Solid-pseudopapillary neoplasm (1 case) and Endocrine neoplasms (3 cases) were correctly diagnosed on cytology. In pancreatic cancer, 49 of 52 cases (94%) were diagnosed as positive, but 3 cases (6%) were false-negative on cytology. The number of centesis for sampling was once in 21 cases, twice in 26 cases and more than twice in 20 cases. In this study of EUS-FNA, sensitivity was 94% and specificity was 100%.Results of our examination suggest that the combination of EUS-FNA and rapid on-site cytology is a highly specific and sensitive test for detection of pancreatic cancer, and may contribute to reduce excessive centesis.Does cytotechnician training influence the accuracy of EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration of pancreatic masses?The presence of on-site cytopathologists improves the diagnostic yield of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) of pancreatic masses; however, on-site cytopathologists are not available to all endoscopic units. We hypothesized that experienced cytotechnicians can accurately assess whether an on-site pancreatic mass fine needle aspiration specimen is adequate. The aim of this study was to evaluate the effect of formal cytotechnician training on the diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA of pancreatic masses.Single-centre, prospective study. The cytotechnician made an on-site assessment of specimen adequacy with immediate evaluation of smears over a 12-month period (pre-training period) then over another 12-month period (post-training period), with a year's intermediate training when the cytopathologist and the cytotechnician worked together in the room. The gold standard used to establish the final diagnosis was based on a non-equivocal fine needle aspiration biopsy reviewed by the same expert cytopathologist. The main outcome measurements were the cytotechnician diagnostic accuracy before and after the training period.A total of 107 patients were enrolled in the pre-training period. Cytotechnician in-room adequacy was 68.2% (73/107). The diagnostic accuracy was 74.8%. The adequacy for the blind-review pathologist was 93.4% (100/107), significantly higher (p=0.008) than the cytotechnician's results. During the post-training period, 95 EUS-FNA were performed and reviewed. Cytotechnician in-room adequacy was 87.4% (83/95). The diagnostic accuracy was 90.5%. The adequacy for the blinded pathologist was 95.8% (91/95), not significantly different from the cytotechnician (p=0.23).An adequate training period with an expert pathologist significantly improves the cytotechnician skill in terms of judging adequacy and diagnostic accuracy.Onsite cytopathology evaluation and ancillary studies beneficial in EUS-FNA of pancreatic, mediastinal, intra-abdominal, and submucosal lesions.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration cytology (EUS-FNA) is considered to be a minimally invasive and safe technique, with low complication rates, for obtaining tissue samples from pancreatic lesions, and mediastinal and intra-abdominal nodes. We retrospectively reviewed the diagnostic accuracy of this method at a tertiary care hospital in Pakistan.The medical records of 393 consecutive patients referred to the gastroenterology service from August 2008 to September 2013 were reviewed in this retrospective study. The mean age of the patients at presentation was 51.2 years (range 6-89; 56.7% males). Major indications for referral were to establish a diagnosis in patients with a pancreatic mass or lymphadenopathy of unknown origin detected on CT scan or PET-CT (n = 235), to exclude lymph node metastasis in those with a known primary tumor (n = 114), and to rule out relapse of lymphoma after treatment or during follow up (n = 44). Of 393 patients, 181 had mediastinal lymphadenopathy, 115 had pancreatic lesions; 79 had intra-abdominal lymphadenopathy and 18 patients had miscellaneous lesions (gastric mass, splenic, retroperitoneal, esophageal, or adrenal lesions).A mean of 2.2 passes per patient were made; 85% of patients had ≤ 3 passes. The initial rapid onsite evaluation (ROSE) was positive in 363 of 393 (92.3%) patients, but on final cytopathological interpretation, 369 of 393 (93.9%) patients had an adequate specimen for diagnosis. Sufficient material for cytopathology was obtained in 369 patients (93.9%), whereas 24 patients (6.1%) had inadequate aspirate on EUS-FNA as assessed by final cytopathological interpretation. The concordance between final cytopathological diagnoses and ROSE was 98.2%. Follow-up data were available for 296 (75.3%) patients, whereas 97 patients were lost to follow up. Of these 296 patients, 283 of 296 patients were true positive, 9 of 296 were true negative, and 4 of 296 patients were false negative. The overall calculated sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 98.6, 100, 100, and 69.2%, respectively. The major diagnoses that we obtained were granulomata (n = 114), adenocarcinoma (n = 104), reactive nodes (n = 35), metastatic carcinoma (n = 35), Hodgkin's lymphoma (HL; n = 19) and non-Hodgkin's lymphoma (NHL; n = 11), neuroendocrine tumors (n = 11), spindle cell lesions (n = 7), benign lesions (n = 9), cystic neoplasms (n = 6), solid pseudopapillary neoplasm (n = 3), and miscellaneous (n = 15). Only 3 of 393 patients (0.7%) suffered a complication as a result of EUS-FNA, and all three were successfully managed conservatively.EUS-FNA, combined with ROSE, is a safe and highly effective technique in experienced hands with excellent diagnostic accuracy and low complication rates.Rapid Growth Rates of Suspected Pancreatic Cyst Branch Duct Intraductal Papillary Mucinous Neoplasms Predict Malignancy.The majority of branch duct intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (BD-IPMNs) are recommended for surveillance imaging based on consensus guidelines. However, growth rates that should prompt concern for malignant transformation of BD-IPMN are unknown.To determine whether BD-IPMN growth can predict an increased risk of malignancy and define growth rates concerning for malignant BD-IPMN.The study is a retrospective, multicenter study of suspected BD-IPMN patients undergoing imaging surveillance. All patients underwent EUS evaluation followed by surveillance imaging.Two hundred and eighty-four patients with suspected BD-IPMN without worrisome features or high-risk stigmata were followed for a median 56 months and underwent a median of four imaging studies. Nine patients (3.2 %) developed malignant BD-IPMN. Malignant BD-IPMN grew at a faster rate (18.6 vs. 0.8 mm/year; P = 0.05) compared to benign BD-IPMN. BD-IPMN growth rate between 2 and 5 mm/year was associated with an increased risk of malignancy with hazard ratio (HR) of 11.4 (95 % CI 2.2-58.6) when compared to subjects with BD-IPMN growth rate <2 mm/year (P = 0.004). BD-IPMN growth rate ≥5 mm/year had a hazard ratio of 19.5 (95 % CI 2.4-157.8) (P = 0.005). BD-IPMN growth rate of 2 mm/year had a sensitivity of 78 %, specificity of 90 %, and accuracy of 88 % to identify malignancy. Total BD-IPMN growth was also associated with increased risk of malignancy (P = 0.003) with all malignant IPMNs growing at least 10 mm prior to cancer diagnosis.BD-IPMN growth rates ≥2 mm/year and total growth of ≥10 mm should be considered worrisome features for BD-IPMN at increased risk of malignancy.Assessment of dynamic contrast-enhanced magnetic resonance imaging in the differentiation of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma from other pancreatic solid lesions.The purpose of this study was to investigate the diagnostic value of quantitative dynamic contrast-enhanced magnetic resonance imaging (QDCE-MRI) of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma (PDA) on a 3.0-T magnetic resonance.The study was approved by the local institutional review board, and all subjects provided written informed consent. Seventy-five patients with suspected pancreatic tumors underwent QDCE-MRI, in which 33 patients with cases of pancreatic solid lesions (23 patients with PDA, 3 patients with solid pseudopapillary tumor, 3 patients with neuroendocrine tumor, 2 patients with mass-forming pancreatitis, 2 patients with ampullary adenocarcinoma) proven through histopathologic diagnosis were included in this study. The parameters of QDCE-MRI were recorded and compared.The parameters of QDCE-MRI of PDA tissue and non-cancer tissue did not show significant difference between 2-compartment model (2C) and 3-compartment model (3C). The contrast enhancement ratio of non-cancer tissue with dilatation of pancreatic duct was significantly higher than that of non-cancer tissue without dilatation of pancreatic duct, whereas the rate constant (Kep) of 2C was significantly lower. The maximun slope of signal intensity ascent (MxSIp), the volume transfer constant (Ktrans), and the Kep of PDA tissue were significantly lower than those of the non-cancer tissue, but the time of peaking of contrast agent (PeakT) was significantly longer. Receiver operating characteristic curves showed that the areas under the curve of differentiating PDA tissue from the non-cancer tissue were 0.82, 0.79, 0.91, 0.94, 0.88, and 0.89 for PeakT, MxSIp, Ktrans-2C, Kep-2C, Ktrans-3C, and Kep-3C, respectively. The PDA tissue showed lower MxSIp and Kep as well as longer PeakT than those of the non-PDA lesions. The receiver operating characteristic curves showed that the areas under the curve of differentiating the PDA from the non-PDA tumor were 0.73, 0.72, 0.79, and 0.72 for PeakT, MxSIp, Kep-2C, and Kep-3C, respectivelyThe parameters of QDCE-MRI are useful for the diagnosis of PDA.18-Fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography does not aid in diagnosis of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma.There are no accurate and reliable tools for diagnosis of early stage pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma (PDA) or small metastatic lesions. It is also a challenge to differentiate PDA from focal mass-forming pancreatitis (FMP). There is controversy regarding the efficacy of 18-fluorodeoxyglucose positron-emission tomography (FDG-PET) in the diagnosis of PDA. We investigated whether FDG-PET provides information that, combined with data from other imaging techniques, can aid in decision making for patients with suspected PDA.We performed a retrospective analysis of data collected from 232 consecutive patients with suspected PDA at Kobe University Hospital from January 2006 through June 2012. All patients underwent a diagnostic imaging protocol that included multidetector row computed tomography, superparamagnetic iron oxide-enhanced magnetic resonance imaging, and FDG-PET. Based on endoscopic ultrasonography, fine-needle aspiration biopsy, or endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography analyses, 218 patients had PDA (89 underwent resection and 129 did not) and 14 patients had FMP (8 had focal mass-forming chronic pancreatitis and 6 had focal mass-forming autoimmune pancreatitis).FDG-PET detected 50% of stages 0 and I, 91.9% of stage II, 100% of stage III, and 96.8% of stage IV tumors. Detection was affected significantly by tumor size (P = .024) and T stage (P = .023) in resected tumors. Multidetector row computed tomography detected significantly more liver metastases than FDG-PET. Few para-aortic lymph node or peritoneal metastases were detected by FDG-PET. FDG-PET correctly identified 11 of the 14 patients with FMP (5 of 8 with focal mass-forming chronic pancreatitis and 6 of 6 with focal mass-forming autoimmune pancreatitis).FDG-PET is not effective in detecting early stage PDA and small metastases, or in differentiating PDA from FMP. Combining FDG-PET with current diagnostic techniques for PDA did not provide any decisive information, therefore it should not be included in this analysis.Endoscopic ultrasonography is a valuable diagnostic tool in patients with incidental findings in the pancreas or bile ducts.Incidental findings are often seen at computed tomographies (CT). This study describes patients who had an endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) because of an incidental finding in the pancreas/bile duct.Patients referred for EUS between September 2012 and September 2013 because of an incidental finding in the pancreas/bile duct at a CT were prospectively enrolled. After EUS, the findings of this procedure were noted together with the plan for further diagnostic work-up or therapy. A follow-up was made after 6 months and 1 year after EUS was performed.A total of 47 patients (24 women, 23 men) were registered with an incidental finding. The median age was 69 years (range: 45-83 years). Diagnoses after performing EUS were: normal findings (n = 16), cystic lesion (n = 16), mass lesion (n = 6), inconclusive (n = 6) and other specified (n = 3). The plan after EUS was: no further evaluation (n = 27), referred for new EUS or other imaging procedures (n = 14) and referred for surgery/endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (n = 6). In total, 6 patients proved to have neoplastic diseases in the pancreas. None of the patients who were stopped from further evaluation following EUS later proved to have a malignant disease in the pancreas.EUS is a valuable diagnostic tool in patients with incidental findings in the pancreas/bile duct noted at a CT. Many patients can be stopped from further diagnostic work-up after EUS with a minimal risk of overlooking a malignant disease.not relevant.The study was approved by the Danish Data Protection Agency via Region of Southern Denmark (case no. 13/27,321).The possible role of F-18 FDG positron emission tomography in the differential diagnosis of focal pancreatic lesions.To compare the diagnostic values of different methods for the differentiation of malignant from benign pancreatic lesions.In 22 patients with focal pancreatic lesions, the carbohydrate antigen (CA) 19-9 level was measured; abdominal ultrasound (US), computed tomography (CT), endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), and F-18 fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) positron emission tomography (PET) were performed; and the value of these methods were analyzed for their use in cancer diagnosis.Malignant lesions were identified in six patients and verified by surgery or clinical follow-up. The CA 19-9 level was elevated in four of the five patients examined (sensitivity, 80%). In all six cases, US and CT revealed hypoechogenic and hypodense areas (sensitivity, 100%). In one patient, ERCP was unsuccessful but yielded true-positive results in three others (sensitivity, 60%). The sensitivity of FDG PET was 100%. Sixteen focal cases of pancreatic disease proved to be benign. The CA 19-9 level was elevated in four of them (specificity, 73%). Hypoechogenic and hypodense areas were evident on US and CT in eight patients. The specificity of CT was 50% (8 of 16 cases). The specificity of US was 47% (7 of 15 cases). The specificity of successful ERCP was 92%. Fourteen negative FDG-PET results were truly negative. In two patients, however, the PET findings proved to be falsely positive (specificity, 88%).FDG-PET is an effective tool to differentiate malignant from benign focal pancreatic lesions. In persons with focal pancreatic hypoechogenic or hypodense lesions detected by CT or US and an elevated CA 19-9 level, FDG PET should be the next step in the diagnostic strategy.Prospective evaluation of pancreatic tumors: accuracy of MR imaging with MR cholangiopancreatography and MR angiography.To prospectively assess accuracy of magnetic resonance (MR) imaging, MR cholangiopancreatography (MRCP), and MR angiography in patients suspected of having pancreatic tumors.Sixty-six patients suspected of having pancreatic tumors underwent MR imaging (unenhanced and contrast material-enhanced MR, MRCP, and contrast-enhanced MR angiography). Two blinded readers prospectively analyzed the images by consensus, and results were correlated with surgery, biopsy, or follow-up findings. Results were tabulated in two-by-two tables.MR assessment of pancreatic lesion status (differentiation of benign vs malignant) resulted in 60 correct diagnoses (accuracy, 91%), and six (10%) false diagnoses. Among histologically proved malignant tumors, MR imaging yielded correct diagnoses in 42 of 44 patients (sensitivity, 95%; 95% CI: 85%, 99%), whereas 18 of 22 patients with benign findings were classified correctly. At MR imaging, findings in four patients with chronic pancreatitis were wrongly categorized as malignant tumors (specificity, 82%; 95% CI: 60%, 95%), and in one patient, a distal common bile duct carcinoma was not detected. In no patient with pancreatic adenocarcinoma was this tumor misdiagnosed as benign. In patients with malignant tumors who underwent resection, local-regional tumor growth and vascular infiltration were accurately classified in 89% and 94%, respectively. MR imaging depicted histologically proved synchronous hepatic metastases in 82%. The positive and negative predictive values for cancer nonresectability were 90% and 83%, respectively, and the accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity were 85%, 69%, and 95%, respectively.Unenhanced and contrast-enhanced MR imaging with MRCP and MR angiography offers potential as a noninvasive tool for assessment of patients suspected of having pancreatic tumors.Differentiation of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms from other pancreatic cystic masses: comparison of multirow-detector CT and MR imaging using ROC analysis.To compare the diagnostic performance of multirow-detector computed tomography (MDCT) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the differentiation of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) from other pancreatic cystic masses.A total of 53 patients with pathologically proven pancreatic cystic lesions who had undergone MDCT and MRI were included in this study. Two radiologists analyzed the morphologic features of the lesions and graded the lesion conspicuity on each examination. The readers assigned their confidence level regarding the differentiation of IPMN from other lesions and predicting ductal communication of the lesion. The radiologists' diagnostic confidence was compared using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis.The Az values for each observer for predicting ductal communication of the lesion and differentiating IPMN from other lesions were as follows: For MRI they were respectively 0.949 and 0.995 for reader 1, and 0.916 and 0.932 for reader 2. For MDCT they were respectively 0.790 and 0.875 for reader 1, and 0.774 and 0.850 for reader 2. In addition, for differentiating IPMNs from other lesions, MRI was significantly more accurate than MDCT (P < 0.05) for one observer, but for the other observer there was no significant difference between the two examinations (P = 0.059). For predicting ductal communication of the cystic lesions for both observers, MRI was significantly more accurate than MDCT (P < 0.05). The weighted kappa values indicate good agreement (kappa = 0.61) between observers for MDCT, and excellent agreement (kappa = 0.82) for MRI.Pancreatic MRI shows better diagnostic performance than MDCT for differentiating IPMNs from other cystic lesions of the pancreas.[Endoscopic ultrasound in small pancreatic tumors].32 of 89 pancreatic tumors examined by endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) from January 1986 to February 1990 had a diameter of 3 cm or less. The final diagnosis of a malignant (n = 28) or benign (n = 4) pancreatic neoplasma was achieved by operation, puncture or autopsy. The accuracy of EUS (100%) was higher than for ultrasound (61%), computed tomography (64%) or endoscopic-retrograde cholangiopancreatography (84%). The echopattern of the small pancreatic carcinomas showed, compared to larger neoplasms, less often regressive changes (21 vs. 77%) and a well demarcated or smooth tumor margin (25 vs. 2%). However, it is not possible to differentiate reliably a small malignant from a benign pancreatic tumor by the echofeatures alone. Since most pancreatic tumors are large at the time of clinical presentation, they can be visualized by conventional imaging methods in most cases. EUS adds clinically important information to the diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma especially in small tumors.EUS and EUS-FNA diagnosis of suspected pancreatic cystic neoplasms: Is the sum of the parts greater than the CEA?Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) is suggested as the single most useful EUS/EUS-FNA derived test for the diagnosis of mucinous pancreatic cysts.To investigate the yield and diagnostic performance of EUS/EUS-FNA on an intention to diagnose basis and to determine the utility of the recommended CEA and amylase cut-off values.A retrospective study of a prospectively maintained database of 433 procedures performed in a 10 year period. Diagnostic performance of EUS-FNA was determined in 133 procedures with a definite diagnosis.CEA value was determined in significantly fewer procedures (58.6%) than EUS diagnosis was stated (83.4%; p < 0.0001), cyst fluid appearance recorded (89.4%) or adequate sample for cytology obtained (76.7%; p < 0.005). Median CEA was significantly higher in mucinous cysts than non-mucinous (175 ng/ml vs 3 ng/ml, p < 0.0001) and in malignant cysts compared to benign (8945 ng/ml vs 93 ng/ml, p < 0.001). On an intention-to-diagnose analysis, a CEA cut-off of 110 ng/ml was significantly less accurate (42.8%) than EUS diagnosis (67.7%), cytology (58.6%) or aspirate appearance (66.9%; p < 0.05 for all comparisons). However, the combination of EUS diagnosis, cytology and CEA provided higher sensitivity (91%), specificity (75%) and accuracy (85.7%) than each component test alone (p < 0.05 for all comparisons). Median amylase was significantly higher in benign compared to high-risk mucinous cysts ((11,429IU/L vs. 113IU/L; p < 0.05.The combination of EUS, cytology and CEA performed well. Malignant cysts had a higher CEA value than benign cysts. On an intention to diagnose basis a CEA cut-off of 110 ng/ml performed poorly.The differences in imaging features of malignant and benign branch duct type of Intraductal Papillary Mucinous Tumor.To investigate the difference in the radiological features of malignant and benign branch duct type of IPMT (Intraductal Papillary Mucinous Tumor) of the pancreas.Thirty-six patients who were referred for operation with branch duct type of IPMT of the pancreas were included in this study. All cases underwent both CT and MRI with contrast enhancement. The size of the cystic lesions, the presence and size of mural nodules, and the amount of dilatation of the MPD were assessed by two independent radiologists, and the results were compared with pathological findings.Histological examination revealed adenoma in 8 cases, AH (atypical hyperplasia) in 8 cases, CIS (carcinoma in situ) in 8 cases and invasive carcinoma in 12 cases. Patients of the malignant group were older than those in the benign group (mean age: 67 yrs vs 60 yrs, respectively), but no statistically significant (p=0.05). Males (16/4 vs 10/6) more often complained weight loss and jaundice. The malignant tumor was more frequently located in the head-body and body. Compared with the benign group, the mean sizes of the cyst, mural nodules, MPD of the malignant group were 44 mm, 13 mm, 7.5 mm and benign group were 31 mm, 5 mm, 3.5 mm respectively. All these difference are statistically significant (p<0.05). In 4 cases of the 20 in the malignant group, soft tissue suggesting spread of disease into the adjacent viscera and peritoneum was detected.Cyst size over 30 mm and mural nodule over 8 mm, irregular thick septa, dilatation of the MPD, and accompany with soft tissue mass may be helpful factors in determining malignancy.Utility of contrast-enhanced FDG-PET/CT in the clinical management of pancreatic cancer: impact on diagnosis, staging, evaluation of treatment response, and detection of recurrence.Fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG)-positron emission tomography/contrast-enhanced computed tomography (PET/CE-CT) involving whole-body scanning first by non-CE-CT and FDG-PET followed by CE-CT has been used for detailed examination of pancreatic lesions. We evaluated PET/CE-CT images with regard to differential diagnosis, staging, treatment response, and postoperative recurrence in pancreatic cancer.Positron emission tomography/CE-CT was conducted in 108 patients with pancreatic cancer and in 41 patients with other pancreatic tumor diseases.The maximum standardized uptake value (SUV(max)) overlapped in benign and malignant cases, suggesting that differential diagnosis of pancreatic tumors based on the SUV(max) is difficult. In the evaluation of staging in 31 resectable pancreatic cancer by PET/CE-CT, the diagnostic accuracy rate was more than 80% for most factors concerning local invasion and 94% for distant metastasis but only 42% for lymph node metastasis. Significant positive correlations were found between the SUV(max) and tumor size/markers, suggesting that SUV(max) may be a useful indicator for the treatment response. Regarding the diagnosis of the postoperative recurrence, PET/CE-CT correctly detected local recurrence in all the 11 cases of recurrence, whereas abdominal CE-CT detected only 7 of 11 cases, suggesting that PET/CE-CT is superior in this context.Positron emission tomography/CE-CT is useful for the clinical management of pancreatic cancer.The role of endoscopic ultrasound and cyst fluid analysis in the initial evaluation and follow-up of incidental pancreatic cystic lesions.To assess the role of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) in the initial evaluation and follow-up of incidental pancreatic cystic lesions (PCL).Retrospective analysis of patients with incidental PCL on imaging who were evaluated by EUS and had a minimal follow-up of 1 year.There were 62 patients (40 females and 22 males). The mean patient age was 67.7 years (range, 30-89). The Median follow-up was 24 months (range, 12-72). The mean PCL size was 21.6 mm. In all, 13 patients underwent surgery (20.9%). Diagnosis included a mucinous cystic tumour (7), mucinous adenocarcinoma (2), intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (1) and a cystic neuroendocrine tumour (1). The overall malignancy rate among patients who underwent surgery was 15.3% (two patients). The mean carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) level from PCL fluid analysis was also significantly higher in surgically treated group (7760) vs. the stable group (184.7) vs. the enlarging PCL group (361.1). A CEA level above 192 ng/ml predicted mucinous PCL with a sensitivity of 90%.EUS with cystic fluid analysis can be successfully used to rule out pancreatic neoplasms and to follow-up incidentally discovered PCL.Clinical utility of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration.To assess our institution's initial experience with the clinical utility of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine needle aspiration.Prospective analysis of the clinical utility of EUS-guided FNA.Fifty-three patients underwent EUS-guided FNA of 64 sites, 28 for pancreatic masses, 15 for lymph nodes, 10 for solid lesions, 7 for cystic masses, 2 for submucosal masses and 2 for perigastrointestinal fluid. A cytopathologist was present during all procedures. An average of four passes (range, one to nine) was required to make a diagnosis in the 22 patients with pancreatic malignancies. There was one possible complication among the 53 patients. In 36 of the 53 patients, the combination of diagnostic EUS findings and cytologic diagnosis made a major change in the patient's management.Because of its ability to affect patient management, EUS-guided FNA will become a more commonly used procedure, especially at oncologic centers. Since the number of fine needle passes needed for diagnosis is quite variable, it is important to have a cytopathologist participate in these procedures.FDG-PET evaluation of indeterminate pancreatic masses.The purpose of this study was to assess the ability of PET with 2-[18F]fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG) to differentiate benign from malignant pancreatic masses in patients with indeterminate findings on CT.We performed FDG-PET on 12 patients with indeterminate mass lesions and 2 patients with CT findings typical for malignancy. Eight were found to have pancreatic carcinoma and six had benign lesions. The final diagnosis was histopathologically confirmed in all patients but two with a presumed diagnosis of focal pancreatitis based on stable clinical follow-up for at least 12 months. Lesion uptake of FDG was evaluated qualitatively and semiquantitatively by determination of the standardized uptake value (SUV) RESULTS: With use of a 2.5 cutoff value for SUV, all eight malignant and four of six benign lesions were correctly categorized. Qualitative evaluation gave the same results. The two false-positive lesions had elevated SUV values of 3.4 and 3.8, respectively.Our results indicate that FDG-PET has potential value for assessing patients with CT findings that are indeterminate for pancreatic carcinoma. FDG-PET may obviate invasive diagnostic procedures in many patients with benign disease.Fluorescence cytology with 5-aminolevulinic acid in EUS-guided FNA as a method for differentiating between malignant and benign lesions (with video).EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) has been increasingly performed to obtain specimens for the pathological evaluation of patients with GI and pancreaticobiliary masses as well as lymphadenopathies of unknown origin. Photodynamic diagnosis by using 5-aminolebulinic acid (ALA) has been reported to be useful for enabling the visual differentiation between malignant and normal tissue in various cancers.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of fluorescence cytology with ALA in EUS-FNA.A prospective study.A single center.A total of 28 consecutive patients who underwent EUS-FNA for the pathological diagnosis of a pancreaticobiliary mass lesion or intra-abdominal lymphadenopathy of unknown origin.Patients were orally administered ALA 3 to 6 hours before EUS-FNA. The sample was obtained via EUS-FNA for fluorescence cytology and conventional cytology. A single gastroenterologist performed the fluorescence cytology by using fluorescence microscopy after the procedure, independently of the conventional cytology by pathologists.The accuracy of fluorescence cytology with ALA in the differentiation between benign and malignant lesions by comparing the results of fluorescence cytology with the final diagnosis.Of the 28 patients included in the study, 22 were considered as having malignant lesions and 6 patients as having benign lesions. Fluorescence cytology could correctly discriminate between benign and malignant lesions in all patients. Therefore, both the sensitivity and specificity of fluorescence cytology were 100% in our study.Fluorescence cytology was performed by only 1 gastroenterologist with a small number of patients.Fluorescence cytology with ALA in EUS-FNA may be an effective and simple method for differentiating between benign and malignant lesions.The clinical utility of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic carcinoma.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) guided fine-needle aspiration (FNA) of pancreatic lesions is being increasingly used. Our aim was to determine the safety, accuracy, and clinical utility of EUS-guided FNA in both the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer.Forty-four patients (24 men/20 women) had EUS-guided FNA of pancreatic lesions (39 head/neck, 5 body, 3 tail) and/or associated lymph nodes. The mean age was 61 (range, 28 to 88 years). The indication for EUS-guided FNA was a pancreatic lesion seen initially on CT (39%), ERCP (43%), or EUS (18%). Follow-up data were collected on all patients for mean of 14.5 months (range 1 to 33 months).CT detected only 15 of 61 (25%) focal lesions seen by EUS, Adequate specimens were obtained by EUS-guided FNA in 44 of 47 (94%) pancreatic lesions and 14 of 14 (100%) associated lymph nodes (overall adequacy was 95%). Of the 46 lesions in which specimens were adequate and a final diagnosis was available (32 malignant, 14 benign), EUS-guided FNA had a sensitivity of 92%, specificity of 100%, and diagnostic accuracy of 95% for pancreatic lesions and 83%, 100%, and 88% for lymph nodes, respectively. Six percent of pancreatic cases had inadequate specimens and, if included, lowered the sensitivity to 83%, specificity to 80%, and diagnostic accuracy to 88% for pancreatic lesions. In 3 patients with enlarged celiac nodes on EUS, EUS-guided FNA was able to make a tissue diagnosis of metastasis, which changed the preoperative staging and precluded surgery. EUS in combination with EUS-guided FNA precluded surgery in 12 of 44 (27%) and may have precluded surgery in an additional 6 of 44 (14%). EUS-guided FNA avoided the need for further diagnostic tests, thus expediting therapy in a total of 25 (57%) patients and influenced clinical decisions in 30 of 44 (68%) patients. The estimated cost savings based on surgeries avoided was approximately $3300 per patient. There was only one complication (2%), a post-FNA fever.EUS-guided FNA of the pancreas appears to be a safe and effective method that increases both the diagnostic and staging capability of EUS in pancreatic cancer. The clinical impact of EUS-guided FNA includes avoiding surgery and additional imaging studies with a substantial cost savings.Mucinous cystic neoplasms of the pancreas: imaging features and diagnostic difficulties.To review the imaging features of mucinous cystic neoplasms (MCNs) of the pancreas and to highlight difficulties in differentiating these lesions from pancreatic pseudocysts.The imaging investigations, case notes and histopathology of 13 patients who underwent surgery for an MCN of the pancreas, were reviewed.An erroneous diagnosis of a pancreatic pseudocyst had been made in five of the 13 cases and in two patients cystenterostomy had been performed. Only one patient had a documented history of acute pancreatitis although mildly elevated serum amylase levels were identified in a further five cases. CT and US correctly diagnosed a cystic pancreatic mass in all 13 patients, however cross-sectional imaging features of neoplasia, such as septae, cyst wall calcification, focal thickening of the cyst wall and papillary projections, were absent in five (38%) cases. Coexistent imaging features of chronic pancreatitis were present in five of the 13 patients and in six resected specimens. Cyst wall calcification occurred only in malignant lesions and there was no relationship between cyst size and the degree of malignancy. While ERCP, angiography, and percutaneous needle aspiration may provide additional information, the majority of these examinations were either unhelpful or even misleading.MCNs of the pancreas are frequently diagnosed and mismanaged as pancreatic pseudocysts with an associated increase in patient morbidity and mortality. Diagnostic imaging can help to distinguish MCNs from pseudocysts when there are features of neoplasia present, however, no imaging investigation can reliably differentiate the two conditions in all cases. If clinical doubt remains, it is preferable to err on the side of safety and either employ a 'wait and watch' strategy or to resect a cystic pancreatic lesion rather than drain a potentially malignant MCN.Diagnostic clues and subsequent examinations that detected small pancreatic cancer.Our aim was to investigate how 2cm or smaller pancreatic cancers were detected successfully in recent years.Diagnostic clues and subsequent examinations that detected 15 histologically confirmed 2 cm or smaller pancreatic cancers were reviewed.Diagnostic clues were imaging findings in 6 patients, symptoms in 5 and laboratory data in 4. Six of 8 patients who had risk factors of pancreatic cancer such as pancreatic cyst, dilated main pancreatic duct, pancreatitis, or diabetes had been followed-up by imaging and laboratory examinations. Five patients with extrapancreatic disease had been followed-up chiefly by laboratory examinations. The remaining 2 had neither of them. Detectabilities of pancreatic mass in US, CT and EUS were 89%, 67% and 100%, respectively; those of pancreatic mass and/or dilated main pancreatic duct were 100% in all three modalities. Cytological examination revealed adenocarcinoma preoperatively in 14 patients (93%).Small pancreatic cancer of 2 cm or smaller were suggested by symptoms, laboratory data, or imaging examinations. They were confirmed by further examinations including cytology.Puncture of solid pancreatic tumors guided by endoscopic ultrasonography: a pilot study series comparing Trucut and 19-gauge and 22-gauge aspiration needles.The aim of this prospective study was to compare endoscopic ultrasonography-guided Trucut needle biopsy (EUS-TNB) with EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy (EUS-FNAB) using 19- and 22-gauge needles for biopsy from different sites in patients with solid pancreatic cancers.Sixteen consecutive patients with masses in the uncinate process (n = 3), the head (n = 5), or the body and tail (n = 8) of the pancreas underwent both EUS-TNB and EUS-FNAB. The specimens obtained were evaluated by histopathological analysis aloneTissue specimens were obtained by Trucut needle, and by 19-gauge and 22-gauge aspiration needles in 69 %, 69 %, and 100 % of patients respectively. Sensitivity for malignancy was 69 % for all needles. Tissue sampling by Trucut and by 19-gauge aspiration needle from masses in the uncinate process was impossible. The sensitivity of the Trucut and 19-gauge aspiration needles was 100 % in the 11 patients with successful procedures. If Trucut or 19-gauge aspiration needles had been used for body and tail masses, and the 22-gauge aspiration needle for masses in the uncinate process and head, the sensitivity for malignancy would have been 81 %.EUS-TNB allows reliable tissue sampling for the diagnosis of pancreatic masses, but its use is limited to lesions in the body and tail of the pancreas. EUS-FNAB using a 22-gauge needle may be useful for accurate diagnosis in some patients with masses in the uncinate process or the head of the pancreas.A novel approach to the diagnosis of pancreatic serous cystadenoma: needle-based confocal laser endomicroscopy.The differential diagnosis of solitary pancreatic cystic lesions is frequently difficult. Needle-based confocal laser endomicroscopy (nCLE) performed during endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is a new technology enabling real-time imaging of the internal structure of such cysts. The aim of this pilot study was to identify and validate new diagnostic criteria on nCLE for pancreatic cystic lesions.A total of 31 patients with a solitary pancreatic cystic lesion of unknown diagnosis were prospectively included at three centers. EUS-FNA was combined with nCLE. The final diagnosis was based on either a stringent gold standard (surgical specimen and/or positive cytopathology) or a committee consensus. Six nonblinded investigators reviewed nCLE sequences from patients with the most stringent final diagnosis, and identified a single feature that was only present in serous cystadenoma (SCA). The findings were correlated with the pathology of archived specimens. After a training session, four blinded independent observers reviewed a separate independent video set, and the yield and interobserver agreement for the criterion were assessed.A superficial vascular network pattern visualized on nCLE was identified as the criterion. It corresponded on pathological specimen to a dense and subepithelial capillary vascularization only seen in SCA. The accuracy, sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of this sign for the diagnosis of SCA were 87 %, 69 %, 100 %, 100 %, and 82 %, respectively. Interobserver agreement was substantial (κ = 0.77).This new nCLE criterion seems highly specific for the diagnosis of SCA. The visualization of this criterion could have a direct impact on the management of patients by avoiding unnecessary surgery or follow-up.Clinicaltrials.gov NCT01563133.Comparison of EUS-guided 19-gauge Trucut needle biopsy with EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration.The accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) depends on immediate specimen review by a cytopathologist. Stromal tumors, lymphoma, and well-differentiated pancreatic cancer are difficult to diagnose on the basis of cytology alone. To overcome these limitations, a 19-gauge Trucut needle has been developed to obtain histological samples at EUS. This pilot study compares the specimen adequacy and diagnostic accuracy of EUS-guided Trucut needle biopsy (EUS-TNB) with EUS-FNA.A total of 18 patients underwent EUS-TNB and EUS-FNA. The specimen adequacy and diagnostic accuracy of the two techniques was compared. The technical performance and safety profile of the Trucut needle were also evaluated.The EUS-TNB specimen was adequate for evaluation in 15/18 patients compared with 18/18 with EUS-FNA (83 % vs. 100 %, not significant). The diagnostic accuracy of EUS-TNB was not significantly different from EUS-FNA (78 % vs. 89 %). Two complications were encountered: one patient developed mediastinitis and required surgery; another had immediate bleeding that was managed conservatively. One technical problem was encountered: the Trucut needle failed to deploy after two passes when a gastric stromal cell tumor was being biopsied.The diagnostic accuracy of the new EUS-TNB is comparable to that of EUS-FNA. In our experience, the overall efficacy and safety profile of the Trucut needle appears modest.Comparative study of diagnostic value of cytologic sampling by endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration and that by endoscopic retrograde pancreatography for the management of pancreatic mass without biliary stricture.Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) can now provide a cytopathological diagnosis of underlying pancreatic malignancy with higher success rates than endoscopic retrograde pancreatography (ERP). To determine the significance of EUS-FNA for the diagnosis of pancreatic mass without biliary stricture, the value of cytopathological diagnosis obtained by EUS-FNA was retrospectively compared with that by ERP, and the complications associated with these procedures evaluated.Eighty-three patients who were suspected to have a pancreatic mass (excluding a cystic mass), without biliary stricture on conventional ultrasound and/or computed tomography were enrolled. The EUS-FNA biopsy was performed in 53 patients and cytology utilizing ERP was performed in 30 patients.The sampling rate of adequate specimen was 100% in both groups. In the EUS-FNA group, the overall results for the available samples were sensitivity 92.9% and accuracy 94.3%. In contrast, in the ERCP group, the overall results were sensitivity 33.3% and accuracy 46.7%. There was a significant difference between the two groups (P < 0.01). With regard to complications, there was a significant difference (P < 0.01) in the frequency of post-procedure pancreatitis between the EUS-FNA group and ERP group (0%, 0/53 vs 33.3%, 10/30, respectively).Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration is safer and more accurate for the cytopathological diagnosis of suspected pancreatic masses without a biliary stricture as compared with cytology during ERP. Endoscopic ultrasonography with FNA should be considered a preferred test (prior to attempting endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography) when a cytological diagnosis of a pancreatic mass is required, especially when there is no biliary obstruction, or when emergent decompression of an obstructed biliary tree is not considered clinically necessary due to lack of signs and symptoms of cholangitis.Diagnostic value of EUS-FNA in patients suspected of having pancreatic cancer with a focal lesion on CT scan/MRI but without obstructive jaundice.Patients frequently present with suspected pancreatic neoplasm based on a focal pancreatic lesion on computed tomographic (CT) scan/magnetic resonance image (MRI) but without obstructive jaundice. We evaluated the performance characteristics of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in this patient subset.This is a retrospective analysis of a prospective database and included patients who underwent EUS-FNA at a university hospital for a focal pancreatic lesion noted on CT/MRI. Patients were excluded if (1) they had obstructive jaundice or (2) the lesion appear (seem)ed cystic on CT/MRI. The main outcome measurements were (1) prevalence of pancreatic cancer and (2) performance characteristics of EUS-FNA for identifying malignancy.In the 213 study patients, a focal pancreatic lesion was identified in 173 patients by EUS. The final diagnosis included adenocarcinoma (n=89), neuroendocrine tumor (n=14), mucinous cystadenocarcinoma (n=1), solid pseudopapillary tumor (n=2), metastases (n=4), benign cyst (n=19), pseudocyst (n=9), abscess (n=4), chronic pancreatitis (n=32), and normal pancreas (n=39). Endoscopic ultrasound-guided FNA had an accuracy of 97.6% for diagnosing malignant neoplasm, with 96.6% sensitivity, 99.0% specificity, 96.2% negative predictive value, and 99.1% positive predictive value.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided FNA is highly accurate for diagnosing malignancy in patients with a focal pancreatic lesion on CT scan/MRI but without obstructive jaundice. Endoscopic ultrasound-guided FNA can potentially be used as a definitive diagnostic test in the management of these patients.The 25-gauge EUS-FNA needle: Good for on-site but poor for off-site evaluation? Results of a randomized trial.When on-site cytopathology support is not available, EUS-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is performed for cell-block preparation to allow off-site interpretation.To identify the number of passes required to obtain a diagnostic cell block by using a 25-gauge needle for sampling pancreatic masses.Randomized trial.Tertiary care hospital.Sixty-two patients with solid pancreatic mass lesions.EUS-FNA was performed by using a 25-gauge needle. After establishing a preliminary on-site diagnosis, patients were randomized to 2 or 4 FNA passes for a cell block. A cell block was evaluated by a pathologist blinded to on-site interpretation for the presence of a tissue pellet, histological core tissue size, and diagnostic accuracy.To determine the number of passes required to obtain a diagnostic cell block with a 25-gauge FNA needle.Sixty-two patients were randomized to undergo either 2 (n = 31) or 4 (n = 31) FNA passes for a cell block. Before randomization, an on-site diagnosis was established in all 62 patients (100%). The final diagnosis was adenocarcinoma in 45 (72.6%), neuroendocrine/other tumor in 7 (11.3%), and chronic pancreatitis in 10 (16.1%). There was no difference in the presence of a tissue pellet (93.5 vs 96.8%; P = .99), the median size of the histological core (0.006 vs 0.05 mm(2); P = .12), or the presence of a diagnostic cell block (80.6 vs 80.6%; P = .99) between patients randomized to 2 or 4 FNA passes, respectively.Only pancreatic masses were evaluated.The 25-gauge FNA needle yielded a diagnostic cell block in only 81% of patients, irrespective of whether 2 or 4 FNA passes were performed. These findings have important implications for centers without on-site cytopathology services. (Clinical trial registration number NCT01809028.).EUS-guided, fine-needle aspiration biopsy using a new mechanical scanning puncture echoendoscope.A new mechanical sector scanning echoendoscope designed for EUS-guided, fine-needle aspiration biopsy (FNAB) was prospectively evaluated. The technical feasibility, safety, and histocytologic FNAB results are reported.Eighty-six patients underwent 106 FNAB procedures. The new echoendoscope has a 2.8 mm accessory channel and an elevator. Target sites: pancreas 58, lymph nodes 43, and miscellaneous lesions 5. Lesions were punctured with a 0.7 mm needle and submitted for cytologic and histologic examination. Definitive diagnosis was by surgery or clinical follow-up.The wide scanning field (250 degrees) enabled easy sonographic orientation for FNAB. Longitudinal needle visibility was "good" in 93% and 71% of transesophageal and transgastric procedures, respectively, but were compromised during most transduodenal procedures. Needle penetration of indurated pancreatic lesions failed in two patients, and in four additional patients pancreatic sampling succeeded only after a second attempt using an automated spring-loaded device. The mean number of passes was three. Ten percent of FNAB specimens were "inadequate"; excluding these, the diagnostic accuracy rate was 97%; sensitivity for malignancy was 88.5% and specificity was 100%.EUS-guided FNAB is feasible, safe, and accurate using the new mechanical puncture echoendoscope. Needle visibility needs to be improved, particularly for transduodenal FNAB.Randomized trial comparing fanning with standard technique for endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration of solid pancreatic mass lesions.The fanning technique for endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS - FNA) involves sampling multiple areas within a lesion with each pass. The aim of this study was to compare the fanning and standard techniques for EUS - FNA of solid pancreatic masses.Consecutive patients with solid pancreatic mass lesions were randomized to undergo EUS - FNA using either the standard or the fanning technique. The main outcome measure was the median number of passes required to establish diagnosis. The secondary outcome measures were the diagnostic accuracy, technical failure, and complication rate of the two techniques.Of 54 patients, 26 were randomized to the standard technique and 28 to the fanning technique. There was no difference in diagnostic accuracy (76.9 % vs. 96.4 %; P = 0.05), technical failure or complication rates (none in either cohort). There was a significant difference in both the number of passes required to establish diagnosis (median 1 [interquartile range 1 - 3] vs. 1 [1 - 1]; P = 0.02) and the percentage of patients in whom a diagnosis was achieved on pass one (57.7 % vs. 85.7 %; P = 0.02) between the standard and fanning groups, respectively.The fanning technique of FNA was superior to the standard approach because fewer passes were required to establish the diagnosis. If these promising data are confirmed by other investigators, consideration should be given to incorporating the fanning technique into routine practice of EUS - FNA. Registered at Clinical Trials.gov (NCT 01501903).Power Doppler endoscopic ultrasonography for the differential diagnosis between pancreatic cancer and pseudotumoral chronic pancreatitis.The accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration for the differential diagnosis of pancreatic masses is variable in the literature, being as low as 75% in some studies. The aim of the study was to assess the accuracy of power Doppler EUS for the differential diagnosis between pancreatic cancer and pseudotumoral chronic pancreatitis.We included 42 consecutive patients with pancreatic tumor masses (27 men and 15 women) examined by EUS between January 2002 and August 2004. Endoscopic ultrasonographic procedures included power Doppler EUS as well as EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration in all patients. Final diagnosis of pancreatic cancer was confirmed in 29 patients on the basis of a combination of information provided by imaging tests, follow-up of at least 6 months, and laparotomy in 18 patients for diagnostic or palliative reasons.Sensitivity and specificity of the absence of power Doppler signals inside the suggestive pancreatic mass were 93% and 77%, respectively, with accuracy of 88%. Moreover, the addition of the information provided by the presence of peripancreatic collaterals improved the sensitivity and specificity to 97% and 92%, with accuracy of 95%.Power Doppler EUS provides useful information for the differential diagnosis of pancreatic masses. The results were in concordance with previous studies that showed a hypovascular pattern of pancreatic carcinoma, as well as the formation of collaterals in advanced cases due to the invasion of the splenic or portal veins. Further studies of dynamic EUS with contrast agents are necessary to better characterize pancreatic masses.Endosonography-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy in the evaluation of pancreatic masses.Diagnosis of pancreatic tumors can be problematic. This study aimed to determine the performance of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy (EUS FNA) in pancreatic malignancy when prior biopsies performed by CT guidance or ERCP were negative.A total of 185 patients with known or suspected pancreatic masses were prospectively evaluated with EUS FNA. Before EUS FNA, all patients were evaluated with abdominal CT (61 with CT-guided biopsy) and 91 with ERCP (41 had brushings or biopsy).EUS had greater sensitivity than CT in detecting a mass (99% vs 57%, p < 0.0001). In 58 patients with negative CT-guided biopsies, EUS FNA had 90% sensitivity for malignancy, 50% specificity for benign disease and 84% accuracy. Similarly, in 36 patients with negative ERCP tissue sampling, results for EUS FNA were 94%, 67% and 92%, respectively. Complications were mild and infrequent (0.5%).EUS FNA of pancreatic masses safely and accurately diagnoses pancreatic malignancy when prior biopsy techniques have been unsuccessful.The utility of F-18 FDG PET/CT in the evaluation of pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm.To assess the utility of F-18 fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography (FDG PET/CT) in evaluating pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN).We included 31 patients with pancreatic IPMN who underwent F-18 FDG PET/CT and multidetector CT (MDCT). Each pancreatic lesion was classified as benign or malignant. On PET, the maximal standardized uptake value was measured in each pancreatic lesion.PET/CT was superior to MDCT in diagnosing malignant IPMN. All 22 concordant results gave accurate diagnoses. Of 9 discordant results, MDCT misdiagnosed 7 IPMNs, whereas PET/CT misinterpreted 2. Malignant IPMNs showed significantly higher maximal standardized uptake values (mean ± standard deviation, 6.7 ± 3.6) than benign IPMNs (mean ± standard deviation, 2.1 ± 1.0) (P < 0.001).F-18 FDG PET/CT outperformed MDCT in detecting malignant IPMN.Differential diagnosis of pancreatic cancer and focal pancreatitis by using EUS-guided FNA.Despite advances in diagnostic imaging techniques, the differentiation between pancreatic cancer and focal pancreatitis remains difficult. This study evaluated the effectiveness of EUS-guided FNA in the differential diagnosis between pancreatic cancer and focal pancreatitis, with particular reference to detection of the K-ras point mutation.The study included 62 consecutive patients with pancreatic ductal cancer and 15 patients with focal pancreatitis demonstrated as a pancreatic mass lesion by EUS.Sensitivity, specificity, overall accuracy, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of cytopathologic diagnosis were 82%, 100%, 86%, 100%, and 58%, respectively. Sensitivity, specificity, overall accuracy, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of histopathologic diagnosis were 44%, 100%, 55%, 100%, and 32%, respectively. The K-ras point mutation was found in 74% of pancreatic cancers and 0% of focal pancreatitis lesions. No complication of EUS-guided FNA was observed.EUS-guided FNA is useful for the differential diagnosis of pancreatic mass lesions caused by pancreatic cancer and focal pancreatitis. Analysis for the K-ras point mutation in specimens obtained by EUS-guided FNA may enhance diagnostic accuracy in indeterminate cases.Ultrasound, computed tomography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the morphologic diagnosis of pancreatic disease.From February to November 1981 the diagnostic relevance of ultrasound (US), computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) was compared prospectively in 75 patients with suspected pancreatic disease. Final diagnosis was confirmed by autopsy, surgery, clinical course, and further laboratory data. Thus it was possible to exclude pancreatic disorders in 32 patients. By ERCP we diagnosed all tumors; sensitivity was 100%. Sensitivity of US and CT were 63% each. In five cases US made the false positive diagnosis" pancreatic malignant tumor" (specificity 93%), CT and ERCP in two cases (specificity 97% each). In chronic pancreatitis specificity of US and ERCP were 100% and specificity of CT was 98%. Sensitivity of ERCP amounted to 93%, CT and US revealed 74% and 52%, respectively. We conclude that ERCP is the best morphologic diagnostic tool in differentiating chronic pancreatitis from pancreatic carcinoma. US is a good screening method and CT reveals good diagnostic results in acute pancreatitis.Mucinous cystic neoplasms of the pancreas: how much preoperative evaluation is needed?Cystic lesions of the pancreas are identified with increasing frequency by modern imaging. The mucinous cystic neoplasm (MCN) is treated with resection for its malignant potential. How much preoperative evaluation is needed before undertaking operation is frequently a diagnostic dilemma. A retrospective review of 32 patients who underwent resection of a MCN between 1994 and 2007 was performed to define the preoperative evaluation and operative treatment of MCN patients. Thirty-two patients (30 women; mean age 49) had histology-proven MCN. Twenty-seven patients had symptomatic cysts (84%). Five had a history of gallstones and/or acute pancreatitis. All patients were worked up with CT and/or MRI. Endoscopic ultrasound was performed in 14 (44%) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in six (18%). Cytology was obtained in 13 (40%). Pathology revealed 22 benign MCNs (68%), five malignant MCNs (16%), and five MCNs with borderline pathology. Preoperative workup including CT or MRI imaging and cytology suggested MCN as the lesion in 15 patients (46%). CT features by itself predicted MCN in three patients (9%). Cytology revealed another six patients (19%) with possible MCN. In this series, preoperative workup did not identify three of five patients with MCN malignancy. A preoperative diagnosis cannot be made in most patients with MCN. Operative treatment can be based on clinical presentation and CT imaging because endoscopic ultrasound and fine needle aspiration for evaluation may be misleading. Middle-aged women with cystic lesions in the tail of the pancreas without prior gallstone or pancreatitis history most typically fit the profile of the MCN patient.Use of IMP3 in identification of carcinoma in fine needle aspiration biopsies of pancreas.To evaluate insulin-like growth factor-II mRNA binding protein 3 (IMP3), which is an oncofetal RNA-binding protein expressed in pancreatic carcinomas and detectable by immunohistochemistry, in diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.We retrospectively identified 25 consecutive pancreatic endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration biopsies with available cell blocks, including 12 invasive pancreatic ductal carcinomas and 13 cases of chronic pancreatitis. Immunostains were performed on 4-microm tissue sections using standard techniques. Cytoplasmic staining of the lesional cells and nonneoplastic pancreatic tissue was evaluated, and the intensity of staining was recorded as absent, weak, moderate or strong.Eleven (92%) adenocarcinomas demonstrated staining of tumor cells with IMP3. The staining reaction was weak in 2 of 11 (18%), moderate in 5 of 11 (45%) and strong in 4 of 11 (36%) of the cases. Nonneoplastic pancreatic tissues, present in 8 of 12 carcinomas and 13 cases of chronic pancreatitis, were negative for IMP3.IMP3 is a promising new marker with high specificity and sensitivity for pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Should we do EUS/FNA on patients with pancreatic cysts? The incremental diagnostic yield of EUS over CT/MRI for prediction of cystic neoplasms.To evaluate the performance characteristics of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) compared with computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and determine the incremental diagnostic yield and accuracy of EUS with or without fine needle aspiration (FNA) over CT and MRI for prediction of neoplastic pancreatic cysts.The EUS database was queried for procedures performed for pancreatic cysts between March 2006 and January 2010. Cystic pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma, cystic pancreatic neuroendocrine tumor, mucinous cystic neoplasm, intraductal papillary neoplasm, and solid pseudopapillary neoplasm were categorized as neoplastic; pseudocysts and serous cysts were designated as nonneoplastic/low risk.Final diagnoses were established by surgery in 154 patients (mucinous cystic neoplasm/intraductal papillary neoplasm [69.4%], pancreatic neuroendocrine tumor [10%], pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma [6.4%], solid pseudopapillary neoplasm [0.6%], nonneoplastic/low risk [13.6%]). Endoscopic ultrasonography with or without FNA was superior to CT and MRI in accurately classifying a cyst as neoplastic (P < 0.0001). After CT and MRI, EUS increased the rate of correctly predicting neoplastic cysts in 43 (36%) and 27 (54%) additional cases, respectively.The incremental increase in diagnostic yield of EUS and fluid analysis over CT and MRI for prediction of a neoplastic cyst is 36% and 54%, respectively. The addition of EUS-FNA to abdominal imaging significantly increases overall accuracy for diagnosis of neoplastic pancreatic cysts.Endosonography for differentiating benign from malignant intraductal mucinous tumors of the pancreas: is the jury out?Immunostaining as an adjunct to cytology for diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Serial analysis of gene expression has helped identify several proteins that are expressed differentially in pancreatic cancer and are highly sensitive and specific for pancreatic adenocarcinoma. We evaluated if the diagnostic accuracy of pancreatic cancer from endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-fine-needle aspiration (FNA) can be improved by combined evaluation of cytology and immunostaining with these markers.This study involved the use of archived specimens from patients treated at Saint Louis University Hospital from 2002 to 2006. We identified 5 protein markers that appeared most promising from published literature. We sequentially evaluated immunostaining with these markers in (1) surgical resection specimens, (2) cell blocks from EUS-FNA, and (3) direct smears of EUS-FN aspirates. Finally, we performed a combined evaluation of cytology and immunostaining in direct smears that were difficult to interpret and required a second consultative cytologic opinion.In resection specimens, the majority of pancreatic adenocarcinomas expressed all 5 markers but fascin, maspin, and carcinoembryonic antigen-related cell adhesion molecule 6 also were expressed abnormally in normal pancreata and in chronic pancreatitis. Further evaluation therefore was limited to the other 2 markers: mesothelin and 14-3-3sigma. It was feasible and useful to perform immunostaining in cell blocks and direct smear for diagnosing pancreatic cancer. In cases requiring a second cytologic consultation, a combined evaluation of cytologic morphology and immunostaining had 90% accuracy for a pancreatic adenocarcinoma diagnosis.In conclusion, immunostaining with newer protein markers is feasible in EUS-FNA specimens and can assist cytopathologists in diagnosing pancreatic cancer. Among the currently available protein immunomarkers, a combination of mesothelin and 14-3-3sigma seems most promising, but needs to be validated in prospective studies before routine clinical use.The morphological classification of a serous cystic tumor (SCT) of the pancreas and evaluation of the preoperative diagnostic accuracy of computed tomography.Although the honeycomb microcystic type is common and typical for a serous cystic tumor (SCT), clinical and radiological features are diverse. Systematic classification of SCT subtypes is not well established. The purpose of this study was to classify the subtypes of SCT and to clarify its clinical and pathological characteristics.Clinical data from 52 patients with a pathologically confirmed SCT were prospectively collected using a standard data form. According to cyst size and multiplicity, on gross and radiological evaluation, the cysts were classified as microcystic when they were smaller than 2 cm, and macrocystic when larger than 2 cm. The microcystic tumors were subdivided into honeycomb and solid types, while the macrocystic tumors into unilocular and multilocular types based on the number of cysts.There were 22 cases with microcystic SCTs that were subclassified into the honeycomb (n = 21) and solid types (n = 1), while 30 cases were macrocystic type and were subclassified into multilocular (n = 16) and unilocular types (n = 14). There were no differences between four subtypes with regard to gender, tumor location, and size. The preoperative diagnostic accuracy of the unilocular macrocystic SCT was only 35.7%, while that of honeycomb microcystic SCT and multilocular macrocystic SCT were 81% and 87.5%, respectively (P = 0.005).Microcystic SCTs and multilocular macrocystic SCTs can be accurately diagnosed preoperatively; therefore conservative treatment and observation are possible in some cases. However, the unilocular macrocystic SCT is difficult to differentiate from the other pancreatic cystic tumors with malignant potential, therefore resection must be considered.Cystic pancreatic tumors: should we resect all of them?Pancreatic cystic tumors are relatively rare tumors and only 1% of them are malignant. They are often asymptomatic and detected as incidental findings through diagnostic imaging. Currently there are no universal guide lines for the correct clinical approach to pancreatic cystic lesions. Cross-sectional imaging demonstrates some typical morphological features that determine the pre-operative diagnosis of the pancreatic cystic lesions (serous or mucinous cystadenoma, intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms). In addition, endoscopic ultrasonography permits the collection and analysis of the fluid content. The aim of this paper is to describe our case load in the management of pancreatic cystic neoplasms and propose some criteria for choosing between surgical or conservative approaches.12 patients with pancreatic cystic neoplasms were retrospectively evaluated. They were studied using cross-sectional imaging modalities (computed tomography and magnetic resonance); endoscopic ultrasonography was performed in 7 patients.In each patient a careful evaluation of several factors (age, comorbidity, imaging features, symptoms, life expectancy) conditioned our clinical decision. Among our 12 patients, surgical resection was performed in 7 cases.The treatment of pancreatic cystic lesions is still a dilemma because even in the presence of malignant potential, pancreatic surgery remains very complicated and demolitive. Many factors need to be considered in the management of cystic pancreatic tumors. The most important include histological type, location, size, age and clinical condition of the patient.A correct multidisciplinary pre-operative diagnosis is mandatory. Surgery should only be performed in selected cases.Effect of pancreatic juice cytology and/or endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy for pancreatic tumor.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy (EUS-FNA) can now provide a cytopathological diagnosis of pancreatic malignancy with higher success rates. However, EUS-FNA cannot be carried out for lesions of minimally invasive carcinoma because they cannot be detected by endoscopic ultrasonography, and in cases of intraductal papillary mucinous carcinoma (IPMC) because of the potential for needle tract seeding. A recent study has shown that pancreatic juice cytology (PJC) is useful for diagnosing pancreatic cancer. This study's aim was to evaluate whether PJC strengthens the diagnostic power of EUS-FNA for pancreatic masses.A total of 161 patients, who were suspected to have a pancreatic mass on conventional ultrasound and/or computed tomography, was enrolled.EUS-FNA was carried out in 121 cases, and PJC was performed in 83 cases. An adequate specimen was obtained for EUS-FNA in 96.0% and for PJC in 98.9%. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy were 86.0%, 100%, 100%, 70.5%, and 89.5% for EUS-FNA, and 71.4%, 100%, 100%, 84.4%, and 88.8% for PJC, respectively. EUS-FNA and/or PJC for the diagnosis of pancreatic tumor had a sensitivity of 92.5%, specificity of 100%, positive predictive value of 100%, negative predictive value of 91.7%, and accuracy of 95.9%. The diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA and/or PJC was significantly higher than that of EUS-FNA alone or PJC alone.PJC improved the diagnostic utility of EUS-FNA for pancreatic tumor.Relationship of pancreatic mass size and diagnostic yield of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is central to discerning the diagnosis of solid pancreatic tumors through tissue acquisition. Test performance is affected by a number of factors including location of mass within the pancreas, presence of onsite cytology technologist, and number of passes with the needle. The influence of tumor size has not been well studied.The objective of the current study was to determine whether the size of mass affects the diagnostic accuracy for solid pancreatic lesions aspirated under EUS guidance.Data were collected retrospectively on all patients with solid pancreatic masses undergoing EUS-FNA from June 2003 to August 2010. The cytology samples were reported as positive, suspicious for malignancy, atypical, negative, or nondiagnostic. The gold standard for a cytological diagnosis was histological confirmation or clinical follow-up of more than 6 months with repeat imaging. Patients were divided into five groups based upon lesion size as follows: (a) less than 1 cm, (b) 1-2 cm, (c) 2-3 cm, (d) 3-4 cm, and (e) greater than 4 cm. Performance characteristics of EUS-FNA including sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were compared for each group. Accuracy was defined as the ratio of the sum of true-positive and true-negative values divided by the number of lesions.We identified 583 patients with solid pancreatic lesions in which EUS-FNA was performed and adequate cellularity was obtained (47% men, mean age 65 ± 1.4 (SE) years). Overall, 486 (83%) of lesions were pancreatic adenocarcinoma, 18 (3%) were neuroendocrine tumors, 12 (2%) were lymphomas, and 67 (12%) were benign lesions. The median size of the mass was 3 cm (range, 0.5-7 cm). A mean of 4.9 passes (range, 1-9 passes) was needed to obtain adequate samples from lesions. The overall yield of obtaining adequate samples for diagnosis was 85%. When stratified by size, the EUS-FNA sensitivity for lesions with size <1, 1-2, 2-3, 3-4, and >4 cm was 40, 75.9, 86.9, 93.2, and 91.6%, respectively; EUS-FNA sensitivity strongly correlate with tumor size (p < 0.001). Similarly, the accuracy of EUS-FNA increased as lesion size increased, ranging from 47% for tumors less than 1 cm to 88% for tumors greater than 4 cm (p < 0.05). Location of tumor and number of needle passes did not significantly influence EUS-FNA performance characteristics.The sensitivity and diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA for solid pancreatic lesions is strongly correlated with tumor size. Sensitivity and accuracy decrease significantly for tumors that are smaller than 1 cm.[Role of 18F-FDG PET scan in the differential diagnosis of large pancreatic masses].Results of standard 18FDG PET and double-phase scanning were compared in the course of differential diagnosis of pancreatic cancer and chronic pseudotumorous pancreatitis, particularly, during exacerbation. PET diagnosis of cancer was confirmed in 6.5% while that of double-phase scanning--100%.Prospective comparative study of the EUS guided 25-gauge FNA needle with the 19-gauge Trucut needle and 22-gauge FNA needle in patients with solid pancreatic masses.The aim of this prospective study was to compare fine-needle aspiration guided by endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS-FNA) using 25-gauge and 22-gauge needles with the EUS-guided 19-gauge Trucut needle biopsy (EUS-TNB) in patients with solid pancreatic mass.Twenty-four consecutive patients with pancreatic mass underwent biopsies by both EUS-FNA and EUS-TNB. Three needles were compared with respect to technical success rate, tissue size obtained, overall diagnostic accuracy and accuracy for histological and cytological diagnosis.The 25-gauge EUS-FNA was technically easier and obtained superior overall diagnostic accuracy than the 22-gauge and Trucut needles, especially in lesions of the pancreas head and uncinate process. Overall accuracy for the 25-gauge, 22-gauge and Trucut needle was 91.7%, 79.7% and 54.1%, respectively. Accuracy for cytological diagnosis irrespective the site of lesions with 25-gauge, 22-gauge and Trucut needles was 91.7%, 75.0%, and 45.8%, respectively. For uncinate masses, it was 100%, 33.3%, and 0.0%, respectively. These differences were significant. Among technically successful patients, the accuracy for histological diagnosis using the 25-gauge was significantly inferior (P < 0.05) to 22-gauge and Trucut needles and the rates were 45.8%, 78.9% and 83.3%.The 25-gauge FNA needle was significantly superior in terms of technical success rate and overall diagnostic accuracy, especially for the head and uncinate lesions, compared to the 22-gauge and Trucut needles and could be considered 'the best choice needle for cytological diagnosis' of solid pancreatic lesions. If histological diagnosis is required, the 22-gauge FNA needle and Trucut needle may be advantageous for use in head/uncinate and body/tail lesions, respectively.Endoscopic ultrasound and fine needle aspiration in chronic pancreatitis: differential diagnosis between pseudotumoral masses and pancreatic cancer.Pseudotumoral chronic pancreatitis can be difficult to differentiate from pancreatic carcinoma.To evaluate the role of endoscopic ultrasound and fine needle aspiration in differentiating between inflammatory masses and malignancies in chronic pancreatitis.Retrospective study.Tertiary care endoscopy unit.Between February 1997 and December 2006, 69 pancreatic head masses from patients with alcoholic chronic pancreatitis underwent EUS-FNA using a linear echoendoscope and 22-gauge needles. Final diagnoses were obtained from surgery or clinical follow-up. The patients were subdivided into two groups: pseudotumoral chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic cancer.Pseudotumoral masses and adenocarcinoma were found in 58 and 11 patients, respectively. The size of the lesions and the clinical presentation were similar in both groups, but the cancer patients were older than the patients with pseudotumoral masses (P=0.020). Fourteen of the 58 (24.1%) pseudotumoral masses were misdiagnosed as cancers, and 4 of the 11 (36.4%) cancers were erroneously diagnosed as pseudotumoral masses when evaluated by EUS alone. EUS-FNA confirmed the final diagnosis in 66 of the 69 (95.7%) cases. Cytopathology correctly classified 8 of the 11 (72.7%) malignancies and all benign cases. Three of the 11 (27.3%) cancers were misdiagnosed as pseudotumoral masses, and no pseudotumoral mass was diagnosed as a cancer. In two cases, the specimens were inadequate for cytopathological assessment. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and the diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA were 72.7%, 100%, 100%, 95.1% and 95.7%, respectively.The diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound alone for differentiating between pseudotumoral masses and pancreatic cancer arising from chronic pancreatitis is unsatisfactory. Fine needle aspiration of these tumors significantly improves diagnostic capability.Contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasound in discrimination between focal pancreatitis and pancreatic cancer.To evaluate the contrast-enhanced endosonography as a method of differentiating inflammation from pancreatic carcinoma based on perfusion characteristics of microvessels.In 86 patients with suspected chronic pancreatitis (age: 62+/-12 years; sex: f/m 38/48), pancreatic lesions were examined by conventional endoscopic B-mode, power Doppler ultrasound and contrast-enhanced power mode (Hitachi EUB 525, SonoVue, 2.4 mL, Bracco) using the following criteria for malignant lesions: no detectable vascularisation using conventional power Doppler scanning, irregular appearance of arterial vessels over a short distance using SonoVue contrast-enhanced technique and no detectable venous vessels inside the lesion. A malignant lesion was assumed if all criteria were detectable [gold standard endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine needle aspiration cytology, operation]. The criteria of chronic pancreatitis without neoplasia were defined as no detectable vascularisation before injection of SonoVue, regular appearance of vessels over a distance of at least 20 mm after injection of SonoVue and detection of arterial and venous vessels.The sensitivity and specificity of conventional EUS were 73.2% and 83.3% respectively for pancreatic cancer. The sensitivity of contrast-enhanced EUS increased to 91.1% in 51 of 56 patients with malignant pancreatic lesion and the specificity increased to 93.3% in 28 of 30 patients with chronic inflammatory pancreatic disease.Contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasound improves the differentiation between chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided sampling of solid pancreatic masses: 22-gauge aspiration versus 25-gauge biopsy needles.Biopsy needles have recently been developed to obtain both cytological and histological specimens during endoscopic ultrasound (EUS). We conducted this study to compare 22-gauge (G) fine needle aspiration (FNA) needles, which have been the most frequently used, and new 25G fine needle biopsy (FNB) needles for EUS-guided sampling of solid pancreatic masses.We conducted a retrospective cohort study of all EUS-guided sampling performed between June 2010 and October 2013. During the study period, 76 patients with pancreatic masses underwent EUS-guided sampling with a 22G FNA needle (n = 38) or a 25G FNB needle (n = 38) for diagnosis. An on-site cytopathologist was not present during the procedure. Technical success, the number of needle passes, cytological diagnostic accuracy, cytological sample quality (conventional smear and liquid-based preparation), histological diagnostic accuracy, and complications were reviewed and compared.There were no significant differences in technical success (100% for both), the mean number of needle passes (5.05 vs. 5.55, P = 0.132), or complications (0% for both) between the 22G FNA group and the 25G FNB group. The 22G FNA and 25G FNB groups exhibited comparable outcomes with respect to cytological diagnostic accuracy (97.4% vs. 89.5%, P = 0.358) and histological diagnostic accuracy (34.2% vs. 52.6%, P = 0.105). In the cytological sample quality analysis, the 25G FNB group exhibited higher scores for the amount of diagnostic cellular material present (22G FNA: 0.92 vs. 25G FNB: 1.32, P = 0.030) and the retention of appropriate architecture (22G FNA: 0.97 vs. 25G FNB: 1.42, P = 0.010) in the liquid-based preparation. The 25G FNB group showed a better histological diagnostic yield for specific tumor discrimination compared with the 22G FNA group (60 % vs. 32.4%, P = 0.018).Use of the 25G FNB needle was technically feasible, safe, efficient, and comparable to use of the standard 22G FNA needle in patients with solid pancreatic masses in the absence of an on-site cytopathologist. The cytological sample quality in the liquid-based preparation and the histological diagnostic yield for specific tumor discrimination of EUS-guided sampling using a 25G FNB needle were significantly higher than those using a 22G FNA needle.High and low negative pressure suction techniques in EUS-guided fine-needle tissue acquisition by using 25-gauge needles: a multicenter, prospective, randomized, controlled trial.EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) has a high diagnostic accuracy for pancreatic diseases. However, although most reports have typically focused on cytology, histological tissue quality has rarely been investigated. The effectiveness of EUS-FNA combined with high negative pressure (HNP) suction was recently indicated for tissue acquisition, but has not thus far been tested in a prospective, randomized clinical trial.To evaluate the adequacy of EUS-FNA with HNP for the histological diagnosis of pancreatic lesions by using 25-gauge needles.Prospective, single-blind, randomized, controlled crossover trial.Seven tertiary referral centers.Patients referred for EUS-FNA of pancreatic solid lesions. From July 2011 to April 2012, 90 patients underwent EUS-FNA of pancreatic solid masses by using normal negative pressure (NNP) and HNP with 2 respective passes. The order of the passes was randomized, and the sample adequacy, quality, and histology were evaluated by a single expert pathologist.EUS-FNA by using NNP and HNP.The adequacy of tissue acquisition and the accuracy of histological diagnoses made by using the EUS-FNA technique with HNP.We found that 72.2% (65/90) and 90% (81/90) of the specimens obtained using NNP and HNP, respectively, were adequate for histological diagnosis (P = .0003, McNemar test). For 73.3% (66/90) and 82.2% (74/90) of the specimens obtained by using NNP and HNP, respectively, an accurate diagnosis was achieved (P = .06, McNemar test). Pancreatitis developed in 1 patient after this procedure, which subsided with conservative therapy.This was a single-blinded, crossover study.Biopsy procedures that combine the EUS-FNA with HNP techniques are superior to EUS-FNA with NNP procedures for tissue acquisition. (UMIN000005939.).Factors affecting the diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) for upper gastrointestinal submucosal or extraluminal solid mass lesions.A number of potential variables are associated with the diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA). The aim of this study was to evaluate factors affecting the diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA for upper gastrointestinal submucosal or extraluminal solid lesions.Patients with such lesions who underwent EUS-FNA between January 2009 and December 2010 were studied retrospectively. Needles of 22, 25 and 19 gauge were used. The associations between the EUS-FNA results and factors such as mass location, mass size, needle size, number of needle passes, combined histologic-cytologic analysis and final diagnosis were analyzed.A total of 170 EUS-FNA procedures were performed in 158 patients with upper gastrointestinal submucosal or extraluminal solid lesions. The overall accuracy of EUS-FNA was 86.5% (147/170). The diagnostic accuracy with three or more needle passes was higher than with less than 3.0 needle passes (90.0%, 108/120 vs 78.0%, 39/50; P < 0.05). Mass location, mass size, and final diagnosis were not associated with EUS-FNA accuracy. Combined cytologic-histologic analysis had significantly higher diagnostic accuracy than either cytologic or histologic analysis alone (P < 0.001). In a subgroup of 90 patients, both 22 and 25 gauge needles were used for EUS-FNA. The overall diagnostic accuracy was similar for 25 gauge needles and 22 gauge needles (80.0% vs 78.9% P = 1.000) in this subgroup.Overall, 25 and 22 gauge needles have a similar diagnostic accuracy. Our results suggest that 3.0 or more needle passes and combined cytologic-histologic analysis enhance the diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA.Validation of a nomogram for predicting the probability of carcinoma in patients with intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm in 180 pancreatic resection patients at 3 high-volume centers.We previously published a nomogram for prediction of carcinoma in patients with intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN). The objective of the current study was to validate this nomogram in an external cohort of patients at multiple institutions.The clinical details of 180 patients with IPMN who underwent a pancreatic resection at 3 hospitals were collected. Four significant predictive factors (sex, lesion type, nodule height, and pancreatic juice cytology) were analyzed.Of the 180 patients, 66 (36.7%) had a main pancreatic duct-type IPMN and 114 (63.3%) had a branch pancreatic duct-type IPMN. The final pathological diagnosis was benign IPMN in 95 (52.8%) patients and malignant IPMN in 85 (47.2%) patients. The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve for the model was 0.760. The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve of the IPMN nomogram for prediction of malignancy was 0.747 in main pancreatic duct-type IPMN and 0.752 in branch pancreatic duct-type IPMN. The sensitivity and specificity of the model were 80.0% and 57.9%, respectively, when the predictive probability of more than 10% was used to indicate the presence of carcinoma.This nomogram for predicting the probability of carcinoma in patients with IPMN was accurate in an external validation patient cohort.Preoperative predictors of malignancy in pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms.Malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) can be predicted before surgery.Retrospective review of a prospectively collected database.Academic, urban, tertiary care hospital.Sixty-four consecutive patients with a pathological diagnosis of IPMN.All 64 patients underwent surgical intervention for IPMN between December 8, 1988, and October 16, 2002.Reliable predictors of malignancy.The 64 patients underwent 69 operations: 39 pancreaticoduodenectomies, 18 distal pancreatectomies, 7 total pancreatectomies, 4 neck and/or body pancreatectomies, and 1 cystgastrostomy with pancreatic biopsy. Twenty-three of 69 specimens were malignant-12 in situ (high-grade dysplasia) and 11 invasive. In a univariate analysis of 12 clinical signs or symptoms recorded, diabetes mellitus and jaundice showed a significant association with malignancy of IPMN. Of 24 serum chemistry studies, hematologic studies, and tumor marker analyses (in serum, bile, and pancreatic fluid), elevation of serum alkaline phosphatase and glucose levels showed correlation with malignancy. Computed tomography, ultrasound, and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography findings did not distinguish between benign and malignant tumors. Atypia on preoperative cytologic analysis was specific for malignancy (93%) but lacked the same degree of sensitivity (40% in situ, 91% invasive, and 67% overall).Malignancy of IPMNs is suggested by new-onset diabetes mellitus, jaundice, and elevations in serum glucose or alkaline phosphatase levels. Atypia on preoperative cytologic testing is the finding most predictive of malignancy. The absence of these features does not predict benign disease. These findings may help guide patient and physician decision making.Complications of endoscopic ultrasound fine needle aspiration on pancreatic cystic lesions: final results from a large prospective multicenter study.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration of pancreatic cystic lesions has been reported to have a higher complication rate than that of solid lesions, but the real complication rate is unknown. Aim of the study was to identify the complication rate of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration and related risk factors.Prospective multicenter study at four referral centres. Data were collected from January 2010 to July 2012, searching for all adverse events related to guided fine needle aspiration. All complications occurring up to day 90 were recorded.298 patients (43.9% male, mean age 63.2 ± 15.4 years) underwent endoscopic ultrasound-guided needle aspiration of pancreatic cystic lesions. Mean size was 34.1 ± 9 mm. Adverse events occurred in 18 patients (6%): mild complications in 12/18 (66.6%), and moderate complications in 6/18 (33.3%). Seven were immediate, 6 early, and 5 late. All resolved with medical therapy.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration of pancreatic cystic lesions has been found to be associated with a higher complication rate than for solid lesions; however, the risk rate is acceptable considering the complication grade and the important diagnostic role of the technique in the management of pancreatic cystic lesions.[Diagnosis of cystadenomas and cystadenocarcinomas of the pancreas. Study of 35 cases].The aims of this study were to assess the circumstances of diagnosis and accuracy of imaging procedures in patients with cystic pancreatic tumours.Thirty-five consecutive patients with cystic pancreatic tumours (serous cystadenomas: n = 19, mucinous cystadenomas: n = 9, cystadenocarcinomas: n = 7) were studied from 1988 to 1993. Respective diagnostic values of ultrasonography, endoscopic ultrasonography, CT scan and analysis of cyst fluid were evaluated.The circumstances of diagnosis were abdominal pain (74%), weight loss (23%), jaundice (8%), abdominal mass (6%), asymptomatic (6%). Initial diagnosis of cystadenoma was correctly made by ultrasonography, CT scan and endoscopic ultrasonography in 63%, 77% and 84%, and the type of cystadenoma was correctly diagnosed in 20%, 51% and 55%. A pseudocyst was falsely diagnosed in 28%, 12% and 3%, respectively. After blind review of CT scans and endoscopic ultrasonography records, the type of cystadenoma was correctly diagnosed in 82% by both procedures. Cytological examination of cyst fluid of 18 cystic tumours gave correct diagnosis in 10 cases with sufficient material. A low CEA (P < 0.002), Ca 19.9 (P < 0.003) and absence of mucins (P < 0.002) in cyst fluid was evocative of serous cystadenoma.Abdominal pain was the main circumstance of diagnosis in cases of pancreatic cystadenomas. The type of cystadenoma was correctly diagnosed in 82% by CT scan and endoscopic ultrasonography. Cytological examination, tumoural marker and mucin levels in cyst fluid were helpful for an accurate diagnosis of cystic tumours.Diagnostic utility of endoscopic ultrasound guided aspiration cytology in evaluation of pancreatic masses.To determine the sensitivity and specificity of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) guided fine needle aspiration cytology (FNAC) in the evaluation of pancreatic masses.Analytical study.Department of Pathology, Shaukat Khanum Cancer Hospital and Research Centre, from January 2006 to June 2011.Patients of either gender aged above 18 years who underwent EUS guided FNAC of pancreatic masses detected on abdominal CT, were included in the study. Biphasic abdominal CT scans were carried out for all the patients, followed by EUS guided FNAC. All material aspirated for cytologic evaluation was assessed for sample adequacy on-site, followed by formal examination for diagnostic purposes.The mean age of patients tested was 58.94 ± 12.84 years with age ranging from 23 to 78 years. Regarding gender 23/42 (54.76%) patients were male and 19/42 (45.24%) were female. Out of 42 cases, 27 (64%) cases were diagnosed as adenocarcinoma, 4 (9.5%) as benign, 4 (9.5%) as mucinous cystic neoplasm, 2 (4.7%) as chronic pancreatitis, 2 (4.7%) as non-diagnostic, 2 (4.7%) as atypical cells seen and 1 (2.38%) as non-Hodgkin's lymphoma. The results were in full concordance with radiologic findings.EUS guided FNA is an excellent procedure for evaluation of pancreatic masses. The overall sensitivity of this procedure is 89% and the specificity is 67%.Diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses by endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) with fine-needle aspiration (FNA) is increasingly being used in the staging algorithm for pancreatic carcinoma. This allows for a tissue diagnosis, which was previously difficult to obtain. The aim of this study is to assess the utility of EUS-FNA in establishing the diagnosis of solid pancreatic mass lesions in an Australian population.A retrospective review of the EUS databases of St Vincent's Hospital Melbourne and Western Hospital, Melbourne from November 2002 to May 2006 was undertaken. The focus was on patients with a solid pancreatic mass who underwent EUS-FNA. Surgical pathology or long-term follow up was used to identify false-positive or false-negative results.EUS was undertaken to investigate a solid pancreatic or distal common bile duct mass lesion in 155 patients. Seventy-two of these underwent EUS-guided FNA. Mean age was 68 years. A positive tissue diagnosis of malignancy could be made in 55 (76%). Nine (13%) had benign histology, with 8 (11%) having inadequate tissue obtained from FNA. A later tissue diagnosis of carcinoma was made in eight of those with either benign or inadequate histology, although in all cases there were EUS features diagnostic of malignancy, with FNA limited by technical difficulties. The overall utility of EUS-FNA showed a sensitivity of 87%, specificity 100%, positive predictive value 100%, negative predictive value 52% and overall accuracy 89%.EUS-FNA gives a high return for histological diagnosis of solid pancreatic mass lesions and should be part of the standard management algorithm for pancreatic carcinoma.[Benefit of PET/CT in the preoperative staging in pancreatic carcinomas].Prognosis of patients with pancreatic cancer is poor. Median survival from diagnosis without determining surgical treatment is 3-11 months, after surgical treatment between 13-20 months according to various studies. 5-year survival rate is below 5%. The only chance of cure remains a radical surgical resection. Early diagnosis and determining resectability of tumour is the most important objective in patients with pancreatic cancer. Aim of this work is to evaluate the benefits and define the role of 18F-FDG PET/CT in preoperative staging.195 patients (103 men, 92 women, mean age 66.7 year, range 32-88 years) with suspected pancreatic lesions underwent enhanced 18F-FDG PET/CT in the preoperative staging in addition to standard investigative methods (ultrasonography, contrast enhanced CT, EUS, EUS FNA). All PET/CT findings were compared with standard methods (CT, EUS, EUS FNA), with peroperative findings and definitive histology in surgical patients as the reference standards. Interpretation of the extent of the tumor defined by TNM classification. Limitations of the local resectability was advanced local stage (T4) and presence of distant metastases (M1).In 195 patients with suspected pancreatic lesions was pre-operatively performed PET/CT in the period 1/2007-3/2009. 153 patients with pancreatic cancer, of which 72 was not suitable for radical surgery because of local inoperability or a generalization of the disease. The sensitivity of PET/CT in the capture of primary lesions was 92.2%, specificity 90.5%. False negative findings in 12 patients, false-positive results occurred in 4 cases, positive predictive value (PPV) 97.2%, negative predictive value (NPV) 76.0%. In the assessment of regional lymph nodes sensitivity was 51.9%, specificity 58.3%, PPV 58.3%,NPV 51.9%. In detection of distant metastases PET/CT reached sensitivity 82.8%, specificity 97.8%, PPV 96.9%, NPV 87.0%. PET/CT found distant metastases in 12 patients, which standard methods failed to detect. Surgery was cancelled in 15 patients (15.6%) with potentially resectable tumour based on the performance of PET/CT findings and the management of treatment was changed.PET/CT is highly sensitive and specific method suitable for preoperative staging of pancreatic cancer. It improves the selection of patients for surgery, who can benefit from and reduces the number of incorrectly indicated operations.Pancreatic cancer versus chronic pancreatitis: diagnosis with CA 19-9 assessment, US, CT, and CT-guided fine-needle biopsy.The authors prospectively performed serum CA 19-9 assessment, ultrasound (US), computed tomography (CT), and CT-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy (FNAB) of the pancreas in 81 consecutive patients with suspected chronic pancreatitis or pancreatic neoplasm. The final diagnosis was pancreatic cancer in 54 patients and chronic pancreatitis in 27 patients. CA 19-9 assessment, US, CT, and FNAB were considered nondiagnostic, respectively, in 0%, 25%, 19%, and 6% of cases. When a definite diagnosis was rendered, the positive predictive value was 90% for CA 19-9 assessment, 95% for US, 98% for CT, and 100% for FNAB; the negative predictive value was, respectively, 69%, 95%, 86%, and 100%. The accuracy of all diagnostic and nondiagnostic studies was 81% for CA 19-9 assessment, 72% for US, 77% for CT, and 94% for FNAB. It is concluded that CT-guided pancreatic FNAB is the most reliable examination for enabling differential diagnosis of pancreatic cancer and chronic pancreatitis. When the pancreas is well visualized at US, the negative predictive value for pancreatic cancer is more accurate than that of CA 19-9 assessment and CT.Diagnostic accuracy of ultrasound, computed tomography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the detection of pancreatic cancer in patients with jaundice or cholestasis.A prospective study of jaundiced and/or cholestatic patients (N = 220) was carried out to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of ultrasound (US), computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the detection of pancreatic cancer. Thirty-one patients had the final diagnosis of pancreatic cancer and two patients had a cancer of the papilla of Vater. The sensitivities of US, CT and ERCP were 60%, 97%, 89% and specificities were 92%, 92%, 94%, respectively. The differences in sensitivity between US and other methods were statistically significant (US vs. CT p less than 0.01, US vs. ERCP p less than 0.05). In US studies, most false negative results were caused by unsatisfying visualization. On the basis of this study, we recommend CT as a diagnostic test of pancreatic cancer, if pancreatic cancer is suspected as a cause of jaundice and/or cholestasis.How useful are clinical, biochemical, and cross-sectional imaging features in predicting potentially malignant or malignant cystic lesions of the pancreas? Results from a single institution experience with 220 surgically treated patients.This study aims to determine the use of preoperative clinical, biochemical, and cross-sectional imaging features for predicting malignancy in cystic lesions of the pancreas (CLP).Two hundred twenty patients who underwent operations for CLP or suspected CLP were reviewed. Patients were divided into two groups, patients undergoing operations for pseudocysts and patients undergoing operations for suspected cystic neoplasms. The predictive effect of various preoperative factors on the malignant potential of CLP was evaluated.Forty-four patients with a preoperative diagnosis of pseudocysts underwent operations for complications of pseudocyst. Forty-two were confirmed pathologically to have pseudocysts, but two were found, unexpectedly, to harbor malignant lesions. One hundred seventy-six patients underwent operations for suspected pancreatic cystic neoplasms. There were 70 benign, 51 potentially malignant, and 55 malignant CLP. On multivariate analysis, three factors, ie, elevated serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) or carbohydrate antigen 19-9; cyst size > 3 cm; and presence of one or more of three morphologic features, such as solid component; peripheral calcification; and main duct dilation on cross-sectional imaging were independent predictors of malignancy. Presence of two or three of these factors had a positive predictive value of 88% in predicting a premalignant or malignant CLP.Most pancreatic pseudocysts can be accurately diagnosed preoperatively. In patients with suspected pancreatic cystic neoplasms, elevated serum CEA or carbohydrate antigen 19-9, cyst size > 3 cm, and presence of suspicious morphologic features on imaging are predictors of potentially malignant or malignant CLP. Patients with a high likelihood of a potentially malignant or malignant lesion based on these three factors should undergo operation without additional investigations.Improving cytological diagnosis of pancreatic cysts: Is it clinically necessary or just the latest fashion?Preoperative classification of pancreatic cystic neoplasms: the clinical significance of diagnostic inaccuracy.The potential for malignant transformation varies among pancreatic cystic neoplasms (PCN) subtypes. Imaging and cyst fluid analysis are used to identify premalignant or malignant cases that should undergo operative resection, but the accuracy of operative decision-making process is unclear. The objective of this study was to characterize misdiagnoses of PCN and determine how often operations are undertaken for benign, non-premalignant disease.A retrospective analysis of patients undergoing pancreatic resection for the preoperative diagnosis of PCN was undertaken. Preoperative and pathological diagnoses were compared to measure diagnostic accuracy.Between 1999 and 2011, 74 patients underwent pancreatic resection for the preoperative diagnosis of PCN. Preoperative classification of mucinous vs. non-mucinous PCN was correct in 74%. The specific preoperative PCN diagnosis was correct in 47%, but half of incorrect preoperative diagnoses were clinically equivalent to the pathological diagnoses. The likelihood that the pathological diagnosis was of higher malignant potential than the preoperative diagnosis was 7%. In 20% of cases, the preoperative diagnosis was premalignant or malignant, but the pathological diagnosis was benign. Diagnostic accuracy and the rate of undercall diagnoses and overcall operations did not change with the use of EUS or during the time period of this analysis.Precise, preoperative classification of PCN is frequently incorrect but results in appropriate clinical decision-making in three-quarters of cases. However, one in five pancreatic resections performed for PCN was for benign disease with no malignant potential. An appreciation for the rate of diagnostic inaccuracies should inform our operative management of PCN.Does on-site adequacy evaluation reduce the nondiagnostic rate in endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration of pancreatic lesions?This retrospective study compared the nondiagnostic rate for endoscopic ultrasound-guided (EUS) fine-needle aspiration (FNA) of pancreatic lesions in 2 settings: 1 with and 1 without on-site evaluation.The authors reviewed 381 consecutive cases and divided them into groups with and without on-site adequacy evaluation. For the group with on-site evaluation, cytopathology personnel prepared and evaluated Diff-Quik-stained direct smears and rinsed the remaining material in CytoLyt solution (Cytyc Corporation, Marlborough, Mass). The group without on-site evaluation was divided into 2 subgroups: the clinical team either prepared an air-dried smear for each FNA pass and then rinsed the remaining material in CytoLyt, or the entire sample was rinsed in CytoLyt. The cytologic diagnoses were reviewed and the nondiagnostic rates for each group were calculated.On-site evaluation was provided for 167 cases with a nondiagnostic rate of 25.8% (43 of 167 cases). On-site evaluation was not provided for 214 cases with a nondiagnostic rate of 24.3% (52 of 214 cases). The nondiagnostic rate for the subgroup with air-dried smears prepared by the clinical team was 25.6% (43 of 168 cases) and that for the subgroup with the entire sample rinsed in CytoLyt was 19.6% (9 of 46 cases). There were no significant statistical differences in nondiagnostic rates noted among the different groups or subgroups.The results of the current study indicate that when experienced operators perform EUS FNA of pancreatic lesions, on-site adequacy evaluation offers no benefit in reducing the nondiagnostic rate. Optimizing visualization of the sampled material by omitting the preparation of direct smears and rinsing the entire sample in liquid-based media demonstrated a trend toward improving the diagnostic rate.[CT diagnosis of pancreatic or periampullary cancer].Seventy-seven patients had abdominal computed tomography (CT) performed as part of the diagnostic work-up for suspicion of pancreatic cancer. The CT-images were reviewed by two radiologists who did not know the clinical course, the surgical procedure, or the final diagnosis. The positive predictive value of CT for the diagnosis of pancreatic or periampullary cancer was 92% (82-97%) and the negative predictive value 69% (41-89%). The 95% confidence limits of the positive predictive value of CT in staging the extent of periampullary cancer in 52 patients varied between 21-79% and 59-100%, with the lowest values in diagnosis of liver metastases. The confidence limits for the negative predictive values in staging varied between 17-56% and 67-94%, with the highest values concerning liver metastases. We conclude that CT cannot be used as the only diagnostic procedure for confirming or excluding the diagnosis of pancreatic or periampullary cancer, and that the staging of periampullary cancer by CT alone is too inaccurate for the evaluation of resectability.A microRNA-based test improves endoscopic ultrasound-guided cytologic diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in combination with cytopathology is the optimal method for diagnosis and staging of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma (PDAC) and other pancreatic lesions. Its clinical utility, however, can be limited by high rates of indeterminate or false-negative results. We aimed to develop and validate a microRNA (miRNA)-based test to improve preoperative detection of PDAC.Levels of miRNAs were analyzed in a centralized clinical laboratory by relative quantitative polymerase chain reaction in 95 formalin-fixed paraffin-embedded specimens and 228 samples collected by EUS-FNA during routine evaluations of patients with solid pancreatic masses at 4 institutions in the United States, 1 in Canada, and 1 in Poland.We developed a 5-miRNA expression classifier, consisting of MIR24, MIR130B, MIR135B, MIR148A, and MIR196, that could identify PDAC in well-characterized, formalin-fixed, paraffin-embedded specimens. Detection of PDAC in EUS-FNA samples increased from 78.8% by cytology analysis alone (95% confidence interval, 72.2%-84.5%) to 90.8% when combined with miRNA analysis (95% confidence interval, 85.6%-94.5%). The miRNA classifier correctly identified 22 additional true PDAC cases among 39 samples initially classified as benign, indeterminate, or nondiagnostic by cytology. Cytology and miRNA test results each were associated significantly with PDAC (P < .001), with positive predictive values greater than 99% (95% confidence interval, 96%-100%).We developed and validated a 5-miRNA classifier that can accurately predict which preoperative pancreatic EUS-FNA specimens contain PDAC. This test might aid in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer by reducing the number of FNAs without a definitive adenocarcinoma diagnosis, thereby reducing the number of repeat EUS-FNA procedures.Endoscopic ultrasound and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography for obstructing pancreas head masses: combined or separate procedures?Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) are complementary procedures in the evaluation of obstructive jaundice.To determine the feasibility, accuracy, and safety of the combined performance of EUS-guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) and ERCP with biliary stenting in patients with obstructive jaundice.Retrospectively reviewed data from consecutive patients presenting with obstructive jaundice due to a pancreas mass at a tertiary referral hospital between April 2002 and November 2007 who underwent combined (under the same sedation and in the same room) or separate EUS and ERCP. Procedure duration, amount of sedative medication administered, ability to achieve biliary stent placement, and the diagnostic yield of EUS-FNA were evaluated.A total of 47 patients were evaluated: 29 patients underwent combined EUS and ERCP and 18 had separate procedures (median of 5 d between procedures). Stent placement at ERCP was successful in 72% combined procedures versus 88% separate ERCP. EUS-FNA diagnosis of malignancy was positive in 91.6% combined versus 87.5% separate. The only complication was self-limited melena after a combined procedure in 1 patient. The median time for combined procedures was 75 minutes versus 50 minutes for separate EUS and 50 minutes for ERCP.Combined EUS and ERCP can be performed under the same sedation with a median 25 minute greater procedure length and similarly high yields for diagnostic EUS-FNA. A nonsignificant trend toward lower biliary stent placement success rates with combined ERCP procedures merits further study. Benefits of a combined procedure may include expedited patient evaluation and the avoidance of repeated sedation.Diagnostic evaluation of CT and ERCP based on a retrospective analysis of hepato-biliary and pancreatic diseases.A retrospective analysis was performed in order to evaluate diagnostic accuracies by computed tomography (CT) and by endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP). Materials studied were 67 lesions out of 56 cases with hepato-biliary and pancreatic diseases confirmed mainly at surgery. Diagnostic accuracy of the CT & ERCP for the hepato-biliary lesions was 59.5% & 86.5% and that of CT & ERCP for the pancreatic lesions was 60% & 80% respectively. CT scan is useful for diagnosing abscess, cyst or tumors. On the contrary, lesions which invade the hepato-biliary tract or pancreatic duct can be readily diagnosed by ERCP examination. ERCP is less useful for the diagnosis of parenchymatous lesions or infiltration of lesions into the surrounding organs. Therefore, the combined use of both CT and ERCP is important for the diagnosis of hepato-biliary or pancreatic disease.Factors determining diagnostic yield of endoscopic ultrasound guided fine-needle aspiration for pancreatic cystic lesions: a multicentre Asian study.The purpose of this study was to determine (1) the diagnostic yield for endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in patients with pancreatic cystic lesions, (2) additional value of EUS-FNA over EUS alone in the diagnosis of pancreatic cysts, and (3) diagnostic sensitivity and specificity of EUS and EUS-FNA in the subset of patients where histopathology of surgical specimens were available.All patients who underwent EUS examination for the evaluation of pancreatic cystic lesions in six Asian centres were included in the study.Of 298 patients with pancreatic cysts who underwent EUS, 132 (44.3 %) underwent FNA. In the entire cohort, pseudocysts and intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) were the predominant cystic lesions. The cytologic yield of EUS-FNA was 47 %. On univariate analysis, factors associated with higher cytologic yield included vascular involvement on EUS, presence of solid cystic component, and increased number of needle passes during EUS-FNA. On multivariate analysis, presence of solid cystic components and increased number of needle passes during EUS-FNA were associated with higher diagnostic yield of EUS-FNA. For pancreatic cysts with a solid component, the diagnostic yield of EUS-FNA increased significantly from 44 % with one pass to 78 % with more than one pass (p = 0.016). In the absence of a solid component, the diagnostic yield was 29 % with one pass and was not significantly different from the diagnostic yield of 50 % with more than one pass, p = 0.081.The cytologic yield of EUS-FNA was 47 %. When a solid component was present in the cyst, doing more than one pass during EUS-FNA increased its diagnostic yield.Volumetric and morphological analysis of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas using computed tomography and magnetic resonance imaging.The purpose of this study was to predict the malignancy of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) based on data obtained by computed tomography and magnetic resonance imaging.Sixty-nine patients with IPMN underwent computed tomography, magnetic resonance imaging, and surgery. The tumors were classified pathologically as IPMN (adenoma), IPMN (in situ carcinoma), and invasive carcinoma derived from IPMN, and analyzed morphologically for the following characteristics: tumor size, main pancreatic duct (MPD) diameter, tumor area, MPD area, tumor volume, MPD volume, and intraductal volume (tumors volume + MPD volume).Main pancreatic duct diameter (P = 0.017) and intraductal volume (P = 0.0013) showed significant differences among IPMN (adenoma), IPMN (in situ carcinoma), and invasive carcinoma derived from IPMN. When IPMN (in situ carcinoma) and invasive carcinoma derived from IPMN were classified as malignant IPMN, an MPD diameter of 6 mm or more and an intraductal volume of 10 cm or more were set as cutoff levels predictive of malignancy using receiver operating characteristic curve analysis. On the basis of these criteria, the sensitivity and specificity for identifying malignancy in MPD were 83% and 59%, and those for intraductal volume were 70% and 73%, respectively.Intraductal volume (≥10 cm) determined by volumetric analysis is useful for diagnosis of malignant IPMN.Fluid CEA in IPMNs: A useful test or the flip of a coin?Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography in cystic lesions of the pancreas.There are few reports about magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) in cystic lesions of the pancreas (KLP). For this reason, we have undertaken a prospective study evaluating the diagnostic efficiency of MRCP as compared with ultrasonography. Twenty-four patients with KLP were examined with magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), and standard and cholangiopancreatography. There were seven cases of cysts associated with acute pancreatitis, 11 patients with KLP and chronic calcifying pancreatitis, five cases of cystic neoplasms of the pancreas, and one polycystic disease of the gland. All cases were first submitted to ultrasonography, which failed to diagnose only a case of cyst associated with chronic pancreatitis depicted by MRCP. We used a GE Signa Horizon 1.5-T system (20 examinations) and a Siemens Magneton Plus 1.5-T machine (four examinations). Eleven patients were operated on. In all cases, it was possible to identify the cysts, the main pancreatic duct and the biliary tree, and verify the relationship of the cyst with neighboring organs. Communication of the cyst with the main pancreatic duct was described in five instances, but we cannot be sure that MRCP would have depicted all cyst-duct communications. The MRI and MRCP images were confirmed by surgery in the 11 operated-on cases. The diagnosis of duct alterations and small pancreatic stones in initial cases of chronic calcifying pancreatitis may be problematic. Clinical findings are very important data to be considered in the differential diagnosis of KLP. Together with the clinical data, MRCP is a very important technique in the diagnostic and therapeutic decision making of KLP. Standard magnetic resonance is advisable as part of the examination in all cases. MRCP is not invasive, is reliable if one knows its limitations, and the patient can return at once to his activities. It allows the analysis of many variables in one examination, contributing to better therapy.Diagnosis of pancreatic cancer using fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (FDG PET) --usefulness and limitations in "clinical reality".The present review will provide an overview of the literature concerning the FDG PET diagnosis of pancreatic cancer and a summary from our experience of 231 cases of pancreatic lesions. FDG PET can effectively differentiate pancreatic cancer from benign lesion with high accuracy. Newly-developed PET scanners can detect small pancreatic cancers, up to 7 mm in diameter, by their high resolution, which could make a great contribution to the early detection of resectable and potentially curable pancreatic cancers. FDG PET is useful and cost-beneficial in the pre-operative staging of pancreatic cancer because an unexpected distant metastasis can be detected by whole-body PET in about 40% of the cases, which results in avoidance of unnecessary surgical procedures. FDG PET is also useful in evaluation of the treatment effect, monitoring after the operation and detection of recurrent pancreatic cancers. However, there are some drawbacks in PET diagnosis. A relatively wide overlap has been reported between semiquantitative uptake values obtained in cancers and those in inflammatory lesions. As for false-positive cases, active and chronic pancreatitis and autoimmune pancreatitis sometimes show high FDG accumulation and mimic pancreatic cancer with a shape of focal uptake. There were 8 false negative cases in the detection of pancreatic cancer by FDG PET, up to 33 mm in diameter, mainly because of their poor cellularity in cancer tissues. In addition, there are 19% of cancer cases with a decline in FDG uptake from 1 hr to 2 hr scan. FDG PET was recently applied to and was shown to be feasible in the differential diagnosis of cystic pancreatic lesions, such as intraductal papillary mucinous tumor of the pancreas. Further investigations are required to clarify the clinical value of FDG PET in predicting prognosis of the pancreatic patients.Diagnostic ability of EUS-FNA for pancreatic solid lesions with conventional 22-gauge needle using the slow pull technique: a prospective study.Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) using the slow pull technique (SP-FNA) has recently attracted attention as an effective tissue acquisition technique. However, efficacy of SP-FNA with a 22-gauge conventional needle remains unclear. The aim of this study is to evaluate the diagnostic ability of SP-FNA with a 22-gauge needle.Patients with a pancreatic solid lesion were prospectively enrolled in this study. SP-FNA was performed at two needle passes with a 22-gauge needle. One dedicated pathologist evaluated the obtained samples in terms of quantity (Grade 0: scant; Grade 1: inadequate; Grade 2: adequate), quality (Grade 0: poor; Grade 1: moderate; Grade 2: good), and blood contamination (Grade 0: significant; Grade 1: moderate; Grade 2: low), and provided a pathological diagnosis. Additional EUS-FNA was performed by applying suction (SA-FNA). The evaluation points were as follows: diagnostic accuracy of SP-FNA compared with that of SA-FNA, and the quantity, quality, and blood contamination level of SP-FNA-obtained samples.We enrolled 40 cases. The diagnostic accuracy of SP-FNA was 90% (36/40). There was no significant difference in the accuracy between SP-FNA and SA-FNA (90% vs. 90%, p = 1.000). The samples obtained using SP-FNA were assessed as Grade 2 for quantity in 29 cases (73%), quality in 31 (78%), and blood contamination in 25 (63%).Adequate, high-quality, and unsubstantially blood-contaminated samples could be obtained using SP-FNA. The diagnostic ability of SP-FNA was 90%, which appeared to be similar to that of SA-FNA.Branch duct IPMTs: value of cross-sectional imaging in the assessment of biological behavior and follow-up.Branch duct intraductal papillary mucinous tumors (IPMTs) are increasingly being described and represent a challenge for the physician. Recent imaging modalities, especially computed tomography and magnetic resonance, allow for a correct diagnosis, but IPMTs can manifest with different degrees of cellular atypia so it is very important to be able to establish the biological behavior of the lesion. Sixty-five patients were included in this study: 29 of them underwent surgery, and the other 36 were followed with cross-sectional imaging. Among patients who underwent surgery, 11 had benign lesions and 18 had malignant lesions. Overall sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy in the diagnosis of malignancy for all the cross-sectional imaging techniques were 61%, 81%, and 69%, respectively. Among patients who were followed and had a magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatographic diagnosis of branch duct IPMT with imaging features indicative of benignity, only two showed modifications over the follow-up period. Even considering some important biases (small number of patients and relatively short follow-up), interesting conclusions can be drawn: the imaging diagnosis of malignancy can be trusted, whereas that of benignity cannot be relied upon, but if the signs of malignancy are absent, the slow growth of the lesions justifies watchful follow-up in the correct clinical setting.Endoscopic ultrasound for diagnosis and staging of pancreatic tumors.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is proving to be a useful tool for evaluation of clinically suspected pancreatic masses unsatisfactorily evaluated by other means of imaging. We reviewed the records of 19 patients who had CT and EUS performed for clinically suspected pancreatic masses. Each patient had subsequent surgical exploration. Nineteen patients (11 females and 8 males) presenting with symptoms (11 with obstructive jaundice, 6 with abdominal pain and weight loss) or incidental CT findings suspicious for pancreatic carcinoma underwent EUS for further pancreatic evaluation. All of these patients had exploratory laparotomies, with 13 pancreaticoduodenectomies, 3 distal pancreatectomies and splenectomies, 1 bypass procedure, 1 open pancreatic and hepatic biopsy showing metastatic disease, and 1 open exploration with negative fine-needle aspiration biopsy. EUS correctly identified pancreatic neoplasms in 17 of 19 cases, with two false positives. The tumors included 15 adenocarcinomas, 1 microcystic adenoma, and 1 lymphoma. Node status was correctly predicted in 9 of 12 specimens. Nine of 12 tumors had accurate tumor staging by EUS. Absence of vascular invasion was accurately predicted in 13 of 14 cases. Two patients had metastatic disease discovered at laparotomy. All 19 patients had preoperative abdominal CT scans, with six of these negative for pancreatic masses. EUS is more sensitive than CT in detecting pancreatic masses and is more accurate than CT in locally staging pancreatic tumors. This higher sensitivity is important because those patients with earlier stage tumors are the most likely to benefit from resection.The prospective randomized, controlled trial of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration using 22G and 19G aspiration needles for solid pancreatic or peripancreatic masses.A large-caliber needle such as a 19-gauge needle may help overcome the limitations of a 22-gauge needle by acquiring a larger amount of tissue sample. However, there has been no well-designed comparative study for endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) with a 19-gauge aspiration needle. We conducted this study to compare the diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA using a 19-gauge aspiration needle with that using a 22-gauge aspiration needle in patients with solid pancreatic/peripancreatic mass.From March 2007 to April 2008, a total of 117 patients (60 in a 19-gauge needle group and 57 in a 22-gauge needle group) with solid pancreatic/peripancreatic mass were included. EUS-FNA was performed using the standard technique without an on-site cytopathologist. A single, blinded cytopathologist retrospectively evaluated each set of slides.The diagnostic accuracy by intention-to-treat analysis was not significantly different (19G: 86.7% vs. 22G: 78.9%, P=0.268). However, the diagnostic accuracy by per-protocol analysis, excluding technical failures, was significantly higher in the 19-gauge needle group (94.5% vs. 78.9%, P=0.015). In the treatment-received group that included crossover cases, although the diagnostic accuracy in all cases was not significantly different (86.1% vs. 76.9%, P=0.164), that of body/tail lesion (95.0% vs. 76.7%, P=0.031) and technically successful cases (93.9% vs. 78.1%, P=0.006) were significantly higher in the 19-gauge needle group. On sample quality analysis, the amount of cellular material obtained was significantly higher in the 19-gauge needle group (P=0.033).EUS-FNA with a 19-gauge aspiration needle may be a valuable method for the diagnosis of pancreatic/peripancreatic masses when an on-site cytopathologist is not available.Incremental value of cell block preparations over conventional smears alone in the evaluation of EUS-FNA for pancreatic masses.The effectiveness of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) has been established for a definite pathological diagnosis of pancreatic solid masses. We investigated the usefulness of cell block preparations in EUS-FNA, by evaluating the added value of cell block preparations over conventional smears alone.Between March 2011 and June 2013, 61 patients were retrospectively evaluated who underwent EUS-FNA for pancreatic solid masses. Diagnostic values for diagnosing pancreatic malignancy were compared for a combination of the conventional smear and cell block (CSCB) and the conventional smear alone (CS).The addition of the cell block technique increased the sensitivity of conventional smear for diagnosing the pancreatic malignancy from 79% (CS) to 90% (CSCB, p=0.0313) and the accuracy from 81% to 91% (p=0.0313). The specificity and positive predictive value were 100% in both methods. The negative predictive value was increased from 33% (CS) to 50% (CSCB), but this difference was not statistically significant (p=0.0833).The addition of the cell block method after a conventional smear may increase the sensitivity and negative predictive value for diagnosing the pancreatic malignancy in patients with pancreatic masses who undergo EUS-FNA. Further study may be warranted to determine whether the cell block method can replace the conventional smear.Pancreatic cystic lesions: discrimination accuracy based on clinical data and high-resolution computed tomographic features.To determine the frequency of typical features of pancreatic cystic lesions on high-resolution computed tomography and the combination of features that best influences discrimination.Ten computed tomography features of 100 proven pancreatic cystic lesions were retrospectively tabulated by 2 blinded imagers. After final diagnosis was revealed, each lesion was categorized as typical or atypical. Stepwise multivariable logistic regression was used to determine which of 10 imaging and 4 clinical features significantly distinguished between benign and malignant lesions.There were 38 benign cysts and 62 cystic tumors. Serous lesions presented with greater than 6 cysts (83%) and cysts of less than 2 cm (44%). Mucinous lesions presented with cysts of 2 cm or greater (82%) and less than 6 cysts (64%). Pseudocysts, serous, and mucinous lesions presented typically in 77%, 67%, and 64% of cases, respectively. The significant variables in classifying malignant lesions are pancreatitis history, cyst size, symptoms, and calcification pattern (area under the curve, 0.837).Four specific imaging and clinical features in combination best predict a malignant lesion.Quantitative endoscopic ultrasound elastography: an accurate method for the differentiation of solid pancreatic masses.Qualitative endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) elastography is an accurate but subjective tool for the differential diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses. Second-generation EUS elastography allows quantitative analysis of tissue stiffness. We evaluated the accuracy of quantitative, second-generation EUS elastography in the differential diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses.The study included 86 consecutive patients who underwent EUS for the evaluation of solid pancreatic masses. EUS elastography was performed with the linear Pentax EUS and the Hitachi EUB900. Representative areas from the mass (A) and soft reference areas (B) were analyzed. The result of the elastographic evaluation was defined by the quotient B/A (strain ratio). Final diagnosis was based on histology of surgical specimens and cytology of EUS-fine-needle aspiration samples. The diagnostic accuracy of EUS elastography in detecting malignancy was calculated using receiver operating curve analysis.The mean size of the pancreatic masses was 31.4 ± 12.3 mm. The final diagnoses were pancreatic adenocarcinoma (n = 49), inflammatory mass (n = 27), malignant neuroendocrine tumor (n = 6), metastatic oat-cell lung cancer (n = 2), pancreatic lymphoma (n = 1), and pancreatic solid pseudopapillary tumor (n = 1). The strain ratio was significantly higher among patients with pancreatic malignant tumors compared with those with inflammatory masses. The sensitivity and specificity of strain ratio for detecting pancreatic malignancies were 100% and 92.9%, respectively (area under the receiver operating curve, 0.983).Quantitative, second-generation EUS elastography is useful for differential diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses. It allows for a quantitative and objective evaluation of tissue stiffness, which indicates the malignant or benign nature of the pancreatic lesion.[18 F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography for characterization and initial staging of pancreatic tumors].To evaluate positron emission tomography (PET) with (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) for characterizing and initial staging of pancreatic tumors and to determine its impact on therapeutic strategy.This study included 24 patients with pancreatic tumor who underwent PET before treatment. Twenty-two patients had a malignant tumor and two had a benign tumor. The PET scan was performed after intravenous injection of FDG with a gamma camera. PET findings were compared with histology of the pancreatic tumor (n=24), liver metastases (n=5), peritoneal metastases (n=5), and lymph node metastases (n=5). Absence of metastasis or lymph node involvement was determined by surgery or by CT scan, ultrasonography, magnetic resonance imaging and at least two months follow-up.The sensitivity of the PET scans to identify pancreatic carcinoma was 64% (95% confidence interval 44-84%). PET scans could not be interpreted for lymph node involvement adjacent to the tumor. For liver metastases, the PET scan was positive in 3 out of 5 patients. For peritoneal metastases, the PET scan was positive in 4 out of 5 patients but was doubtful in one. There were two false positives. Among the 4 cystic tumors, the PET scan was positive for 2 malignant tumors and negative for 2 benign tumors. Surgical strategy was modified in only one of the 24 patients on the basis of PET findings.The sensitivity of PET for the diagnosis of primary malignant pancreatic tumor was found to be low. The contribution of FDG-PET to the surgical decision appears to be limited to the detection of metastases or lymph node involvement distant from the tumor, contraindicating surgery. Nevertheless, the sensitivity of FDG-PET is lower than that of laparoscopy for peritoneal metastases. Indications for PET should be included in an evaluation of therapeutic decision making and cost analysis.Small solid tumors (< or = 2 cm) of the pancreas: relative accuracy and differentiation of CT and MR imaging.To determine the relative accuracy of CT and MRI in characterization of solid pancreatic masses (< or = 2cm) and useful imaging appearance for differentiating small pancreatic duct adenocarcinoma (PDAC) from other small solid pancreatic neoplasms.CT and MRI scans of 46 patients with evidence of small pancreatic solid tumor were retrospectively evaluated, who underwent CT (n=30), MRI (n=4), or both (n=12). Two gastrointestinal radiologists independently recorded specific morphological features of tumors and the most likely diagnosis.With respect to specific histopathological characterization, CT and MRI were equally accurate. The mean number of correct diagnoses made by the two reviewers was 37.5 (88.4%) of 42 cases for CT compared to 12 (75%) of 16 cases for MRI (p=0.388). Location in the pancreatic head (p=0.000), presence of dilatation of MPD (p=0.000), presence of dilatation of CBD (p=0.001) and enhancement pattern (p=0.000) were statistically significant for differentiating PDAC from the other small solid pancreatic tumors, while pancreatic atrophy (p=0.069) was statistically inadequate for differentiation, although it gave a 96.4% specificity for the diagnosis of PDAC.CT and MRI are similarly accurate in the characterization of small solid pancreatic tumors. Small PDAC has characteristic CT and MRI findings that differentiate it from other small solid tumors.Pancreatic tissue sampling guided by EUS, CT/US, and surgery: a comparison of sensitivity and specificity.Needle aspiration of the pancreas is performed to differentiate pancreatic malignancy, focal chronic pancreatitis, and metastasis to the pancreas. Biopsies may be directed by using EUS, CT, US, or surgery. This study retrospectively compared the accuracy of EUS-guided, CT/US-guided, and surgical tissue sampling of the pancreas over a 5-year period.The records of patients undergoing pancreatic tissue sampling were reviewed for a final clinical diagnosis based on the results of cytology, histology, and clinical history. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of each technique were calculated.One hundred forty-nine tissue samples (68 EUS-guided, 70 CT/US-guided, 11 surgical) from 128 patients were compared. There was no significant difference in accuracy rates for EUS (76.4%), CT/US (81.4%), and surgically guided (81.8%) specimens. EUS was used when masses were smaller (2.6 +/- 0.1 cm) as compared with CT/US (3.4 +/- 0.2 cm, p < 0.001) and surgery (2.9 +/- 0.4 cm, p = 0.49). In univariate analyses, factors associated with greater accuracy regardless of technique were as follows: (1) older age, (2) larger size of the mass, and (3) participation by a cytologist during the procedure. A subsequent multivariate logistic regression analysis, in which the examination of the effect of each factor controls for the effect of each of the other factors, found that only older age was a significant predictor of accuracy.EUS-guided tissue sampling of pancreatic masses is as accurate as CT/US-guided sampling and surgical biopsies.Does on-site adequacy assessment by cytotechnologists improve results of EUS guided FNA of solid pancreaticobiliary lesions?Rapid onsite adequacy assessment is stated to improve the diagnostic performance of EUS-FNA.The aim of this study was to establish if the introduction of adequacy assessment performed by a biomedical scientist (cytotechnologist) to an established EUS service improved the diagnostic accuracy of EUS guided FNA of solid pancreaticobiliary lesions.This retrospective study includes all patients with solid pancreaticobiliary lesions who underwent EUS-FNA from April 2009 to September 2010. An in room cytotechnologist was present for 2 out of the 4 weekly EUS lists and therefore there were two groups identified: Group 1, cytotechnologist absent; and Group 2, cytotechnologist present.There were 82 patients in Group 1 and 97 patients in Group 2. There was no statistically significant difference in the number of passes (4.1 vs. 4.3), the inadequate aspirate rate (7.3% vs. 5.1%) or the mean size of the lesions (34.7 vs. 32.6 mm) between the groups. The accuracy, sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value in Group 1 were 89%, 88%, 100%, 100% and 50% respectively. The results in Group 2 were 91%, 90%, 100%, 100% and 69% respectively. There was no statistically significant difference between the two groups.In this study the adequacy assessment performed by a cytotechnologist did not improve the diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA. In an established EUS-FNA service with low inadequate aspirate rates, onsite adequacy assessment may not improve results of the test.Strategy for differentiating autoimmune pancreatitis from pancreatic cancer.It is of utmost importance that autoimmune pancreatitis (AIP) be differentiated from pancreatic cancer (PC) because some AIP cases undergo unnecessary laparotomy or pancreatic resection on suspicion of PC. This study aimed to develop an appropriate strategy for differentiating between AIP and PC.Clinical, serological, and radiological features of 17 AIP patients forming a masslike lesion on pancreas head and 70 patients with pancreatic head cancer were compared.Numerous findings can be used to distinguish between AIP and PC, and the following are more likely in AIP: fluctuating jaundice; elevated serum IgG4 levels; delayed enhancement of the enlarged pancreas and a capsule-like low-density rim on computed tomography; long or skipped narrowed portion with side branches of the main pancreatic duct without upstream dilatation on endoscopic retrograde pancreatography, extrapancreatic lesions, such as stenosis of the intrahepatic bile duct, salivary gland swelling, and retroperitoneal mass; and responsiveness to steroid therapy.In elderly male patients presenting with obstructive jaundice and a pancreatic mass, AIP should be considered in the differential diagnosis. Based on a combination of clinical, serological, and radiological findings, AIP can be differentiated from PC. An algorithm for management of patients with a masslike lesion on pancreas head is presented.Evaluation of pancreatic tumors with positron emission tomography and F-18 fluorodeoxyglucose: comparison with CT and US.To assess the clinical value of positron emission tomography (PET) with fluorine-18-labeled fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) for identification of pancreatic carcinoma.Forty-six patients suspected of having a pancreatic neoplasm and who were to undergo surgery prospectively underwent FDG PET, computed tomography (CT), and transabdominal ultrasound (US). Endoscopic US was performed in 40 patients. Images were independently interpreted and compared with the histopathologic findings at surgery (41 patients) or with clinical follow-up findings (five patients).In 33 of 35 patients, foci of pancreatic carcinomas (10-100 mm in diameter) were identified as an increase in FDG uptake, whereas CT, transabdominal US, and endoscopic US depicted the foci in 31, 31, and 28, cases, respectively. Among 11 benign lesions, nine showed no increased FDG uptake (specificity = 82%). Specificities of the other modalities were lower. False-positive findings were obtained in a case of chronic active pancreatitis and in a serous cystadenoma.FDG PET, which provides "biochemical" information, is accurate in identifying pancreatic carcinoma and may be a method of choice when imaging equivocal masses detected with other "anatomic" imaging studies.Fine-needle aspiration biopsy of solid pancreatic masses: comparison of CT and endoscopic sonography guidance.Imaging-guided biopsies of solid pancreatic masses are performed with either CT or endoscopic sonography at our institution. We compared test characteristics of fine-needle aspiration biopsies guided using CT with those guided using endoscopic sonography and secondarily evaluated for an effect of mass size.Of 70 solid pancreatic masses, 43 (mean size, 4.4 cm; range, 1.5-10.3 cm) underwent fine-needle (20- to 22-gauge) aspiration biopsy with CT guidance and 27 (mean size, 2.3 cm; range, 1.0-5.0 cm) underwent fine-needle (22-gauge) aspiration biopsy with endoscopic sonography guidance. The diagnostic rate, sensitivity, and negative predictive value (NPV) for each technique were compared using Fisher's exact test before and after stratifying masses by size as small (< or = 3 cm) or large (> 3 cm).The overall diagnostic rate, sensitivity, and NPV of fine-needle aspiration biopsies guided using CT (97.7%, 94.9%, and 60%, respectively) were not significantly different from those guided using endoscopic sonography (88.9%, 85%, and 57.1%, respectively). Among small masses, the diagnostic rate and sensitivity for biopsies guided using CT (100% and 100%, respectively) were not significantly different from those for biopsies guided using endoscopic sonography (90.9% and 93.8%, respectively). Among large masses, the diagnostic rate and sensitivity (96.6% and 92.3%, respectively) for biopsies guided using CT were not significantly different from those for biopsies guided using endoscopic sonography (83.3% and 50%, respectively).When biopsying solid pancreatic masses with fine needles, procedures guided with CT and those guided with endoscopic sonography have similar test characteristics regardless of mass size.Diagnosis of pancreatic cancer-EUS/FNA to the rescue?Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy of patients with suspected pancreatic cancer: diagnostic accuracy and acute and 30-day complications.The aims of this study were to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in patients with suspected pancreatic cancer, and to assess immediate, acute, and 30-day complications related to EUS-FNA.All patients with suspected pancreatic cancer were prospectively evaluated. A single gastroenterologist performed all EUS-FNAs in the presence of a cytopathologist. Immediate complications were evaluated in all patients. An experienced nurse called patients 24-72 h and 30 days after the procedure. Reference standard for the classification of the final diagnosis included: surgery (n = 48), clinical or imaging follow-up (n = 63), or death from the disease (n = 47).A total of 158 patients (mean age 62.3 yr) underwent EUS-FNA during the study period. The mean tumor size was 32 x 26 mm. The median number of passes was three (range one to 10). Of these patients, 44% had at least one failed attempt at tissue diagnosis before EUS-FNA. The sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV, and accuracy of EUS-FNA in solid pancreatic masses were 84.3%, 97%, 99%, 64%, and 84%, respectively. Immediate self-limited complications occurred in 10 of the 158 EUS-FNAs (6.3%). Of 90 patients contacted at 24-72 h, 78 patients (87%) responded. Of the 90 patients, 20 (22%) reported at least one symptom, all of which were minor except in three cases (one self-limited acute pancreatitis and two emergency room visits, one of which led to admission). In all, 83 patients were contacted at 30 days, and 82% responded. No additional or continued complications were reported.EUS-FNA is highly accurate in identifying patients with suspected pancreatic cancer, especially when other modalities have failed. Major complications after EUS-FNA are rare, and minor complications are similar to those reported for upper endoscopy. It seems that follow-up at 1 wk might capture all of the adverse events related to EUS-FNA.Preoperative local MRI-staging of patients with a suspected pancreatic mass.The aim of this study was to define the value of MRI of the pancreas for preoperative local staging of patients with a suspected pancreatic mass. Ninety-four patients (41 women, 53 men; age range 32-87 years) with a suspected pancreatic tumor underwent preoperative staging with MRI on a 1.5-T system. The MRI protocol included breath-hold MR cholangiopancreatography in turbo spin-echo technique, biphasic contrast-enhanced 3D MR angiography, and MRI of the upper abdomen with breath-hold T2-weighted half-Fourier acquired single-shot turbo spin-echo and T1-weighted fast-low-angle-shot (pre- and postcontrast) sequences. Data were collected prospectively and analyzed by two radiologists in agreement modality. Evaluation criteria were vascular involvement, resectability, and a characterization benign vs malignant. Results were compared to histopathology in 78 patients. Sixteen patients were followed-up. In 74 of 94 patients a solid tumor or an inflammation of the pancreas ( n=62) or the papilla ( n=12) was detected. In this group, MRI had a sensitivity of 98%, a specificity of 92%, and an accuracy of 96% in the characterization of malignant tumors. Regarding only the solid tumors, the positive predictive value of MRI was 87% with respect to resectability. Other pathologic findings included adenoma or inflammation of the duodenum ( n=5), carcinoma or benign stenosis of the choledochus duct ( n=7) and carcinoma of the gall bladder ( n=2). In 6 patients MRI did not depict any pathologic findings, and follow-up confirmed this interpretation. Magnetic resonance imaging allows a local preoperative staging in patients with suspected pancreatic tumor. Limitations, however, concern to the diagnostics of peritoneal and/or liver metastases.Neural network analysis of dynamic sequences of EUS elastography used for the differential diagnosis of chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic cancer.EUS elastography is a newly developed imaging procedure that characterizes the differences of hardness and strain between diseased and normal tissue.To assess the accuracy of real-time EUS elastography in pancreatic lesions.Cross-sectional feasibility study.The study group included, in total, 68 patients with normal pancreas (N = 22), chronic pancreatitis (N = 11), pancreatic adenocarcinoma (N = 32), and pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (N = 3). A subgroup analysis of 43 cases with focal pancreatic masses was also performed.A postprocessing software analysis was used to examine the EUS elastography movies by calculating hue histograms of each individual image, data that were further subjected to an extended neural network analysis to differentiate benign from malignant patterns.To differentiate normal pancreas, chronic pancreatitis, pancreatic cancer, and neuroendocrine tumors.Based on a cutoff of 175 for the mean hue histogram values recorded on the region of interest, the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of differentiation of benign and malignant masses were 91.4%, 87.9%, and 89.7%, respectively. The positive and negative predictive values were 88.9% and 90.6%, respectively. Multilayer perceptron neural networks with both one and two hidden layers of neurons (3-layer perceptron and 4-layer perceptron) were trained to learn how to classify cases as benign or malignant, and yielded an excellent testing performance of 95% on average, together with a high training performance that equaled 97% on average.A lack of the surgical standard in all cases.EUS elastography is a promising method that allows characterization and differentiation of normal pancreas, chronic pancreatitis, and pancreatic cancer. The currently developed methodology, based on artificial neural network processing of EUS elastography digitalized movies, enabled an optimal prediction of the types of pancreatic lesions. Future multicentric, randomized studies with adequate power will have to establish the clinical impact of this procedure for the differential diagnosis of focal pancreatic masses.EUS elastography for the characterization of solid pancreatic masses.Differential diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses remains a challenge. EUS elastography, by analyzing tissue stiffness of the mass, may be of help in this setting.To evaluate the different elastographic patterns of solid pancreatic masses and the diagnostic accuracy of EUS elastography for malignancy.Prospective, consecutive, descriptive study with a second blind evaluation of elastographic patterns for concordance analysis and use of a well-defined reference method for calculation of diagnostic accuracy.This study involved 130 consecutive patients with solid pancreatic masses and 20 controls with normal pancreases.EUS elastography was performed by using a linear Pentax echoendoscope and Hitachi EUB-8500 US.Elastographic patterns of solid pancreatic masses and accuracy of the technique for malignancy.Mean (SD) size of the masses was 30.9 (12.5) mm. The final diagnosis was malignant tumor in 78 patients, inflammatory mass in 42 patients, and neuroendocrine tumor in 10 patients. Four elastographic patterns were described, with a high concordance among 2 blinded investigators. A green-predominant pattern, either homogeneous or heterogeneous, excluded malignancy with a high accuracy. On the contrary, a blue-predominant pattern, either homogeneous or heterogeneous, supported the diagnosis of malignant tumor. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and overall accuracy of EUS elastography for diagnosis of malignancy were 100%, 85.5%, 90.7%, 100%, and 94.0%, respectively.Single-center study.EUS elastography is a useful tool for differential diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses. It provides specific patterns supporting the benign or malignant nature of the disease.Cytologic criteria for well differentiated adenocarcinoma of the pancreas in fine-needle aspiration biopsy specimens.Fine-needle aspiration biopsy (FNAB) of pancreatic lesions has become popular to establish a tissue diagnosis before chemotherapy and/or surgery. The diagnostic sensitivity and specificity of FNAB have improved as a result of several articles regarding cytologic criteria for pancreatic adenocarcinoma. However, false-negative and "suspicious for malignancy" rates remain relatively high, in part because of the underdiagnosis of well differentiated adenocarcinoma (WDA). Existing cytologic criteria do not specifically focus on WDA. In this study, the authors attempt to add to, redefine, and test cytologic criteria for WDA of the pancreas in FNAB specimens.The authors retrospectively reviewed the specimens of 291 consecutive computed tomography-guided FNABs of pancreatic lesions performed at the study institution between 1995 and 1999. The original cytologic diagnoses were confirmed by cell blocks (131), surgical tissue (84), or clinical follow-up. The FNAB specimens were evaluated for the presence of 10 cytologic criteria: 1) anisonucleosis, 2) nuclear membrane irregularity, 3) nuclear crowding/overlapping/three-dimensionality, 4) nuclear enlargement (if there are more than two red blood cells), 5) gap versus confluent cell spacing, 6) hyperchromasia, 7) macronucleoli, 8) mitosis, 9) chromatin clearing, and 10) necrosis.The original cytologic diagnoses were nondiagnostic in 24 cases, benign in 27, suspicious for malignancy in 15, and malignant in 225. Among the 225 malignant lesions, 74 cases were diagnosed as WDA. Cytologic criteria 1-4 were observed in 92-99% of WDA cases, whereas criteria 5-10 were present in only 7-38% of WDA cases. Six of 15 suspicious and 4 of 27 negative cases were of low cellularity but retrospectively met the cytologic criteria 1-4 for WDA (the diagnosis was confirmed on clinical follow-up).The diagnosis of pancreatic WDA can be made in FNAB specimens by the observance of anisonucleosis, nuclear membrane irregularity, nuclear crowding/overlapping/three-dimensionality, and nuclear enlargement. Necrosis, chromatin clearing, mitosis, macronucleoli, and hyperchromasia are of limited diagnostic significance because they are commonly absent in pancreatic WDA.Tumoral and nontumoral pancreas: correlation between quantitative dynamic contrast-enhanced MR imaging and histopathologic parameters.To prospectively determine whether dynamic contrast material-enhanced (DCE) magnetic resonance (MR) quantitative parameters correlate with fibrosis and microvascular density (MVD) in malignant and benign solid pancreatic focal lesions and nontumoral pancreatic tissue.The institutional review board approved the study; written informed consent was obtained. DCE MR was performed in 28 patients with surgically resectable focal pancreatic lesions. DCE MR quantitative parameters derived from one-compartment (OC) (transfer rate constant [K(trans)] and distribution fraction [ƒ]) and two-compartment (TC) (K(trans), tissue volume fraction occupied by extravascular extracellular space [v(i)], and tissue volume fraction occupied by vascular space [v(p)]) pharmacokinetic models were correlated with fibrosis content and MVD counts in focal lesions and nontumoral tissue (Spearman correlation coefficient [SCC]). Pharmacokinetic parameters were compared (Mann-Whitney test) between tumoral and nontumoral tissue. Diagnostic performance of DCE MR fibrosis detection was assessed (receiver operator characteristic curve analysis).K(trans) OC and K(trans) TC were significantly lower in primary malignant tumors compared with benign lesions (P = .023) and nontumoral pancreatic tissue downstream (P < .001) and upstream (P = .006); ƒ and v(i) were significantly higher in primary malignant tumors compared with nontumoral pancreatic tissue downstream (P = .012 and .018, respectively). Fibrosis was correlated negatively with K(trans) OC (SCC, -0.600) and K(trans) TC (SCC, -0.564) and positively with ƒ (SCC, 0.514) and v(i) (SCC, 0.464), with P < .001 (all comparisons). MVD was positively correlated with ƒ (SCC, 0.355; P = .019) and v(i) (SCC, 0.297; P = .038) but not with K(trans) OC (SCC, -0.140; P = .33) and K(trans) TC (SCC, -0.194; P = .181). Sensitivity and specificity for fibrosis detection were 65% (24 of 37) and 83% (10 of 12) for K(trans) OC (cutoff value, 0.35 min(-1)) and 76% (28 of 37) and 83% (10 of 12) for K(trans) TC (cutoff value, 0.29 min(-1)), respectively.Quantitative DCE MR parameters, derived from pharmacokinetic models in malignant and benign pancreatic solid lesions and nontumoral pancreatic tissue, were significantly correlated with fibrosis and MVD.http://radiology.rsna.org/lookup/suppl/doi:10.1148/radiol.11103515/-/DC1.Can EUS alone differentiate between malignant and benign cystic lesions of the pancreas?Differentiation of pancreatic cancer and chronic pancreatitis using computer-aided diagnosis of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) images: a diagnostic test.Differentiating pancreatic cancer (PC) from normal tissue by computer-aided diagnosis of EUS images were quite useful. The current study was designed to investigate the feasibility of using computer-aided diagnostic (CAD) techniques to extract EUS image parameters for the differential diagnosis of PC and chronic pancreatitis (CP).This study recruited 262 patients with PC and 126 patients with CP. Typical EUS images were selected from the sample sets. Texture features were extracted from the region of interest using computer-based techniques. Then the distance between class algorithm and sequential forward selection (SFS) algorithm were used for a better combination of features; and, later, a support vector machine (SVM) predictive model was built, trained, and validated. Overall, 105 features of 9 categories were extracted from the EUS images for pattern classification. Of these features, the 16 were selected as a better combination of features. Then, SVM predictive model was built and trained. The total cases were randomly divided into a training set and a testing set. The training set was used to train the SVM, and the testing set was used to evaluate the performance of the SVM. After 200 trials of randomised experiments, the average accuracy, sensitivity, specificity, the positive and negative predictive values of pancreatic cancer were 94.2±0.1749%,96.25±0.4460%, 93.38±0.2076%, 92.21±0.4249% and 96.68±0.1471%, respectively.Digital image processing and computer-aided EUS image differentiation technologies are highly accurate and non-invasive. This technology provides a kind of new and valuable diagnostic tool for the clinical determination of PC.A comparative study of endoscopic ultrasound guided fine needle aspiration with and without a stylet.Despite lack of evidence, use of a stylet during endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is assumed to improve the quality and diagnostic yield of specimens.The purpose of this study was to compare EUS-FNA specimens obtained with stylet (S+) and without stylet (S-) for: (i) cellularity, contamination, adequacy, and amount of blood and (ii) diagnostic yield of malignancy.Patients who underwent EUS-FNA of solid lesions by two experienced endosonographers at a tertiary referral center using a 22-gauge FNA needle with suction were included. Stylet was used for all EUS-FNA procedures performed between January 2006 and September 2007 and no stylet was used between October 2007 and April 2009 allowing comparison between the two techniques. Cytology slides were retrieved, de-identified and evaluated by two experienced cytopathologists blinded to FNA technique. Slides were evaluated for cellularity, degree of contamination, adequacy, amount of blood and cytologic diagnosis. Fisher's exact and unpaired t-test were used for comparative analysis.A total of 162 patients with 228 lesions were included. FNA of 106 and 122 lesions each was performed in the S+ and S- groups, respectively. FNA sites included pancreas [41 (18%)], lymph node [125 (55%)], liver [20 (9%)], adrenal [21 (9%)] and others [21 (9%)]. No significant differences in the cellularity (P=0.37), contamination (P=0.18), significant blood (P=0.42) and adequacy of specimen (P=0.45) were found between S+ and S- specimens. There was no statistically significant difference in the diagnostic yield of malignant lesions (P=0.48).The use of stylet during FNA does not appear to confer any advantage with regards to the adequacy of specimen or diagnostic yield of malignancy.EUS FNA in intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas.There is little information concerning the potential role of fine-needle aspiration guided by endoscopic ultrasonography in the pathologic diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas.Patients with an intraductal papillary mucinous tumor of the pancreas suggested by endoscopic ultrasonography underwent fine-needle aspiration guided by endoscopic ultrasonography in order to investigate the presence of mucin and/or cytologic changes consistent with this diagnosis. A group of 111 patients with other pancreatic lesions explored during the same period of time was used as a control group.Fine-needle aspiration guided by endoscopic ultrasonography was safely performed in 19 patients and supported the diagnosis in 17 of them. Nine out of the 17 patients with suspicion of intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas went to surgery and this diagnosis was confirmed in the resected specimen in all of them. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and accuracy of EUS FNA in the diagnosis of IPMT were 82%, 100%, 100%, 92% and 94% respectively.Fine-needle aspiration guided by endoscopic ultrasonography is a good technique to support the diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas and should be considered in this group of patients if pathologic confirmation is judged to be necessary.Accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration cytology on the differentiation of malignant and benign pancreatic cystic lesions: a single-center experience.The aim was to compare the use of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in cytology and the biochemical analysis of cyst fluid, together with the size of the lesion in the differentiation between benign and malignant pancreatic cystic lesions.Data of patients who underwent EUS-FNA for pancreatic cystic lesions in our center from January 2006 to October 2010 were retrospectively analyzed. The diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA was determined.Of the 56 patients, 37 (66.1%) had evaluable cytology for diagnosis and sufficient cyst fluid was available for biochemical analysis in 58.9% (33/56) of the patients. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of EUS-FNA for detecting malignancy were 63%, 100%, 100% and 85%, respectively. EUS-FNA was the most accurate diagnostic method for differentiating malignant and benign pancreatic cystic lesions (88%). Cyst fluid carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) > 365 ng/mL had a sensitivity of 100% for the detection of malignant cystic lesions.Although the rate of insufficient cyst fluid aspiration is high, the combination of cytological evaluation and CEA analysis of cyst fluid obtained by EUS-FNA is accurate in differentiating malignant cystic lesions from benign ones. Safe techniques are essential to improve the yield of cyst fluid aspiration by EUS.Differential diagnosis between chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic cancer: a prospective study of 156 patients.The aim of this study was to evaluate prospectively the efficacy of different imaging methods in differentiating between chronic pancreatitis and cancer in focal pancreatic lesions and staging of adenocarcinoma. MATERIAL AND METHODS. Between June 2005 and October 2007, 156 consecutive patients were enrolled into the prospective clinical trial. The patients were randomized into two groups. Ultrasonoscopy and endoscopic ultrasound were performed in both the groups. Group A patients were additionally examined by computed tomography and tumor marker assay, while in the group B, intraoperative ultrasonoscopy with biopsy and urgent histological examination were done. Results of each imaging technique regarding differential diagnosis and cancer stage were compared with the findings of surgical and histological examination. RESULTS. Chronic pancreatitis and adenocarcinoma were documented in 58 (37.2%) and 78 (50%) patients, respectively. The size of the lesions and clinical presentation were similar in both the groups, but cancer patients were older than patients with pancreatitis (P<0.001). Preoperatively endosonoscopy had the highest accuracy in assessing differential diagnosis (92.1%) and adenocarcinoma (91.8%), whereas computed tomography had the highest accuracy in assessing tumor size (84.5%) and transabdominal ultrasonography in assessing lymph node involvement (78.9%) and distant metastases (88.6%). Intraoperative ultrasound was the most accurate imaging technique in the assessment of differential diagnosis (100%), adenocarcinoma (98.5%), extent of primary tumor (84.8%), lymph node involvement (87.9%), and distant metastases (100%). CONCLUSIONS. In the differential diagnosis between chronic pancreatitis and adenocarcinoma, preoperative ultrasonography and intraoperative ultrasound are the best imaging methods. When ultrasonography is nondiagnostic, computed tomography and endoscopic ultrasound are alternative techniques.Core needle versus standard needle for endoscopic ultrasound-guided biopsy of solid pancreatic masses: a randomized crossover study.A new core biopsy needle for endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided sampling has recently been developed. The aim of this prospective multicenter study was to compare this needle with a standard needle in patients with solid pancreatic masses.Consecutive patients with solid pancreatic masses referred to 17 centers for EUS-guided sampling were included. Each patient had two passes with a standard 22G needle and a single pass with a 22G core needle performed in a randomized order. Samples from both needles were separately processed for liquid-based cytology and cell-block preparation and were assessed independently by two blinded expert pathologists. The primary endpoint was the accuracy of the detection of malignancy. The reference standard was based on further cytohistological analysis obtained under ultrasound or computed tomography scanning, endoscopic or surgical guidance, and/or by clinical follow-up with repeated imaging examinations for at least 12 months. The secondary endpoints were the rate of technical failure and the quality of the cytohistological samples obtained.Of the 80 patients included (49 men; mean age 67.1 ± 11.1), 87.5 % had final malignant diagnoses (adenocarcinoma n = 62, 77.5 %). There was no difference between the needles in diagnostic accuracy (standard needle 92.5 % vs. core needle 90 %; P = 0.68) or technical failure. Both pathologists found the overall sample quality significantly better for the standard needle (expert 1, P = 0.009; expert 2, P = 0.002).The diagnostic accuracy of EUS sampling for solid pancreatic masses using standard and core needles seems comparable but with a better overall histological sample quality for the former. ClinicalTrial.gov identifier: NCT01479803.Core biopsy needle versus standard aspiration needle for endoscopic ultrasound-guided sampling of solid pancreatic masses: a randomized parallel-group study.An endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine needle biopsy (EUS-FNB) device using a core biopsy needle was developed to improve diagnostic accuracy by simultaneously obtaining cytological aspirates and histological core samples. We prospectively compared the diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNB with standard EUS-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in patients with solid pancreatic masses.Between January 2012 and May 2013, consecutive patients with solid pancreatic masses were prospectively enrolled and randomized to undergo EUS-FNB using a core biopsy needle or EUS-FNA using a standard aspiration needle at a single tertiary center. The specimen was analyzed by onsite cytology, Papanicolaou-stain cytology, and histology. The main outcome measure was diagnostic accuracy for malignancy. The secondary outcome measures were: the median number of passes required to establish a diagnosis, the proportion of patients in whom the diagnosis was established with each pass, and complication rates.The overall accuracy of combining onsite cytology with Papanicolaou-stain cytology and histology was not significantly different for the FNB (n = 58) and FNA (n = 58) groups (98.3 % [95 %CI 94.9 % - 100 %] vs. 94.8 % [95 %CI 91.9 % - 100 %]; P = 0.671). Compared with FNA, FNB required a significantly lower median number of needle passes to establish a diagnosis (1.0 vs. 2.0; P < 0.001). On subgroup analysis of 111 patients with malignant lesions, the proportion of patients in whom malignancy was diagnosed on the first pass was significantly greater in the FNB group (72.7 % vs. 37.5 %; P < 0.001).The overall accuracy of FNB and FNA in patients with solid pancreatic masses was comparable; however, fewer passes were required to establish the diagnosis of malignancy using FNB.This study was registered on the UMIN Clinical Trial Registry (UMIN000014057).Differentiation of benign and malignant solid pseudopapillary neoplasms of the pancreas.The aim of this study was to investigate differential imaging features between benign and malignant solid pseudopapillary neoplasms (SPN) of the pancreas on computed tomographic and magnetic resonance imagings.Between January 2001 and January 2007, we identified 30 patients with confirmed SPN by surgery. The computed tomographic and magnetic resonance images were reviewed by 3 radiologists in consensus. Each tumor was analyzed for the following categories: location of tumor, tumor margin, proportion of solid component, morphology of capsule, growth pattern, calcification, and presence of upstream pancreatic ductal dilatation.Benign SPN usually had oval/round or smoothly lobulated margins, and malignant SPN more commonly had focal lobulated margins (P = 0.027). Presence of complete encapsulation was more frequently seen in benign SPN, whereas focal discontinuity of capsule was more commonly seen in malignant SPN (P = 0.005). There was no statistical difference between benign and malignant tumors in other imaging findings.A focal lobulated margin and a focal discontinuity of the capsule may suggest malignant SPN, whereas a round or smoothly lobulated margin and a complete encapsulation were more commonly seen in benign SPN.EUS/EUS-FNA for suspected pancreatic cancer: influence of chronic pancreatitis and clinical presentation with or without obstructive jaundice on performance characteristics.The clinical utility of EUS-FNA is debated in patients with obstructive jaundice (ObJ) because of a very high pretest probability of pancreatobiliary malignancy (PBM) and biliary stent-induced inflammation that can potentially confound EUS-FNA diagnosis. EUS-FNA also has lower accuracy in patients with underlying chronic pancreatitis (CP).Our purpose was to determine the clinical value of EUS-FNA for PBM diagnosis based on clinical presentation and presence of CP.Retrospective analysis of prospective database.University hospital.Patients who underwent EUS-FNA from 2002 to 2006 for suspected PBM based on (1) ObJ with biliary stricture or a mass lesion or (2) abnormal pancreatic imaging by CT/MRI: a focal pancreatic "mass" lesion; dilated pancreatic duct +/- common bile duct; or an enlarged head of pancreas.EUS was performed with a radial echoendoscope followed by a linear echoendoscope if a focal pancreatic lesion was identified. Fine-needle aspirates were assessed immediately by an attending cytopathologist.(1) Prevalence of cancer and (2) performance characteristics of EUS-FNA.PBM was diagnosed in 73.9% of patients with ObJ and biliary stricture or pancreatic mass, in 49.6% of patients with pancreatic mass, and in 7.0% of patients with an enlarged head of pancreas or dilated pancreatic duct +/- common bile duct. The prevalence of PBM was lower in all 3 presentations with associated CP. Both CP and presentation with ObJ lowered performance characteristics of EUS-FNA, but CP did so only in the subset of patients with ObJ. All except 1 false-negative diagnoses were due to cytologic misinterpretation.Retrospective design.Among patients with suspected PBM, the accuracy of EUS-FNA is significantly lower only in a subset of patients with ObJ with underlying CP, largely as a result of difficulty in cytologic interpretation.Characterization of malignant pancreatic cystic lesions in the background of chronic pancreatitis.Cystic lesions of the pancreas in association with chronic pancreatitis are a diagnostic and therapeutic challenge.The aim of the study was to study clinical and radiological features that may differentiate between benign and malignant cystic lesions of the pancreas and examine the indications for surgery in these patients.Retrospective case note study.Patients with concomitant cystic lesions of the pancreas and chronic pancreatitis stated in radiology reports between 1995 and 2005.Thirty-one patients were identified with alcohol-related chronic pancreatitis with a median age of 53 years (range: 27-82 years). Eight patients (26%) had deranged liver function tests and four (13%) presented a raised CA 19.9. Radiological features of cystic lesions of the pancreas included median cyst size of 3 cm (range: 0.8-10 cm), solitary cyst in 28 patients (90%) and multi-loculated in 3 patients (10%). Dilatation of the main pancreatic duct was seen in seven cases (23%). Overall, 12 patients (39%) underwent surgery, 13 patients (42%) were managed with radiological follow-up, five patients (16%) were managed conservatively and one patient (3%) was treated with chemotherapy for advanced malignancy. Overall, three cases (10%) of this series had malignant cystic lesions of the pancreas. Malignant cystic lesions of the pancreas are associated with deranged liver function tests, elevated CA 19.9, and are larger solitary cysts on imaging.The differentiation between benign and malignant cystic lesions of the pancreas remains a diagnostic challenge, although malignant cysts tend to be solitary and larger. The high prevalence of malignancy merits an aggressive approach to follow-up and early surgical intervention.The impact of prior biliary stenting on the accuracy and complication rate of endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspiration for diagnosing pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Our aim was to determine whether the presence of a biliary stent during endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) affects diagnosis and complication rates.Retrospective analysis was performed of 268 patients with pancreatic head or neck adenocarcinoma who underwent EUS-FNA at our academic medical center between 2000 and 2009. Endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspiration and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography reports, cytology results, and physicians' notes were reviewed.A total of 170 patients without stents, 87 patients with stents placed more than 1 day before EUS, and 11 patients with stents placed less than 1 day before EUS were identified. In patients without stents, the tissue diagnosis rate via EUS-FNA was 92.4% compared with a rate of 88.5% for those with stents placed more than 1 day before EUS-FNA (P=0.36). However, the patients with stents placed immediately before EUS-FNA were more likely to have indeterminate results from the EUS-FNA than the other patients were (P=0.008). Complication rates were the same among the groups.Pre-EUS stenting of biliary obstruction due to pancreatic adenocarcinoma does not influence the rate of tissue diagnosis if performed more than 1 day before EUS-FNA. Lack of immediate EUS access should not preclude stent placement in appropriate patients with malignant biliary obstruction who will undergo EUS-FNA.Proteomic mucin profiling for the identification of cystic precursors of pancreatic cancer.Pancreatic cystic lesions (PCLs) are increasingly frequent radiological incidentalomas, with a considerable proportion representing precursors of pancreatic cancer. Better diagnostic tools are required for patients to benefit from this development.To evaluate whether cyst fluid mucin expression could predict malignant potential and/or transformation in PCLs, a proteomic method was devised and prospectively evaluated in consecutive patients referred to our tertiary center for endoscopic ultrasound-guided aspiration of cystic lesions from May 2007 through November 2008 (discovery cohort) and from December 2008 through October 2012 (validation cohort). Cytology and cyst fluid carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA; premalignancy > 192 ng/mL, malignancy > 1000 ng/mL) were routinely analyzed, and samples were further processed as follows: one-dimensional gel electrophoresis, excision of high-mass areas, tryptic digestion and nano-liquid chromatography-tandem mass spectrometry, with peptide identification by Mascot software and an in-house mucin database. All diagnostic evaluations were blinded to proteomics results. Histology was required to confirm the presence/absence of malignant transformation. All statistical tests were two-sided.Proteomic mucin profiling proved statistically significantly more accurate (97.5%; 95% confidence interval [CI] = 90.3% to 99.6%) than cytology (71.4%; 95% CI = 59.8% to 80.9%; P < .001) and cyst fluid CEA (78.0%; 95% CI = 65.0% to 87.3%; P < .001) in identifying the 37 (out of 79; 46.8%) lesions with malignant potential (ie, premalignant or malignant tumors). The accuracy of proteomics was nearly identical (96.6% vs 98.0%) between the discovery (n = 29) and validation (n = 50) cohorts. Furthermore, mucin profiling predicted malignant transformation, present in 16 out of 29 (discovery cohort: 9, validation cohort: 20) lesions with available histology, with 89.7% accuracy (95% CI = 71.5% to 97.3%) (for the validation cohort only: 95.0%; 95% CI = 73.1% to 99.7%). This markedly exceeded corresponding results for cytology (51.7%; 95% CI = 32.9% to 70.1%; P = .003) and CEA (57.1%; 95% CI = 34.4% to 77.4%; P = .02).Proteomic cyst fluid mucin profiling robustly discriminates benign, premalignant, and malignant PCLs. Consequently, it may improve pancreatic cancer prevention and reduce the morbidity burden of unwarranted pancreatic surgery.Clinical utility of endoscopic ultrasound in solid pancreatic mass lesions deemed resectable by computer tomography.Appropriate surgical exploration and resection of pancreatic carcinoma depends on accurate preoperative evaluation.Determine the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound in predicting the need for surgical exploration in patients with solid pancreatic masses deemed by computer tomography to be resectable without venous grafting (absence of distant metastatic disease or major vascular involvement).All patients between March 2000 and November 2003 with focal pancreatic mass lesions deemed to be surgically resectable by computer tomography. Forty-nine patients participated (29 males, 20 females; age range: 40-86 years).Preoperative linear-array endoscopic ultrasound.Surgical pathology compared to computer tomography and endoscopic ultrasound results.Out of the 49 patients, 33 (67.3%) had pancreatic neoplasms and 16 (32.7%) had chronic pancreatitis. Endoscopic ultrasound correctly diagnosed all 16 patients with chronic pancreatitis. Endoscopic ultrasound correctly identified 18 (54.5%) of those with neoplasms as having unresectable disease while 6 (18.2%) patients were appropriately identified as resectable by endoscopic ultrasound. The remaining 9 patients (27.3%) were deemed resectable by endoscopic ultrasound, but were unresectable at the time of surgery. None of the patients were falsely designated as unresectable by endoscopic ultrasound.Endoscopic ultrasound is an important compliment to computed tomography in predicting resectability and in avoiding nontherapeutic laparotomy of solid pancreatic neoplasms. Moreover, endoscopic ultrasound classification did not discourage surgery of resectable pancreatic masses.[Diagnostic evaluation of CT and ERCP based on the retrospective analysis of operated cases with hepato-biliary and pancreatic diseases (author's transl)].Is there any clinical or radiologic feature as a preoperative marker for differentiating mass-forming pancreatitis from early-stage pancreatic adenocarcinoma?The differential diagnosis of early-stage pancreatic cancer and mass-forming pancreatitis is still unsettled. The purpose of the present study was to define the differential feature of focal mass-forming pancreatitis and malignant mass using aspects of clinical, laboratory and imaging features on pancreatogram or computed tomography (CT).Between April 1995 and May 2003, 15 patients confirmed as inflammatory mass after surgical resection for pancreatic mass and 21 patients with early-stage pancreatic adenocarcinoma among the patients diagnosed as pancreatic malignancy were included in our study. Hospital records, laboratory results, findings of imaging studies and pathological findings were reviewed retrospectively.Regarding the clinical characteristics, the history of previous pancreatitis was distinguished in group with mass-forming pancreatitis. Incidence of jaundice was higher in the group with adenocarcinoma than in the mass-forming pancreatitis group. For laboratory results, CA19-9 level and alkaline phosphatase level were significantly elevated in the malignant group. Findings such as hyperattenuation on portal venous phase of CT scans and gradual tapering stricture on pancreatogram were differential diagnostic markers between the two groups. A portion of patients with mass-forming pancreatitis demonstrated the pathologic characteristics of autoimmune pancreatitis.Our 9-year experience suggests that imaging findings such as attenuation pattern on the delayed phase of CT scan and tapering pattern of pancreatic ductal stricture on pancreatogram can help to differentiate mass-forming pancreatitis from early-stage pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Endoscopic ultrasonographic findings predict the risk of carcinoma in branch duct intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas.The preoperative diagnosis of branch duct intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) of the pancreas can be very difficult, since low-risk and high-risk lesions can be difficult to differentiate even after cytological analysis. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the preoperative diagnostic value of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in differentiating low-risk and high-risk IPMNs.We retrospectively identified 36 patients who underwent preoperative EUS for branch duct IPMNs. The pathological diagnosis after surgical resection was low-grade dysplasia (n = 26), moderate dysplasia (n = 1), high-grade dysplasia or carcinoma in situ (n = 5), and invasive carcinoma (n = 4). We divided the patients into two groups: low risk (low-grade dysplasia or moderate dysplasia) and high risk (high-grade dysplasia or carcinoma). We focused on the diameter of the cystic dilated branch duct, the main pancreatic duct, and the mural nodule as measured using the EUS findings.The cystic dilated branch duct diameter (31.5 mm vs. 41.9 mm, P = 0.0225) was significantly correlated with low-risk and high-risk IPMNs, but the main pancreatic duct diameter (5.37 mm vs. 5.44 mm, P = 0.9418) was not significantly correlated with the low-risk and high-risk IPMNs. The mural nodule diameter of the papillary protrusions (4.3 mm vs. 16.4 mm, P < 0.0001) and the width diameter of the mural nodule (5.7 mm vs. 23.2 mm, P < 0.0001) were significantly correlated with low-risk and high-risk IPMNs.The mural nodule of papillary protrusions diameter and width diameter observed using EUS was a reliable preoperative diagnostic finding capable of distinguishing low-risk and high-risk IPMNs.Dynamic telecytopathology for on-site preliminary diagnosis of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration of pancreatic masses.We evaluated dynamic telecytopathology for on-site-evaluation of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) samples of the pancreas. Realtime images of stained cytology smears were assessed by a cytopathologist while communicating with the on-site operator by telephone. A total of 55 consecutive cases was assessed; preliminary diagnoses of benign, atypical/suspicious and positive for malignancy were 69%, 7% and 24%. We also reviewed 55 consecutive cases of EUS-guided FNA of pancreas which had had conventional microscopic on-site evaluation prior to the introduction of telecytopathology. Preliminary diagnoses of benign, atypical/suspicious and positive for malignancy were 60%, 9% and 31%. The overall concordance between the preliminary and final diagnosis was 84% for telecytopathology and 87% for conventional microscopy. Neuroendocrine neoplasms and well-differentiated adenocarcinoma were diagnostically challenging for both telecytopathology and conventional microscopy. Telecytopathology was similar in accuracy of preliminary diagnosis to conventional microscopy during EUS-FNA of pancreas.Role of endoscopic ultrasound in the diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms: correlation with surgical histopathology.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) are precancerous tumors characterized by dilation of the main pancreatic duct, its side branches, or both. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the role of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) in differentiating benign and malignant IPMNs.We identified all patients between July 1996-November 2005 who underwent preoperative EUS for IPMNs. Malignancy was defined as the presence of invasive carcinoma; all other neoplasms were considered benign. The results of EUS and EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) were compared with corresponding histopathology.Seventy-four patients (38 male; mean age, 65 years) with 21 (28%) malignant and 53 (72%) benign IPMNs were identified. Sixty-five (88%) underwent EUS-FNA. Compared with benign tumors, patients with malignant IPMNs were more likely to be older (P = .011), present with jaundice (P = .03) or weight loss (P = .03), and have EUS features of a dilated main pancreatic duct (P = .0001), solid lesion (P = .0001), pancreatic ductal filling defects (P = .03), or thickened septa within any cyst (P = .02). The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of EUS-FNA for the diagnosis of malignancy were 75% (95% confidence interval [CI], 53%-89%), 91% (95% CI, 79%-97%), and 86% (95% CI, 76%-93%), respectively. Cyst or pancreatic duct fluid carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and carbohydrate antigen (CA) 19-9 did not differ between groups.Older age, jaundice and weight loss, and EUS features of a solid lesion, dilated main pancreatic duct, ductal filling defects, and thickened septa are predictive of malignancy in patients with IPMNs. EUS-FNA cytology is helpful, but cyst fluid CEA and CA 19-9 are of limited value to differentiate malignant from benign IPMNs.Comparison of endoscopic ultrasonography and multidetector computed tomography for detecting and staging pancreatic cancer.Accurate preoperative detection and staging of pancreatic cancer may identify patients with locoregional disease that is amenable to surgical resection.To compare endoscopic ultrasonography and multidetector computed tomography (CT) for the detection, staging, and resectability of known or suspected locoregional pancreatic cancer.Prospective, observational, cohort study.Single, tertiary referral hospital in Indianapolis, Indiana.120 participants with known or suspected locoregional pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasonography followed by multidetector CT was performed in all patients. Patients with known or suspected pancreatic cancer deemed potentially resectable by 1 or both tests were considered for surgery.Detection, staging, and resectability of pancreatic cancer. Surgically resected pancreatic cancer with negative microscopic histologic margins was considered resectable.Of 120 patients enrolled, 104 (87%) underwent endoscopic ultrasonography and CT. Of the 80 patients with pancreatic cancer, 27 (34%) were managed nonoperatively, and 53 (66%) treated surgically had resectable (n = 25) or unresectable (n = 28) cancer. For the 80 patients with cancer, the sensitivity of endoscopic ultrasonography (98% [95% CI, 91% to 100%]) for detecting a pancreatic mass was greater than that of CT (86% [CI, 77% to 93%]; P = 0.012). For the 53 surgical patients, endoscopic ultrasonography was superior to CT for tumor staging accuracy (67% vs. 41%; P < 0.001) but equivalent for nodal staging accuracy (44% vs. 47%; P > 0.2). Of the 25 resectable pancreatic tumors in patients recommended for surgery, endoscopic ultrasonography and CT correctly identified 88% and 92%, respectively, as resectable. Of the 28 unresectable pancreatic tumors in patients recommended for surgery, endoscopic ultrasonography and CT correctly identified 68% and 64%, respectively, as unresectable.Radiologists who read the scans and endosonographers were not blinded to previous radiographic information. Because of the modest sample size, CIs of the sensitivity estimates were sometimes wide.Compared with multidetector CT, endoscopic ultrasonography is superior for tumor detection and staging but similar for nodal staging and resectability of preoperatively suspected nonmetastatic pancreatic cancer.Role of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and EUS-guided fine needle aspiration in the diagnosis and treatment of cystic lesions of the pancreas.Cystic neoplasms of the pancreas may be inadvertently treated as benign pseudocysts in clinical practice, often without the use of cytology, cyst tumor markers, or histopathology. We assessed the utility of EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) to assist in the diagnosis and management of pancreatic cysts.All patients who had pancreatic cysts detected by EUS over a 24-month period were analyzed. Preoperative diagnosis was derived from an algorithm combining clinical history and endosonographic features. In selected cases, EUS-FNA was performed and cyst fluid aspirates were analyzed. Surgical specimens served as diagnostic standard.A total of 43 patients with pancreatic cysts underwent 45 EUS examinations. Surgical specimens were obtained from 9 patients (mucinous cystadenocarcinoma, 3; adenocarcinoma, 3; pancreatic endocrine tumor, 2; and benign cyst, 1); diagnostic EUS correctly predicted malignant cysts in 8/9 (88.9%). One case inaccurately interpreted by EUS as cystic neoplasm turned out to be a benign cyst on resection. Twenty-one patients underwent EUS-FNA. The cytologic interpretation was adenocarcinoma in 9.5% (2/21); suspicious for malignancy or atypical cells in 19.0% (4/21); benign in 66.6% (14/21); and insufficient cells in 4.8% (1/21).The information gathered from clinical history and EUS, complemented by fluid analysis after EUS-guided FNA, predicts neoplastic pancreatic cysts and assists in decision-making for medical or surgical approach.Paraduodenal pancreatitis: clinical performance of MR imaging in distinguishing from carcinoma.To evaluate the diagnostic performance of contrast material-enhanced magnetic resonance (MR) imaging for distinguishing paraduodenal pancreatitis (PDP) from pancreatic head duct adenocarcinoma (CA) in patients with diagnoses confirmed by histopathologic analysis.This retrospective study was approved by the institutional review board and is HIPAA compliant. Between July 2007 and July 2010, 47 patients who underwent Whipple procedure and MR imaging less than 60 days before surgery were identified retrospectively. Two relatively inexperienced fellowship trainees with 9 months of body fellowship training were asked to record the presence or absence of three MR imaging features: focal thickening of the second portion of the duodenum; abnormal enhancement of the second portion of the duodenum; and cystic focus in the expected region of the accessory pancreatic duct. Strict criteria for diagnosis of PDP included presence of all three imaging features. Any case that did not fulfill the criteria was classified as CA. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value for characterization of PDP was calculated for each reader with 95% confidence intervals. A κ test assessed level of agreement between readers.Each reader correctly categorized 15 of 17 (88.2%) PDP cases when all three imaging criteria were met. Alternatively, 26 of 30 (86.7%) pancreatic duct CA were correctly categorized as inconsistent with PDP. Four patients with histopathologic diagnosis of CA were incorrectly classified as PDP by each reader. Agreement between the two readers showed substantial κ agreement for the diagnosis of PDP and differentiation from pancreatic duct CA.Contrast-enhanced MR imaging may help accurately identify PDP and distinguish it from CA when strict diagnostic criteria are followed.http://radiology.rsna.org/lookup/suppl/doi:10.1148/radiol.13112056/-/DC1.EUS-guided fine needle aspiration of pancreatic cysts: a retrospective analysis of complications and their predictors.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS FNA) of pancreatic cysts is considered safe, however, data are conflicting regarding complication rates. The aim of this study was to determine the complication rate of EUS-guided pancreatic cyst aspiration and predictors of these complications.Results of pancreatic cyst EUS FNA at 2 academic institutions from March 1996 to October 2003 were reviewed. A total of 603 patients with 651 pancreatic cysts were evaluated. Complications were identified from clinic, emergency department, and discharge notes, and laboratory and radiologic data. Data collected were as follows: cyst size, location, septations, diagnosis, number of passes, needle size, status as inpatient or outpatient, performance of same-day endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), and use of prophylactic antibiotics.Complications were identified in 13 patients (2.2%, 13 of 603): 6 patients had pancreatitis, 4 patients had abdominal pain, 1 patient had a retroperitoneal bleed, 1 patient had an infection, and 1 patient had bradycardia. Twelve patients required hospitalization, with an average length of stay of 3.8 +/- 1.1 days. Type of cyst, size, presence of septations or mass, and same-day ERCP were not predictors of complications.EUS-guided pancreatic cyst aspiration carries a low complication rate similar to that reported for solid pancreatic lesions. No patient or cyst characteristics appear to be predictive of adverse events.A novel distinguishing system for the diagnosis of malignant pancreatic cystic neoplasm.To explore a simple and reliable non-invasive distinguishing system for the pre-operative evaluation of malignancy in pancreatic cystic neoplasm (PCN).This study first enrolled an observation cohort of 102 consecutive PCN patients. Demographic information, results of laboratory examinations, and computed tomography (CT) presentations were recorded and analyzed to achieve a distinguishing model/system for malignancy. A group of 21 patients was then included to validate the model/system prospectively.Based on the 11 malignancy-related features identified by univariate analysis, a distinguishing model for malignancy in PCN was established by multivariate analysis: PCN malignant score=2.967 × elevated fasting blood glucose (FBG) (≥6.16 mmol/L) ± 4.496 × asymmetrically thickened wall (or mural nodules ≥ 4 mm) ± 1.679 × septum thickening (≥2 mm)-5.134. With the optimal cut-off value selected as -2.8 in reference to the Youden index, the proposed system for malignant PCN was established: septum thickening (>2 mm), asymmetrically thickened wall (or mural nodules>4 mm), or elevated FBG (>6.16 mmol/L, accompanying commonly known malignant signs), the presence of at least one of these 3 features indicated malignancy in PCN. The accuracy, sensitivity and specificity of this system were 81.4%, 95.8% and 76.9%, respectively. MRI was performed on 32 patients, making correct prediction of malignancy explicitly in only 68.8% (22/32). The subsequent prospective validation study showed that the proposed distinguishing system had a predictive accuracy of 85.7% (18/21). Moreover, a higher model score, or aggregation of the features in the proposed system, indicated a higher grade of malignancy (carcinoma) in PCN.Elevated FBG (>6.16 mmol/L), asymmetrically thickened wall (or mural nodules>4 mm) and septum thickening (>2 mm) are of great value in differentiating the malignancy in PCN. The developed distinguishing system is reliable in the diagnosis of malignant PCN.Endoscopic ultrasound guided fine needle aspiration with fluorescence in situ hybridization analysis in 104 patients with pancreatic mass.Diagnosis of pancreatic malignancy is often based on cytological specimens collected by endoscopic ultrasound guided fine needle aspiration (EUS FNA). Several factors can decrease sensitivity of EUS FNA for pancreatic cancer: well-differentiated tumors, pancreatitis, blood, necrosis and slides with low cellularity. The objective of this study is to report on the use of fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) analysis combined with cytology in pancreatic masses.EUS database and medical records of patients referred for EUS between January 2009 through august 2013 were reviewed. Data on cytology, FISH and surgical pathology were reviewed. Surgical pathology, death or extended clinical follow-up were used to verify correct diagnosis of malignancy. FISH performed using a four-set DNA probe for chromosomes 3, 7, 17, and band 9p21 in patients with inconclusive immediate cytology reading. Sensitivity of cytology and FISH were compared.Study cohort comprised of 104 patients with FISH analysis on EUS FNA specimens of pancreatic masses (74 adenocarcinoma, 7 neuroendocrine tumor and 23 benign. Sensitivity of cytology and FISH for carcinoma was respectively: 62% and 81%. Sensitivity of FISH + cytology was 89%. The specificity of FISH and cytology was 100%. The most common abnormality on FISH was a 9p21 deletion seen in 43 patients (58%) followed by polysomy of 7 (46%). FISH detected malignancy in 23 patients with negative cytology.In patients with inconclusive immediate cytology reading, FISH is superior to cytology and improves overall sensitivity. The 9p21 deletion is the most common abnormality seen in this cohort of patients with pancreatic cancer.Cross-modality PET/CT and contrast-enhanced CT imaging for pancreatic cancer.To explore the diagnostic value of the cross-modality fusion images provided by positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) and contrast-enhanced CT (CECT) for pancreatic cancer (PC).Data from 70 patients with pancreatic lesions who underwent CECT and PET/CT examinations at our hospital from August 2010 to October 2012 were analyzed. PET/CECT for the cross-modality image fusion was obtained using TureD software. The diagnostic efficiencies of PET/CT, CECT and PET/CECT were calculated and compared with each other using a χ(2) test. P < 0.05 was considered to indicate statistical significance.Of the total 70 patients, 50 had PC and 20 had benign lesions. The differences in the sensitivity, negative predictive value (NPV), and accuracy between CECT and PET/CECT in detecting PC were statistically significant (P < 0.05 for each). In 15 of the 31 patients with PC who underwent a surgical operation, peripancreatic vessel invasion was verified. The differences in the sensitivity, positive predictive value, NPV, and accuracy of CECT vs PET/CT and PET/CECT vs PET/CT in diagnosing peripancreatic vessel invasion were statistically significant (P < 0.05 for each). In 19 of the 31 patients with PC who underwent a surgical operation, regional lymph node metastasis was verified by postsurgical histology. There was no statistically significant difference among the three methods in detecting regional lymph node metastasis (P > 0.05 for each). In 17 of the 50 patients with PC confirmed by histology or clinical follow-up, distant metastasis was confirmed. The differences in the sensitivity and NPV between CECT and PET/CECT in detecting distant metastasis were statistically significant (P < 0.05 for each).Cross-modality image fusion of PET/CT and CECT is a convenient and effective method that can be used to diagnose and stage PC, compensating for the defects of PET/CT and CECT when they are conducted individually.[Diagnosis and staging of pancreatic carcinoma: MRI versus multislice-CT -- a prospective study].To evaluate multislice-CT versus MRI in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic carcinoma in a prospective multi-reader analysis.Fifty patients with suspected pancreatic carcinoma underwent both multislice-CT (4-Row, "hydro-technique") and state-of-the-art MRI (two 1.5 T units). In correlation with histopathologic findings or in case of a non-lesion diagnosis by follow-up (6-month interval), we evaluated MRI versus CT in a multi-reader analysis (2 reader pairs) for: 1. diagnostic quality; 2. examination time; 3. accuracy of potential resectability; 4. kappa analysis of observer variations; and 5. overall diagnostic reliability.A total of 28 lesions (n = 22 malignant, n = 6 benign) were present in the cohort group versus 22 patients without a focal lesion (n = 10 pancreatitis, n = 12 no tumor). For lesion detection, CT had a sensitivity of 100/89 % (reader pair 1/2) and specificity of 77 %, and MRI had a sensitivity of 75/89 % and specificity of 77/73 %. For the subgroup of adenocarcinomas of the pancreas (n = 17), we found a sensitivity of 100 % and a specificity of 61 % for CT versus a sensitivity of 82/94 % and a specificity of 67/61 % for MRI. The accuracy for determining the resectability was 91/82 % for CT and 90/82 % for MRI. The kappa analysis showed a good correlation for CT (0.71) and a moderate correlation of both groups for MRI (0.49).CT and MRI showed comparable results in the detection of pancreatic carcinomas as well as in the determination of resectability. Chronic pancreatitis as a "tumor-like-lesion" was the major factor of a missed diagnosis. The results of multi-reader analysis for both reading groups were almost identical with a moderate to good kappa correlation. There is no reason to prefer MRI (more expensive) over CT for patients with the presumptive diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.Characterization of pancreatic cancer and intra-abdominal lymph node malignancy using spectrum analysis of endoscopic ultrasound imaging.This study assessed the ability of spectral analysis of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) RF signals acquired in humans in vivo to distinguish between (1) benign and malignant intraabdominal and mediastinal lymph nodes and (2) pancreatic cancer, chronic pancreatitis, and normal pancreas. Mean midband fit, slope, intercept, and correlation coefficient from a linear regression of the calibrated RF power spectra were computed over regions of interest defined by the endoscopist. Linear discriminant analysis was then performed to develop a classification of the resulting spectral parameters. For lymph nodes, classification based on the midband fit and intercept provided 67% sensitivity, 82% specificity, and 73% accuracy for malignant vs. benign nodes. For pancreas, classification based on midband fit and correlation coefficient provided 95% sensitivity, 93% specificity, and 93% accuracy for diseased vs. normal pancreas and 85% sensitivity, 71% specificity, and 85% accuracy for pancreatic cancer vs. chronic pancreatitis. These promising results suggest that mean spectral parameters can provide a non-invasive method to quantitatively characterize pancreatic cancer and lymph malignancy in vivo.Negative predictive value of endoscopic ultrasound in a large series of patients with a clinical suspicion of pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) has been shown to be very accurate in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer. The accuracy of EUS in predicting the absence of pancreatic cancer in a large series of patients with a clinical suspicion of pancreatic cancer is not well documented. Our aim was to determine the negative predictive value (NPV) of EUS in patients with a suspicion of pancreatic cancer.We retrospectively reviewed, from our EUS database (between January 1999 and March 2003), 693 patients who were suspected of having pancreatic cancer and had EUS examinations. A total of 155 patients were found by EUS to have a completely normal pancreas. Indications for EUS in these patients included: weight loss/abdominal pain; and/or pancreatic enlargement/fullness on computed tomography (CT); and/or bile duct/pancreatic duct narrowing on endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography; and/or an elevated CA 19-9. Follow-up information was obtained in 135/155 (87%) patients from patient phone calls and/or physician visits and/or CT scan. The mean follow-up period was 25 months (range 8-48 months).No patients developed pancreatic cancer during the follow-up period. Following the EUS examination, no work-up was required in 119/135 (88%) of patients. CT scan was performed in 16 patients at 6 months post-procedure, none of which showed a pancreatic mass. The NPV of EUS in excluding pancreatic cancer in those patients with follow-up was 100%.EUS is highly specific in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer with a NPV of 100% and obviates the need for further diagnostic testing. In patients with a clinical suspicion of pancreatic cancer, EUS should be considered as the initial diagnostic modality.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration in 179 cases: the M. D. Anderson Cancer Center experience.Recently, endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) has emerged as a diagnostic adjunct for small pancreatic lesions and abdominal and mediastinal lymph node diseases.During a 21-month period, we performed 179 EUS-FNAs in 166 consecutive patients; these data are the subject of this study. An average of 2.6 needle passes were obtained and aspiration was performed most commonly in the pancreas (162 cases, 91%). The FNA smears were reviewed using six diagnostic categories (negative for malignancy/nondiagnostic [NND], atypia, suspicious for malignancy, benign tumor/cyst, neuroendocrine neoplasm [NEN], and carcinoma). The review diagnosis was correlated with the histologic diagnosis made on resection or surgical biopsy specimens in 70 cases. Up to 17 months of clinical follow-up were sought for the cases with a negative or inconclusive FNA diagnosis and no diagnostic tissue confirmation (81 cases).The review FNA diagnoses were as follows: NND (49 cases), atypia (17 cases), suspicious for malignancy (12 cases), benign tumor/cyst excluding NEN (10 cases), NEN (6 cases), carcinoma (85 cases). Follow-up methods included resection (49 cases), surgical biopsy (21 cases), repeat FNA or brushing cytology (28 cases), and clinical follow-up only (81 cases). Of the 49 NND cases, 23 (47%) had positive follow-up results (i.e., false-negative diagnosis) that were confirmed by tissue diagnosis (resection/surgical biopsy in 11 cases [48%] and repeat FNA/brushing in 12 cases [52%]). These included pancreatic/ampullary adenocarcinoma in 20 cases, esophageal squamous carcinoma in 1 case, and NEN in 2 cases. Follow-up also revealed carcinoma in all 12 suspicious cases and 13 pancreatic adenocarcinomas and 1 microcystic adenoma in 14 of the 17 atypical cases. Overall, repeat computed tomography (CT)-guided FNA samples yielded a definite diagnosis in four atypical and seven NND cases, whereas EUS-FNA results provided a definite diagnosis in three cases in which CT-guided FNA failed and in two cases in which ampullary biopsy failed. No false-positive cases were identified. The false-negative rate due to inadequate sampling was 13.2%. Sensitivity (including cases with inadequate cellularity and nondiagnostic aspirates) was 81.7% and specificity was 100%. None of the factors evaluated (lesion characteristics, aspiration site, and tumor type) significantly influenced diagnostic results.EUS-FNA is a valuable diagnostic and staging tool with high specificity and sensitivity. Negative or nondiagnostic cases on EUS-FNA require further diagnostic work for a definitive diagnosis when clinical or radiographic findings do not correlate with the FNA results.Percutaneous CT-guided fine needle aspiration cytology in the differential diagnosis of pancreatic lesions.Cytologic results were retrospectively evaluated in 83 patients who underwent CT-guided fine-needle aspiration of pancreatic lesions during a 5-year period. Sixty seven patients had malignant disease and 16 benign disease. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and diagnostic efficiency of fine-needle aspiration (FNA) cytology in detecting malignancy were 91%, 100%, 100%, 73%, and 93%, respectively. In solid pancreatic masses the sensitivity of FNA cytology rose to 98%, while in cystic pancreatic masses sensitivity fell to 62%. In 18 patients with cystic lesions (12 benign and 6 malignant), the cystic fluid was analyzed for amylase, CEA and CA 19-9 content. Amylase levels were high in pseudocysts and in 4/6 malignant cysts. CEA levels were low in benign cysts, and high in all malignant cysts. CA 19-9 levels were high in one pseudocyst and in all malignant cysts. Tumour marker content analysis enhanced the sensitivity of the cytologic diagnosis of malignant cysts to 92%. FNA cytology is a simple and highly accurate method in the differential diagnosis of solid pancreatic lesions. In cystic lesions, tumour marker fluid content determination increases the sensitivity of FNA cytology.Accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound elastography used for differential diagnosis of focal pancreatic masses: a multicenter study.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) elastography represents a new imaging procedure that might characterize the differences of hardness and strain between diseased tissue and normal tissue. The aim of this study was to assess the efficiency of EUS elastography for the differentiation of focal masses in chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic cancer.The study group comprised 258 patients with focal pancreatic masses included prospectively at 13 participating centers. Qualitative analysis of the diagnoses made by two expert doctors using all recorded video clips was performed in order to test the interobserver variability. A post-processing software analysis was used to examine the EUS elastography videos by calculating average-hue histograms of individual elastography images. The quantitative information was used to calculate intra-observer variability and the accuracy of the method.Qualitative analysis of the recorded videos revealed a kappa value of 0.72. Intra-observer variability analysis revealed that the single measure intraclass correlation ranged between 0.86 and 0.94. The average-hue histogram analysis of the data indicated a sensitivity of 93.4 %, a specificity of 66.0 %, a positive predictive value of 92.5 %, a negative predictive value of 68.9 %, and an overall accuracy of 85.4 %, based on a cut-off value of 175. Area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AUROC) was 0.854 ( P < 0.0001) with a confidence interval of 0.804 - 0.894.The value of quantitative analysis of EUS elastography recordings was proven by good reproducibility of the videos, as well as good parameters of the AUROC analysis. (Clinical Trials.gov identifier: CT00909103).False-negative rate of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration for pancreatic solid and cystic lesions with matched surgical resections as the gold standard: one institution's experience.The diagnosis of pancreatic tumors is often complicated because of sampling and interpretive challenges. The current study was performed to determine the rates, types, and causes of diagnostic discrepancies.The authors retrospectively reviewed cytology cases from 2004 to 2010 using matched surgical resection cases as the gold standard.A total of 733 cases were divided into 3 categories: 1) positive or suspicious (290 cases); 2) negative or atypical (403 cases); and 3) unsatisfactory (40 cases). Of these cases, 101 fine-needle aspiration (FNA) cases had matched surgical resections including 58 positive diagnoses, 39 negative diagnoses, and 4 unsatisfactory diagnoses. All 19 discrepant cases represented false-negative diagnoses without any false-positive cases noted, which included 2 cases with interpretive errors (10%) and 17 cases with sampling errors (90%). All matched cytology cases were divided into 5 subgroups based on the type of lesion or type of error and were analyzed for sensitivity and specificity. The sampling error rate in cystic lesions (8 of 24; 33%) was significantly higher than that in solid lesions (9 of 73; 12%). The false-negative rate in the interpretive error group (3%) was significantly lower than that in the sampling error group (23%).The results of the current study confirm that pancreatic endoscopic ultrasound-guided FNA diagnosis has a very low false-positive rate but a relatively high false-negative rate using matched surgical resections as the gold standard. The major cause of a false-negative cytology diagnosis is sampling error and the rate of sampling error in cystic lesions is significantly higher than that in solid lesions.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas: differentiate from chronic pancreatits by MR imaging.To evaluate the differentiating factors for intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas and chronic pancreatitis as determined by MR imaging.During a three-year period, we performed MR imaging on 33, consecutive patients with IPMN and on 41 patients with chronic pancreatitis. All IPMNs were confirmed by surgery. Two radiologists retrospectively analyzed the ductal change, the cyst shape, CBD dilatation, lymphadenopathy, and parenchymal change. The sensitivity and specificity were calculated for each MRI findings using the Chi square test. Statistically significant MR findings were further analyzed using multivariate logistic regression analysis. The diagnostic performance was evaluated according to the area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (A(z)) using specific MRI findings. Simple κ statistics were used to evaluate the inter-observer reliability.Statistically specific findings for IPMN compared with those for chronic pancreatitis, were duct dilatation without stricture (specificity=95.1%, sensitivity=75.8%, p<0.0001), bulging ampulla (specificity=97.6%, sensitivity=30.3%, p<0.0001), nodule in a duct (specificity=100%, sensitivity=15.2%, p<0.0004), grape-like cyst shape (specificity=97.6%, sensitivity=78.8%, p<0.0001), and nodule in a cyst (specificity=100%, sensitivity=24.2%, p<0.0001). Statistically specific findings for chronic pancreatitis compared with those for IPMN, were duct dilatation with strictures (specificity=93.9%, sensitivity=95.1%, p<0.0001), the presence of a stone (specificity=97.0%, sensitivity=56.1%, p<0.0001), and a unilocular cyst shape (specificity=93.9%, sensitivity=34.1%, p<0.0004). Duct dilatation without stricture and a grape-like cyst shape were independently associated with the IPMN. Duct dilatation with strictures was independently associated with the chronic pancreatitis. Interobserver agreement was good to excellent for each finding (κ=0.762-1.000).Highly specific findings for IPMN include duct dilatation without stricture, bulging ampulla, nodule in a duct, grape-like cyst shape, and nodule in a cyst. MRI is very useful for differentiating IPMN from chronic pancreatitis using these specific findings.Intraductal papillary and mucinous tumors of the pancreas: accuracy of preoperative computed tomography, endoscopic retrograde pancreatography and endoscopic ultrasonography, and long-term outcome in a large surgical series.Few data are available on the accuracy of preoperative imaging or on long-term outcome after surgery for intraductal papillary and mucinous tumors of the pancreas. The aims of this study were to assess the following: (1) the accuracy of preoperative computed tomography, endoscopic retrograde pancreatography, and endoscopic ultrasonography for determination of tumor invasion and pancreatic extension as compared with surgical findings; (2) the long-term outcome after surgery.Forty-seven patients who underwent surgery between 1980 and 1995 for pathologically diagnosed intraductal papillary and mucinous tumors were included in this study. The findings of available computed tomography (n = 25), endoscopic retrograde pancreatography (n = 29), and endoscopic ultrasonography (n = 21) were reviewed by experienced clinicians blinded to pathologic diagnosis to assess tumor invasion and pancreatic extension. Pathologic specimens were reviewed by experienced pathologists. Postoperative follow-up data were analyzed.Histologic features of invasive carcinoma were found in 43% of patients, severe dysplasia in 21%, and mild or moderate dysplasia in 36%. The overall accuracy of computed tomography, endoscopic retrograde pancreatography, and endoscopic ultrasonography in distinguishing between invasive and noninvasive tumors were, respectively, 76%, 79%, and 76%. The overall 3-year disease-free survival rate was 63%, but it was 21% among patients with invasive carcinoma at surgery (p < 0.001).This study emphasizes the need for early surgical resection in patients with suspected intraductal papillary and mucinous tumors of the pancreas because of the high frequency of invasive carcinoma and the inadequacy of preoperative imaging for assessing malignancy.Diagnostic yield and therapeutic impact of fine-needle aspiration biopsies guided by endoscopic ultrasound in pancreatic lesions.The correct approach and treatment in a patient with a pancreatic lesion detected by imaging is not easy. Recently, the endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) biopsy is becoming a useful tool. The aim of the study is to evaluate the diagnostic yield and therapeutic impact of EUS-FNA in pancreatic lesions.Fifty-three patients with focal pancreatic lesions underwent EUS-FNA from March 2005 to March 2006. The final diagnosis was confirmed by the histological analysis from the surgical specimen and/or clinical follow-up for at least 6 months.. Fifty-two patients were evaluated. Forty-seven useful samples for histological evaluation were obtained. Adequate samples were obtained in 83.3% (5/6) for lesions < 20 mm, 100% (19/19) for lesions from 20 to < 40 mm and 85.1% (23/ 27) for those > or = 40 mm. To differentiate between benign/malignant disease the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA were 97.3% (95% CI: 84.9-99.1), 100% (95% CI: 66-100), 100% (95% CI: 88-100), 90% (95% CI: 57-96) and 97.8%, respectively. There was a change in the initial diagnosis in seven patients (14.8%). No complications were reported.EUS-FNA is a useful and safe method with high predictive values to differentiate between malignant and benign pancreatic lesions.Role of curved planar reformations using multidetector spiral CT in diagnosis of pancreatic and peripancreatic diseases.To investigate the role of curved planar reformations using multidetector spiral CT (MSCT) in diagnosis of pancreatic and peripancreatic diseases.From October 2001 to September 2003, 47 consecutive patients with pancreatic or peripancreatic diseases, which were confirmed by operation, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and clinical follow-up, were enrolled in this study. CT scanning was performed at a MSCT with four rows of detector. A set of images with an effective thickness of 1.0-2.0 mm and a gap of 0.5-1.0 mm (50% overlap) were acquired in all patients for post-processing. Curved planar reformations were carried out by drawing a curved line on transverse source images, coronal or sagittal multiplanar reformations according to certain anatomic structures (such as cholangiopancreatic ducts or peripancreatic vessels) and the position of lesion.With thin collimation, MSCT could acquire high-quality curved planar reformations to display the profile of the whole pancreas, to trace the cholangiopancreatic ducts and peripancreatic vessels, and to show the relationship of lesions with pancreas and peripancreatic anatomic structures in one curved plane, which facilitates diagnosis and rapid communication of diagnostic information with referring physicians.MSCT with thin collimation could be used to create high-quality curved planar reformations in evaluating pancreatic and peripancreatic diseases with pertinent anatomic information and relative pathologic signs to facilitate the diagnosis and enhance communication with the referring physician. Curved planar reformations can serve as supplements for transverse images in diagnosis and management of pancreatic and peripancreatic diseases.Differentiation between pancreatic carcinoma and mass-forming chronic pancreatitis: usefulness of high b value diffusion-weighted imaging.To investigate the value of high b value diffusion-weighted (DW) imaging in differentiating between pancreatic carcinoma and mass-forming chronic pancreatitis (MFCP).Fifty-one consecutive patients with pathology-proven pancreatic carcinoma (n = 37) or MFCP (n = 14) were evaluated with DW imaging (b value, 0 and 1000 s/mm(2)) at a 3-T MR system. Overall 20 healthy volunteers were evaluated as the control group. The apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC) values of normal pancreas, pancreatic carcinoma, MFCP, and mass-associated obstructive pancreatitis were measured.On high b value (1000 s/mm(2) ) DW images, both pancreatic carcinoma and MFCP were hyperintense focal lesions; mass-associated obstructive pancreatitis occurred in 17 of 37 (45.9%) pancreatic carcinoma and 8 of 14 (57.1%) MFCP. The ADC (×10(-3) mm(2) /s) of the pancreatic carcinomas (1.06 ± 0.15) was significantly lower than that of normal pancreas (1.47 ± 0.18; P < 0.01), MFCP (1.35 ± 0.14; P < 0.01) and mass-associated chronic pancreatitis (1.44 ± 0.17; P < 0.01). The ADC of MFCP was also lower than that in the normal pancreas (P = 0.025), whereas the ADC of mass-associated obstructive pancreatitis was not different from those of the MFCP (P = 0.113) and normal pancreas (P = 0.544). When 1.195 was used as the optimal cut-off value, ADC quantification obtained a sensitivity of 85.7% and a specificity of 86.5% for differentiating pancreatic carcinomas from MFCP.High b value DW imaging in combination with ADC quantification at a 3-T MR system is useful in differentiating between pancreatic carcinoma and MFCP.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration of pancreatic masses: the utility and impact on management of patients.It is controversial whether endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is beneficial in all patients with suspected pancreatic cancer. The aim of this study was to assess diagnostic yield, safety and impact of EUS-FNA on management of patients with solid pancreatic mass.Consecutive patients undergoing EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic mass were enrolled. Gold standard for final diagnosis included histology from surgical resection. In patients without surgery, clinical evaluation methods and repeated imaging studies were used for the comparison of initial cytology and final diagnosis. Patients were followed-up prospectively focusing on subsequent treatment.Among 207 enrolled patients, final diagnosis was malignant in 163 (78.6%) and benign in 44 (21.4%). The sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of EUS-FNA in diagnosing pancreatic cancer were 92.6% (95% CI: 87.20-95.96), 88.6% (95% CI: 74.64-95.64) and 91.8% (95% CI: 87.24-94.81), respectively. No major and five (2.4%) minor complications occurred. Of 151 true-positive patients by EUS-FNA, 57 (37.7%) were surgically explored, of whom 28 (49.1%) underwent resection. Ten of 12 patients with false-negative cytology were explored based on detection of mass on EUS, of whom two had a delay due to false-negative cytology without curative treatment. From the whole study cohort, EUS-FNA had positive and negative impacts on subsequent management in 136 (65.7%) and 2 (0.9%) patients, respectively.EUS-FNA provides accurate diagnosis in 92% and has positive therapeutic impact in two-thirds of patients with solid pancreatic mass. Despite negative cytology, surgical exploration is recommended in clinical suspicion for pancreatic cancer and solid mass on EUS.Correlation between magnetic resonance imaging and histopathology in differentiation of pancreatic diseases.In the last four decades, the incidence of pancreatic cancer has tripled in Western countries. More than 90% of all pancreatic cancers are detected in the advanced stage of the disease when surgical treatment is no longer possible and survival after initial diagnosis is usually very short. The aim of this study was to correlate magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) established diagnosis of chronic pancreatitis, benign lesion and malignant neoplasm with final histopathology. The study included 29 patients in whom the nature of pancreatic pathology could not be determined clinically and by other imaging modalities including abdominal ultrasonography, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and multislice computed tomography. MRI examination was performed and radiological report was compared with histopathology assessment of the pancreatic lesion detected. The data obtained indicated systematic conformity between radiological and histopathology findings, confirmed high diagnostic accuracy of MRI for selected pancreatic pathology, and demonstrated the role of MRI as a problem solving diagnostic imaging modality in undetermined pancreatic changes.Randomized trial comparing the 22-gauge aspiration and 22-gauge biopsy needles for EUS-guided sampling of solid pancreatic mass lesions.To overcome limitations of cytology, biopsy needles have been developed to procure histologic samples during EUS.To compare 22-gauge (G) FNA and 22G biopsy needles (FNB) for EUS-guided sampling of solid pancreatic masses.Randomized trial.Tertiary-care medical center.This study involved 56 patients with solid pancreatic masses.Sampling of pancreatic masses by using 22G FNA or 22G FNB devices.Compare the median number of passes required to establish the diagnosis, diagnostic sufficiency, technical performance, complication rates, procurement of the histologic core, and quality of the histologic specimen.A total of 28 patients were randomized to the FNA group and 28 to the FNB group. There was no significant difference in median number of passes required to establish the diagnosis (1 [interquartile range 1-2.5] vs 1 [interquartile range 1-1]; P = .21), rates of diagnostic sufficiency (100% vs 89.3%; P = .24), technical failure (0 vs 3.6%; P = 1.0), or complications (3.6% for both) between FNA and FNB needles, respectively. Patients in whom diagnosis was established in passes 1, 2, and 3 were 64.3% versus 67.9%, 10.7% versus 17.9%, and 25% versus 3.6%, respectively, for FNA and FNB cohorts. There was no significant difference in procurement of the histologic core (100% vs 83.3%; P = .26) or the presence of diagnostic histologic specimens (66.7% vs 80%; P = .66) between FNA and FNB cohorts, respectively.Only pancreatic masses were evaluated.Diagnostic sufficiency, technical performance, and safety profiles of FNA and FNB needles are comparable. There was no significant difference in yield or quality of the histologic core between the 2 needle types.Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided brushing increases cellular diagnosis of pancreatic cysts: A prospective study.The diagnosis of pancreatic cystic lesions is still a challenge.To prospectively investigate the usefulness and safety of EUS-guided cytology brushing (EUS BR) in the cellular diagnosis of pancreatic cysts.Cysts >15mm were sampled with a 19G needle. The fluid was aspirated and processed for cytology. The brush was introduced to scrub the cystic wall and processed as standard brushings. Antibiotic prophylaxis was administered. Complications were assessed in the first 24h and 7 days after the procedure.30 patients were included. In 8 patients the technique failed for technical reasons. EUS BR provided with a cellular diagnosis in 20/22 cases (91%). The EUS BR was superior to the aspirated fluid for detecting diagnostic cells (73% vs. 36%, p=0.08) and mucinous cells (50% vs. 18%, p=0.016). In the 8 patients operated on, the specimen was consistent with EUS BR diagnosis. Three patients (10%) had complications, one of them a subacute retroperitoneal haemorrhage in a patient on anticoagulation therapy who died for complications 1 month later.EUS BR increases cellular diagnosis of pancreatic cystic lesions as compared with fluid analysis, mainly in mucinous lesions. Its use is not recommended in patients under anticoagulation therapy.EchoBrush may be superior to standard EUS-guided FNA in the evaluation of cystic lesions of the pancreas: preliminary experience.Cystic lesions of the pancreas are being detected with increasing frequency. Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is one of the most precise methods of diagnosis but still has limited accuracy. A new, through-the-needle cytologic brush system (EchoBrush; Cook Medical, Bloomington, Ind) has been approved for use during EUS evaluation of cystic pancreatic lesions.Data from 127 EUS-FNAs of pancreatic cystic lesions were analyzed to compare the cytologic yield of EchoBrush with conventional EUS-FNA. An attending cytopathologist was present on site to assess specimen adequacy in all the cases. Diagnostic yields of both procedures, as well as related adverse events, were recorded. Statistical analysis was performed with the SPSS 15.0 version software (SPSS, Chicago, Ill).A total of 127 cystic lesions of the pancreas from 120 patients (42 men and 78 women, mean age of 62.17 ± 12.17 years) were included in the study. Mean size of lesions was 23.58 ± 21.69 mm. Adequacy of the samples and diagnostic yield were higher using EchoBrush. In 80 (63 %) cases, conventional EUS-FNA was performed, whereas in 47 (37%), we used EchoBrush. Diagnostic material was obtained in 85.1% (40 of 47) of cases using EchoBrush and in 66.3% (53 of 80) with conventional EUS-FNA. (P < .05). There were very few clinically relevant complications related to EUS-FNA and EUS-EchoBrush techniques.This study suggests that cytological specimens from pancreatic cystic lesions obtained using EchoBrush at the time of EUS are superior to conventional EUS-FNA mainly because of the higher yield of epithelial cells. Larger studies are needed to compare both methods.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided, 18-gauge, fine needle aspiration biopsy of the pancreas using a 2.8 mm channel convex array echoendoscope.Previous studies have reported on endoscopic ultrasound-guided, fine needle aspiration biopsy using 22- to 25-gauge needles. We evaluated the histologic and cytologic yield of endoscopic ultrasound-guided, fine needle aspiration biopsy of the pancreas using an 18-gauge, Menghini-type core needle.Fine needle aspiration biopsy was performed in conjunction with a prototype 2.8 mm channel convex array echoendoscope. The core specimen was placed in formalin for cell block, and residual material was expelled on slides for cytology. Definitive diagnosis was established by surgery or clinical follow-up.Of 45 patients who underwent fine needle aspiration biopsy, the needle failed to penetrate indurated pancreatic lesions in five. An average of 2.6 passes were performed in the remaining patients. Sufficient material for a histologic and/or cytologic diagnosis was obtained in 40 patients (histologic and cytologic yield of 68% and 75%, respectively). Combining the results of histology and cytology, the sensitivity and specificity for detection of malignancy was 76% and 100%, respectively. Histology confirmed the cytologic findings in 35 patients, providing additional tissue specific information. In three cases histology established a diagnosis of malignancy where cytology was not conclusively malignant. However, in three cases of surgically confirmed malignancy histology failed to detect malignancy, whereas cytology showed suspicious or malignant cells. The sensitivity of histology and cytology alone in detecting malignancy was 53% and 70%, respectively. Mild pancreatitis occurred after pancreatic fine needle aspiration biopsy in one patient.Core specimens for histology can be safely obtained using an 18-gauge needle. Histology provides tissue-specific information that complements cytology, but histology is less sensitive than cytology in detecting malignancy.Implications of imaging criteria for the management and treatment of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms - benign versus malignant findings.Evaluation of computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) for differentiation of pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) subtypes based on objective imaging criteria.Fifty-eight patients with 60 histologically confirmed IPMNs were included in this retrospective study. Eighty-three imaging studies (CT,n = 42; MRI,n = 41) were analysed by three independent blinded observers (O1-O3), using established imaging criteria to assess likelihood of malignancy (-5, very likely benign; 5, very likely malignant) and histological subtype (i.e., low-grade (LGD), moderate-grade (MGD), high-grade dysplasia (HGD), early invasive carcinoma (IPMC), solid carcinoma (CA) arising from IPMN).Forty-one benign (LGD IPMN,n = 20; MGD IPMN,n = 21) and 19 malignant (HGD IPMN,n = 3; IPMC,n = 6; solid CA,n = 10) IPMNs located in the main duct (n = 6), branch duct (n = 37), or both (n = 17) were evaluated. Overall accuracy of differentiation between benign and malignant IPMNs was 86/92 % (CT/MRI). Exclusion of overtly malignant cases (solid CA) resulted in overall accuracy of 83/90 % (CT/MRI). The presence of mural nodules and ductal lesion size ≥30 mm were significant indicators of malignancy (p = 0.02 and p < 0.001, respectively).Invasive IPMN can be identified with high confidence and sensitivity using CT and MRI. The diagnostic problem that remains is the accurate radiological differentiation of premalignant and non-invasive subtypes.• CT and MRI can differentiate benign from malignant forms of IPMN. • Identifying (pre)malignant histological IPMN subtypes by CT and MRI is difficult. • Overall, diagnostic performance with MRI was slightly (not significantly) superior to CT.Differentiation of focal-type autoimmune pancreatitis from pancreatic carcinoma: assessment by multiphase contrast-enhanced CT.To evaluate the utility of multiphase contrast-enhanced computed tomography (CT) findings alone and in combination for differentiating focal-type autoimmune pancreatitis (f-AIP) from pancreatic carcinoma (PC).The study group comprised 22 f-AIP lesions and 61 PC lesions. Two radiologists independently evaluated CT findings. Frequencies of findings were compared between f-AIP and PC. Statistical, univariate and multivariate analyses were performed.Homogeneous enhancement during the portal phase (AIP, 59 % vs. PC, 3 %; P < 0.001), dotted enhancement during the pancreatic phase (50 % vs. 7 %; P < 0.001), duct-penetrating sign (46 % vs. 2 %; P < 0.001), enhanced duct sign (36 % vs. 2 %; P < 0.001) and capsule-like rim (46 % vs. 3 %; P < 0.001) were more frequently observed in AIP. Ring-like enhancement during the delayed phase (5 % vs. 46 %; P < 0.001) and peripancreatic strands with a length of at least 10 mm (5 % vs. 39 %; P = 0.001) were more frequently observed in PC. AIP was identified with 82 % sensitivity and 98 % specificity using four of these seven findings. Multivariate analysis revealed significant differences in dotted enhancement (P = 0.004), duct-penetrating sign (P < 0.001) and capsule-like rim (P = 0.007).The combination of CT findings may allow improvements in differentiating f-AIP from PC.• f-AIP can mimic PC on imaging findings. • The differentiation of f-AIP from PC is important in patient management. • Some CT findings can be used to identify AIP. • The combination of CT findings will improve differentiation from PC.Pancreatic cystic lesions without overt cytologic atypia: proposed diagnostic categories for endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration cytology with utilization of fluid carcinoembryonic antigen level.It was the aim of this study to examine pancreatic cyst cases that lack markedly atypical or malignant epithelium on endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspirations.We conducted a retrospective case review study, including 24 cases that were either acellular or lacked cytologic atypia and were subsequently resected. The cases were retrospectively divided into 3 categories: (1) non-diagnostic, (2) cyst contents only, and (3) cyst contents with bland-appearing epithelium. The cyst contents were subdivided into mucinous and non-mucinous types. The cytologic diagnoses were correlated with cyst fluid carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels and subsequent histologic diagnoses.Category 1 comprised 4 cases: 2 cases (CEA >800 ng/ml) with mucin-producing neoplasms and 2 cases (CEA not determined) with microcystic serous cystadenomas. Category 2 included 4 cases with non-mucinous and 4 with mucinous contents. In the first subgroup, 2 cases (CEA >800 ng/ml) showed mucinous cystic neoplasms and 2 cases (CEA negligible or not determined) pseudocysts. In the second subgroup, there were 3 cases with neoplastic mucinous cysts (1 CEA >800 ng/ml, 2 not determined) and 1 case with a lymphoepithelial cyst with mucinous metaplasia (CEA >800 ng/ml). Almost all cases (10/11) in category 3 had neoplastic mucinous cysts regardless of the CEA levels.The proposed 3 cytologic categories of pancreatic cystic lesion combined with cyst fluid CEA levels provide useful clinical information.Utility of 18F-FDG PET/CT for differentiation of autoimmune pancreatitis with atypical pancreatic imaging findings from pancreatic cancer.This study was conducted to evaluate the clinical usefulness of PET/CT in differentiating autoimmune pancreatitis from pancreatic cancer.To differentiate autoimmune pancreatitis from pancreatic cancer, we analyzed the cases of 17 patients with autoimmune pancreatitis and atypical pancreatic imaging findings who underwent integrated PET/CT. The PET/CT findings on the 17 patients with autoimmune pancreatitis were compared with those of 151 patients with pancreatic cancer.Fluorine-18 FDG uptake by the pancreas was found in all patients with autoimmune pancreatitis and in 82% (124/151) of patients with pancreatic cancer. Diffuse uptake by the pancreas was significantly more frequent in patients with autoimmune pancreatitis (53% vs 3%, p < 0.001). FDG uptake by the salivary glands and kidneys was seen only in patients with autoimmune pancreatitis, the former reaching statistical significance (p = 0.003). Follow-up PET/CT after steroid therapy was performed for eight patients with autoimmune pancreatitis. After steroid therapy, none of the patients had intense FDG uptake by the pancreas or extrapancreatic organs.In difficult cases, at PET/CT the presence of diffuse uptake of FDG by the pancreas or concomitant extrapancreatic uptake by the salivary glands can be used to aid in differentiation of autoimmune pancreatitis and pancreatic cancer.Role of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography imaging in surgery for pancreatic cancer.To evaluate the role of positron emission tomography using 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG-PET) in the surgical management of patients with pancreatic cancer, including the diagnosis, staging, and selection of patients for the subsequent surgical treatment.This study involved 53 patients with proven primary pancreatic cancer. The sensitivity of diagnosing the primary cancer was examined for FDG-PET, CT, cytological examination of the bile or pancreatic juice, and the serum levels of carcinoembrionic antigens (CEA) and carbohydrate antigen 19-9 (CA19-9). Next, the accuracy of staging was compared between FDG-PET and CT. Finally, FDG-PET was analyzed semiquantitatively using the standard uptake value (SUV). The impact of the SUV on patient management was evaluated by examining the correlations between the SUV and the histological findings of cancer.The sensitivity of FDG-PET, CT, cytological examination of the bile or pancreatic juice, and the serum levels of CEA and CA19-9 were 92.5%, 88.7%, 46.4%, 37.7% and 69.8%, respectively. In staging, FDG-PET was superior to CT only in diagnosing distant disease (bone metastasis). For local staging, the sensitivity of CT was better than that of FDG-PET. The SUV did not correlate with the pTNM stage, grades, invasions to the vessels and nerve, or with the size of the tumor. However, there was a statistically significant difference (4.6 +/- 2.9 vs 7.8 +/- 4.5, P = 0.024) in the SUV between patients with respectable and unresectable disease.FDG-PET is thus considered to be useful in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer. However, regarding the staging of the disease, FDG-PET is not considered to be a sufficiently accurate diagnostic modality. Although the SUV does not correlate with the patho-histological prognostic factors, it may be useful in selecting patients who should undergo subsequent surgical treatment.EUS-guided FNA cytology of pancreatic neuroendocrine tumour (PanNET): a retrospective study of 132 cases over an 18-year period in a single institution.To determine the diagnostic accuracy and pitfalls of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) cytology of pancreatic neuroendocrine tumour (PanNET).A search of our laboratory information system was performed from July 1992 to June 2010 to identify all FNA cytology and corresponding surgical specimens in which the diagnosis of PanNET was rendered or considered.One hundred and thirty-two cases diagnosed by EUS-guided FNA were collected. Histological correlation was available for 77 (58%) of FNAs; 55 patients may have been treated elsewhere or had no surgery because of advanced disease or co-morbidity. Among 56 cases diagnosed as PanNET on FNA, 54 (96%) were confirmed histologically; the remaining two were poorly differentiated adenocarcinoma with focal neuroendocrine features in one case and no tumour was found in the other. Follow-up histology of nine patients diagnosed as suspicious for PanNET on FNA showed four PanNETs, two pancreatic ductal adenocarcinomas (PDA), one solid pseudopapillary tumour (SPT) and two cases of chronic pancreatitis. Nine cases rendered by FNA as atypical (n = 3), no atypical cells identified (n = 4) or unsatisfactory (n = 2) were PanNETs on histology. Lastly, three cases of oncocytic variant of PanNET were misdiagnosed on FNA as either adenocarcinoma (n = 2) or as suspicious for carcinoma (n = 1).Overall, 54 of the 70 histologically confirmed PanNET cases (77%) were correctly diagnosed by preoperative FNA as PanNET. FNA cases designated as no atypical cells identified and unsatisfactory (7/132, 5%) were attributable to sampling error. Diagnostic pitfalls in our study mainly included PDA, SPT and chronic pancreatitis.Values and limitations of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose-positron-emission tomography with preoperative evaluation of patients with pancreatic masses.The aim of this study was to determine the value and limitations of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG)-position-emission tomography (PET) for differentiating benign and malignant pancreatic disease and for staging malignant disease. One hundred fifty-nine patients with 89 malignant and 70 benign pancreatic lesions all received PET, computed tomography (CT), and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) before pancreatic surgery. The original reports were compared for all patients (group I; N = 159), for a subgroup that neither had fasting plasma glucose levels > or =130 mg/dL or known elevated levels of C-reactive protein ([CRP], group II; n = 123), and for the remaining patients (group III; n = 36). For group I, accuracy values (areas under receiver operating characteristic [ROC] curves) for differentiation of benign/malignant masses were 0.86 (PET), 0.93 (ERCP), 0.82 (CT), and 0.95 for ERCP + PET (N = 159). For group II, ROC areas increased to 0.92 (PET), 0.94 (p < 0.05; n = 123) (ERCP), 0.82 (CT), 0.97 (p < 0.05; n = 123) (ERCP + PET). The results for group III were 0.71 (PET), 0.81 (CT), and 0.93 (ERCP); (n = 36). With 54 patients of group II that either had contradictory or indeterminate/technically unsuccessful CT/ERCP, PET was correct in 43 patients (84%). Sensitivity/specificity for lymph node staging was 49%/63%, respectively. For patients with hepatic metastasis, PET was 70% sensitive and 95% specific, missing some metastasis that were <1 cm. PET detected peritoneal metastasis in 25% of patients, missing poorly localized microscopic spread. For selected patients who have indeterminate pancreatic masses but no hyperglycemia or serologic evidence of active inflammation, FDG-PET is an independent functional assay that significantly adds to the diagnostic accuracy of ERCP and CT in the differentiation of benign and malignant pancreatic disease. PET can reliably detect hepatic, peritoneal, and other distant metastases that are > or =1 cm.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided biopsies of pancreatic masses: comparison between fine needle aspirations and needle core biopsies.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-guided FNA) is a highly sensitive and specific method for diagnosing pancreatic masses. Alternatively, EUS-guided needle core biopsies (NCB) have also been introduced. We sought to determine efficacies of pancreatic EUS-guided FNAs and NCBs. Records of consecutive EUS-guided FNAs received over a 24-mo-period were reviewed. Cases with concurrent NCBs were selected for the study. The diagnoses from the two modalities were compared and designated concordant (CC) or discordant (DC). Of 252 cases, 52 had concurrent NCBs. The final diagnoses included primary and secondary tumors. Of the 52 cases, 29/52 (55.8%) were CC and 23/52 (44.2%) were DC. The sensitivities for FNAs and NCBs were 95.0% and 67.6%, respectively. Both modalities were 100% specific. Direct comparison between EUS-guided FNAs and NCBs demonstrated that the former are more sensitive for diagnosing pancreatic neoplasms, both primaries and metastases. There was no correlation between CC/DC cases and type of neoplasm.Echo-enhanced color- and power-Doppler EUS for the discrimination between focal pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma.EUS is a precise method for detection and staging of pancreatic tumors. However, differentiation between inflammatory pseudotumor and pancreatic carcinoma remains difficult. The aim of this study was to evaluate contrast-enhanced EUS as a method of differentiating inflammation and carcinoma based on perfusion characteristics.Patients with solid pancreatic masses underwent EUS with a linear echoendoscope. Perfusion in the pancreatic tissue and the mass was assessed with native and contrast-enhanced EUS with power- and color-Doppler imaging. Examinations were evaluated by a blinded reader. A markedly hyperperfused lesion was considered an inflammatory pseudotumor whereas lesions that were hypoperfused compared with surrounding tissue were considered to be carcinoma.Fifteen of 23 patients had hypoperfusion within the mass and 8 patients had hyperperfused lesions. Of the 15 patients with hypoperfused masses, all had pancreatic adenocarcinoma; 1 of 8 patients with a hyperperfused lesion also had adenocarcinoma. The remaining 7 patients had focal inflammation. Sensitivity for differentiation of pancreatic carcinoma versus inflammatory changes was 94%, specificity 100%.Echo-enhanced power-Doppler EUS reliably differentiates pancreatic neoplasm and focal pancreatitis. The diagnostic accuracy of this technique is comparable to CT, magnetic resonance imaging, positron emission tomography, and ERCP.Optimal number of needle passes in endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration for pancreatic lesions.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is accurate in cytological diagnosis of pancreatic lesions. Our aim was to determine optimal number of needle passes in EUS-FNA for pancreatic lesions without onsite cytopathologist, who is not routinely available to participate in the procedure.Results of all needle passes in EUS-FNAs for 117 pancreatic neoplasms in 115 patients were reviewed retrospectively. Factors that required 2 or more needle passes for correct diagnosis were identified by multivariate logistic regression analysis. In each lesion group defined by the factors that required 2 or more passes and were known at the time of EUS-FNA, number of needle passes was regarded as optimal when an increase in diagnostic sensitivity by an additional needle pass did not reach 10%.Size of 15 mm or less (OR 4.58, 95% CI 1.70-12.3, P < 0.01), location of head (OR 5.02, 95% CI 1.82-13.9, P < 0.01), and neuroendocrine tumor (NET) (OR 5.04, 95% CI 1.38-18.4, P = 0.01) independently required 2 or more needle passes. Optimal numbers of needle passes for lesions of 15 mm or less in the head, those of more than 15 mm in the head, those of 15 mm or less in the body or tail, and those of more than 15 mm in the body or tail were 3, 2, 2, and 1, respectively. When these numbers of needle passes were performed, 93% of pancreatic lesions were correctly diagnosed.Optimal numbers of needle passes in EUS-FNA for pancreatic lesions without onsite cytopathologist were between 1 and 3.[Value of dual-phase-helical CT in the preoperative diagnosis of pancreatic cancer--a prospective study].A prospective study was performed to evaluate the accuracy of dual phase helical CT in suspected pancreatic cancer.Within one year 136 patients underwent helical CT with arterial and portal venous scans after bolus tracking and NaCl bolus injection. Evidence of pancreatic cancer and assessment of resectability were recorded using a standardised protocol. Suspected benign disease was verified by follow-up examination and clinical data, suspected malignant disease was correlated with biopsy or surgery.For the detection of tumor the overall concordance was 92%, the sensitivity 98% and the specificity 70% (6 false positive, 1 false negative). Resectability was correctly assessed in 90% with a sensitivity of 92% and a specificity of 88% (4 false positive, 4 false negative). Vascular invasion was detected correctly in 91% (veins)-94% (arteries), lymph node invasion in 67% and liver metastasis in 94%.Dual phase helical CT is a very reliable tool in the assessment of resectability in pancreatic cancer.Impact of 18-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography on the management of pancreatic cancer.We compared the usefulness of positron emission tomography with the glucose analogue 2-deoxy-2-[18F]-fluoro-D-glucose (FDG-PET) and multidetector-row computed tomography (MD-CT) in diagnosing pancreatic cancer and in determining the patients' suitability for surgery.We reviewed the clinical FDG-PET data of 103 consecutive pancreatic cancer patients between July 2004 and March 2009.The detection rates of pancreatic cancer by MD-CT (89%) and FDG-PET (91%) were similar. From the MD-CT findings, 38 patients were judged as operable, and 65, inoperable. Among the inoperable patients, noncurative factors (metastasis to the liver, peritoneum, remote lymph nodes, bones, and other organs and major arterial invasion) were detected by MD-CT and/or FDG-PET. Detection rates of liver metastasis and arterial invasion by FDG-PET were significantly inferior to those of MD-CT (neither was detected by FDG-PET alone). Remote lymph nodes and bone metastasis were detected in 20 lesions by FDG-PET alone; however, MD-CT indicated other noncurative factors in these patients. All 65 patients could be diagnosed as inoperable without FDG-PET.FDG-PET is not a suitable imaging modality for either diagnosis or preoperative treatment in pancreatic cancer patients. Since it is expensive, FDG-PET as a routine diagnostic tool in pancreatic cancer patients must be used with caution.Comparison of F-18-FDG PET/CT findings between pancreatic solid pseudopapillary tumor and pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma.Pancreatic solid pseudopapillary tumor (SPT) is a rare benign tumor. Little data are available on positron emission tomographic/computed tomographic (PET/CT) characteristics of this tumor. Therefore, we analyzed the metabolic characteristics of SPT using F-18-FDG PET/CT and compared the results with those of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma.We retrospectively reviewed the records of 11 SPT patients and 46 patients with ductal adenocarcinoma. Ten SPT patients had primary tumors and 1 patient had metastatic SPT. Maximum standardized uptake value (max SUV), mean SUV, metabolic tumor volume (MTV), total lesion glycolysis (TLG), and tumor-to-background ratio (TBR) were evaluated. Mann-Whitney U test between pancreatic SPT and ductal adenocarcinoma was performed. In addition, age, gender and tumor size-adjusted analysis of covariance (ANCOVA) was done between pancreatic SPT and ductal adenocarcinoma.Compared with pancreatic ductal adenocarcinomas, SPTs had significantly higher tumor size-adjusted MTV and TLG. MTV and TLG values were significantly correlated with T-stage of the SPTs. In 1 SPT patient, metastases in the liver and mesentery were revealed by intense uptake of FDG on F-18-FDG PET/CT, and after PET/CT had suggested the presence of pancreatic SPT.We recommend that SPT be considered when a solid pancreatic mass with increased FDG metabolism is encountered on PET/CT. F-18-FDG PET/CT may be useful in detecting subtle metastases of SPT.Computerized tomography, diagnostic ultrasound, and radionuclide scanning. Comparison of efficacy in diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma.Forty-six patients, including 33 with proved pancreatic carcinoma, were studied with computerized tomography (CT), ultrasound (US), and radionuclide (RN) scanning. The results of each scanning procedure were compared with the surgical and clinical findings. The detection rate was 82% for CT, and 92% with US. A mass is the most important finding in the diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma. Measurements of the pancreas with CT and US were similar, with visualization of all parts of the pancreas routinely better with CT scans. Radionuclide scans were abnormal in 96% of the patients with pancreatic carcinoma as well as in 75% of patients without pancreatic disease. A rational approach to examination of a patient with suspected pancreatic carcinoma should begin with US scan with available, because the detection rate with this method is equal to that with CT and its cost per procedure and for equipment is substantially less.Endoscopic ultrasound guided fine needle aspiration biopsy: a large single centre experience.Endoscopic ultrasound guided fine needle aspiration biopsy (EUS-FNA) is a recent innovation in the evaluation of gastrointestinal and pulmonary malignancies.To review the experience with EUS-FNA of a large single centre.333 consecutive patients underwent EUS-FNA. Follow up data were available on 327 lesions in 317 patients, including 160 lymph nodes, 144 pancreatic lesions, 15 extraintestinal masses, and eight intramural tumours.A primary diagnosis of malignancy was obtained by EUS-FNA in 62% of patients with clinically suspicious lesions. The overall accuracy of EUS-FNA for the diagnosis of malignancy was 86%, with sensitivity of 84% and specificity of 96%. With respect to lesion types, the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were 85%, 100%, and 89% for lymph nodes; 82%, 100%, and 85% for pancreatic lesions; 88%, 100%, and 90% for perirectal masses; and 50%, 25%, and 38% for intramural lesions, respectively. Compared with size and sonographic criteria, EUS-FNA in the evaluation of lymph nodes provided superior accuracy and specificity, without compromising sensitivity. Inadequate specimens were obtained from only six patients, including 3/5 with stromal tumors. Only one complication occurred.EUS-FNA is safe and can readily obtain tissue specimens adequate for cytopathological diagnoses. Compared with size and sonographic criteria, it is a superior modality for the detection of nodal metastases. While providing accurate diagnosis of pancreatic and perirectal malignancies, results suggest the technique is less useful for intramural lesions.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration with or without flow cytometry for the diagnosis of primary pancreatic lymphoma - a case series.The role of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) with flow cytometry for the diagnosis of primary pancreatic lymphoma (PPL) has not been previously described. Our aims were to describe the EUS features of PPL and the role of EUS-FNA with and without flow cytometry in the diagnosis of 16 patients. When EUS-FNA with flow cytometry was compared with EUS-FNA without flow cytometry, the sensitivities for diagnosing non-Hodgkin's lymphoma were 84.6 % versus 30.8 %, respectively ( P = 0.01). EUS-FNA with flow cytometry is a valuable tool to diagnose PPL. Flow cytometry analysis complements traditional assessment by standard cytology.A prospective study comparing rapid assessment of smears and ThinPrep for endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspirates.ThinPrep is often used for endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) samples but the sensitivity of this method is unknown. The objective of the study was to compare sensitivity and accuracy of ThinPrep versus the smear method in pancreas and lymph node samples obtained by EUS-FNA.Patients with suspected malignancy in the pancreas or lymph node underwent EUS-FNA. On-site rapid assessment of all aspirates using the smear method was performed. After rapid assessment, three additional passes from each site were submitted into ThinPrep liquid medium. Cytopathologists interpreting the smear method and ThinPrep slides were blinded to each other. The gold standard was final cytology or pathology results.A total of 130 patients (36 % women, mean age 63 years) underwent EUS-FNA of 139 sites (50 pancreas, 89 lymph node). Malignancy was confirmed in 47 pancreas samples (94 %) and 48 lymph node samples (54 %). Mean +/- SD number of passes made for the smear method was 2.6 +/- 1.3. For pancreatic cancer, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive value (NPV), and accuracy of the ThinPrep versus the smear method were: 62 % versus 98 %, 100 % versus 100 %, 100 % versus 100 %, 14 % versus 75 %, and 64 % versus 98 %, respectively. For lymph nodes the values were 67 % versus 92 %, 100 % versus 98 %, 100 % versus 98 %, 72 % versus 72 %, and 82 % versus 94 %, respectively.The smear method is more sensitive and accurate than ThinPrep in detecting malignancy from EUS-FNA samples of the pancreas and lymph nodes. Smear method with on-site rapid assessment should be favored over ThinPrep in suspected malignancy.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration of the pancreas. Diagnostic utility and accuracy.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy (EUS-FNAB) is regarded as a safe and reliable procedure for diagnosing and staging of pancreatic neoplasms. This study retrospectively evaluated both the diagnostic utility and accuracy of pancreatic EUS-FNABs and potential cytologic pitfalls when using Diff-Quik stain for on-site evaluation.Pancreatic EUS-FNABs performed between 1995 and 1998 were identified from the files of the Department of Pathology. All patients were studied via a linear-array ultrasound endoscope with an FNAB device. Immediate evaluation of the specimen by a pathologist using air-dried slides and Diff-Quik stain was done on all cases. An average of five passes (range, three to nine) were performed. Five cytologic categories were identified: nondiagnostic, benign, atypical, suspicious and malignant. EUS disease staging, histologic correlation and clinical follow-up were reviewed.Sixty-nine consecutive pancreative FNABs were evaluated in the study period. The patients comprised 38 females and 31 males with a mean age of 65 years (range, 36-83). Histologic correlation was available on 40 patients, and follow-up was available on the remaining 29. The cytologic diagnoses included: 31 malignant, 8 suspicious, 6 atypical, 20 benign and 4 nondiagnostic. Forty-three cases were true positive, 9 were true negative, 2 were false positive, and 11 were false negative. The overall sensitivity was 80% and specificity was 82%.The study showed that cytologic evaluation of pancreatic EUS-FNABs has 80% sensitivity and 82% specificity. False negative diagnosis was usually due to sampling error. A nondiagnostic cytologic diagnosis should be rendered in the absence of adequate sampling of a lesion. On-site cytologic evaluation of EUS-FNABs aids in guaranteeing specimen adequacy, and the pathologist should be trained to evaluate Diff-Quik-stained samples.Diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration for suspected pancreatic malignancy in relation to the size of lesions. Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is an accurate method for cytological confirmation of pancreatic malignancy, but it has been unknown whether its diagnostic accuracy for pancreatic lesions was affected by their size, location, or size of needles. Our aim was to investigate the accuracy of EUS-FNA for suspected pancreatic malignancy in relation to these factors, especially to the size of lesions. In a tertiary referral center, EUS-FNAs for 120 suspected pancreatic malignancies in 115 patients based on other imaging studies were evaluated retrospectively. Overall accuracy of EUS-FNA was 96% (115/120), with sensitivity of 95% (76/80), specificity of 98% (39/40), positive predictive value of 99% (76/77), and negative predictive value of 91% (39/43). Accuracies for lesions less than 10mm, 11-20mm, 21-30mm, and more than 31mm were 96%, 95%, 96%, and 100%, respectively; those for lesions in the head, the body, and the tail of the pancreas were 96%, 95%, and 95%, respectively. Accuracies for 22-gauge and 25-gauge needle were 93% and 98%, respectively. EUS-FNA was accurate in the evaluation of suspected pancreatic malignancy regardless of its size, location, or size of needles. It was useful also in the confirmation of small pancreatic malignancies less than 10mm.A comparison of ultrasound, computed tomography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the differential diagnosis of benign and malignant jaundice and cholestasis.To assess the accuracy of ultrasonography (US), computed tomography (CT), and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in distinguishing between benign and malignant causes of jaundice and cholestasis without jaundice.Prospective study.University Hospital in Finland.A consecutive series of patients with jaundice (n = 187) or cholestasis without jaundice (n = 33).Correlation between diagnosis on imaging and final diagnosis at follow up 6 months later. Final diagnoses made on histology (n = 79), cytology (n = 5), operative or endoscopic findings (n = 96), and clinical course or serology (n = 40).The most common benign disease was choledocholithiasis (n = 83) and the most common malignant disease was carcinoma of pancreas (n = 33). The benign nature of the extrahepatic obstruction was correctly defined by US, CT, and ERCP in 53%, 53%, and 90% of patients, respectively, and the corresponding figures for choledocholithiasis were 22%, 25%, and 79% (ERCP compared with each of the other techniques, p < 0.0001). Intrahepatic benign diseases were diagnosed by US and CT in a third of cases. Malignant extrahepatic obstruction was correctly diagnosed in 57%, 80%, and 83%, respectively and the corresponding figures for pancreatic cancer were 60%, 97%, and 89% (US compared with CT, p < 0.01, and with ERCP, p < 0.05). Intrahepatic malignant lesions were diagnosed by US, CT, and ERCP in 100%, 77%, and 60% of patients, respectively.When the obstruction was benign and extrahepatic ERCP was the most accurate, but when it was malignant CT was comparable. Intrahepatic disease was best diagnosed by US and CT. The results emphasise that the three methods of imaging are complementary.Intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas: helical CT with histopathologic correlation.To evaluate the accuracy of preoperative computed tomography (CT) in predicting the location and type of ductal involvement and malignant transformation in intraductal papillary mucinous (IPM) pancreatic tumors and to determine the predictive factors for malignancy at CT.The helical CT scans obtained in 36 operated on patients with a diagnosis of IPM pancreatic tumor were retrospectively assessed. CT-histopathologic correlation was then performed.The final diagnoses of IPM tumor were combined type (n = 26) and branch duct type (n = 10) lesions. Histologic analysis revealed adenocarcinoma (n = 9), hyperplasia (n = 8), low-grade dysplasia (n = 12), and high-grade dysplasia (n = 7). The lesions were located mainly in the head or uncinate process (n = 20) or were diffuse or multifocal (n = 12). In 12 patients (13 cases), CT-histopathologic correlation was poor, including that in the evaluation of ductal involvement (n = 7), evaluation of lesion location (n = 2), and diagnosis of malignant transformation (n = 4). The most specific predictive signs of malignancy were presence of diabetes and, at CT, a solid mass, main pancreatic duct dilatation greater than 10 mm, diffuse or multifocal involvement, and attenuating or calcified intraluminal content.The main causes of poor CT-histopathologic correlation were related to evaluation of main pancreatic duct involvement and diagnosis of malignant transformation. The association between diabetes and specific CT criteria was highly suggestive of malignancy.Macrocystic pancreatic lesions: differentiation of benign from premalignant and malignant cysts by CT.To assess useful CT features for differentiating benign from premalignant and malignant macrocystic pancreatic lesions.Seventy-four patients with pathologically proven macrocystic pancreatic lesions were enrolled: 17 benign cysts (macrocystic serous cystadenoma, n=12; congenital cyst; n=5) and 57 premalignant and malignant cysts (mucinous cystic neoplasm, n=28; intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of branch duct type, n=20; tumor with cystic change, n=9). Size, location, shape (lobulated, round or oval, or complex cystic with tubular cyst), wall thickness (thin, < or =1mm; thick, >1mm), internal surface (smooth or irregular), and other findings were analyzed with multiphasic CT with thin-section (2.5-3mm) images. CT features between two groups were compared using univariate and multivariate stepwise logistic regression analyses.On univariate analysis, the differences for the shape (p=0.007), wall thickness (p=0.011), and internal surface (p=0.012) between benign and premalignant and malignant cysts were significant. A lobulated shape, a thin wall and a smooth internal surface were more frequent in benign cysts, whereas a round or oval shape or a complex cystic shape with tubular cyst, a thick wall and an irregular internal surface were more frequent in premalignant and malignant cysts. On multivariate analysis, the shape (p=0.002) and wall thickness (p=0.025) were significant CT features for differentiating benign from premalignant and malignant cysts.Shape and wall thickness are the main CT features for differentiating benign from premalignant and malignant macrocystic pancreatic lesions.Value of the single-phase technique in MDCT assessment of pancreatic tumors.The purpose of our study was to determine the diagnostic value of single-phase MDCT in patients with suspected pancreatic carcinoma.Seventy-one patients (41 men, 30 women; mean age, 63 years; range, 29-80 years) with suspected pancreatic tumor underwent MDCT. Scanning was performed on an MDCT scanner with 0.5-sec gantry rotation and acquisition of 4 slices per rotation. Unenhanced scanning was followed by one set of scanning in the caudocranial direction from the inferior hepatic margin to the diaphragm with a scanning delay of 60 sec after the IV injection of 150 mL of contrast material delivered at 3 mL/sec. Two reviewers independently scored images in a blinded fashion for the presence of tumor and assessment of resectability. Receiver operating characteristic analysis was performed.A final histopathologic diagnosis derived from surgical findings was obtained in 42 patients; in the remaining 29 patients, percutaneous fine-needle aspiration biopsy coupled with a 1-year clinical follow-up to determine development of local, regional or distant neoplasm served as gold standard proof of diagnosis. Final diagnosis was pancreatic cancer in 40 patients (27 ductal adenocarcinoma, nine mucinous cystoadenocarcinoma, two neuroendocrine tumors, one lymphoma, and one papillary cystoadenocarcinoma) and chronic pancreatitis in 31. The mean tumor size was 2.4 cm (range, 4-1 cm). Values for the area under the curve (A(z)) for the assessment of tumor detection were 0.97 for reviewer 1 and 0.96 for reviewer 2 (p = not significant). A(z) values for tumor resectability were 0.90 for reviewer 1 and 0.90 for reviewer 2 (p = not significant). No statistically significant differences were observed between superior mesenteric artery and vein opacification with the hepatic parenchyma enhanced at a time closer to the peak hepatic enhancement, optimizing the detection of hepatic lesions.Thin-section single-phase MDCT is an accurate technique for the diagnosis and assessment of resectability in patients with a suspected pancreatic neoplasm. This technique provides optimal tumor-to-pancreas contrast and maximal pancreatic parenchymal and peripancreatic vascular enhancement. It allows visualization of the entire liver and the whole upper abdomen during the portal phase for accurate identification of liver metastases and peritoneal seeding.Comparison of resected and non-resected intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas.By comparing the clinicopathological features and survivals between the resected and non-resected intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) of the pancreas, this study tried to clarify the natural history of IPMNs, to provide a strategy for treatment, and to determine the justification of not performing resection for some patients. A total of 57 patients with IPMN, including 39 resected and 18 non-resected IPMNs, were recruited for study. Data on demographics, clinical presentations, diagnostic work-up, treatment modality, clinical course, and outcomes were evaluated and compared between the resected and non-resected IPMNs. The most common clinical presentation was abdominal pain (57% in total IPMNs, 67% in resected, 33% in non-resected), followed by body weight loss (32% in total IPMNs, 33% in resected, 28% in non-resected). The sensitivity in the diagnosis of IPMN was highest by magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) (88%), followed by endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) (68%), and computed tomography scan (CT scan) (42%) and sonography (10%). The median survival was 21.5 months for patients with resected IPMNs, ranging from 2 to 124 months, and 14 months in non-resected IPMN patients, ranging from 5.5 to 70 months. There is no significant survival difference between the resected and non-resected groups, with a 5-year survival of 69.8% in resected IPMNs and 59.8% in non-resected IPMNs, P = 0.347. The survival outcome of the unresectable non-resected IPMNs was much inferior to the resected IPMNs, P = 0.002 and resectable non-resected IPMNs, P = 0.001. Thus, the prime prognostic factor in predicting the survival outcome of IPMNs is resectability, instead of resection itself. Long-term survival could also be expected in resectable IPMNs without resection. No resection for the IPMN may be justified for patients with high surgical risks, especially for those who are asymptomatic and very aged.Pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms: role of CT in predicting pathologic subtypes.The objective of our study was to evaluate whether CT can be used to predict the pathologic subtypes of pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs).Three radiologists, blinded to the pathologic IPMN subtype, retrospectively and independently reviewed the preoperative CT scans of 38 patients with surgically resected pancreatic IPMN: 11 intraductal papillary mucinous adenomas, 11 intraductal papillary mucinous carcinomas, and 16 intraductal papillary mucinous carcinomas with invasion. The patients, 16 women and 22 men, ranged in age from 38 to 80 years (mean age, 64.3 years). CT findings were correlated with each pathologic subtype using the chi-square (two-sided) test and analysis of variance. Interobserver agreement of the CT diagnosis of pathologic subtype and agreement between the CT diagnosis and pathologic subtype were also studied (kappa statistic).Predominant main pancreatic duct (MPD) involvement (p = 0.04) and a wide (> 1 cm) connection of a side-branch lesion with the MPD (p = 0.03) correlated with intraductal papillary mucinous carcinoma with invasion. Tumor size, MPD diameter, number of tumors per patient, number of pseudoseptations per tumor, common bile duct dilatation, enlarged lymph nodes, intraductal calcifications, papillary bulging, and presence and size of a solid mass yielded no statistically significant relationship with pathologic subtype. Both interobserver agreement of CT diagnosis (range, 0.004-0.359) and agreement between CT diagnosis and pathologic subtype (range, 0.046-0.317) ranged from slight to fair.Prediction of the pathologic subtypes of pancreatic IPMNs by CT is limited. Predominant MPD involvement and a wide connection of a side-branch lesion with the MPD are the only CT findings that can be used to predict the pathologic subtype of pancreatic IPMN.Evaluation of various imaging methods in the differential diagnosis of intraductal papillary-mucinous tumor (IPMT) of the pancreas.IPMT (intraductal papillary-mucinous tumor) of the pancreas has unique clinicopathological characteristics. The lesions which show characteristic clinical features of IPMT exhibit a wide spectrum of histological types ranging from atypical hyperplasia to invasive cancer. Therefore, surgical treatment cannot be recommended for all patients with IPMT. It is necessary to assess the malignant potential of IPMT in individual patients in order to select an appropriate approach. The aim of this study was to evaluate the effectiveness of endoscopic ultrasonography and intraductal ultrasonography as compared with ultrasonography and computed tomography for this purpose.Ultrasonography, computed tomography, endoscopic ultrasonography and intraductal ultrasonography were performed in 49 cases of IPMT (atypical hyperplasia 7, adenoma 23, noninvasive 7 and invasive adenocarcinoma 12). On the basis of the histopathological analysis of another 28 cases of resected IPMT specimens, criteria for differential diagnosis by imaging modalities were defined as follows: Nonneoplastic lesion (atypical hyperplasia): no wall thickening or nodule; noninvasive IPMT (adenoma and intraductal carcinoma): a nodule or wall thickening is present; and invasive IPMT with pancreatic parenchymal invasion: a mass with a heterogenous pattern or interruption of the pancreatic duct wall by the mass.The diagnostic accuracy rate for differentiating nonneoplastic lesion noninvasive IPMT, and invasive IPMT was 33% by ultrasonography, 38% by computed tomography, 77% by endoscopic ultrasonography, and 67% by intraductal ultrasonography. Sensitivity, specificity and accuracy rates for differentiating neoplastic and nonneoplastic IPMT by ultrasonography was 33%, 100%, 42%, by computed tomography 36%, 100%, 44%, by endoscopic ultrasonography 90%, 71%, 88%, by intraductal ultrasonography 94%, 29%, 84%, respectively. Sensitivity, specificity and accuracy rates for differentiating invasive and noninvasive IPMT by ultrasonography was 25%, 100%, 80%, by computed tomography 33%, 100%, 83%, by endoscopic ultrasonography 55%, 97%, 88%, by intraductal ultrasonography 56%, 91%, 84%, respectively. Diagnostic accuracy for invasive IPMT except minimally invasive cases by endoscopic ultrasonography and intraductal ultrasonography was 80%, based on the results of the examination which demonstrated a higher grade lesion.With these criteria, ultrasonography and computed tomography showed high specificity, but low sensitivity for the differential diagnosis of neoplastic/nonneoplastic and invasive/noninvasive IPMT. However, endoscopic ultrasonography and intraductal ultrasonography had high sensitivity and diagnostic accuracy for the differential diagnosis of neoplastic/nonneoplastic lesions. Combination of endoscopic ultrasonography and intraductal ultrasonography showed a high accuracy rate in the diagnosis of invasive IPMT. Thus endoscopic ultrasonography and intraductal ultrasonography contributed significantly to the choice of the treatment for IPMT.Cytotechnologist on-site evaluation of pancreas fine needle aspiration adequacy: comparison with cytopathologists and correlation with the final interpretation.To compare on-site evaluations of adequacy (OSEA) of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) of the pancreas performed by cytotechnologists and cytopathologists.A 10-year retrospective review of 2,426 OSEA from 2,223 procedures in 1,984 patients was performed. Adequacy statistics were calculated along with the accuracy of the OSEA for each OSEA provider. The effect of other variables, including the lifetime number of EUS pancreatic OSEA, the number of years of experience at the time of each case, the institutional number of EUS FNA, and the number of smears was evaluated with ANOVA.There was no difference in the adequacy downgrade rate for cytotechnologists versus cytopathologists during this study period (38.2 vs. 32.2%, p = 0.13). Neither individual cytologist experience with EUS-guided pancreatic FNA (p = 0.25) nor years in practice (p = 0.86) was correlated with the accuracy of the OSEA. The experience of the institution with EUS-guided pancreatic FNA was correlated with both adequacy (p = 0.003) and accuracy (p = 0.000001).Cytotechnologists and cytopathologists are comparably accurate in OSEA of EUS-guided pancreatic FNA. The adequacy and accuracy of the OSEA increase with institutional experience, and this increase is not solely attributable to cytologist factors.Cell block technique and cytological smears for the differential diagnosis of pancreatic neoplasms after endosonography-guided fine-needle aspiration.Cytological smear is widely employed to analyse specimens obtained from endosonography-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA), but false-negative or inconclusive results may occur. A better diagnostic yield can be obtained from processing cell blocks. We compared the effectiveness of the cell block technique and cytological smear in the diagnosis of pancreatic neoplasms. From January 1997 to December 2006, 611 patients with pancreatic tumors were evaluated by EUS-FNA. Surgery was performed in 356 cases, and the other 255 patients were followed clinically for an average of 12.8 months. In total, 282 (46.2%) patients were evaluated with cytological smears, and 329 (53.8%) were evaluated using only cell blocks. Malignant disease was detected in 352 (57.6%) cases, in which adenocarcinoma accounted for 236 (67%) cases. A benign disease was found in the other 259 cases, including 35.1% focal chronic pancreatitis and 32.4% pseudocysts. Aspiration samples were satisfactory in 595 (97.4%) patients after an average of 2.2 (1-4) passes of the needle. Regardless of the cytopathological examination technique, EUS-FNA confirmed malignancy in 269 of 352 (76.4%) cases, and a benign disease in 257 of 259 (99.2%) cases. For patients who received surgery with histologically confirmed lesions, the sensitivity specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy of the smears versus cell blocks in diagnosing pancreatic tumors were 61% versus 85.2% (P<0.001), 100% versus 93.1%, 100% versus 98.4%, 36% versus 55.1% (P=0.046) and 68% versus 86.5% (P<0.001), respectively The cell block technique demonstrated a hig her sensitivity, negative predictive value and accuracy than cytological smears.Predictors of malignancy in intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas: analysis of 310 pancreatic resection patients at multiple high-volume centers.The present study was a retrospective investigation of predictors of malignancy in intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) of the pancreas.The subjects were 310 patients who underwent pancreatic resection at 3 high-volume centers. Preoperative laboratory and imaging findings were analyzed in logistic regression analyses. Endoscopic ultrasonography measurements were essential for the size of mural nodules, and a central review was conducted for pathological diagnosis.Pathological diagnosis was benign IPMN in 150 cases and malignant in 160 (noninvasive carcinoma, n = 100; invasive, n = 60). In multivariate analysis, size of mural nodules, diameter of main pancreatic duct, and cyst size of branch pancreatic duct were independent predictors of malignancy, and areas under the receiver operating characteristic curve for these 3 factors were 0.798, 0.643, and 0.601, respectively. With 7 mm taken as the cutoff value for the size of mural nodules, the diagnosis of malignant IPMN had sensitivity of 74.3% and specificity of 72.7%. Carcinoma without nodules was present in 15 patients (15/160 [9.4%]).The size of mural nodules measured with endoscopic ultrasonography showed high predictive ability. However, about 10% of carcinoma patients did not have nodules, and the handling of the diagnosis in such cases is a problem for the future.Pancreatic tumors: comparison of dual-phase helical CT and endoscopic sonography.The purpose of this study was to compare dual-phase helical CT and endosonography for the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic tumors.Thirty patients with suspected pancreatic tumors underwent endosonography and dual-phase helical CT. A pathologic diagnosis was obtained in all cases with surgery (n = 23) or biopsy (n = 7), resulting in 27 neoplasms. Dual-phase helical CT and endosonographic findings were correlated with surgical and pathologic findings to determine diagnosis and resectability of pancreatic tumors.Overall diagnostic sensitivity was 92% for dual-phase helical CT and 100% for endosonography (p = .45). Overall accuracy for staging of pancreatic tumors was 93% for both dual-phase helical CT and endosonography. Overall accuracy for predicting resectability was 90% for both dual-phase helical CT and endosonography. Accuracy of predicting unresectability was 100% for dual-phase helical CT and 86% for endosonography (p > .80). Differences were not considered statistically significant.Dual-phase helical CT and endoscopic sonography do not differ significantly for diagnosis and assessment of resectability of pancreatic tumors.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided pancreatic fine-needle aspiration: potential pitfalls in one institution's experience of 1212 procedures.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) has emerged as the diagnostic modality of choice for mass lesions in the pancreas. The objective of the current study was to determine the accuracy and pitfalls of EUS-FNA in the diagnosis of pancreatic lesions in cases that involved follow-up surgical resection.Cases of EUS-FNA of pancreatic lesions performed from 2007 to mid-2012 for which subsequent surgical resection was performed were retrieved from the department's database. The accuracy of the cytologic diagnosis was assessed using the histological diagnosis as the gold standard. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were calculated. "Neoplastic," "suspicious," and "malignant" were classified as a positive cytologic diagnosis. In one calculation method, "atypical" was also included as a positive cytologic diagnosis whereas in another it was not considered to be a positive cytological result. The cases with a cytologic-histological discrepancy were reviewed to identify sources of errors.A total of 1212 cases from 1104 patients (518 women and 586 men; age range, 18-94 years [average age, 63.5 years]) were identified. Cytologic diagnoses included 52 unsatisfactory, 224 benign, 129 atypical, 140 neoplasm, 35 suspicious, and 632 malignant diagnoses. Of these cases, 397 patients had histological follow-up information available. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 83.2%, 85.9%, 95.9%, and 56.1%, respectively, with atypical cases excluded from the analysis. When atypical cases were included as a positive cytologic diagnosis, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 86.7%, 67.9%, 90.7%, and 58.5%, respectively, and were 73.7%, 87.7%, 95.6%, and 48.0%, respectively, when atypical cases were included as a negative cytologic diagnosis. The major difficulty in EUS-FNA cytology was to differentiate pancreatic mucinous neoplasms from contaminants of gastric mucosa. Other pitfalls included differentiating mucinous neoplasm from extensive pancreatic intraepithelial neoplasia, and endocrine tumor from nesidioblastosis versus acinar cell carcinoma or intrapancreatic spleen.EUS-FNA is a valuable tool for the diagnosis of pancreatic lesions, especially solid malignant tumors. Cytologic-radiological correlation is essential in differentiating pancreatic mucinous neoplasms from gastric mucosa, because the former usually are found to have characteristic features on imaging. Pathologists should be aware of the pitfalls in the cytologic diagnosis of pancreatic lesions that may significantly change the clinical management of the patients.Accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration in the suspicion of pancreatic metastases.Metastases to the pancreas are rare, and usually mistaken for primary pancreatic cancers. This study aimed to describe the histology results of solid pancreatic tumours obtained by endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) for diagnosis of metastases to the pancreas.In a retrospective review, patients with pancreatic solid tumours and history of previous extrapancreatic cancer underwent EUS-FNA from January/1997 to December/2010. Most patients were followed-up until death and some of them were still alive at the end of the study. The performance of EUS-FNA for diagnosis of pancreatic metastases was analyzed. Symptoms, time frame between primary tumour diagnosis and the finding of metastases, and survival after diagnosis were also analyzed.37 patients underwent EUS-FNA for probable pancreas metastases. Most cases (65%) presented with symptoms, especially upper abdominal pain (46%). Median time between detection of the first tumour and the finding of pancreatic metastases was 36 months. Metastases were confirmed in 32 (1.6%) cases, 30 of them by EUS-FNA, and 2 by surgery. Other 5 cases were non-metastatic. Most metastases were from lymphoma, colon, lung, and kidney. Twelve (32%) patients were submitted to surgery. Median survival after diagnosis of pancreatic metastases was 9 months, with no difference of survival between surgical and non-surgical cases. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy of EUS-FNA with histology analysis of the specimens for diagnosis of pancreatic metastases were, respectively, 93.8%, 60%, 93.8%, 60% and 89%.EUS-FNA with histology of the specimens is a sensitive and accurate method for definitive diagnosis of metastatic disease in patients with a previous history of extrapancreatic malignancies.MR imaging versus PET/CT for evaluation of pancreatic lesions.To retrospectively determine the diagnostic accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and combined positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) in the differential diagnosis of benign and malignant pancreatic lesions.Twenty-seven patients (15 women/12 men, mean age 56.5 years) with MR imaging and PET/CT studies performed to differentiate benign and malignant pancreatic lesions were identified between October 2008 and October 2010. Both MR and PET/CT data sets were retrospectively and blindly evaluated by two independent readers (4 readers total) with different degrees of experience, using a visual five-point score system. The results were correlated with final diagnosis obtained by histopathology.17 patients had malignant diseases and 10 patients had benign diseases. Depending on the observer, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of MRI varied between 88-94%, 50-80%, 75-89% and 71-89% respectively. Sensitivities, specificities, positive predictive values and negative predictive values of PET/CT were 73%, 56%, 73% and 56% respectively. The diagnostic accuracy of MR for the differential diagnosis of pancreatic lesions was 74-89%, compared with 67% for PET/CT. The weighted Cohen's kappa coefficient was 0.47 at MR and 0.53 at PET/CT.MRI achieved higher sensitivity and specificity in the differential diagnosis of pancreatic lesions.EUS-guided FNA of solid pancreatic masses: a learning curve with 300 consecutive procedures.The objective of our study was to assess a single operator's learning curve with regard to the number of passes, the diagnostic accuracy, and the complications associated with EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) of solid pancreatic masses.The number of passes, the diagnostic accuracy, and the complication rate were prospectively evaluated in 300 consecutive EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses performed by a single endosonographer over a 3-year period. The procedures were placed into 3 groups, which contained 100 procedures each. The endosonographer had undergone a third-tier EUS fellowship and had performed 45 supervised pancreatic EUS-FNA during his training.Of the 300 EUS-FNA performed (median age 63 years, 64% men), no statistically significant differences among the 3 groups with regard to age, gender, race, location, or size of the mass were found. Diagnostic accuracy of the EUS-FNA procedure was similar over time (Group 1, 92%; Group 2, 92%; Group 3, 95%). Median number of passes showed a decreasing trend over the 3-year study period, despite an increasing trend of the number of procedures performed (r = -0.14, p = 0.42). The median number of passes was lower for Group 2 (median, 3; p = 0.02) and Group 3 (median, 3; p = 0.003) compared with Group 1 (median, 4). Group 3 (7/100, 7%) was less likely to encounter complications compared with Group 1 (13/100, 13%; p = 0.24) and Group 2 (18/100, 18%; p = 0.03). Frequency of serious complications was similar across the 3 groups (1%-3%).With adequate third-tier training, a newly developed EUS program can achieve safe and accurate results of EUS-FNA of the pancreas. The learning curve, however, needs to continue after the fellowship, because more procedures are needed for one to gain proficiency and efficiency with EUS-FNA.Usefulness of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy for the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy (EUS-FNAB) has come into widespread use, mainly in Western countries, as an efficient and safe method for the cytologic or histologic diagnosis of pancreatic cancer. However, it still has received relatively little attention in Japan. To evaluate the clinical status of EUS-FNAB in Japan, we retrospectively analyzed the results with regard to the ability of EUS-FNAB to diagnose pancreatic cancer, as well as its safety.A total of 52 patients (37 male, 15 female; mean age, 62.5 years; range, 33-85 years) with focal pancreatic lesions underwent EUS-FNAB at our group of hospitals in one region of Japan. Final diagnosis was confirmed by histologic examination of surgical specimens or clinical follow-up.The final diagnoses were malignant tumors in 32 patients and benign ones in 20. Insertion of the needle into the lesion was successful in 50 of the 52 patients (96.2%). Adequate specimens were obtained by EUS-FNAB from 47 of the 50 pancreatic lesions (94.0%). With five false-negative and no false-positive results, the accuracy, sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values were 89.4%, 82.1%, 100%, 100%, and 79.2%, respectively. No complications occurred.EUS-FNAB is an efficient and safe method for the histologic diagnosis of pancreatic cancer. It should be considered as one of the indispensable modalities for the histological diagnosis of pancreatic cancer in Japan, as it is in Western countries.Pancreatic fine needle aspiration. A comparison of computed tomographic and endoscopic ultrasonographic guidance.To compare the sensitivity and specificity of pancreatic fine needle aspiration (FNA) with computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) guidance.A 6-year retrospective review included 137 pancreatic FNAs (CT 51, magnetic resonance imaging 2 or EUS 84). Clinical or histologic follow-up was available for 110 patients.Positive (POS), suspicious (SUS), atypical, negative and unsatisfactory (UNSAT) results represented 25.5%, 7.3%, 7.3%, 40.1% and 19.1% of reported diagnoses, respectively. In detecting malignancy, the sensitivities of POS/SUS results were 71% and 42% for CT and EUS, respectively, with negative predictive value (NPV) of 41% and 45%. Also, 35% of UNSAT results were found to have malignancy. However, EUS was used on more difficult lesions, including 82% of small, cystic ones and 75% of small, solid ones.Although the apparent performance of percutaneous CT-guided biopsies surpasses that of EUS, this is due to the choice of endoscopy for more difficult lesions. The specificity and negative predictive value of EUS and CT are similar.Pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma and chronic mass-forming pancreatitis: Differentiation with dual-energy MDCT in spectral imaging mode.To investigate the value of dual-energy MDCT in spectral imaging in the differential diagnosis of chronic mass-forming chronic pancreatitis (CMFP) and pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma (PDAC) during the arterial phase (AP) and the pancreatic parenchymal phase (PP).Thirty five consecutive patients with CMFP (n=15) or PDAC (n=20) underwent dual-energy MDCT in spectral imaging during AP and PP. Iodine concentrations were derived from iodine-based material-decomposition CT images and normalized to the iodine concentration in the aorta. The difference in iodine concentration between the AP and PP, contrast-to-noise ratio (CNR) and the slope K of the spectrum curve were calculated.Normalized iodine concentrations (NICs) in patients with CMFP differed significantly from those in patients with PDAC during two double phases (mean NIC, 0.26±0.04 mg/mL vs. 0.53±0.02 mg/mL, p=0.0001; 0.07±0.02 mg/mL vs. 0.28±0.04 mg/mL, p=0.0002, respectively). There were significant differences in the value of the slope K of the spectrum curve in two groups during AP and PP (K(CMFP)=3.27±0.70 vs. K(PDAC)=1.35±0.41, P=0.001, and K(CMFP)=3.70±0.17 vs. K(PDAC)=2.16±0.70, p=0.003, respectively). CNRs at low energy levels (40-70 keV) were higher than those at high energy levels (80-40 keV).Individual patient CNR-optimized energy level images and the NIC can be used to improve the sensitivity and the specificity for differentiating CMFP from PDAC by use of dual-energy MDCT in spectral imaging with fast tube voltage switching.Comparison of 3'-deoxy-3'-[¹⁸F]fluorothymidine positron emission tomography (FLT PET) and FDG PET/CT for the detection and characterization of pancreatic tumours.Despite recent advances in clinical imaging modalities, differentiation of pancreatic masses remains difficult. Here, we tested the diagnostic accuracy of molecular-based imaging including 3'-deoxy-3'-[(18)F]fluorothymidine (FLT) positron emission tomography (PET) and [(18)F]fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) PET/CT in patients with suspected pancreatic masses scheduled to undergo surgery.A total of 46 patients with pancreatic tumours suspicious for malignancy and scheduled for resective surgery were recruited prospectively. In 41 patients, FLT PET and FDG PET/CT scans were performed. A diagnostic CT performed on a routine basis was available in 31 patients. FLT PET and FDG PET/CT emission images were acquired according to standard protocols. Tracer uptake in the tumour [FDG and FLT standardized uptake value (SUV)] was quantified by the region of interest (ROI) technique. For FDG PET/CT analysis, correct ROI placement was ensured via side-by-side reading of corresponding CT images.Of 41 patients, 33 had malignancy, whereas 8 patients had benign disease. Visual analysis of FDG and FLT PET resulted in sensitivity values of 91% (30/33) and 70% (23/33), respectively. Corresponding specificities were 50% (4/8) for FDG PET and 75% (6/8) for FLT PET. In the subgroup of patients with contrast-enhanced CT (n = 31), sensitivities were 96% (PET/CT), 88% (CT alone), 92% (FDG PET) and 72% (FLT PET), respectively. Mean FLT uptake in all malignant tumours was 3.0 (range SUV(max) 1.1-6.5; mean FDG SUV(max) 7.9, range 3.3-17.8; p < 0.001).For differentiation of pancreatic tumours, FDG PET and FDG PET/CT showed a higher sensitivity but lower specificity than FLT PET. Interestingly, visual analysis of FLT PET led to two false-positive findings by misinterpreting physiological bowel uptake as pathological FLT uptake in the pancreas. Due to the limited number of patients, the clinical value of adding FLT PET to the diagnostic workup of pancreatic tumours remains to be determined.Effectiveness of contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasound for the evaluation of solid pancreatic masses.To evaluate the usefulness of contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasound (CH-EUS) in differentiating between pancreatic adenocarcinomas and other pancreatic disease.This retrospective cohort study evaluated 90 patients who were seen between November 2010 and May 2013. All these patients had solid pancreatic masses that had a hypoechoic appearance on EUS. All patients underwent CH-EUS to evaluate this diagnostic method's usefulness. The mass lesions observed on CH-EUS were classified into three categories based on their echo intensity: hypoenhanced, isoenhanced, and hyperenhanced lesions. We adjusted the sensitivity and the specificity of each category for detecting malignancies. We also estimated the accuracy of CH-EUS by comparing it to a pathological diagnosis.Of the 90 patients, 62 had a pancreatic adenocarcinoma. Fifty-seven out of 62 pancreatic adenocarcinomas showed a hypoenhanced pattern on CH-EUS. The sensitivity was 92%, the specificity 68% and the accuracy approximately 82%. The area under the curve of the receiver operating characteristic analysis for CH-EUS was 0.799. There is a significant association between the hypoenhanced pattern on CH-EUS and pancreatic duct adenocarcinoma (χ(2) = 35.264, P < 0.001). In pathological examinations, the number of specimens for EUS-fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) was considered insufficient for diagnosis in three patients, and in two patients, the results were reported to be negative for malignancy. Pancreatic masses in all five patients revealed a hypoenhanced pattern with CH-EUS. Three patients were diagnosed with pancreatic adenocarcinoma based on the pathology results of a biopsy, and the remaining two patients were clinically diagnosed with malignancy.CH-EUS is useful for distinguishing between pancreatic adenocarcinoma and other pancreatic disease. When a pancreatic mass shows a hypoenhanced pattern on CH-EUS but involves either insufficient samples or negative results with EUS-FNA, clinicians might consider performing another pathologic diagnosis on the basis of an EUS-FNA sample or a biopsy.Pancreatic fine-needle aspiration cytology in patients < 35-years of age: a retrospective review of 174 cases spanning a 17-year period.Pancreatic lesions in young patients are relatively rare and, to our knowledge, the clinical value of pancreatic fine needle aspiration (FNA) in patients < 35 years of age has not been previously established by any other large retrospective studies. All pancreatic endoscopic ultrasound-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) cases performed on patients < 35 years of age were identified for a 17-year period (1994-2010). All FNAs and all available correlating surgical pathology reports were reviewed. There were a total of 174 cases of pancreatic FNA performed on 109 females and 65 males under the age of 35 (range: 8-34, mean: 27 years). The FNA diagnoses included 37 malignant, 114 negative, nine atypia/suspicious, and 14 cases that were nondiagnostic. Of the 37 malignant FNA cases, the diagnoses included 18 pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (PanNeT), 11 solid pseudopapillary neoplasms (SPN), five adenocarcinomas and three metastatic neoplasms. Histologic follow-up was available in 22 of the 37 malignant cases diagnosed by FNA, and the diagnosis was confirmed in 21 cases. One pancreatoblastoma was misclassified as SPN on EUS-FNA. False negative diagnoses were noted in three cases of low-grade mucinous cystic neoplasm and one case of PanNeT. The most common type of neoplasms diagnosed by EUS-FNA in patients < 35-year old is PanNeT, followed by SPN with both tumors accounting for 75% of all the neoplasms encountered in this age group. The sensitivity and specificity for positive cytology in EUS-FNA of the pancreas to identify malignancy and mucinous neoplasms were 90% and 100%, respectively. Diagn. Cytopathol. 2014;42:297-301. © 2013 Wiley Periodicals, Inc. Comparing the performance of visual estimation and standard uptake value of F-18 fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography for detecting malignancy in pancreatic tumors other than invasive ductal carcinoma.The utility of FDG PET/CT for the detection and evaluation of invasive ductal carcinoma has been widely reported, but a few studies have assessed the utility of FDG PET/CT to detect malignancy in a variety of pancreatic lesions other than invasive ductal carcinoma.To compare the diagnostic performance of visual estimation with the semi-quantitative scores of FDG PET/CT for detecting malignancy in a variety of pancreatic lesions other than invasive ductal carcinoma.Images of pathologically proven pancreatic lesions from 32 patients were retrospectively evaluated: 14 benign lesions, 7 borderline (low malignant) lesions, and 11 malignant lesions. The average scores from visual estimation by the two observers were compared to two semi-quantitative analyses of FDG uptake in the lesions, namely the maximum standardized uptake value (SUVmax) and mean standardized uptake value (SUVmean).Visual analysis value, SUVmax and SUVmean were 0.33 ± 0.21, 1.8 ± 0.7 and 1.5 ± 0.7 for the benign lesions, 0.70 ± 0.28, 5.0 ± 2.6 and 3.1±1.7 for the borderline lesions, and 0.73 ± 0.18, 4.7 ± 2.5 and 3.2 ± 1.6 for the malignant lesions, respectively. Receiver operating characteristic analysis revealed the areas under the curves for detecting non-benign (malignant or borderline) lesions through visual analysis, SUVmax, and SUVmean were 0.914, 0.954, and 0.875, respectively.For a variety of pancreatic lesions other than invasive ductal carcinoma, visual analysis and semi-quantitative analyses all showed strong diagnostic performance. However, semi-quantitative analysis with SUVmax proved to be the most effective method for detecting non-benign pancreatic lesions.Preoperative evaluation of invasive and noninvasive intraductal papillary-mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas: clinical, radiological, and pathological analysis of 123 cases.We aimed to investigate preoperative findings that are useful to distinguish intraductal papillary-mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) subtypes.One hundred twenty-three patients who underwent pancreatectomy for IPMN were analyzed clinicopathologically and radiologically. Invasive IPM carcinomas (IPMCs) were subdivided into early-stage nonaggressive (minimally invasive IPMC [MI-IPMC]) and more advanced and aggressive (invasive carcinoma originating in IPMC [IC-IPMC]) subtypes according to our recently proposed pathological criteria.The lesions consisted of 27 IPMNs with low-grade dysplasia, 14 IPMNs with moderate dysplasia, 21 IPMNs with high-grade dysplasia, 30 MI-IPMCs, and 31 IC-IPMCs. Multidetector-row computed tomography detected a component of invasive carcinoma in IC-IPMC with 86% sensitivity and 100% specificity. In patients with IPMNs other than IC-IPMC, multivariate analysis demonstrated 3 significant predictive factors of malignancy: IPMN size (>40 mm), IPMN duct type (main pancreatic duct or mixed type), and the presence of a mural nodule or thick septum. The diagnostic score obtained using these 3 factors showed a strong correlation with the presence of malignancy.For preoperative evaluation of patients with IPMN, it is recommended to rule out IC-IPMC using multidetector-row computed tomography and then to categorize IPMN other than IC-IPMC according to malignant potential based on the diagnostic score.Quantitative contrast-enhanced harmonic EUS in differential diagnosis of focal pancreatic masses (with videos).The role of EUS with contrast agents can be expanded through the use of time-intensity curve (TIC) analysis and computer-aided interpretation.To validate the use of parameters derived from TIC analysis in an artificial neural network (ANN) classification model designed to diagnose pancreatic carcinoma (PC) and chronic pancreatitis (CP).Prospective, multicenter, observational trial-endoscopy units from Romania, Denmark, Germany, and Spain.A total of 167 consecutive patients with PC or CP.Contrast-enhanced harmonic EUS (CEH-EUS) and EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA), TIC analysis, and ANN processing.Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values (PPV, NPV) for EUS-FNA, CEH-EUS, and the ANN.After excluding all of the recordings that did not meet the technical and procedural criteria, 112 cases of PC and 55 cases of CP were included. EUS-FNA was performed in 129 patients, and the diagnosis was confirmed by surgery (n = 15) or follow-up (n = 23) in the remaining cases. Its sensitivity and specificity were 84.82% and 100%, respectively, whereas the PPV and NPV were 100% and 76.63%, respectively. The sensitivity of real-time quantitative assessment of CEH-EUS was 87.5%, specificity 92.72%, PPV 96.07%, and NPV 78.46%. Peak enhancement, wash-in area under the curve, wash-in rate, and the wash-in perfusion index were significantly different between the groups. No significant differences were found between rise time, mean transit time, and time to peak. For the ANN, sensitivity was 94.64%, specificity 94.44%, PPV 97.24%, and NPV 89.47%.Only PC and CP lesions were included.Parameters obtained through TIC analysis can differentiate between PC and CP cases and can be used in an automated computer-aided diagnostic system with good diagnostic results. (NCT01315548.).Diagnostic value of mucins (MUC1, MUC2 and MUC5AC) expression profile in endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration specimens of the pancreas.Mucins are aberrantly expressed in various malignancies. We immunohistochemically tested mucins expression (MUC1, MUC2 and MUC5AC) in EUS-FNA samples from pancreatic occupying lesions for the diagnostic utility. The prevalence of MUC1, MUC2 and MUC5AC expression in pancreatic cancers were 77.5% (31/40), 10.0% (4/40) and 80.0% (32/40), respectively, and in the benign pancreatic diseases 25% (4/16), 31.3% (5/16) and 43.8% (7/16). MUC1 and MUC5AC significantly overexpressed in pancreatic cancer, and MUC1 negatively related with tumor differentiation degree (p < 0.05). The prevalence of MUC1, MUC2 and MUC5AC expression in pancreatic mucinous neoplasms were 66.7% (12/18), 38.9% (7/18) and 88.9% (16/18), respectively, and in the pancreatic non-mucinous neoplasms 60.5% (23/38), 5.3% (2/38) and 57.9% (22/38). MUC2 and MUC5AC significantly overexpressed in pancreatic mucinous neoplasms, especially MUC2 in benign mucinous neoplasms (p < 0.05). Compared with cytology alone, the combination test of MUC1+cytology, and MUC5AC+cytology could achieve higher sensitivity (85 vs. 65%, 100 vs. 65%) and accuracy (89.3% vs. 73.2%, 91.1% vs. 73.2%) for pancreatic cancer diagnosis; the combination test of MUC2 + cytology, and MUC5AC + cytology could achieve higher sensitivity (77.8% vs. 38.9%, 100% vs. 38.9%), and specificity (97.4% vs. 60.5%, 71.1% vs. 60.5%) accuracy (100% vs. 51.8%, 80.4% vs. 51.8%) for mucinous neoplasm diagnosis. The panel MUC1+/MUC2-/MUC5AC+/ was higher specific in pancreatic cancer diagnosis, as well as MUC1-/MUC2+/MUC5AC+/ in pancreatic mucinous neoplasms. Our observations suggest the mucins expression profile in EUS-FNA specimens has higher value for the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer and mucinous neoplasms.Evaluation of pancreatic cystic lesions with EUS.Mucin-hypersecreting intraductal neoplasms of the pancreas: a precursor to cystic pancreatic malignancies.Muncin-hypersecreting intraductal pancreatic neoplasms were first described in 1982 and have been observed in increasing numbers since. They are observed primarily by endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) and are characterized by an intraductal papillary neoplasm that secretes thick mucin, causing pancreatic duct dilatation and obstructive pancreatitis.Twenty patients are presented, 14 male and six female, with an average age of 59 +/- 11 years. All patients presented with abdominal pain, and most had nausea and vomiting, weight loss, and documented pancreatitis. Of the preoperative studies, ERCP was positive in all patients. Computed tomography scan, endoscopic ultrasonogram, and cytologic findings were less sensitive. Tumor markers were only positive in one patient. All 20 patients were treated surgically. Nine underwent Whipple procedure, one patient had a total pancreatectomy, and nine had distal pancreatic resections. The first patient in the series did not have a pancreatic resection, and his disease evolved into a lethal cystadenocarcinoma causing his death 99 months later.Histopathologic findings were interpreted as borderline malignant in 17 of the 20 patients, and three patients had evidence of invasive adenocarcinoma. Two of these three patients had nodal or distant metastases at the time of diagnosis, and all three died of adenocarcinoma. Seventeen of the patients are alive and well, although two of three with positive pancreatic margins have had recurrent symptoms and have been successfully reresected.The mucin-producing intraductal papillary tumor of the pancreas is a newly described variant of pancreatic cancer. It presents with symptoms of pancreatitis and has a progressive but more indolent course than the more lethal invasive ductal cancers. Patients with unexplained pancreatitis should undergo ERCP investigation, and aggressive surgical therapy should be carried out because the prognosis for this lesion, when appropriately treated, is more favorable than the usual pancreatic cancer.EUS-guided fine needle aspiration with and without trucut biopsy of pancreatic masses.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided trucut biopsy (EUS TCB) has a lower yield than fine needle aspiration (FNA) in pancreatic masses but the additional use of TCB to FNA may improve the diagnostic accuracy over FNA alone.To compare the yield of EUS FNA alone or combined with EUS TCB for diagnosis of pancreatic masses.Single center retrospective case control study conducted at academic tertiary center. Study conducted between March 2004 and April 2007.A total of 126 consecutive patients referred for EUS guided biopsy of pancreatic mass; three patients excluded from analysis, final cohort comprised 123 patients (108 malignant and 15 benign). EUS FNA was performed in 72 patients and EUS FNA+TCB was performed in 51 patients.The diagnostic performance of EUS FNA versus EUS FNA+TCB was compared.The sensitivity, specificity and frequency of cases correctly identified for malignancy of FNA alone were 87.1% (54/62), 100% (10/10) and 88.8% (64/72), while for the combination of FNA+TCB they were: 95.7% (44/46), 100% (5/5) and 96.0% (49/51), respectively (P=0.184, 1.000, and 0.193 FNA versus FNA+TCB). No major complication occurred in either group.FNA+TCB can be safely performed in selected lesions but sensitivity is not statistically improved over FNA alone (95.7% versus 87.1%).EUS elastography of the pancreas: feasibility and pattern description of the normal pancreas, chronic pancreatitis, and focal pancreatic lesions.Initial clinical applications have shown that US elastography might be able to distinguish tissues because of their specific consistency.(1) To investigate the feasibility of EUS elastography of the pancreas and (2) to describe elastographic patterns of the normal pancreas and the pancreas affected by inflammatory or focal disease.Prospective single-center study.Academic center of the University of Witten/Herdecke.Twenty patients with normal pancreas, 20 patients with chronic pancreatitis, and 33 patients with focal pancreatic lesion, histologically later proven in 32 of these 33 cases.Commercially available US equipment was used. The elasticity of tissue was reconstructed in real time within a sample area and was translated into a color scale imaging relative tissue elasticity within this area. Representative loops of at least 20 seconds were recorded regarding each region of interest.Adequate elastographic recordings could be obtained in all 73 patients. Patients with hypoechoic and intermediately echogenic normal pancreas revealed a relatively homogeneous elastographic pattern. Thirty-one focal lesions, including 30 neoplasms and most of the chronically inflamed pancreata had a honeycomb pattern dominated by hard strands. This pattern showed analogies to the histologic structure of 10 resected tumors. Other patients with chronic pancreatitis and those with hyperechoic healthy pancreas had miscellaneous elastographic appearances.EUS elastography of the pancreas is feasible and produces plausible results. The examination of homogeneous tissue is impaired by the relative scale used. Chronic pancreatitis and hard tumors cannot be distinguished by elastography, probably because of their similar fibrous structure.EUS elastography for pancreatic mass lesions: between image and FNA?[The role of FDG-PET scan in the diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma].In 22 patients with focal pancreatic lesions, the values of different diagnostic modalities were analysed for the evaluation of malignancy. The CA 19-9 level was elevated in 4/5 malignant cases (sensitivity: 80%) and in 4/15 of benign cases (specificity: 73%). Hypodensity/hypoechogeneity was considered to be the characteristic sign of malignancy during CT/ultrasound (sensitivity: 100%, specificity: 50%/47%). ERCP was found to be specific but not sensitive enough and the rate of unsuccessful investigations was relatively high (4/22). The diagnostic value of FDG-PET was found to be superior to other diagnostic modalities (sensitivity 100%, specificity 88%). In cases with focal pancreatic hypoechogenic/hypodense lesions detected by CT or US in suspicion of malignancy, the FDG-PET should be the next step in the diagnostic strategy.Diagnostic efficacy of cell block immunohistochemistry, smear cytology, and liquid-based cytology in endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration of pancreatic lesions: a single-institution experience.The diagnostic efficiency of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) cytology varies widely depending on the treatment method of the specimens. The present study aimed to evaluate the diagnostic efficacy of cell block (CB) immunohistochemistry, smear cytology (SC), and liquid-based cytology (LBC) in patients with pancreatic lesions without consulting an on-site cytopathologist.This study prospectively enrolled 72 patients with pancreatic lesions. The EUS-FNA specimens were examined by SC, LBC, and CB immunohistochemistry. The diagnostic efficacy of the 3 methods was then compared. Patients' final diagnosis was confirmed by surgical resection specimens, diagnostic imaging, and clinical follow-up.Our results included 60 malignant and 12 benign pancreatic lesions. The diagnostic sensitivity (90%), negative predictive value (66.7%), and accuracy (91.7%) of CB immunohistochemistry were significantly higher than those of SC (70.0%, 30.0%, and 75.0%, respectively) and LBC (73.3%, 31.6%, and 77.8%, respectively) (all P<0.05). The combination of CB and SC, or CB and LBC, did not significantly increase the efficacy compared to CB immunohistochemistry alone.Our findings suggest that in the absence of an on-site cytopathologist, CB immunohistochemistry on EUS-FNA specimens offers a higher diagnostic efficacy in patients with pancreatic lesions than does SC and LBC.EUS-guided FNA of solid pancreatic masses: a prospective, randomized trial comparing 22-gauge and 25-gauge needles.There is a lack of prospective, randomized studies comparing the diagnostic yield and complication rates of 22-gauge and 25-gauge needles during EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses.Our primary aim was to compare the diagnostic yield of 22-gauge and 25-gauge needles. Secondary aims included determining the number of needle passes performed, ease of needle passage, and complications.Prospective, randomized study.Tertiary referral centers at Yale University School of Medicine, New Haven, Connecticut, and Virginia Piper Cancer Institute, Minneapolis, Minnesota.Patients with a suspected solid pancreatic mass from February 2007 to June 2008 were enrolled.Patients were randomized to EUS-FNA with a 22-gauge or 25-gauge needle.A diagnostic result was defined as cytology findings positive for malignant cells.A total of 131 patients were enrolled: EUS-FNA was performed with a 22-gauge needle in 64 patients and with a 25-gauge needle in 67 patients. Cytology was diagnostic in 120 (91.6%) of 131 patients overall: 56 (87.5%) of 64 with 22-gauge needles and 64 (95.5%) of 67 with 25-gauge needles (no statistically significant difference was found between the 2 groups; P=.18). A similar number of passes was performed in both arms (mean [SD] 2.6 [1.2] each; P=.96). There were no complications in either group.A larger number of patients is needed to determine small differences in diagnostic yield.This is the first prospective, randomized trial comparing 22-gauge and 25-gauge needles in EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses. We achieved equally high diagnostic yields by using a similar number of passes, showing that 25-gauge needles are an effective alternative to 22-gauge needles.Relative efficiency and predictive value of ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde pancreatography in diagnosis of pancreatic disease.Improved early diagnosis of cystadenocarcinoma of the pancreas.Cystadenocarcinoma of the pancreas is insensitive to radiotherapy and chemotherapy, and surgery is at present the definitive treatment. Early and accurate diagnosis of cystadenocarcinoma is crucial for increasing the five-year survival rate and the resectable rate. There is no definitive and effective method of early diagnosis of cystadenocarcinoma of the pancreas in China and other countries.We compared endoscopic ultrasonography-guided (EUS-guided) fine needle aspiration biopsy combined with cyst fluid carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), CA19-9 examination with computed tomography (CT), B-ultrasonography (B-US) and serum CEA and CA19-9, to explore methods of early diagnosis of cystadenocarcinoma of the pancreas. Retrospective analysis was made on the clinical data of 126 cases of benign pancreatic lesion (90 cases) and cystadenocarcinoma (36).The sensitivity of B-US and CT for cystadeno-carcinoma was 52.8% and 77.8%, while the specificity was 78.9% and 86.7%, respectively. When measurement of CEA and CA19-9 of cyst fluid was combined with EUS-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy, the sensitivity was 94.4%, higher than that of B-US and CT (P<0.05). The sensitivity of cyst fluid CEA, CA19-9 examinations was considerably higher than that of serum CEA, CA19-9 (P<0.05). Upper gastrointestinal barium meal and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) had low sensitivity and specificity.EUS-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy combined with examination of cyst fluid CEA, CA19-9 is a credible means for early diagnosis of cystadenocarcinoma of the pancreas. B-US, CT and serum CEA, CA19-9 measurements are in common use, their findings are also very important.Diagnosis of pancreatic tumors by endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) for pancreatic solid tumors larger or smaller than 3 cm, and cystic lesions.From January/1997 to December/2006, 611 patients with pancreatic tumors were subjected to EUS-FNA. The final diagnosis was obtained either by surgery (356 cases) or after a mean clinical follow-up of 11.8 mo in the remaining patients.There were 405 solid tumors, 189 cystic lesions and 17 mixed. Pancreatic specimens for cytological assessment were successfully obtained by EUS-FNA in 595 (97.4%) cases. There were 352 (57.6%) malignancies and 259 (42.4%) benign tumors. Among the malignancies, pancreatic adenocarcinomas accounted for 67% of the lesions. Overall, the sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy of EUS-FNA were, respectively, 78.4%, 99.2%, 99.3%, 77.2% and 87.2%. Specifically for solid tumors, the same parameters for neoplasms larger and smaller than 3 cm were, respectively, 78.8% vs 82.4%, 100% vs 98.4%, 100% vs 99%, 54.8% vs 74.1% and 83.1% vs 87.8%. For cystic lesions, the values were, respectively, 72.2%, 99.3%, 97.5%, 91% and 92.2%.EUS-FNA can be used to sample pancreatic tumors in most patients. Even though the negative predictive value is inadequate for large solid tumors, the results are rather good for small solid tumors, especially concerning the sensitivity, negative predictive value and diagnostic accuracy. Among all pancreatic lesions, EUS-FNA for cystic lesions can reveal the best negative predictive value and diagnostic accuracy, both higher than 90%.A prospective multicenter evaluation of a new side-port endoscopic ultrasound-fine-needle aspiration in solid upper gastrointestinal lesions.Diagnostic yield of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-fine-needle aspiration (FNA) varies depending on the equipment used and the site targeted. Multiple needle passes are usually required to obtain a diagnosis. A new needle incorporating a side-port carries a theoretical advantage regarding acquisition of cytological material. The aim of the study was to demonstrate the safety and efficacy of the Olympus side-port needle in solid upper gastrointestinal indications.A prospective multicenter evaluation of patients referred for EUS-FNA for solid lesions was performed across six tertiary gastroenterology referral centers in four capital cities in Australia. The main outcome measures include cytological diagnosis, number of needle passes required for diagnosis and complication rates.Thirty patients (17 men; 13 women) with a mean age of 67.5 years were studied. Indications included pancreatic or biliary mass in 24 patients, retroperitoneal or periduodenal mass in 2, enlarged lymph node in 2, a gastric submucosal tumor in 1 and a subcarinal mass in 1. The mean size of the lesions was 3.47 cm (range, 0.5-8 cm). All but one case had a diagnosis made (96.7%). The mean number of passes required to reach a diagnosis was 1.7. In neoplastic lesions the diagnosis was made with a mean of 1.6 passes. No complications were encountered.The new EUS-FNA needle with side port appears effective and safe in solid upper gastrointestinal EUS-FNA indications.A prospective, randomized trial comparing 25-gauge and 22-gauge needles for endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration of pancreatic masses.Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is widely performed for pancreatic masses. The 25-gauge needle (25G) might be easier to be manipulated and expected to be associated with fewer complications since it is thinner and more flexible than the 22-gauge needle (22G) although obtaining adequate specimens is questioned. In this randomized trial, the authors tried to compare prospectively 25G and 22G in diagnostic accuracy, manipulability from the operator's viewpoint and procedure-related complications.A total of 188 consecutive patients undergoing EUS-FNA for solid or cystic pancreatic masses were consecutively enrolled and 94 patients were randomized to either 25G or 22G group, respectively.Baseline characteristics were similar except that more masses of 25G group were located in the head or uncinate process of pancreas than those from 22G group. Although there was no difference in diagnostic accuracy (89.4% vs. 88.3% with p = 0.82), 25G was easier to be manipulated (p = 0.004) and related with fewer procedure-related complications (10.6% vs. 3.2% with p = 0.004).25G can be chosen in preference to 22G when performing pancreatic EUS-FNA because 25G was significantly superior to 22G in terms of manipulability and complications although both were effective for accurate diagnosis.[Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) as primary diagnostic tool for unclear lesions in the upper gastrointestinal tract].Endoscopic Ultrasound (EUS) and the EUS guided fine-needle Aspiration (EUS-FNA) increasingly plays an important role in the diagnostic evaluation of lesions or lymph nodes in the mediastinum and upper gastrointestinal tract of unknown origin. The objective of this study was to assess safety and accuracy of EUS-FNA in two secondary and tertiary health care providers.Prospectively, from Mai 2003 to June 2007, all patients underwent EUS with devices from Pentax (FG38UX, EC3830UT) with EUS-FNA (Cook or Mediglobe) at Johannes Gutenberg University and Catholic Hospital in Mainz. In all cases, cytology and extracted cells were histological examined by the same pathologists. In case of negative EUS results, patients were observed for at least 12 months after initial diagnosis later by reanalysis, CT-scan and follow-up clinical data to confirm the diagnosis.In total, 776 patients with EUS and 167 EUS-FNA (21.5 %) could be evaluated. Median age was 62 years, 68 % of patients were male. Patients underwent EUS-FNA in the mediastinum (n = 54), pancreas (73), stomach (13), liver, adrenal glands and rectum (n = 6). The complication rate of EUS-FNA was very low with only 0.6 %, mainly consistent of one minor haemorrhage at the aspiration site. A clear histological diagnosis could not be achieved in 12.5 % (21/167). Statistical analyses of all EUS-FNA revealed a sensitivity of 77.8 % (95 %CI 67,2 - 86,3) and a specificity of 98.5 % (95 % CI 92,2 - 100), with a positive and negative predictive value of 98.4 % and of 78.1 %, respectively. The overall accuracy was 87 % (95 %CI 80,4 - 92,0).EUS combined with FNA is a safe tool for first histological evaluation of unidentified lesions or lymph nodes in the mediastinum and upper gastrointestinal tract, indicative for gastrointestinal cancers.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration for the diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses: the impact on patient-management strategy.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is a safe and accurate technique for diagnosing pancreatic cancer. However, its impact for management of these patients is poorly investigated.To investigate the diagnostic yield and the therapeutic impact of EUS-FNA in the management of solid pancreatic masses.One hundred consecutive patients who underwent EUS-FNA for a solid pancreatic mass were included. Aspirates were placed onto glass slides for cytological examination and microbiopsies were fixed in formaldehyde for histology. The impact on clinical management was analysed retrospectively according to different endpoints, such as its impact on indications for chemotherapy, surgery or appropriate follow-up modality.Eight procedures were considered failures and two patients were lost to follow-up. A final diagnosis was obtained in 90 patients. The sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of combined cytology and histology for the diagnosis of malignant or potentially-malignant tumours were 78%, 75%, and 78% respectively. The sensitivity and accuracy of cytology alone were significantly higher than those of histology alone (P = 0.0003). By intention-to-diagnose analysis, EUS-FNA directly influenced the management strategy in 62 of 100 patients.In patients with pancreatic mass and suspected malignancy, EUS-FNA provides an accurate diagnosis in approximately 80% of cases. EUS-FNA directly influences the management in two-thirds of patients.Endoscopic ultrasonography in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic adenocarcinoma. Results of a prospective study with comparison to ultrasonography and CT scan.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) was compared to ultrasonography (US) and CT scan (CT) in order to evaluate its role in the diagnosis and the locoregional spread assessment of pancreatic cancer. Sixty-four patients suspected of pancreatic cancer were studied prospectively, and the results of imaging techniques were compared to histology and surgical exploration. There were 49 cases of pancreatic adenocarcinoma, 11 of pancreatitis, 2 of common bile duct carcinoma, 1 lymphoma and 1 hepatocellular carcinoma with peripancreatic metastatic lymph nodes. EUS was significantly more accurate (91%) than CT (66%) and US (64%) for diagnosis of pancreatic cancer. EUS was able to image all 7 cancers less than 25 mm in diameter, US and CT only one. There were 4 false positives with EUS which were all cases of pseudotumorous pancreatitis. For detecting lymph node involvement, EUS was significantly more sensitive (62%) and accurate (74%) than US (8% and 37%) and CT (19% and 42%), respectively. Invaded lymph nodes adjacent to large tumors and micrometastatic involvement were responsible for this lack of sensitivity. EUS was significantly more sensitive (100%) than CT (71%) and US (17%) for detecting venous involvement. The specificity of EUS was lower (67%) because of duodenal bulb stenosis and large tumors. In conclusion, this prospective and comparative study confirms that EUS is an accurate tool for diagnosis and locoregional spread assessment of pancreatic cancer when performed in a reference center. EUS is of particular interest for small tumours. However, EUS does not enable differentiation of pseudotumorous pancreatitis from adenocarcinoma.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy using linear array and radial scanning endosonography.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) accurately stages gastrointestinal malignancies but is less able to differentiate between neoplastic and inflammatory processes. EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS FNA) has been reported useful for obtaining a diagnosis in suspected gastrointestinal lesions. We report our entire experience with EUS FNA using both radial and linear array endosonography, including our diagnostic accuracy and complication rate.Two hundred eight consecutive patients (119 men, 89 women) referred for EUS evaluation of suspected gastrointestinal or mediastinal masses underwent EUS-guided FNA. We performed EUS FNA using radial scanning or linear array endosonography and a 23 gauge, 4 cm needle or a 22 gauge, 12 cm needle. Data collected included lesion types, number of passes, complications, and diagnostic accuracy.Two hundred eight lesions were targeted, with a total of 705 FNA passes (mean 3.39 passes/patient). Overall diagnostic accuracy for our study population was 87% with a 89% sensitivity and 100% specificity. The diagnostic accuracy for each subgroup was 95% for mediastinal lymph node, 85% for intra-abdominal lymph node, 85% for pancreatic, 84% for submucosal, and 100% for perirectal masses. EUS FNA provided an adequate specimen in 90% of patients. The FNA results were similar for both types of endosonography. We observed immediate complications in 2% (4 of 208) of patients. All complications occurred with EUS FNA of pancreatic lesions and consisted of bleeding and pancreatitis in 2 patients each. For EUS FNA of pancreatic masses there was a 1.2% (2 of 121) risk of pancreatitis, 1% (1/121) risk of severe bleeding, and risk of death in less than 1%.EUS-guided FNA appears to be technically feasible, safe, and accurate for obtaining diagnostic tissue of suspicious gastrointestinal and mediastinal lesions and provides important preoperative information.Non-invasive differentiation of pancreatic lesions: is analysis of FDG kinetics superior to semiquantitative uptake value analysis?The diagnostic utility of fluorine-18 2-deoxy-D-glucose positron emission tomography (FDG PET) for the non-invasive differentiation of focal pancreatic lesions originating from cancer or chronic pancreatitis by combined visual image interpretation and semiquantitative uptake value analysis has been documented. However, in clinical routine some misdiagnosis is still observed. This is because there is potential overlap between the semiquantitative uptake values obtained for active inflammatory lesions and cancer. Therefore, this prospective study was undertaken to test the hypothesis that analysis of dynamic kinetics of focal pancreatic lesions based on FDG PET may more accurately determine the benign or malignant nature of such lesions. Thirty patients (56+/-17 years) were studied dynamically with FDG PET for a period of 60-90 min. Patients were assigned to one of four groups: control, acute pancreatitis, chronic pancreatitis or pancreatic cancer. Two observers, blinded to the clinical data, analysed the time-activity curves of FDG kinetics based on region of interest analysis. The diagnosis predicted by FDG PET was compared with the result of histological examination of the surgical specimen. Analysis of FDG kinetics revealed significant differences in the shape of the time-activity curve for controls, pancreatic cancer and inflammatory disease. Surprisingly, there was no significant difference in the time-activity curve shape for chronic pancreatitis and acute pancreatitis; this is, however, not a clinical issue. Furthermore, acquisition time (60 min vs 90 min) did not affect interpretation of the time-activity curve, so that scanning time may be regularly shortened to 60 min. Interobserver agreement was 1. Based on these findings, non-invasive differentiation between pancreatic cancer and chronic pancreatitis was correctly predicted in all cases, as confirmed by histology. In addition, the specificity was increased compared with that obtained from standardised uptake value analysis. Non-invasive differentiation between pancreatic cancer and chronic pancreatitis may best be achieved based on a dynamic FDG PET study including kinetic analysis. This approach yields results superior to those obtained from a semiquantitative analysis of pancreatic lesions.Validating a simple scoring system to predict malignancy and invasiveness of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas.The objective of the present study was to identify reliable preoperative factors predicting malignancy or invasiveness of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) of the pancreas and the effectiveness of a diagnostic scoring system based on these factors.Between August 1994 and December 2007, 204 patients underwent pancreatic resection for IPMN at a single institute. Medical records were reviewed retrospectively, and a new diagnostic scoring system for predicting malignant IPMN preoperatively was designed.Univariate analysis revealed nine significant predictors of both malignant and invasive IPMN: age > or =60 years, history of pancreatitis, presence of mural nodule(s), diameter of main pancreatic duct (MPD) >6 mm, main duct or mixed type, total bilirubin >1.2 mg/dl, CA-19-9 >37 U/ml, tumor location in the pancreatic head, and tumor size >30 mm. Multivariate analysis showed that age, pancreatitis, mural nodule(s), and MPD diameter were independent predictors of invasive IPMN, and that all these parameters, plus elevated carbohydrate antigen-19-9 (CA-19-9), were independent predictors of malignant IPMN. A scoring system based on these five factors, each assigned 1 point, and with a cut-off of 3 points, could predict malignant IPMN with a sensitivity of 50.7% and a specificity of 90.1%. The 5-year survival rates of patients with benign and malignant IPMN were 95.0% and 64.0%, respectively.Our scoring system using five independent factors (age > or =60 years, history of pancreatitis, presence of mural nodule(s), elevated level of CA-19-9, and MPD diameter >6 mm) may be helpful for predicting malignancy and postoperative survival.Cyst wall puncture and aspiration during EUS-guided fine needle aspiration may increase the diagnostic yield of mucinous cysts of the pancreas.Pancreatic cysts are common, however, their diagnosis and classification remains a challenge despite advances in cross-sectional imaging and endoscopic ultrasound with fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA).To determine the incremental yield of cytologic examination of material obtained from targeted fine needle aspiration ("puncture") of the cyst wall after aspiration of fluid for CEA.Retrospective consecutive series.Consecutive patients undergoing EUS-FNA of a pancreatic cyst by 2 expert endoscopists at a single tertiary care center between January 2006 and June 2008.Standard EUS-FNA of pancreatic cysts was carried out, and after cyst fluid aspiration the cyst wall was punctured and aspirated (CWP) to obtain epithelium for cytologic analysis.The diagnostic yields of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) obtained from cyst fluid and of cytology obtained from CWP. CEA greater than192 ng/mL was considered diagnostic of a mucinous cyst.One hundred seven patients underwent EUS-FNA with CWP. Sixteen (31%) of 52 patients with CEA <192 ng/mL had cytology positive for mucinous epithelium, whereas 15 (47%) of 32 cysts with an insufficient amount of fluid for CEA analysis had positive cytology from CWP. The additional, cumulative diagnostic yield for mucinous cysts was therefore, 37%. Of 55 cysts diagnosed as mucinous, more (56%) were diagnosed by CWP cytology alone than by CEA (P<0.05).Retrospective design and limited surgical pathology.Cyst wall puncture and aspiration during routine EUS-FNA may be a safe, easily applied, and inexpensive technique for improving the diagnostic yield for mucinous cysts of the pancreas.Comparison of multidetector CT and endoscopic ultrasonography in malignant pancreatic mass lesions.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) has been shown to be superior to conventional CT in detecting and staging pancreatic cancer. We conducted a prospective trial to compare EUS and MDCT, in discriminating benign/malignant, in determining local and vascular invasion of a suspected pancreatic cancer and deciding its resectability.The study was performed at the Gastroenterology Department of Izmir Ataturk Training and Research Hospital, from June 2009 to June 2010, all patients with suspected pancreatic and periampullary tumors referred to our department were enrolled. A total of 56 patients were evaluated at the beginning. Five patients having distal CBD tumor (n=2), gallbladder tumor (n=1) and papillary tumor (n=2) were excluded from the study. Analysis was done for the remaining 51 patients.For the diagnosis of resectability/unresectability, EUS alone demonstrated a definite role in 4 (9%) of the 43 patients in confirming surgical and pathologic results and MDCT alone demonstrated a definite role in 6 (14%) of the 43 patients in confirming their results. An accurate diagnostic decision regarding resectability/unresectability was accomplished in 27 (63%) patients with EUS and MDCT.While MDCT is clinically quite effective, in terms of a correct resectability/unresectability decision, EUS should also be used.Optimal scan time for evaluating pancreatic disease with positron emission tomography using F-18-fluorodeoxyglucose.Image interpretation in positron emission tomography (PET) using F-18-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG) is usually performed for images obtained at 1 h postinjection (PI) of FDG, but it remains unknown whether this is the optimal time for imaging patients with pancreatic disease. The aim of this study was to assess the optimal scan time for FDG-PET for patients suspected of having pancreatic cancer.Forty-four patients with suspected pancreatic cancer underwent FDG-PET scans at both 1 h and 2 h PI. Tracer uptake in the pancreatic lesions and possible liver metastasis was interpreted qualitatively, using a 5-point grading system (0 = normal, 1 = probably normal, 2 = equivocal, 3 = probably abnormal, and 4 = definitely abnormal) by 4 nuclear medicine physicians independently, who were blind to all clinical information. Detection performance with each image was compared using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis. An average score of the 4 readers for each patient was also defined as consensus average index (CAI) and compared between the two images.ROC results indicated no significant differences in detection performance (Averaged areas under ROC curves of 1 h vs. 2 h were 0.92 vs. 0.90 for primary tumor, and 0.81 vs. 0.85 for liver metastases). There were no significant differences in CAIs between 1 h and 2 h PI images in interpreting primary tumor and positive liver metastases, but a significant difference was observed for cases without liver metastases (p < 0.05).The certainty of excluding liver metastases was increased when the 2h image was used, although ROC analysis did not establish a difference between 1 h and 2 h imaging for differentiating malignant and benign lesions in primary pancreatic cancer or its liver metastases.[Combined use of MRI and MR cholangiopancreatography and contrast enhanced dual phase 3-D MR angiography in diagnosis of pancreatic tumors: initial clinical results].To evaluate the accuracy of a non-invasive "all-in-one" staging MR method in patients with pancreatic tumors.46 patients were prospectively evaluated by a combined MR imaging protocol including breath-hold T1- and T2-weighted pulse sequence, MRCP using a breath-hold 2D-RARE sequence, and breath-hold gadolinium-enhanced dual-phase 3D-MR angiography.All pancreatic tumors were detected by the combination of cross-sectional imaging and MRCP. In spite of the use of MRCP, definitive differentiation between pancreatic carcinoma and chronic pancreatitis was not possible in 3 (6.5%) out of 46 cases. High quality 3D-MR angiograms were obtained in 43 (93.5%) cases. In 6 (13%) patients 3D-MRA showed an aberrant right hepatic artery. The overall accuracy of MRI in assessing extrapancreatic tumor spread, lymph node metastases, liver metastases, and vascular involvement was 95.7%, 80.4%, 93.5%, and 89.1%, respectively.Due to its high accuracy, the "all-in-one" MR protocol may become the most important modality after clinical examination and ultrasound in the diagnostic work-up for most patients with suspicion of pancreatic tumors.Differentiation of benign from malignant pancreatic masses by endoscopic ultrasound.It is often difficult to determine whether a mass in the pancreas is benign or malignant. The goal was to evaluate whether endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) can reliably establish whether a mass is benign or malignant.One hundred five patients with possible pancreatic tumors were referred for EUS. Those who were found to have a lesion suspicious for carcinoma and did not have a known malignancy also underwent EUS-guided FNA.A mass suspicious for cancer was identified in 73 patients, whereas inflammatory changes or a normal pancreas was noted in 32 patients. Four of the latter 32 patients were subsequently found to have cancer. EUS-guided FNA was performed on 47 of the 73 patients with a suspicious mass and was read as cancer in 27 patients, atypia in 10 patients, and benign in 10 patients. All 10 patients with atypia were subsequently confirmed to have cancer, and 6 of the 10 patients with a benign FNA were proved to have a tumor at surgery. EUS could differentiate the lesion as malignant with a sensitivity of 95%, specificity 88%, positive predictive value 95%, and negative predictive value 88%.Radial array EUS is helpful in supporting or refuting a diagnosis of cancer in a patient with a pancreatic mass. Although EUS-guided FNA can confirm the diagnosis, a negative FNA should not preclude exploration when clinically indicated.Absence of a dilated duct predicts benign disease in suspected pancreas cancer: a simple clinical rule.Pancreatic cancer can be difficult to diagnose. Fine-needle aspiration (FNA) biopsies may be negative even when malignancy is present.To identify endosonographic features predictive of malignancy that will separate patients into high- and low-risk groups, in whom a negative FNA effectively rules out malignancy.Patients presenting for endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) evaluation for suspected pancreatic mass were prospectively enrolled. If a mass or abnormal lymph nodes were present, sampling via fine-needle aspiration (FNA) was performed. The characteristics of patients with cancer were compared to the characteristics of patients without cancer using Chi-square testing and t-tests.Seventy-three patients were enrolled. Thirty-three patients had cancer and 40 had benign disease. On multivariate analysis, only vascular or organ invasion and dilation of the pancreatic duct (PD) were significantly associated with cancer. PD dilation was examined as a stand-alone feature. The presence of a dilated PD placed patients into a group with a 65% prevalence of malignancy. In the non-dilated PD group, the prevalence of malignancy was only 17%, and in this group, the negative predictive value of FNA was 100%, compared to an NPV of 73% in the entire cohort.The most significant negative predictive endosonographic finding in patients with suspected pancreatic cancer is a non-dilated PD. If a patient with suspected pancreatic cancer does not have a dilated PD and the FNA is negative for malignancy, the likelihood of cancer is low.Endoscopic ultrasound fine needle aspirate DNA analysis to differentiate malignant and benign pancreatic masses.Accurate diagnosis of malignant and benign pancreatic masses can be challenging, potentially delaying treatment for cancer and subjecting patients with benign disease to unnecessary surgery. Endoscopic ultrasound fine needle aspirate (EUS-FNA) of pancreatic masses remains inconclusive in a subset of patients. The role of EUS-FNA molecular analysis in this context is studied.Patients with benign pancreatic masses (6 cases, 4 autoimmune pancreatitis, 2 focal chronic pancreatitis) and malignant pancreatic masses (15) with inconclusive cytology (5 cases) and positive cytology (10 controls) were selected. All cases had definitive pathology. Representative cells were microdissected from each EUS-FNA sample and subjected to PCR for analysis of 16 microsatellite allele loss markers situated at 1p, 3p, 5q, 9p, 9q, 10q, 17p, 17q, 21q, and 22q. Loss of heterozygosity analysis used fluorescent capillary electrophoresis for quantitative determination of allelic imbalance. k-ras-2 point mutation analysis was also performed. Mean fractional mutation rate (FMR) was calculated and compared for each group.All malignant cases carried multiple mutations (FMR 0.50), regardless of positive cytology (FMR 0.52) or suspicious cytology (FMR 0.47) (p = NS). Five of the 6 benign cases carried no mutations whereas 1 case of autoimmune pancreatitis and coexisting PanIN lesions exhibited a k-ras mutation (FMR 0.01). The mean FMR for the malignant and benign samples was significantly different (p < 0.0001).Broad panel microsatellite loss and k-ras point mutation analysis can be reliably performed on EUS-FNA samples from pancreatic masses and improves the diagnostic accuracy. Furthermore, it accurately differentiates between malignant and benign pancreatic masses.Diffusion-weighted imaging in characterization of cystic pancreatic lesions.To evaluate whether apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC) measurements from diffusion-weighted imaging (DWI) can characterize or predict the malignant potential of cystic pancreatic lesions.Retrospective review of the magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) database over a 2-year period revealed 136 patients with cystic pancreatic lesions. Patients with DWI studies and histological confirmation of cystic mass were included. In patients with known pancreatitis, lesions with amylase content of >1000 IU/l that resolved on subsequent scans were included as pseudocysts. ADC of cystic lesions was measured by two independent reviewers. These values were then compared to categorize these lesions as benign or malignant using conventional MRI sequences.Seventy lesions were analysed: adenocarcinoma (n=4), intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN; n=28), mucinous cystic neoplasm (MCN; n=9), serous cystadenoma (n=16), and pseudocysts (n=13). There was no difference between ADC values of malignant and non-malignant lesions (p=0.06), between mucinous and serous tumours (p=0.12), or between IPMN and MCN (p=0.42). ADC values for low-grade IPMN were significantly higher than those for high-grade or invasive IPMN (p=0.03).ADC values may be helpful in deciding the malignant potential of IPMN. However, they are not useful in differentiating malignant from benign lesions or for characterizing cystic pancreatic lesions.Intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas: pancreatic resections guided by preoperative morphological assessment and intraoperative frozen section examination.We undertook this study to assess the results of a policy of limited pancreatic resections for intraductal papillary-mucinous tumors (IPMT), guided by a standardized preoperative morphological assessment and the frozen section histologic examination of pancreatic resection margins.From 1991 to 1998, there were 41 patients who underwent resection of IPMT in our center after standardized morphological preoperative assessment, including abdominal computed tomography scans, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, and endoscopic ultrasonography. All patients but one underwent a partial pancreatic resection.Preoperative assessment had an 89% diagnostic accuracy for IPMT. It detected malignant transformation with a 67% sensitivity and a 95% specificity, but failed to correctly assess ductal extension of the disease in 17 cases (41%). The diagnostic accuracy of frozen section histologic examination of the pancreatic resection margin was 92%. There was no recurrence in case of in situ carcinoma when epithelial lesions were completely resected (8 cases) nor in lower grades of dysplasia (23 cases). Conversely, recurrence was constant in invasive carcinoma (10 cases) regardless of the status of the pancreatic margin.Frozen section histologic examination of the pancreatic resection margin is useful and reliable to ensure a complete resection of IPMT by a partial resection that prevents recurrence of noninvasive lesions.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy coupled with KRAS mutation assay to distinguish pancreatic cancer from pseudotumoral chronic pancreatitis.Differential diagnosis between pancreatic adenocarcinoma (PADC) and pseudotumoral forms of chronic pancreatitis remains difficult. Mutation of KRAS oncogene is present in 75% to 95% of PADC. This study aimed to evaluate whether the combined analysis of KRAS mutation with cytopathological findings from endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy (EUS-FNAB) might improve discrimination between PADC and chronic pancreatitis.This prospective multicenter study included 178 patients with solid pancreatic masses (men 104, women 74; mean age 64.5 years). Cytopathological examination and KRAS mutation analysis (codon-12 and codon-13, restriction fragment length polymorphism [RFLP] and direct sequencing) were performed on EUS-FNAB material. Final diagnoses were obtained on EUS-FNAB analysis and/or a second biopsy and/or clinical follow-up and/or surgery: PADC, n = 129; chronic pancreatitis, n = 27; other pancreatic neoplasms, n = 16; and benign lesions, n = 6.KRAS status analysis was successful in all EUS-FNAB samples. Codon-12 KRAS point mutation was found in 66% of PADC samples. No case of chronic pancreatitis displayed KRAS mutation. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and overall accuracy of cytopathology alone for diagnosis of PADC versus chronic pancreatitis were 83%, 100%, 100%, 56% and 86%, respectively. When KRAS mutation analysis was combined with cytopathology, these values reached 88%, 100%, 100%, 63% and 90% respectively.Although the value of KRAS analysis in addition to EUS-FNAB is limited for distinguishing pancreatic mass lesions, when chronic pancreatitis presented as a pseudotumor a negative finding (wild-type KRAS), was useful in strongly suggesting a benign lesion.Abdominal imaging studies: comparison of diagnostic accuracies resulting from ultrasound, computed tomography, and magnetic resonance imaging in the same individual.We retrospectively compared the diagnostic accuracy of abdominal ultrasound (US), computed tomography (CT), and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) studies performed on the same individual to determine the relative performance of these modalities in the evaluation of disease processes, arising from different intra-abdominal organ systems. We retrospectively reviewed all procedure codes accrued by our abdominal imaging section during a 1-year period to determine how many patients underwent all three imaging procedures in our institution within a 2-week interval. These cases were then further evaluated to determine: (1) the primary organ system of disease involvement, (2) the final diagnosis, and (3) the imaging modality that provided the most accurate information upon which appropriate medical management was based. Imaging findings were determined by review of diagnostic reports, and medical management was determined by chart review. Two thousand six hundred-ninety five patients underwent ultrasound, 4,394 patients underwent CT, and 872 patients underwent MRI for the investigation of abdominal disease. Among these 5,126 patients, 26 underwent sequential US, CT, and MRI evaluation within a two-week interval. Appropriate clinical management was based on the US findings in 12/26 cases (46%; 95% CI: 27-67%), CT findings in 16/26 cases (62%; 95% CI: 41-80%), and MRI findings in 24 cases (92%; 95% CI: 75-99%). Significant differences in directing appropriate clinical management were found when comparing the relative diagnostic accuracies of MRI to US (p = 0.0003) and MRI to CT (p = 0.009). However, differences were not significant when comparing CT to US (p = 0.27). All final diagnoses in a given patient were accurately determined by US in 7/26 cases (27%), by CT in 10/26 cases (38%), and by MRI in 23/26 cases (88%). When analyzed according to individual diagnoses (61 total), US detected 33 of 61 (54%) abnormalities, CT detected 41 (67%) abnormalities, and MRI detected 51 (84%) abnormalities. US correctly characterized 32 (52%) abnormalities, CT correctly characterized 36 (59%) abnormalities, and MRI correctly characterized 49 (80%) abnormalities. Ultrasound, CT, and MR imaging correctly diagnosed the disease process in 3 of 12 (25%), 3 of 12 (25%), and 10 of 12 (83%) patients, respectively, with liver disease; 2 of 9 (22%), 6 of 9 (66%), and 9 of 9 (100%) patients, respectively, with pancreatic disease; 17 of 17 (100%), 8 of 17 (47%), and 10 of 17 (58%) patients, respectively, with gallbladder and biliary disease; 2 of 8 (25%), 5 of 8 (63%), and 5 of 8 (63%) patients, respectively, with renal disease; 0 of 3 (0%), 2 of 3 (66%), and 3 of 3 (100%) patients, respectively, with adrenal disease; and 8 of 12 (75%), 12 of 12 (100%), and 12 of 12 (100%) patients with free intraperitoneal fluid. Our results provide new information, regarding the relative benefits of ultrasound, CT, and MRI for the investigation of abdominal diseases at our institution. This initial data suggests that ultrasound provides the most accurate diagnoses in the investigation of gallbladder disease; MRI provides the most accurate diagnoses in the investigation of hepatic, adrenal, and pancreatic disease; and either CT or MRI may be the most appropriate first imaging study for the detection of renal disease.The impact of preoperative endoscopic ultrasound on the surgical management of pancreatic neuroendocrine tumours.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is accurate in diagnosing pancreatic neuroendocrine tumours (PNETs), but its impact on surgical management is unclear.To determine whether preoperative EUS findings altered the decision for, and extent of, surgery in patients with PNETs.A retrospective review of patients referred for EUS because of suspected PNETs was conducted. The diagnosis of PNETs was confirmed by EUS-guided fine needle aspiration cytology, where indicated, or by surgical histology. EUS findings were compared with computed tomography (CT) findings to determine whether there was an impact on the decision for surgical management.Fourteen patients (10 women), with a mean age of 44 years, underwent EUS for suspected PNETs. PNETs were seen with CT in 10 of 13 patients (77%) and with EUS in 14 of 14 patients (100%). One obese patient could not fit into the CT scanner. This patient had five PNETs on EUS. Three patients with a normal CT scan were determined to have one or two PNETs on EUS. Three patients with one or two PNETs on CT were found to have five to eight PNETs on EUS. EUS altered the decision for possible surgical management in five of 14 patients (36%), either by identifying a PNET or by finding multiple and multifocal PNETs that were not visualized on CT scans.EUS is useful in the preoperative assessment of PNETs by providing information that significantly influences the decision for surgical intervention or changes the extent of the planned surgery.Optimizing the multimodal approach to pancreatic cyst fluid diagnosis: developing a volume-based triage protocol.The objective of this study was to develop a triage algorithm to optimize diagnostic yield from cytology, carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), and v-Ki-ras2 Kirsten rat sarcoma viral oncogene homolog (KRAS) testing on different components of a single pancreatic cyst fluid specimen. The authors also sought to determine whether cell block supernatant was suitable for CEA and KRAS testing.Fifty-four pancreatic cysts were triaged according to a volume-dependent protocol to generate fluid (neat and supernatant) and cell block specimens for cytology, comparative CEA, and KRAS testing. Follow-up histology, diagnostic cytology, or a combined clinicopathologic interpretation was recorded as the final diagnosis.There were 26 mucinous cystic lesions and 28 nonmucinous cystic lesions with volumes ranging from 0.3 mL to 55 mL. Testing different components of the specimens (cell block, neat, and/or supernatant) enabled all laboratory investigations to be performed on 50 of 54 cyst fluids (92.6%). Interpretive concordance was observed in 17 of 17 cases (100%) and in 35 of 40 cases (87.5%) that had multiple components tested for CEA and KRAS mutations, respectively. An elevated CEA level (>192 ng/mL) was the most sensitive test for the detection of a mucinous cystic lesion (62.5%) versus KRAS mutation (56%) and "positive" cytology (61.5%). KRAS mutations were identified in 2 of 25 mucinous cystic lesions (8%) in which cytology and CEA levels were not contributory.A volume-based protocol using different components of the specimen was able to optimize diagnostic yield in pancreatic cyst fluids. KRAS mutation testing increased diagnostic yield when combined with cytology and CEA analysis. The current results demonstrated that supernatant is comparable to neat fluid and cell block material for CEA and KRAS testing.[Difficulties of differential diagnosis of pancreatic pseudocysts and cystic neoplasms].Surgical resection is indicated in potentially malignant pancreatic cystic neoplasms. Drainage operations are performed in large (5-6 cm) and/or symptomatic pseudocysts. Misdiagnosis results in a considerable delay in an appropriate treatment. Our aims were to compare clinical, morphological, biochemical features of cystic neoplasms and pseudocysts, in which diagnosis of cystic neoplasm was suspected preoperatively, and to determine characteristics, which could predict the misdiagnosis of cystic neoplasms as "pseudocysts".One hundred and thirty four patients were operated because of pancreatis cystic lesions (22 cystic neoplasms and 112 pseudocysts) between January 1999 and May 2004. Two groups of patients were evaluated retrospectively. Group I included 22 (10 serous and 8 mucinous cystoadenomas, 3 mucinous cystadenocarcinomas, 1 solid papillary tumor) resected neoplasms. Group II included 11 patients in whom neoplasm was suspected during investigation, but definitive diagnosis of pseudocyst was established. Clinical manifestation, morphologic characteristics and data of instrumental investigations were also compared. Preoperative and postoperative diagnoses were compared with histopathological findings.Women predominated in group I (67.2%) and men in group II (81.2%). Group I patients were older (mean age 57.9+/-14.55 versus 49.27+/-10.07 years). All pseudocysts were symptomatic. Two (9.1%) incidental cystic neoplasms and 2 drainage operations were performed previously because of misdiagnosed "pseudocysts" in other hospitals. Abdominal pain, 81.8% and 100%, and abdominal mass, 31.8% and 54.4%, were recorded most frequently, group I and group II respectively. Neoplasms (median diameter 59.6 mm) were mainly located in pancreatic head (31.8%) and body (36.4%). Most of pseudocysts (median diameter 71.1 mm) were located in pancreatic head (45.5%). Diagnostic sensitivity of ultrasonography (86.4%) and computed tomography scan (84.2%) was higher in group I than in group II (63.6% and 77.8%). Two serous oligocystic and 1 mucinous cystoadenomas were misdiagnosed as "pseudocyst" preoperatively. In one case malignancy of mucinous tumor diagnosed only postoperatively.Differentiating serous and mucinous cystoadenomas from pseudocysts may be difficult. Malignant neoplasms may be undetermined preoperatively. Resection should always be performed in instances where findings cannot be clearly identified.Does general anesthesia increase the diagnostic yield of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration of pancreatic masses?: Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) of the pancreas has become the preferred method for tissue diagnosis for pancreatic solid masses. The yield of EUS-FNA in this setting is influenced by multiple factors. We hypothesized that general anesthesia (GA) may improve EUS-FNA yield by improving patient cooperation and stillness during the procedure. Our objective was to assess the association between the sedation method employed and the diagnostic yield of EUS-FNA.: A retrospective cohort study was conducted involving consecutive patients who received EUS-FNA for diagnosis of a solid pancreatic mass at the Cleveland Clinic (Cleveland, OH) gastrointestinal endoscopy units from 2007 to 2009. We compared the diagnostic yield of EUS-FNA between patients receiving GA provided by an anesthesiologist (GA group) and patients receiving conscious sedation (CS) provided by a qualified registered nurse (CS group).: Of 371 patients, a cytological diagnosis was obtained in 73/88 patients (83%) in the GA group and 206/283 patients (73%) in the CS group. Anesthesiologist-delivered GA was associated with an increased odds of having a successful diagnosis as compared with CS (adjusted odds ratio [95% CI]: 2.56 [1.27-5.17], P = 0.01). However, the incidence of complication during or after the procedure was not different between the groups (P > 0.99).: Anesthesiologist-delivered GA was associated with a significantly higher diagnostic yield of EUS-FNA. GA should be considered a preferred sedation method for EUS-FNA of a solid pancreatic mass.Endoscopic ultrasound elastography strain histograms in the evaluation of patients with pancreatic masses.To investigate the accuracy of the strain histogram endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-based method for the diagnostic differentiation of patients with pancreatic masses.In a prospective single center study, 149 patients were analyzed, 105 with pancreatic masses and 44 controls. Elastography images were recorded using commercially available ultrasound equipment in combination with EUS linear probes. Strain histograms (SHs) were calculated by machine integrated software in regions of interest and mean values of the strain histograms were expressed as Mode 1 (over the mass) and Mode 2 (over an adjacent part of pancreatic tissue, representing the reference area). The ratio between Mode 2 and Mode 1 was calculated later, representing a new variable, the strain histogram ratio. After the final diagnosis was established, two groups of patients were formed: a pancreatic cancer group with positive cytology achieved by fine needle aspiration puncture or histology after surgery (58 patients), and a mass-forming pancreatitis group with negative cytology and follow-up after 3 and 6 mo (47 patients). All statistical analyses were conducted in SPSS 14.0 (SPSS Inc., Chicago, IL, United States).Results were obtained with software for strain histograms with reversed hue scale (0 represents the hardest tissue structure and 255 the softest). Based on the receiver operating characteristics (ROC) curve coordinates, the cut-off point for Mode 1 was set at the value of 86. Values under the cut-off point indicated the presence of pancreatic malignancy. Mode 1 reached 100% sensitivity and 45% specificity with overall accuracy of 66% (95%CI: 61%-66%) in detection of pancreatic malignant tumors among the patients with pancreatic masses. The positive and negative predictive values were 54% and 100%, respectively. The cut-off for the new calculated variable, the SH ratio, was set at the value 1.153 based on the ROC curve coordinates. Values equal or above the cut-off value were indicative of pancreatic malignancy. The SH ratio reached 98% sensitivity, 50% specificity and an overall accuracy of 69% (95%CI: 63%-70%). The positive and negative predictive values were 92% and 100%, respectively.SH showed high sensitivity in pancreatic malignant tumor detection but disappointingly low specificity. Slight improvements in specificity and accuracy were achieved using the SH ratio.[Echography, computerized tomography and retrograde cholangiopancreatography for the diagnosis of focal pathology of the exocrine pancreas].In spite of the improved imaging techniques currently available, mortality for pancreatic cancer is still high, and pancreatitis is often diagnosed only in its advanced stages. The authors investigated the value of different imaging techniques--i.e., US, CT, and ERCP--for an early diagnosis, when a more effective (curative?) treatment can be suggested. Fifty-six cases of pancreatic cancer and 36 cases of chronic pancreatitis were evaluated. The results indicate that ERCP, with the help of statistical methods, is superior to US and CT not only in evaluating early neoplastic or inflammatory lesions, but also for their differential diagnosis. In the latter case, ERCP can sometimes be used as a valid alternative to fine-needle aspiration biopsy.Mucinous cystic neoplasms of the pancreas: definition of preoperative imaging criteria for high-risk lesions.Pancreatic mucinous cystic neoplasms (MCN) are premalignant lesions whose natural history is poorly known. Whether the dysplasia grade might be determined with precision by preoperative clinical and imaging criteria is not known. We aimed to determine if CT scan data might be useful to predict the grade of dysplasia in a series of 60 histologically proven MCN.All consecutive patients who were operated on with pathological confirmation of MCN were included. Careful CT scan evaluation was reviewed without knowledge of pathological results. Imaging and pathological results were correlated.Sixty patients (59 females) were included. Low- and intermediate-grade dysplasias were identified in 47 and 3 patients (benign MCN), respectively, and high-grade dysplasia and invasive carcinoma in 7 and 3 patients (malignant MCN), respectively. Patients with benign lesions were significantly younger. None of the studied clinical data were statistically different to distinguish benign and malignant MCN, except age (42 vs. 48 years, p < 0.05). Only maximal diameter and mural nodules on CT scan were significantly more frequent in the malignant group. No malignant MCN had a maximal diameter <40 mm. At a 40-mm threshold, the sensitivity and specificity of the maximal diameter to diagnose malignant MCN were 100 and 54%, respectively. Mural nodules seen on CT scan were confirmed in all cases but one upon pathological examination of the surgical specimen. The sensitivity and specificity of the presence of a mural nodule seen on CT scan for the diagnosis of a malignant lesion were 100 and 98%, respectively.Preoperative CT scan detection of a mural nodule within a cystic pancreatic neoplasm suggestive of MCN strongly suggests malignancy. A diameter <40 mm is associated with no risk of malignancy.Management of 100 consecutive cases of pancreatic serous cystadenoma: wait for symptoms and see at imaging or vice versa?Pancreatic serous cystadenomas have a low malignancy rate. When nonsymptomatic, in selected patients, they can be managed without surgery; however, a high degree of diagnostic reliability is crucial. We admitted 100 consecutive cases (87 women with a median age of 51.86 years). Of these, 44 were symptomatic and 56 were diagnosed incidentally. Ultrasound correctly diagnosed 53% of the cases, incorrectly 31%, and was nondiagnostic in 16%. Computed tomography scan had similar rates (54%, 34% and 12%, respectively), while magnetic resonance imaging improved diagnostic accuracy to 74% and reduced incorrect diagnoses to 26%. In 21 cases, exploratory needle aspiration of the cyst was carried out; only 8 samples (38%) resulted in a diagnosis; in 12 patients (57%) insufficient material was acquired to allow for diagnosis, one case demonstrated epithelial dysplasia. In 1 patient an exploratory puncture resulted in a very serious bleeding. Sixty-eight patients were treated surgically, the 44 symptomatic cases and another 24 patients with ill-defined oligocystic lesions that could not be differentiated as serous or mucinous in the preoperative period. Two patients underwent resection because of frank tumor growth. In the two time periods analyzed (the first 7 years and the subsequent 6.5 years) the relationship between cases observed/operated on did not significantly change. Twenty-one (30.8%) distal pancreatectomies, 14 (20.5%) intermediate resections, 10 (14.7%) pancreaticoduodenectomies 4 (5.8%) enucleations, and 1 (1.4%) duodenum-preserving pancreatic head resection were carried out. Nine patients (13.2%), underwent exploratory laparotomy with a diagnostic biopsy. Another 9 underwent decompressive interventions with cystojejunostomies. The morbidity was 27.9%, with a reoperation rate of 7.3% and zero mortality. In general the patient's pain resolved in the postoperative period. Median follow-up was 43 months (range, 4-191 months). One patient died from other causes, and all others are currently alive. In the group of 32 patients who did not undergo operation, the median follow-up is 69 months (range, 8-164 months). Until more sophisticated technologies can be developed, the current diagnostic work-up will not result in increased preoperative diagnosis of serous-cystic tumors of the pancreas. This is mainly relevant to the oligocystic forms, which account for about one fourth of all serous tumors observed.New trends in diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging as a tool in differentiation of serous cystadenoma and mucinous cystic tumor: a prospective study.Pancreatic cystic lesions are increasingly being recognized. Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is the method that brings the greatest amount of information about the morphologic features of pancreatic cystic lesions. To establish if diffusion-weighted MRI (DW-MRI) can be used as a tool to differentiate mucinous from nonmucinous lesions.Fifty-six patients with pancreatic cystic lesions (benign, n = 46; malignant, n = 10) were prospectively evaluated with DW-MRI in order to differentiate mucinous from nonmucinous lesions. Final diagnosis was obtained by follow-up (n = 31), surgery (n = 16) or endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (n = 9). Serous cystadenoma was identified in 32 (57%) patients.The threshold value established for the differentiation of mucinous from nonmucinous lesions was 2,230.06 s/mm(2) for ADC of 700. DWI-MRI behavior between mucinous and nonmucinous groups revealed sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and accuracy to be 80, 98, 92, 93 and 93%, respectively (p < 0.01, power of sample = 1.0). In the comparison of the diffusion behavior between mucinous (n = 13) and serous (n = 32) lesions, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and accuracy were 100, 97, 92, 100 and 98%, respectively (p < 0.01, power of sample = 1.0). The results of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration were similar to those of DW-MRI.DW-MRI can be included as part of the array of tools to differentiate mucinous from nonmucinous lesions and can help in the management of pancreatic cystic lesions. and IAP.Diagnosis of pancreatic cancer by 2[18F]-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose positron emission tomography.The detection of pancreatic cancer or the discrimination between pancreatic cancer and chronic pancreatitis remains an important diagnostic problem. The increased glucose metabolism in malignant tumours formed the basis for this investigation, which focused on the role of positron emission tomography (PET) with 2[18F]-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG) in the detection of pancreatic cancer and its differentiation from chronic pancreatitis. Eighty patients admitted for elective pancreatic surgery received preoperatively 250-350 mBq FDG intravenously and emission scans were recorded 45 minutes later. Intense focal activity in the pancreatic region was taken at the time of scanning as showing the presence of pancreatic cancer. The presence of cancer was later confirmed by histological examination of the surgical specimens and histological findings were compared with the preoperative PET results. Forty one patients with pancreatic cancer (group I: n = 42) had a focally increased FDG uptake in the pancreatic region. Two patients with a periampullary carcinoma (group II: n = 6) failed to develop FDG accumulation. In 28 patients with chronic pancreatitis (group III: n = 32) no FDG accumulation occurred. Overall sensitivity and specificity of PET for malignancy (group I + II) were 94% (45 of 48) and 88% (28 of 32), respectively. The standard uptake value of the patients with pancreatic carcinoma was significantly higher than in patients with chronic pancreatitis (3.09 (2.18) v 0.87 (0.56); p < 0.001; median (interquartile range)). These findings show that FDG-PET represents a new and non-invasive diagnostic procedure for the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer and to differentiate pancreatic cancer from chronic pancreatitis. However, the diagnostic potential of this technique requires further evaluation.Endoscopic ultrasound for differential diagnosis of focal pancreatic lesions, confirmed by surgery.Endoscopic ultrasound is increasingly used for evaluation of pancreatic cancer. The potential of sonographic morphology to differentiate histology type and biological behaviour of pancreatic lesions is doubtful.We prospectively studied 115 patients with focal pancreatic lesions on endoscopic ultrasound. Morphology was assessed using Olympus UM3/20/200 echoendoscopes. Histologic confirmation of diagnosis was obtained in all patients.Endoscopic ultrasound correctly diagnosed 18/34 benign and 77/81 malignant lesions. Sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, PPV and NPV for diagnosing malignancy were 95%, 53%, 83%, 83% and 82%, respectively. Endosonographic diagnosis of the lesions (% correct) were: pancreatic cancer, 84 (63.3%); chronic pancreatitis, 14 (71.4%); ampullary cancer, 9 (77.8%); cystadenoma, 5 (80%); ampullary adenoma, 2 (50%); acute pancreatitis, 1 (0). In 13 patients of chronic pancreatitis, diagnosed as cancer, diagnosis was based on absence of sonographic features of chronic pancreatitis (7) or suspected involvement of adjacent structures (6). In 3 patients malignancy was missed owing to features of chronic pancreatitis. Non-suspected neuroendocrine tumours were misjudged in all 10 cases using morphologic criteria as pancreatic cancer (8), cystadenoma and chronic pancreatitis. Accuracy for prediction of metastatic lymph nodes and an advanced pancreatic cancer stage (TxN1 or T3Nx) was 61% and 75%, respectively. On retrospective analysis, a lesion >2 cm, vessel ingrowth, absence of cystic spaces and absence of diffuse pancreatitis were associated with pancreatic cancer.While overall sensitivity was high, specificity of endoscopic ultrasound for diagnosis of malignancy was low, especially in presence of chronic pancreatitis. In addition, endosonography had only a limited potential to predict the histological type of lesions.Differential diagnosis of focal pancreatic masses by semiquantitative EUS elastography: between strain ratios and strain histograms.Rapid on-site cytopathological examination (ROSE) performed by endosonagraphers and its improvement in the diagnosis of pancreatic solid lesions.To evaluate the diagnosis improvement of EUS-FNA when using ROSE performed by the endosonographer.A retrospective study was conducted. A total of 48 pancreatic solid masses EUS-FNA were divided into two groups according to the availability of on-site cytology (ROSE) - the first 24 patients (group A-without ROSE) and the latter 24 cases (group B-with ROSE). Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, accuracy, complications and inadequacy rate of EUS-FNA were determined and compared.Among the 48 EUS-FNA, the overall performance was: sensitivity 82%; specificity 100%; positive predictive value (PPV) 100%; negative predictive value (NPV) 70% and accuracy 87%. The sensitivity of the Group A was 71%, versus 94% in-group B (p=0.61). Moreover, the negative predictive value was 58% versus 87% (p=0.72). The accuracy rate increased from 79% to 96% (p=0.67) in the ROSE group. The number of punctures was similar between the groups. No major complications were reported.Rapid on-site cytopathological examination, even when performed by the endosonographer, may improve the diagnostic performance in the diagnosis of solid pancreatic lesions, regardless of the slight increase in the number of punctures.The role of EUS in the diagnosis of cystic lesions of the pancreas.Preoperative evaluation of periampullary tumors by endoscopic sonography, transabdominal sonography, and computed tomography.The purpose of this retrospective study was to compare the sensitivity of endoscopic sonography (EUS), transabdominal sonography (US), and CT in the detection of, local staging of, and prediction of vascular involvement by or distant metastasis from periampullary tumors.Seventy-four consecutive patients with presumed periampullary tumors were evaluated by EUS, US, and CT during a 3.25-year period. The local staging accuracy of the modalities was assessed in the 36 patients with solid tumors who underwent surgery. The sensitivity of the modalities in predicting vascular involvement and distant metastasis was assessed in the 56 patients with carcinomas.EUS was the most sensitive modality in the detection (EUS, 97%; US, 24%; and CT, 39%; p < 0.001 for EUS versus US or CT) and T classification (EUS, 72%; US, 11%; CT, 22%; p < 0.001 for EUS versus US or CT) of periampullary tumors. EUS also had better sensitivity than US in detecting lymph node metastasis from periampullary cancers (EUS, 47%; US, 7%; and CT, 33%; p = 0.02 for EUS versus US; p = 0.7 for EUS versus CT). The accuracy of EUS in determining the T classification (without stent, 81%; with stent, 65%) and N classification (without stent, 80%; with stent, 70%) tended to decrease in the presence of an endobiliary stent, but the differences were not significant. EUS was the most sensitive modality in demonstrating vascular involvement (EUS, 100%; US, 0%; and CT, 33%; p = 0.002 for EUS versus US; p = 0.03 for EUS versus CT) but was not significantly different in detecting distant metastasis (EUS, 11%; US, 44%; and CT, 44%).EUS is superior to US and CT in the local assessment of periampullary tumors. The staging accuracy of EUS is minimally but not significantly affected by the presence of an endobiliary stent.Delayed (18)F-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose positron emission tomography scan for differentiation between malignant and benign lesions in the pancreas.Positron emission tomography (PET) using (18)F-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG) has been used for the evaluation of various tumors, but accumulation in inflammatory lesions makes it a controversial modality. The aim of this study was to investigate the usefulness of delayed scanning in differentiation between malignant and benign lesions in the pancreas.Forty-seven patients with suspected pancreatic carcinoma were studied by FDG-PET. All patients received approximately 370 megabequerels of FDG after a transmission scan, and an emission scan was performed 1 hour and 2 hours later for all patients. A subset of 19 patients was also scanned at 3 hours postinjection. The standardized uptake value (SUV) was determined, and the retention index was calculated by dividing the increase in the SUV between 1 hour and 2 hours postinjection by the SUV at 1 hour postinjection.Of 27 malignant lesions, the SUVs of 22 lesions increased at 2 hours postinjection, whereas the FDG uptake in 17 of 20 benign lesions decreased. The SUVs at 3 hours postinjection were higher than those at 2 hours postinjection in 9 of 14 malignant lesions and in 2 of 5 benign lesions. Malignant lesions showed a higher retention index than benign lesions (mean +/- standard deviation: 12. 36 +/- 13.37 and -7.05 +/- 17.28, respectively; P < 0.0001). Applying an SUV of 2.5 at 1 hour postinjection with the cut-off value for the differentiation between malignant and benign lesions caused one false negative result and seven false positive results, with a diagnostic accuracy of 83.0% (39 of 47 patients). However, combining the retention index with the SUV obtained at 2 hours postinjection provided a higher diagnostic accuracy (91.5%; 43 or 47 patients) than the SUV alone. The false negative rate remained constant when the retention index was taken into account. Images at 3 hours postinjection usually were unhelpful in differentiating further between malignant lesions and benign lesions.The current data suggest that delayed FDG-PET scanning at 2 hours postinjection may contribute to differentiation between malignant and benign lesions in the pancreas.Utility of contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasonography for diagnosis of small pancreatic carcinomas.The aim of our study was to assess the utility of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and contrast-enhanced EUS (CE-EUS) for the depiction and differential diagnosis of pancreatic tumors focusing in particularly those 2 cm or smaller. We compared different diagnostic procedures, contrast-enhanced multidetector computed tomography (CE-CT) and EUS with the use of power Doppler (PD-EUS) and CE-EUS for detection and differential diagnosis of pancreatic tumors. The study included 156 consecutive patients with suspected pancreatic tumors, who underwent CE-CT, and EUS followed by PD-EUS and CE-EUS. CE-EUS was performed by power Doppler mode using sonographic contrast agent Levovist. Thirty-six of 156 patients examined had tumors of < or =2 cm. EUS had significantly higher sensitivity (94.4%) for detection of pancreatic carcinomas of 2 cm or less in comparison to CE-CT (50%). For small pancreatic tumor of 2 cm or less, sensitivities for differentiating ductal carcinomas from other tumors were 50.0%, 11.0% and 83.3% for CE-CT, PD-EUS and CE-EUS. CE-EUS was significantly more sensitive than PD-EUS and CE-CT. EUS and subsequent CE-EUS are more sensitive than CE-CT in the detection and the differentiation of small pancreatic tumors.Evaluation of pancreatic carcinoma with FDG PET.To assess the diagnostic usefulness and clinical impact of positron emission tomography with [F-18]fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG PET) on the management of patients with known or suspected pancreatic carcinoma.Attenuation-corrected FDG PET was performed in 20 patients (12 male, eight female) with pancreatic carcinoma at the time of initial diagnosis (n = 7), for tumor surveillance after Whipple surgery (n = 11), and for reevaluation after chemoradiation therapy (n = 2). Visual analysis of PET images were correlated with the results of abdominal computed tomography (CT) and carbohydrate antigen (CA) 19-9 serum tumor marker level that were obtained within 1 month of the PET study. Diagnostic validation was by histology in nine patients and by clinical or radiologic follow-up (5-48 months) in 11 patients. Changes in therapeutic management that were prompted by PET were tabulated.PET was concordant with the findings of abdominal CT in 14 patients (13 true positive, 1 true negative). PET detected clinically unsuspected lung lesions, confirmed subsequently by a chest CT, in one of these 14 patients. PET was discordant with CT in six patients. PET detected tumor recurrence in three patients in this group (15% of total) with nondiagnostic CT findings and elevated CA 19-9 serology. In two of these three patients, chemotherapy with gemcitabine was initiated based on PET localization of disease. Tumor was confirmed in the remaining one of the three patients at autopsy shortly after the PET study. FDG localization in a displaced loop of bowel resulted in an apparent false-positive hepatic lesion in one of six patients in the discordant group. PET underestimated the extent of metastatic disease in the remaining two of six patients due to hyperglycemia.In patients with suspected pancreatic carcinoma at the time of initial presentation, PET is complementary to abdominal CT and allows detection of unsuspected distant metastases. In patients with suspected recurrent pancreatic carcinoma, based on elevated or rising CA 19-9 serology, PET can localize the disease when abdominal CT is nondiagnostic as a result of posttherapy anatomic alteration. Imaging evaluation with PET may impact the clinical management of patients with pancreatic carcinoma.Small pancreatic lesions: is there need for EUS-FNA preoperatively? What to do with the incidental lesions?Detection of KRAS gene mutations in endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy for improving pancreatic cancer diagnosis.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy (EUS-FNAB) is a useful tool in the diagnosis of pancreatic masses. Genetic analysis of these samples could increase the sensitivity and specificity of diagnosis. This study aimed to evaluate the usefulness of a novel method for the detection of mutations in the KRAS (Kirsten rat sarcoma-2 virus) gene for the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.EUS-FNABs were performed on 82 patients with pancreatic masses, including 54 cases of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma and 28 of non-malignant pancreatic masses. The biopsies were histopathologically and cytopathologically evaluated, and the detection of KRAS gene mutations (codons 12 and 13) was performed through peptide nucleic acid-directed polymerase chain reaction clamping and DNA sequencing.In the pancreatic cancer cases, 88.9% (48/54; 95% confidence interval (CI): 80.5-97.2%) had KRAS mutations, while 61.1% (33/54; 95% CI: 48.1-74.1%) were unequivocally diagnosed by histo/cytopathology. In the indeterminate patients (n=49; diagnosed by EUS-FNA as either insufficient material to make a diagnosis, no malignancy, or suspicion of malignancy), there were 10 cases of pancreatic cancer with low serum carbohydrate antigen 19-9 (CA19-9) (<37 U/l) and 6 of these were KRAS mutations. The sensitivity of detection by KRAS mutations (76.2%) and the combination of KRAS mutations and serum CA19-9 (81%) were significantly higher than for serum CA19-9 alone (52.4%). A logistic regression model showed that the KRAS mutation was significant (odds ratio=5.830; CI: 1.531-22.199, P=0.01), but not serum CA19-9. In the non-malignant pancreatic masses (n=28), KRAS mutations were detected in nine precancerous lesions.Our method for the detection of KRAS gene mutations may be useful to supplement histo/cytopathologic evaluations for pancreatic cancer, and is superior to serum CA19-9 in EUS-FNAB histo/cytopathology-indeterminate patients. Results warrant further verification in other patient populations.Impact of F18-fluorodeoxyglycose positron emission tomography/computed tomography on the management of resectable pancreatic tumours.Positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) using F18-fluorodeoxyglucose has been shown to be valuable in the management of malignant disease. The aim of this study is to investigate the impact of this technique on the management of patients with resectable pancreatic tumours.Thirty-six patients with 37 potentially resectable pancreatic tumours on diagnostic CT imaging underwent PET/CT scans. Operative findings, histological reports and/or clinical follow-up served as standard of reference. The impact of PET/CT on patient management was estimated by calculating the percentage of patients whose treatment plan was altered due to PET/CT.Pancreatic adenocarcinoma was diagnosed in 30 patients, neuroendocrine tumours in 3, mass-forming pancreatitis in 3 and serous cystadenoma in 1. The median standard uptake (max) value was 5.0 (range 2.2-12.0). Sensitivity and specificity of detecting extrapancreatic metastatic disease were 73% and 100%, respectively. Three occult liver metastases were detected at laparotomy following negative PET/CT. PET/CT findings influenced the management of 8 (22%) patients - 3 with liver metastases, 3 with bone metastases, 1 with lymph node metastases and 1 by identifying the benign appearance of the pancreatic tumour.PET/CT achieves a significant diagnostic impact in detecting extrapancreatic metastatic disease. F18-fluorodeoxyglucose PET/CT appears to be useful in assessing suspicious pancreatic masses.Diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer: comparison of mangafodipir trisodium-enhanced MR imaging and contrast-enhanced helical hydro-CT.The purpose of this study was to compare mangafodipir trisodium-enhanced MR imaging performed with a phased array coil and contrast-enhanced single-detector helical CT for accuracy in the detection and local staging of pancreatic adenocarcinoma and in the differentiation between cancer and focal pancreatitis.Forty-two patients with suspected pancreatic masses underwent contrast-enhanced helical CT and mangafodipir trisodium-enhanced MR imaging at 1.5 T. The images were assessed for the presence or absence of tumors; characterization of masses; and presence of vascular invasion, lymph node metastases, or liver metastases. Imaging findings were correlated with findings at laparotomy, laparoscopy, biopsy, or follow-up.Focal masses were present in 36 patients (cancer, n = 26; focal pancreatitis, n = 7; other, n = 3). The sensitivity for lesion detection of MR imaging was 100% and of CT, 94%. Two small malignant lesions were missed on CT. For the diagnosis of tumor nonresectability, the sensitivity of MR imaging and CT was 90% and 80%, respectively. Liver metastases were missed on MR imaging in one of the eight patients and on CT in four. For differentiation between adenocarcinoma and nonadenocarcinoma, the sensitivity of MR imaging was 100% (positive predictive value, 90%; negative predictive value, 100%), and the sensitivity of CT was 92% (positive predictive value, 80%; negative predictive value, 67%). Receiver operating characteristic analysis revealed that the mean area under the curve for MR imaging was 0.920 and for CT, 0.832 (not significant).Mangafodipir trisodium-enhanced MR imaging is as accurate as contrast-enhanced helical CT for the detection and staging of pancreatic cancer but offers improved detection of small pancreatic metastases and of liver metastases compared with CT.[Endosonographic diagnosis of pancreatic tumors].140 patients (72 men, 68 women; mean age 57 [26-83] years) with suspected pancreatic tumours were investigated by endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and also by conventional ultrasound, computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP). The EUS scans were performed with an echo-endoscope in the descending part of the duodenum (for the head of the pancreas) or in the stomach (for the body and tail). The definitive diagnosis or exclusion of a pancreatic tumour (malignant n = 85, benign n = 4, inflammatory n = 23, no tumour n = 28) was made at operation (n = 63), by needle biopsy (n = 35), at necropsy (n = 4) or by clinical follow up (n = 38, mean 10.5 months). The sensitivity and specificity of endoscopic ultrasound (99% and 100%) were superior to the results given by conventional ultrasound scans (71% and 39%), CT (82% and 46%) and ERCP (89% and 64%). This was also true of small tumours of 3 cm or less (EUS 100%, conventional ultrasound 57%, CT 68% and ERCP 89%). However, the differential diagnosis between malignant and inflammatory masses in the pancreas was not feasible by endoscopic ultrasound, either prospectively (detection rate 69%) or by comparative analyses of echo structure. Endoscopic ultrasound appears to be a valuable aid to the diagnosis or exclusion of pancreatic tumours. When conventional ultrasound and CT give negative or doubtful results it can be used in conjunction with or instead of ERCP to confirm the diagnosis.Comparison of methods to detect neoplasia in patients undergoing endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration.Digital image analysis (DIA) and fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) can be used to evaluate biliary strictures with greater accuracy than conventional cytology (CC). We performed a prospective evaluation of the accuracy of CC, compared with that of DIA and FISH, in detection of malignancy in patients undergoing endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) fine-needle aspiration (FNA).We collected a minimum of 6 FNA samples from each of 250 patients during EUS. CC or DIA and FISH analyses were performed on every other specimen (from every other FNA pass); patients were randomly assigned to the first test performed. CC slides were reviewed by gastrointestinal cytopathologists who were blinded to all data. Findings from cytohistologic analysis, after a minimum 24-month follow-up period, were used as the standard (n = 202; median age, 65 years).Aspirates were collected from lymph nodes (n = 111), pancreas (n = 61), gastrointestinal lumen wall (n = 9), periluminal mass (n = 4), liver (n = 8), and miscellaneous sites (n = 9). Matched samples provided a mean of 3.2 passes for CC and 1.6 passes for DIA and FISH. The data indicate a potential lack of utility for DIA. The combination of CC and FISH detected malignancy with 11% greater sensitivity than CC alone (P = .0002), but specificity was reduced from 100% to 96%.FISH analysis identifies neoplastic lesions with significantly greater sensitivity than CC in patients with diverse pathologies who underwent EUS with FNA, despite limited tissue sampling for FISH analysis.Contrast harmonic echo-endoscopic ultrasound improves accuracy in diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses.Contrast harmonic echo (CHE) has been developed for endoscopic ultrasound (EUS). This new technique detects echo signals from microbubbles in vessels with very slow flow, without artifacts. We assessed whether CHE-EUS increases the accuracy of diagnosis of pancreatic solid lesions.At a tertiary-care EUS center, we examined 90 patients who were suspected of having pancreatic solid neoplasm. Radial and linear echoendoscopes were used with dedicated software for CHE. Sonovue (Bracco International BV, Amsterdam, The Netherlands) uptake, pattern, and washout were studied; data were compared for pancreatic lesions and adjacent parenchyma. The final diagnosis was obtained based on results of surgical pathology and/or EUS-fine needle aspiration (FNA) analyses.The finding of a hypoenhancing mass with an inhomogeneous pattern was a sensitive and accurate identifier of patients with adenocarcinoma (96% and 82%, respectively) (49 of 51 patients with primary pancreatic adenocarcinoma had a hypoenhancing mass that was inhomogeneous and had fast washout). This finding was more accurate in diagnosis than the finding of a hypoechoic lesion using standard EUS (P < .000). Hyperenhancement specifically excluded adenocarcinoma (98%), although sensitivity was low (39%). Of neuroendocrine tumors, 11 of 13 were non-hypo-enhancing (9 hyperenhancing, 2 isoenhancing). Interestingly, CHE-EUS allowed detection of small lesions in 7 patients who had uncertain standard EUS findings because of biliary stents (n = 5) or chronic pancreatitis (n = 2). Targeted EUS-FNA was performed on these lesions.Detection of a hypoenhancing and inhomogeneous mass accurately identified patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma. CHE-EUS increased the detection of malignant lesions in difficult cases (patients with chronic pancreatitis or biliary stents) and helped guide EUS-FNA. A hyperenhancing pattern could be used to rule out adenocarcinoma.The role of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) with magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) in the diagnosis and assessment of resectability of pancreatic tumors.Carcinoma of the pancreas is one of the most malignant tumors. Symptoms are usually nonspecific and insidious, such that the cancer is advanced by the time of diagnosis. The aim of the study was to assess the usefulness of MRI and MRCP in the diagnosis of patients suspected of pancreatic carcinoma and to define the role of these methods in the evaluation of resectability of pancreatic cancer in comparison with surgical findings.Forty-seven patients (32 men and 15 women) aged 46-81 had undergone MRI and MRCP examination of the upper abdomen on a 1.5 T system with a standard flexible surface coil. The results of those tests were compared with surgical and histopathological findings. The capacity of MR and MRCP to detect pathological mass, assess the nature of the disease process, and accurately assess the resectability of the malignant lesion were evaluated. In the statistical analysis the chi-squared and Fisher's precise tests were performed.Statistical analysis showed 87% sensitivity, 97% specificity, and 95% accuracy of MRI and MRCP in the evaluation of the nature of tumors within the pancreas and 100% sensitivity, 90% specificity, and 93% accuracy in determining the resectability of the lesion. The positive predictive value came to 83%, while the negative predictive value was 100%. The kappa compatibility index in comparison with surgical findings was 0.85714.MR and MRCP is an important diagnostic method in assessing pancreatic tumors. It is very useful in differential diagnosis and determination of tumor resectability.Predictors of malignant potential of cystic lesions of the pancreas.Cystic lesions of the pancreas (CLP) are a diagnostic dilemma, the correct characterisation of which determines surgical management.From 1995 to 2005, radiology and pathology records were reviewed for the presence of CLP. CLP were divided into three groups; Group 1: Benign, Group 2: Pre-malignant, and Group 3: Malignant.Seventy-nine of 121 patients were included [Group 1: n=46, Group 2: n=10, Group 3: n=23], with a median age at diagnosis of 68 (31-92) years. The median follow-up period was 24 (14-84) months. On univariate analysis, female gender (p=0.04), jaundice (p<0.01), raised serum ALT concentration (p=0.03), cyst size (> or = 2.5 cm) (p<0.01), and biliary duct dilatation (p<0.01) were associated with malignant potential. Benign cysts were more likely to present incidentally (p<0.01). On multi-variate analysis, cyst size (> or =2.5 cm) was an independent predictor of malignant potential. Sub-group analysis revealed that cysts <2.5 cm in the head of the pancreas with evidence of biliary obstruction (either abnormal liver function; raised ALT [p=0.01], ALP [p=0.01], total bilirubin [p=0.02], and/or biliary duct dilatation [p<0.01]) were associated with malignant potential.Cyst size > or =2.5 cm on computer tomography imaging was an independent predictor of pre-malignant and malignant pancreatic cysts. Cyst size and the presence of biliary obstruction predict potentially malignant cysts of the head of the pancreas, which require surgical management.Mucinous ductal ectasia of the pancreas.Pancreatic mucinous ductal ectasia (MDE) is a recently described and poorly understood disorder, with few cases reported in the imaging literature. We undertook this study to describe the spectrum of CT and pancreatographic findings of MDE and to investigate the incidence of associated pancreatic malignancy.The medical records, CT scans, and pancreatograms of 12 consecutive patients with pathologically proven MDE were retrospectively reviewed. There were nine men and three women, ranging in age from 37 to 72 years (mean 59 years).Focal lesions involved primarily the uncinate (two patients) and head (eight patients) by CT imaging. The entire gland was involved in two patients. CT findings were variable and included focal pancreatic enlargement, a low attenuation or cystic mass, low attenuation of the entire gland, or marked ductal dilatation. Pancreatographic findings were more consistent, showing ductal dilatation with or without intraluminal filling defects, obstruction, or displacement. In all cases, findings at endoscopy were felt to be characteristic, with ductal dilatation, filling defects, or abundant mucus seen upon cannulation of the pancreatic duct. Carcinoma-in-situ was present in six cases, cellular atypia without malignancy in two, and in three cases the lesions were histologically benign. One case demonstrated invasive adenocarcinoma. No finding or group of findings on CT or pancreatography permitted differentiation between benign and malignant lesions.MDE can present with a variety of appearances on CT, none of which is diagnostic. Pancreatography can be diagnostic if dilatation and intraluminal filling defects are seen. Carcinoma-in-situ, invasive adenocarcinoma, or cellular atypia is present in approximately 75%, but cannot be accurately diagnosed prospectively.Cyst fluid carcinoembryonic antigen level is not predictive of invasive cancer in patients with intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas.Cyst fluid CEA concentration>192 ng/mL has proven accurate to differentiate mucinous from non-mucinous pancreatic cystic neoplasms. It is unclear whether the degree of cyst fluid CEA elevation is predictive of malignant behavior in IPMNs.To determine whether elevated cyst fluid CEA concentrations were predictive of invasive cancer.Cross sectional study.Single National Cancer Institute comprehensive cancer care center experience.47 patients underwent preoperative EUS-FNA with cyst fluid analysis and surgical resection of an IPMN over a 9 year period.Cyst fluid CEA concentrations among the four grades associated with IPMN (low grade dysplasia, moderate dysplasia, high grade dysplasia, and invasive cancer).The mean±standard deviation cyst fluid CEA concentration increased as the pathology progressed from low grade dysplasia (1,261±1,679 ng/mL) to moderate dysplasia (7,171±22,210 ng/mL) to high grade dysplasia (10,807±36,203 ng/mL). However, the mean CEA level decreased (462±631 ng/mL) once invasive cancer developed (P=0.869). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of a cyst fluid CEA concentration greater than 200 ng/mL for the diagnosis of malignant IPMN (cases of high grade dysplasia and invasive IPMN) was 52.4%, 42.3%, 42.3%, 52.4% and 46.8%, respectively.Single center experience, small patient numbers, retrospective data collection.The degree of cyst fluid CEA elevation is a poor predictor of malignant degeneration within IPMNs. Clinical management decisions regarding surgical resection should not be based upon degree of cyst fluid CEA elevation.Quantitative analysis of K-ras gene mutation in pancreatic tissue obtained by endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine needle aspiration: clinical utility for diagnosis of pancreatic tumor.Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) has become established in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer. The combination of pathological diagnosis and analysis for mutant K-ras gene was investigated to improve the accuracy of diagnosis.EUS-FNA was performed in 34 patients with pancreatic masses (26 adenocarcinomas and eight chronic pancreatitis). Mutant ras gene was analyzed semiquantitatively in the specimens obtained by EUS-FNA as well as in pancreatic juice obtained by ERCP.Mutant gene was detected at high amounts (more than 2% of total ras genes) in 20 of 26 (77%) specimens of EUS-FNA and in 12 of 19 (63%) of pancreatic juice in cases with pancreatic carcinoma. Cytological diagnosis of malignancy by EUS-FNA was found in 16 of 26 (62%) patients with pancreatic cancer. Accurate diagnosis of the carcinoma was 21 of 26 (81%) by combined cytology and molecular method of EUS-FNA, and increased to 23 of 26 (88%) by adding molecular analysis of pancreatic juice. In contrast, mutant gene was absent or low level despite suspicious cytology in patients with benign pancreatic lesion.Quantitative analysis of mutant ras gene supplemented conventional cytology of EUS-FNA and ERCP. Detection of mutation at high amounts may represent pancreatic cancer, whereas its absence increased the possibility of benign lesion.A randomized comparison of EUS-guided FNA versus CT or US-guided FNA for the evaluation of pancreatic mass lesions.Diagnosing pancreatic cancer by EUS-FNA is a potentially appealing alternative to percutaneous biopsy.To compare EUS-FNA with CT or US-guided FNA for diagnosing pancreatic cancer.Single center, prospective, randomized, cross-over.Duke University Medical Center.Eighty-four patients referred with suspicious solid pancreatic mass lesions randomized to CT/US-FNA (n = 43) or EUS-FNA (n = 41).Patients underwent an imaging procedure/FNA. If cytology was nondiagnostic, cross over to the other modality was offered. Final outcome was determined by clinical follow-up every 6 months for 2 years and/or surgical pathology for patients with negative FNA.Sensitivity and accuracy of EUS-FNA versus CT/US-FNA for pancreatic cancer.There were 16 true positive (TP) by CT/US-FNA and 21 TP by EUS-FNA. Sixteen of the 20 CT/US-FNA negative patients crossed over to EUS-FNA; 12 underwent FNA, 4 had no mass at EUS. Seven of the 12 had positive EUS-FNA. Eight EUS-FNA negative crossed over to CT/US; 4 had no mass at CT/US, 3 remained true negative throughout follow-up, 1 had chronic pancreatitis at surgery. The sensitivity of CT/US-FNA and EUS-FNA for detecting malignancy was 62% and 84%, respectively. A comparison of the accuracy for CT/US-FNA and EUS-FNA was not statistically significant (P = .074, chi(2)).Failure to meet target enrollment resulted in an inability to demonstrate a statistically significant difference between the 2 modalities.EUS-FNA is numerically (though not quite statistically) superior to CT/US-FNA for the diagnosis of pancreatic malignancy.EUS or percutaneous CT/US-guided FNA for suspected pancreatic cancer: when tissue is the issue.Histological diagnosis by EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy in pancreatic solid masses without on-site cytopathologist: a single-center experience.There are few reports on the histological diagnostic ability of endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in a large-series of pancreatic masses. In the present study therefore we retrospectively evaluated the histological diagnostic ability of EUS-FNA in pancreatic masses without on-site cytopathologist. In 355 patients with pancreatic solid masses, EUS-FNA was carried out. EUS-FNA histology showed accuracy, 90.7%; sensitivity, 89.5%; specificity, 95.6%; positive predict value, 98.8%; negative predict value, 68.8% by intention-to-treat analysis. Except for 10 with inadequate materials, EUS-FNA histology showed accuracy, 93.3%; sensitivity, 91.8%; specificity, 100%; positive predict value, 100%; negative predict value, 77.6%. The mean number of puncture was 2.88 (range 1 to 8). There was two (0.6%) procedure-related bleeding. In conclusion, diagnostic ability of EUS-FNA by histological materials was similar to previous literature on the EUS-FNA without on-site cytopathologist.[Comparison of enhanced magnetic resonance imaging and magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography in the differential diagnosis of benign and malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas].To compare the value of liver acquisition with volume acceleration (LAVA) and magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) in diagnosing benign and malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMN) of the pancreas.The MR findings of 35 IPMN patients confirmed by pathology were analyzed retrospectively, and the sequences included T1WI, T2WI, LAVA, and MRCP. All patients were divided into two groups: the group of MRI enhancement (including T1WI, T2WI, and MRI enhancement) and the group of MRCP (including T1WI, T2WI, and MRCP). Two groups were evaluated by the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve.Totally 23 cases of intraductal papillary mucinous tumors and 12 cases of intraductal papillary mucinous carcinomas were diagnosed. Finally, 29 cases (29/35) of IPMN were diagnosed correctly in the group of MR enhancement, and 25 cases (25/35) diagnosed correctly in the group of MRCP. The differential diagnostic accuracy of the group of MRI enhancement (82.9%) was higher than that of the group of MRCP (71.4%), although the difference was not statistically significant (P=0.068). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and the area under the ROC curve (AUC) of the group of MRI enhancement were 83.3%, 82.6%, 71.4%, and 0.850, and those of the group of MRCP were 75.0%, 69.6%, 52.3%, and 0.723. The AUC of the group of MRI enhancement was significantly larger than that of the group of MRCP (P=0.0465).MRI enhancement is more valuable than MRCP in the differential diagnosis of benign and malignant IPMN.EUS-guided 22-gauge fine-needle aspiration versus core biopsy needle in the evaluation of solid pancreatic neoplasms.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is widely used for diagnosis of pancreatic lesions. The Echotip Procore Needle (Wilson-Cook Medical) is a new 22G fine biopsy needle (FNB) for obtaining core biopsy material at time of EUS. This study aimed to compare the technical and diagnostic performance of conventional FNA and FNB. Thirty-two patients met the design criteria for this prospective paired cohort study. All lesions sampled were solid (non-cystic) pancreatic masses by EUS appearance. Patients were randomized to receive FNA or FNB by first attempt. A cytopathologist performed on-site evaluations. Samples were assessed for accuracy of diagnosis, cellularity, contamination, and sufficiency for ancillary studies. Technical and diagnostic performances were compared. Compared to FNA, there was a statistically significant decreased ability of FNB to achieve a diagnosis (FNA 93.8%, FNB 28.1%, P < 0.001). FNB was diagnostically superior to FNA in 1 of 32 cases. Technical failures were observed in five cases due to resistance to advancement of the FNB needle. Regarding operator perceived ease-of-use, FNA outperformed FNB (P < 0.001). Eight cases had insufficient FNB material to survive tissue processing. There was no significant difference in mean specimen cellularity between devices. FNA samples showed an increased amount of contaminant (P = 0.036) but were more sufficient for ancillary studies (P = 0.502). Although deemed comparable to FNA when providing material for cytology, the pledged advantage of FNB acting like a core biopsy needle was not apparent in our series. Additional studies are needed before routine adoption of 22G FNB can be recommended.Combining fine needle aspiration with brushing cytology has improved yields in diagnosing pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma.The aim of this retrospective study is to evaluate the diagnostic yields of combining fine needle aspiration (FNA) with brushing cytology (BC) in clinical work-up of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma. The study included a total of 97 patients who underwent both FNA and BC along with histologic/clinical follow-up (F/U). Cytologic diagnoses were categorized as negative for neoplasm (NEG), atypical/favor neoplasm (AN), and suspicious or positive for neoplasm (POS). Based on the cytologic diagnoses, the cohort was divided as follows: 23 had concordant FNA and BC diagnoses of POS/AN, all were neoplasms on F/U; 34 had disconcordant (POS/AN vs. NEG) FNA and BC diagnoses, all but 2 were neoplasms on F/U; The remaining 40 were NEG on both FNA and BC, F/U revealed that 10 were neoplasms and 30 were chronic pancreatitis. Overall, FNA rendered more true positive diagnoses than BC. However, BC but not FNA detected neoplasms in 10 patients. Most of the neoplasms identified on F/U were ductal adenocarcinoma (59 of 65). Diagnostic sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and accuracy were 69.2, 93.8, 95.7, 60, and 77.3% for FNA alone, 50.8, 100, 100, 50.0, and 67.0% for BC alone, and 84.6, 100, 100, 76.2, and 89.7% for combining FNA with BC. In conclusion, both EUS-guided FNA and BC are valuable modalities in the preoperative diagnosis of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma. When used in combination, the two modalities complement each other and achieve better diagnostic yield in pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma than either FNA or BC alone.Comparison of ultrasound and computed tomography in the detection of pancreatic malignancy.A retrospective analysis was performed on 102 patients who were examined by both ultrasound (US) and computed tomography (CT) for known or possible carcinoma of the pancreas. In 38% of the patients, ultrasonography was unsatisfactory due to overlying interfering intestinal gas or ascites, whereas only 2% of CT studies were unsatisfactory due to technical considerations. In comparing the two modalities, CT was found to be more accurate (96% CT vs. 84% US), and this became more significant when nondiagnostic studies were considered in evaluating accuracy (95% CT vs. 54% US). Because of the findings in this analysis, CT is recommended as the initial diagnostic imaging modality for the evaluation of possible pancreatic neoplasm.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration and cyst fluid analysis for pancreatic cysts.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) with EUS-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) has been increasingly utilized to differentiate malignant/pre-malignant pancreatic cysts from those that are benign or have low malignant potential.To determine the utility of EUS morphology, EUS-FNA cytology and cyst fluid analysis to distinguish mucinous cystic neoplasms from non-mucinous cystic neoplasms based on histopathology following surgical resection.A retrospective, single center case series.Patients who underwent EUS and EUS-FNA of known or suspected pancreatic cysts followed by surgical resection. The final diagnosis was based on histopathology.Patients were divided in two groups: mucinous cystic neoplasms and non-mucinous cystic neoplasms. Patients with intraductal papillary mucinous tumors were excluded.Clinical profiles and EUS findings.Forty-eight patients (mean age: 52 years; 29 females, 19 males) were identified: 16 mucinous cystic neoplasms and 32 non-mucinous cystic neoplasms. There were more women in the mucinous cystic neoplasm group compared to the non-mucinous cystic neoplasm group (88% vs. 47%; P=0.011) but the two groups were otherwise similar. The sensitivity, specificity and frequency of cases correctly identified of EUS-FNA cytology for the diagnosis of mucinous cystic neoplasms were 12.5% (95% CI: 2.2-37.2%), 90.6% (95% CI: 75.0-97.5%) and 64.6% (95% CI: 50.4-77.0%), respectively. Median cyst fluid CEA for the mucinous cystic neoplasm group (277 ng/mL; n=14) was significantly higher (P=0.002) than the non-mucinous cystic neoplasm group (1.5 ng/mL; n=21). Cyst fluid CEA greater than 800 ng/mL had a sensitivity of 42.9% (95% CI: 21.3-67.4%) and specificity of 95.2% (95% CI: 75.6-99.9%) for the diagnosis of mucinous cystic neoplasm. On the other hand, a cyst fluid CEA greater than a best cut-off ranging from 3.5 to 8.5 ng/mL had a sensitivity of 92.9% (95% CI: 66.5-100%), a specificity of 66.7% (14/21; 95% CI: 45.2-83.0%), and an accuracy of 81.1% with a frequency of cases correctly identified of 77.1% (95% CI: 60.7-88.2%).EUS-FNA cytology and cyst fluid CEA greater than 800 ng/mL are insensitive but highly specific for differentiating mucinous cystic neoplasms from non-mucinous cystic neoplasms. EUS morphology alone cannot distinguish between the two groups.Role of (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography in diagnosis and management of pancreatic cancer; comparison with multidetector row computed tomography, magnetic resonance imaging and endoscopic ultrasonography.We aimed to analyze the contribution of (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography (FDG PET/CT) imaging to the diagnosis and management of pancreatic cancer compared with multidetector row computed tomography (MDCT), magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS).We retrospectively scanned the data of 52 patients who were referred for FDG PET/CT imaging for evaluation of pancreatic lesions greater than 10mm. The diagnostic performances of 4 imaging methods and the impact of PET/CT on the management of pancreatic cancer were defined.Pancreatic adenocarcinoma was diagnosed in 33 of 52 patients (63%), 15 patients had benign diseases of pancreas (29%), and 4 patients were normal (8%). Sensitivity and NPV of EUS and PET/CT were equal (100%) and higher than MDCT and MRI. Specificity, PPV and NPV of PET/CT were significantly higher than MDCT. However, sensitivities of two imaging methods were not significantly different. There was no significant difference between PET/CT and MRI and EUS for these values. When the cut-off value of SUVmax was 3.2, the most effective sensitivity and specificity values were obtained. PET/CT contributed to the management of pancreatic cancer in 30% of patients.FDG PET/CT is a valuable imaging method for the diagnosis and management of pancreatic cancer, especially when applied along with EUS as first line diagnostic tools.Aspirative cytology with fine-needle in the abdomen, retroperitoneum and pelvic cavity: a seven year experience of the Portuguese Institute of Oncology, Center of Porto.A review was made of 236 fine-needle aspiration cytologies (FNAC), guided by ultrasound, computerized tomography or fluoroscopy, performed in the abdomen, retroperitoneum and pelvic cavity. Seventy-three FNAC were from the liver, 41 from the kidneys, 30 from the pelvic cavity, 26 from the retroperitoneum, 24 from the peritoneal cavity, 13 from the pancreas, 11 from the adrenal glands, nine from the abdominal wall, seven from the spleen and two from the digestive tract. The total accuracy rate was 90%, ranging from 77% in the abdominal wall lesions to 100% in the splenic lesions. Indications for FNAC and results are discussed as well as the accuracy rate obtained with different guiding modalities. We conclude considering FNAC a safe, unexpensive and reliable method to confirm the diagnosis of malignant lesions in the abdomen, retroperitoneum and pelvic cavity.Indications for and clinical impact of repeat endoscopic ultrasound.The value of repeating endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is seldom described. This study evaluates a patient population in which EUS was repeated.This was a retrospective study of patients who between January 2002 and December 2006 had an EUS scan performed; this EUS scan (re-EUS) was the second or more EUS scan performed.Over the study period, the department performed 3024 EUS procedures, of which 561 investigations were defined as re-EUS. According to defined exclusion criteria, 244 procedures were not analyzed further. The study group thus consisted of 317 procedures (242 patients). In 163 cases (126 patients), re-EUS was planned by the endosonographer for control of an undetermined lesion. The first re-EUS scan performed changed the further management in 91 of 126 patients (72%). Sensitivity and specificity of re-EUS regarding pancreatic cancer were 0.65 and 1.00, respectively. Re-EUS was performed in 82 cases (77 patients) where no re-investigation had been planned at the initial EUS scan but worsening of symptoms or new findings of other imaging procedures had led to an additional EUS scan. Thirteen of these patients (17%) proved to have pancreatic cancer. In 62 cases (57 patients) re-EUS and EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration (FNA) had been planed in order to confirm the suspicion of malignant disease. Following re-EUS and EUS-FNA, 40 of these patients could be referred for either oncology or surgery. In the remaining 10 cases, re-EUS was performed for miscellaneous indications.Re-EUS has a substantial clinical impact on the further management of the patient.Is diagnostic accuracy of fine needle aspiration on solid pancreatic lesions aspiration-related? A multicentre randomised trial.Endoscopic ultrasound fine needle aspiration has a central role in the diagnostic algorithm of solid pancreatic masses. Data comparing the fine needle aspiration performed with different aspiration volume and without aspiration are lacking. We compared endoscopic ultrasound fine needle aspiration performed with the 22 gauge needle with different aspiration volumes (10, 20 and 0 ml), for adequacy, diagnostic accuracy and complications.Prospective clinical study at four referral centres. Endoscopic ultrasound fine needle aspiration was performed with a 22G needle with both volume aspiration (10 and 20 cc) and without syringe, in randomly assigned sequence. The cyto-pathologist was blinded as to which aspiration was used for each specimen.100 patients met the inclusion criteria, 88 completed the study. The masses had a mean size of 32.21±11.24 mm. Sample adequacy evaluated on site was 87.5% with 20 ml aspiration vs. 76.1% with 10 ml (p=0.051), and 45.4% without aspiration (20 ml vs. 0 ml p<0.001; 10 ml vs. 0 ml p<0.001). The diagnostic accuracy was significantly better with 20 ml than with 10 ml and 0 ml (86.2% vs. 69.0% vs. 49.4% p<0.001).A significantly higher adequacy and accuracy were observed with the 20 ml aspiration puncture, therefore performing all passes with this volume aspiration may improve the diagnostic power of fine needle aspiration.Comparison of endoscopic ultrasound and computed tomography in the assessment of pancreatic cyst size using pathology as the gold standard.Accurate assessment of whether a cyst is greater than 3 cm is an essential component when considering resection especially for mucinous lesions. The most accurate method of assessing cyst size is uncertain with many patients undergoing several complimentary imaging modalities. This study aimed to compare the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) with CT scanning in assessing pancreatic cyst size compared to histology.Patients referred for EUS of a pancreatic cystic lesion from April 2003 to August 2011. Patient age and gender, lesion size and site were recorded and compared using cyst size at histology compared to EUS and CT recorded within 3 months of surgery. Subgroup analysis was performed with respect to cyst site and proven mucinous lesions.357 patients were included of which 70 (mean age 60.6 years, 24 males) had undergone surgical resection. The resected cysts were located 30/17/23 in the head/body/tail of the pancreas. Median size at histology was 32 mm compared to 35 mm at EUS (p = 0.47) and 35 mm at CT (p = 0.52). For mucinous lesions alone, median size at histology was 32 mm compared to 33 mm at EUS (p = 0.46) and 35 mm at CT (p = 0.39). EUS and CT had comparable sensitivity, specificity, negative predictive value, positive predictive value and accuracy for all cyst types and locations.CT and EUS measurements are not significantly different to pathological size following resection of pancreatic cystic lesions. CT and EUS are interchangeable investigations for determining cyst size pre-operatively although EUS has the additional advantage of fluid sampling.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration in focal pancreatic lesions: a prospective intraindividual comparison of two needle assemblies.The results of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in focal pancreatic lesions are less impressive than those in the mediastinum. The aim of this prospectively randomized study was to compare two commercially available needle assemblies with regard to handling and cytopathological yield.A total of 30 patients (19 men, 11 women; mean age 61) with focal pancreatic lesions underwent EUS-FNA with each of the two needles (GIP, Wilson-Cook). The sequence was randomized for the examiner and blinded for the cytologist. Three patients had to be excluded because of the impossibility of sample assignment or patient follow-up. EUS-FNA was performed using the standard technique with linear echo endoscopes.None of the characteristics evaluated by the examiner differed significantly between either of the needles. Inadequate results were obtained in 11% using the GIP needle, but in none with the Wilson-Cook needle. GIP needle cytology revealed malignancy in 11 patients (sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were 55%, 100%, and 65%, respectively, including inadequate results). The aspirates obtained with the Wilson-Cook needle identified malignancy in 16 patients (sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were 85%, 100%, and 89%, respectively).No statistically significant differences were detected in the handling of either of the two needle assemblies. No complications were reported using the GIP needles. However, in four procedures breakages of the outer Teflon sheath of the Wilson-Cook needle occurred, and in another four cases re-insertion of the stylet was impossible. Nevertheless, cytopathologic results were significantly better with the Wilson-Cook needle.Diagnosis of pancreatic cancer by contrast-harmonic endoscopic ultrasound (EUS): complementary and not competitive with EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle biopsy of small solid pancreatic lesions using a 22-gauge needle with side fenestration.Early detection of small pancreatic cancer is important because expected survival is markedly better for tumors ≤ 2 cm. A new endoscopic ultrasound-(EUS) guided biopsy needle with side fenestration has been recently developed to enable fine-needle biopsy (FNB) under EUS guidance. The aim of this study was to evaluate the outcome of EUS-FNB using a 22-gauge ProCore needle in solid pancreatic lesions ≤ 2 cm, in terms of diagnostic accuracy and yield.From January 2011 to December 2012, all consecutive EUS-guided tissue sampling of small pancreatic lesions (≤ 2 cm) were performed using 22-gauge ProCore needles; the data of these patients were analyzed retrospectively.Sixty-eight patients with a mean age of 65.7 years were included. The mean lesion size was 16.5 mm (range 5-20). None of the patients developed complications. On pathological examination, the tissue retrieved was judged adequate in 58 out of 68 cases (85.3 %) and the presence of a tissue core was recorded in 36 out of 68 cases (52.9 %). The overall sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy were 80, 100, 100, 40, and 82 %, respectively.Our results suggested that EUS-FNB of small pancreatic lesions using a 22-gauge ProCore needle is effective and safe, and supports our hypothesis that EUS-FNB is highly useful in establishing the nature of small pancreatic lesions.Utility of endoscopic ultrasound, cytology and fluid carcinoembryonic antigen and CA 19-9 levels in pancreatic cystic lesions.To assess the diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS), fluid tumor markers and cytology in distinguishing benign from (pre)malignant pancreatic cystic lesions.46 consecutive patients, referred to a gastroenterologist and surgeon for a symptomatic or incidental pancreatic cyst, were reviewed. EUS, cytology, and carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and carbohydrate antigen (CA 19-9) levels were compared with the final diagnosis, based on surgical pathology and/or imaging follow-up of at least 12 mo. Cysts were classified as benign (pseudocyst, serous cystadenoma) or malignant/pre-malignant (mucinous cystic neoplasm). Receiver-operator characteristics (ROC) curve analysis was performed.The mean age was 56 years; 29% were male and median cyst diameter was 3 cm. Final outcome was obtained in 41 (89%) patients. Twenty-three (56%) of these 41 had surgical pathology. Twenty-three (56%) had benign lesions and 18 (44%) had malignant/pre-malignant lesions. Sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive value of EUS alone to distinguish benign from malignant/premalignant pancreatic cystic lesions were 50%, 56%, 36% and 54% and for cytology were 71%, 96%, 92% and 85%, respectively. The corresponding values for the ROC-derived ideal cutoffs were 75%, 90%, 75%, 90% for CA 19-9 (> 37 U/mL) and 70%, 85%, 79% and 78% for CEA (> 3.1 ng/mL). Subgroup analysis of those with surgical pathology yielded almost identical performance and cutoffs.Cytology and cyst fluid tumor marker analysis is a very useful tool in distinguishing benign from (pre)malignant pancreatic cystic lesions.Predictors of malignancy in patients with suspicious or indeterminate cytology on pancreatic endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration: a multivariate model.The aim of this study was to evaluate predictors of malignancy in pancreatic lesions with suspicious or indeterminate endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) cytology.Suspicious/indeterminate EUS-FNA cytology was identified from our database. Stable imaging, benign pathology, or survival for 12 months after EUS-FNA was considered benign. Diagnosis of malignancy was based on positive pathology, local invasion/metastasis on imaging, or death within 12 months from cancer-associated causes. Univariate analysis was performed to compare variables between benign and malignant lesions. Multivariate analysis (covariates: age [<70 or ≥70], appearance [solid/cystic], size [<20 or ≥20 mm], and serum CA19-9 [<40 or ≥40]) was performed using binary logistic regression.There were 81 patients with suspicious or indeterminate cytology. Final diagnosis was cancer in 55 (67.9%) of 81 (adenocarcinoma in 40/81 [49.4%], "other neoplasms" in 15/81 [18.5%]) and benign in 26 (32.1%) of 81. Univariate analysis revealed a difference in age, lesion size, solid/cystic characteristics, and serum CA 19-9 between benign and malignant lesions. Only elevated serum CA 19-9 was independently associated with a diagnosis of malignancy on multivariate analysis.Age, lesion size, and solid/cystic characteristics on EUS were not independently associated with cancer. Pancreatic lesions with suspicious/indeterminate cytology and elevated serum CA 19-9 should be considered as concerning for a malignant diagnosis.Endoscopic ultrasound guided aspiration cytology--a useful diagnostic tool.To evaluate the diagnostic utility of endoscopic ultrasound guided fine needle aspiration cytology in the diagnosis of mediastinal and abdominal lesions.Endoscopic ultrasound guided aspiration cytology was carried out on a total of 155 cases during the study period. The lesions were categorized according to the site of needle biopsy. Clinical impression and provisional diagnoses were compared with the final cytological diagnoses and the percentage of inadequate/non diagnostic smears was calculated.Out of 155 cases, 18 cases (11.5%) were reported as inadequate while a definite diagnosis was given in the remaining cases (88.5%). The mean patient age was 49 +/- 14.0 years. There were 105 (68%) males and 50 (32%) females. The most common site biopsied was mediastinal lymph nodes followed by pancreas. The most frequent diagnosis was adenocarcinoma mostly of pancreas followed by chronic granulomatous inflammation of mediastinal and abdominal lymph nodes. The average number of passes made was 3. The size of the lesions ranged from 0.6 cm to 25 cm with mean size of 3 cm as measured by endoscopic ultrasound probe.Endoscopic ultrasound guided aspiration cytology is a useful procedure in the evaluation of deep seated lesions of gastrointestinal tract (GIT), abdominal cavity and mediastinum.Contrast enhanced ultrasound and computer tomography diagnosis of solid and mixed pancreatic tumors - analysis of confounders.AIMS. The aim of this study was to evaluate the leading causes of discrepancies between imaging studies [contrast enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) and contrast enhanced computer tomography (CECT)] diagnosis and histology in patients presenting to a tertiary referral center with previously detected pancreatic masses by standard abdominal ultrasound. METHODS. We performed a prospective longitudinal observational study on 76 patients with pancreatic masses: 57 (75%) patients with solid pancreatic tumors and 19 (25%) patients with cystic and mixed pancreatic masses. For each tumor the CEUS and CECT features were analyzed and compared with the final histological diagnosis. RESULTS. Testing the performance of CEUS and CECT in evaluating the benign or malignant etiology of pancreatic masses, we obtained a probability of 82% for CEUS and of 83% for CECT, for a randomly selected individual from the pancreatic tumor group to have an imaging result indicating suspicion for malignancy. We obtained discordances with the histopathological diagnosis in 25 (32.89%) patients for CEUS and in 23 (30.26%) patients for CECT. In multiple regression analysis, two variables independently influenced the discordance between the two imaging methods and histological conclusion: enhancement pattern and tumor nature (solid vs. cystic). CONCLUSIONS.CEUS and CECT showed a good diagnostic performance in differentiating benign from malignant pancreatic tumors. Enhancement pattern and tumor nature (solid vs. cystic) are independent confounders between imaging and histological diagnosis.A prospective comparison of liquid-based cytology and traditional smear cytology in pancreatic endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration.To compare results of liquid-based cytology (LBC) and the conventional smear method (SMEAR) when performing endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) for lesions of suspected pancreatic malignancy without an on-site cytopathologist.Fifty-eight patients were prospectively enrolled between July and December 2009. Aspirates obtained from the first needle pass were randomized either to SMEAR or LBC. Another sample from the second needle pass was allocated to the other method. The rest of the aspirates from the third or later needle passes were used for SMEAR. Diagnostic accuracy was compared and related factors were pursued.Although both methods were 100% specific, LBC was inferior to SMEAR in terms of sensitivity, negative predictive value, and accuracy. However, LBC provided correct diagnoses in 2 out of 3 cases of false negatives for malignancy by SMEAR in which blood was highly contaminated. Although no factor was identified for LBC, low blood contamination and more than 3 needle passes were related with accurate diagnosis in SMEAR.LBC was less accurate than SMEAR when performing pancreatic EUS-FNA without an on-site cytopathologist. However, LBC might serve as a good complement to SMEAR if blood contamination is profound.Value of endoscopic ultrasound guided fine needle aspiration biopsy in the diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses.To assess the feasibility and diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound guided fine needle biopsy (EUS-FNAB) in patients with solid pancreatic masses.Ninety nine consecutive patients with pancreatic masses were studied. Histological findings obtained by EUS-FNAB were compared with the final diagnosis assessed by surgery, biopsy of other tumour site or at postmortem examination, or by using a combination of clinical course, imaging features, and tumour markers.EUS-FNAB was feasible in 90 patients (adenocarcinomas, n = 59; neuroendocrine tumours, n = 15; various neoplasms, n = 6; pancreatitis, n = 10), and analysable material was obtained in 73. Tumour size (>/= or < 25 mm in diameter) did not influence the ability to obtain informative biopsy samples. Diagnostic accuracy was 74.4% (adenocarcinomas, 81.4%; neuroendocrine tumours, 46.7%; other lesions, 75%; p<0.02). Overall, the diagnostic yield in all 99 patients was 68%. Successful biopsies were performed in six patients with portal hypertension. Minor complications (moderate bleeding or pain) occurred in 5% of cases.EUS-FNAB is a useful and safe method for the investigation of pancreatic masses, with a high feasibility rate even when lesions are small. Overall diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNAB seems to depend on the tumour type.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas (IPMN): clinico-pathological correlations and surgical indications.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) are increasingly recognized entities, whose management remains sometimes controversial, due to the high rate of benign lesions and on the other side to the good survival after resection of malignant ones.Retrospective analysis of a prospectively collected Western series of IPMN.Forty cases of IPMN were analysed (1992-2007). Most patients were symptomatic (72.5%); cholangio-MRI had the best diagnostic accuracy both for the tumour nature (83.3%) and for the presence of malignancy (57.1%). ERCP was done in 8 cases (20%), and the results were poor. Thirteen patients were treated by pancreatic resection and 27 were maintained in follow-up. Total pancreatectomy was performed in 46% of the cases; in situ and invasive carcinoma were recognized in 15.4% and 38.4% of the cases, respectively. The mean follow-up was 42 months (range 12-72). One only patients with nodal metastases died 16 months after the operation for disease progression, while 91.6% of the operated patients are disease free. Out of the 27 not resected patients, 2 out of 4 presenting a lesion at high risk for malignancy died, while the remaining are in good conditions and disease free, with a mean follow-up of 31 months.Therapeutic indication for IPMNs is mainly based upon radiological evaluation of the risk of malignancy. While the main duct tumours should be resected, preserving whenever possible a portion of the gland, the secondary ducts tumours may be maintained under observation, in absence of radiological elements of suspicion such as size larger than 3 cm, or a wall greater than 3 mm or nodules or papillae in the context of the cyst.Imaging features of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas in multi-detector row computed tomography.To retrospectively evaluate the imaging features of pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) in multi-detector row computed tomography (MDCT).A total of 20 patients with pathologically-confirmed intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) were included in this study. Axial MDCT images combined with CT angiography (CTA) and multiplanar volume reformations (MPVR) or curved reformations (CR) were preoperatively acquired. Two radiologists (Tan L and Wang DB) reviewed all the images in consensus using an interactive picture archiving and communication system. The disputes in readings were resolved through consultation with a third experienced radiologist (Chen KM). Finally, the findings and diagnoses were compared with the pathologic results.The pathological study revealed 12 malignant IPMNs and eight benign IPMNs. The diameters of the cystic lesions and main pancreatic ducts (MPDs) were significantly larger in malignant IPMNs compared with those of the benign IPMNs (P < 0.05). The combined-type IPMNs had a higher rate of malignancy than the other two types of IPMNs (P < 0.05). Tumors with mural nodules and thick septa had a significantly higher incidence of malignancy than tumors without these features (P < 0.05). Communication of side-branch IPMNs with the MPD was present in nine cases at pathologic examination. Seven of them were identified from CTA and MPVR or CR images. From comparison with the pathological diagnosis, the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of MDCT in characterizing the malignancy of IPMN of the pancreas were determined to be 100%, 87.5% and 95%, respectively.MDCT with CTA and MPVR or CR techniques can elucidate the imaging features of IPMNs and help predict the malignancy of these tumors.18F-FDG PET/MRI fusion in characterizing pancreatic tumors: comparison to PET/CT.To demonstrate that positron emission tomography (PET)/magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) fusion was feasible in characterizing pancreatic tumors (PTs), comparing MRI and computed tomography (CT) as mapping images for fusion with PET as well as fused PET/MRI and PET/CT.We retrospectively reviewed 47 sets of (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose ((18)F -FDG) PET/CT and MRI examinations to evaluate suspected or known pancreatic cancer. To assess the ability of mapping images for fusion with PET, CT (of PET/CT), T1- and T2-weighted (w) MR images (all non-contrast) were graded regarding the visibility of PT (5-point confidence scale). Fused PET/CT, PET/T1-w or T2-w MR images of the upper abdomen were evaluated to determine whether mapping images provided additional diagnostic information to PET alone (3-point scale). The overall quality of PET/CT or PET/MRI sets in diagnosis was also assessed (3-point scale). These PET/MRI-related scores were compared to PET/CT-related scores and the accuracy in characterizing PTs was compared.Forty-three PTs were visualized on CT or MRI, including 30 with abnormal FDG uptake and 13 without. The confidence score for the visibility of PT was significantly higher on T1-w MRI than CT. The scores for additional diagnostic information to PET and overall quality of each image set in diagnosis were significantly higher on the PET/T1-w MRI set than the PET/CT set. The diagnostic accuracy was higher on PET/T1-w or PET/T2-w MRI (93.0 and 90.7%, respectively) than PET/CT (88.4%), but statistical significance was not obtained.PET/MRI fusion, especially PET with T1-w MRI, was demonstrated to be superior to PET/CT in characterizing PTs, offering better mapping and fusion image quality.EUS elastography combined with the strain ratio of tissue elasticity for diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses.Recently, the usefulness of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) elastography has been reported for the diagnosis of pancreatic lesions. In the present study, we retrospectively assessed EUS elastography as a diagnostic tool by evaluating tissue elasticity distribution and elasticity semiquantification, using the strain ratio (SR) of tissue elasticity, in patients with pancreatic masses.One hundred and nine patients who underwent EUS elastography between September 2006 and May 2009 were retrospectively evaluated. The final diagnosis was chronic pancreatitis (CP) in 20 patients [6 with non-mass-forming pancreatitis, 7 with mass-forming pancreatitis (MFP), and 7 with autoimmune pancreatitis (AIP)], pancreatic cancer (PC) in 72, pancreatic neuroendocrine tumor (PNET) in 9, and normal pancreas in 8. The tissue elasticity distribution calculation was performed in real time, and the results were represented in color in fundamental B-mode imaging. In addition, we performed quantification using the SR (non-mass area/mass area).Elastography for all PC patients showed intense blue coloration, indicating malignant lesions. In contrast, MFP presented with a mixed coloration pattern of green, yellow, and low-intensity blue. Normal controls showed an even distribution of green to red. The mean SR was 23.66 ± 12.65 for MFP and 39.08 ± 20.54 for PC (P < 0.05).Endoscopic ultrasound elastography is a promising diagnostic tool for defining the tissue characteristics of pancreatic masses. In addition, semiquantitative analysis of elasticity using the SR may allow the differentiation of MFP from PC.Diagnostic efficacy of the cell block method in comparison with smear cytology of tissue samples obtained by endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration.The diagnostic efficacy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) cytology may vary greatly depending on the treatment of the samples obtained and the level of proficiency of the cytopathologist or cytoscreener.We prospectively evaluated the diagnostic efficacy of the cell block (CB) method and that of smear cytology using tissue samples obtained in the same needle pass at EUS-FNA in 33 patients with pancreatic tumors, abdominal tumors or swollen lymph nodes. An average of 3.1 passes were applied during the procedure without affirmation by rapid cytology. About half of the material obtained by each single pass was subjected to smear cytology, while the other half was evaluated by the CB method. Four to 12 glass slides were prepared for both Papanicolaou stain and Giemsa stain. The CB sections were prepared using the sodium alginate method and subjected to HE, PAS-AB and immunohistochemical stains. Two pathologists independently made cytological and histological diagnoses. The final diagnosis was based on integration of cytohistological findings, diagnostic imaging, and clinical course.The diagnostic accuracy of the CB method and that of smear cytology were 93.9 and 60.6%, respectively (p = 0.003), and their respective sensitivities were 92.0 and 60.0% (p = 0.02). It was easier to make a definite diagnosis of not only malignancies but also benign conditions by the CB method than by the smear method.The CB method with immunostaining showed a higher diagnostic yield than smear cytology in patients who had undergone EUS-FNA without rapid on-site cytology.Prospective assessment of diagnostic utility and complications of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration. Results from a newly developed academic endoscopic ultrasound program.It is currently unknown whether a newly developed endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) program can produce results similar to those of experienced EUS centers. We therefore prospectively evaluated the diagnostic accuracy and major complications of EUS-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in a newly developed EUS program.All procedures were performed by a single endosonographer in the presence of a cytopathologist. Reference standard for classification of final disease included: surgical resection, death from disease progression and repeat radiologic and/or clinical follow-up. Major complications were defined as oversedation, and those that resulted in a physician or emergency department visits, hospitalization, or death.540 patients (median age 63 years, 77% white) underwent EUS-FNAs of 656 lesions: lymph nodes (LNs, n = 248), solid pancreatic masses (SPMs, n = 229), cystic pancreatic masses (CPM, n = 57), mural lesions (n = 41), bile duct/gallbladder (n = 28), liver (n = 17), mediastinum/lung (n = 17), adrenal (n = 15), spleen (n = 3) and kidney (n = 1). SPMs and bile duct/gallbladder lesions were more likely to have suspicious/atypical cytology when compared to other lesions (8.7 vs. 4.6%; p = 0.04) and required more passes to achieve a tissue diagnosis (p < 0.001). The overall sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV and accuracy of EUS-FNA was 91.7, 97.1, 98.1, 87.7 and 93.8%, respectively. Six patients (1.1%) (95% CI 0.4-2.4) experienced a major complication. One patient died shortly after the procedure due to preexisting pulmonary embolus (0.18%).EUS-FNA is highly accurate and safe in sampling a variety of peri-intestinal organs and lymph nodes. With adequate third-tier training, a newly developed program can produce results similar to those from expert EUS centers.Intravoxel incoherent motion MRI for the differentiation between mass forming chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma.To determine which of the quantitative parameters obtained from intravoxel incoherent motion diffusion weighted imaging (DWI) is the most significant for the differentiation between pancreatic carcinoma and mass-forming chronic pancreatitis.Twenty-nine patients with pancreatic masses were included, 9 proved to have a mass-forming pancreatitis and 20 had a pancreatic carcinoma. The patients were studied using intravoxel incoherent motion DWI with 11 b-values and the apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC), the true diffusion constant (D) and the perfusion fraction (f) were calculated. The diagnostic strength of the parameters was evaluated using receiver operating characteristic analysis.The ADC in chronic pancreatitis was higher than in pancreatic carcinoma with significant differences at b = 50, 75, 100, 150, 200, 300 s/mm (ADC50 = 3.17 ± 0.67 vs. 2.55 ± 1.09, ADC75 = 2.46 ± 0.4 vs. 1.93 ± 0.52, ADC100 = 2.28 ± 0.48 vs. 1.73 ± 0.45, ADC150 = 1.97 ± 0.26 vs. 1.63 ± 0.40, ADC200 = 1.98 ± 0.24 vs. 1.53 ± 0.28, and ADC300 = 1.76 ± 0.19 vs. 1.46 ± 0.31 × 10(-3) mm2/s). No significant differences were found at b = 25, 400, 600, and 800 s/mm (ADC25 = 4.69 ± 0.65 vs. 4.04 ± 1.35, ADC400 = 1.57 ± 0.21 vs. 1.37 ± 0.30, ADC600 = 1.38 ± 0.18 vs. 1.24 ± 0.25, and ADC800 = 1.27 ± 0.10 vs. 1.18 ± 0.19 × 10(-3) mm2/s) nor using ADCtot (1.42 ± 0.23 vs. 1.28 ± 0.12 × 10(-3) mm2/s). The perfusion fraction f was significantly higher in pancreatitis compared with pancreatic carcinoma (16.3% ± 5.30% vs. 8.2% ± 4.00%, P = 0.0001). There was no significant difference between groups for D (1.07 ± 0.224 × 10(-3) mm2/s for chronic pancreatitis and 1.09 ± 0.3 × 10(-3) mm2/s for pancreatic carcinoma, P = 0.66). For f, the highest area under the curve (0.894) and combined sensitivity (80%) and specificity (89.9%) were found.There were significant differences in ADC50-300 between chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma. Because D is not significantly different between groups, differences in ADC can be attributed mainly to differences in perfusion. The perfusion fraction f proved to be the superior DWI-derived parameter for differentiation of mass-forming pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma.Utility of a repeated EUS at a tertiary-referral center.The utility of a repeated EUS by experts is not known.To define the utility of a repeated EUS for the same indication.A retrospective case series.Tertiary-referral hospital in Indianapolis, Indiana.Consecutive subjects, with and without cancer, who, between January 2000 and September 2006, underwent an initial EUS elsewhere within 6 and 12 weeks of a repeated EUS at our hospital.A repeated EUS.Clinical impact of a repeated EUS.Of 8936 EUS examinations, 73 repeated procedures (0.8%) were identified, and 24 were excluded. The 49 initial EUS procedures (26 men, median age 59 years) were done in Indiana (n = 44) or another state (n = 5) by one of 15 physicians in private practice (n = 48) or at a teaching hospital (n = 1). An EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) was performed during an initial EUS in 21 patients (no biopsy diagnostic for cancer) and was not attempted in 14 patients. The principle indication for a repeated EUS (n = 35) was for an EUS-FNA after the initial tissue sampling was benign, nondiagnostic, or not done. A second EUS had no clinical impact in 18 patients (37%). In the remaining 31 patients (63%), a repeated EUS provided a new or changed clinical diagnosis (n = 12), the initial diagnosis of primary pancreatic cancer (n = 5) or GI stromal tumor (GIST) (n = 1) after a previous nondiagnostic biopsy; or the initial diagnosis of primary (n = 4) or metastatic (n = 2) pancreatic cancer, metastatic esophageal cancer (n = 1), hilar cholangiocarcinoma (n = 1), GIST (n = 1), or pancreatic neuroendocrine tumor (n = 1), or an initial aspiration of a pancreatic cyst (n = 3) after a previous EUS-FNA was not able to be performed.A retrospective design; a small number of nonpancreatic indications.In this study, a repeated EUS at a tertiary-referral center had a clinical impact in 63% of patients when performed by experts for a similar clinical indication.Pancreatic cystadenoma and cystadenocarcinoma: diagnostic value of preoperative morphological investigations.To find out whether preoperative morphological investigations differentiated between serous cystadenoma, mucinous cystadenoma, and cystadenocarcinoma of the pancreas.Multicentre retrospective study of casenotes.24 Adult gastroenterology units (1 private, 8 non-university teaching hospitals, and 15 university teaching hospitals) in France.71 Patients with 74 tumours diagnosed between January 1978 and January 1988.Correlation between histological diagnosis and results of ultrasonography, computed tomography, angiography, and magnetic resonance imaging.6 of 59 ultrasound scans (10%), 7 of 52 computed tomograms (13%), 0 of 18 angiograms, 1 of 12 pancreatograms (8%), and the single magnetic resonance scan correctly diagnosed the type of pancreatic tumour. Ultrasonography or computed tomography, or both, diagnosed cystadenoma (but not the type) in 26 cases (37%). "Pseudocyst" was diagnosed in 14 cases (20%).In contrast to other studies, our results indicate that preoperative morphological investigations are of limited value in diagnosing cystadenomas of the pancreas. In particular, their ability to differentiate between different types of cystadenoma is poor.FDG-PET scanning in the diagnosis of gastrointestinal cancers.This review deals with the current, well-established indications for two-(18F)-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) scanning in patients with gastrointestinal cancers. FDG-PET is a non-invasive, functional imaging technique. FDG exploits the native glucose transporter to enter the cell. Since many tumours have enhanced glucose uptake, FDG is readily accumulated in malignant cells and can be detected by a PET camera. FDG-PET has been established as an important diagnostic tool in clinical oncology. This review deals with the current, well-established indications for FDG-PET scanning in patients with gastrointestinal cancers. In the current practice, FDG-PET is most commonly used to stage oesophageal carcinoma, to detect and stage recurrence of colorectal carcinoma and to differentiate between benign and malignant pancreatic lesions. The benefit of FDG-PET scanning in patients with oesophagus carcinoma is best established in stage IV disease, as the diagnostic accuracy to detect metastatic disease is higher compared to the combination of computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS). In patients with a history of colorectal carcinoma, FDG-PET scanning is particularly effective in diagnosing recurrent disease, especially in those with a rising carcinoembryonic antigen without a suspect lesion on conventional imaging. Large series have indicated that the sensitivity and specificity for detecting recurrent colorectal carcinoma are in the range of 87%-100% and 66%-100%, respectively. Equally, FDG-PET has a high sensitivity (68%-96%) and specificity (78%-100%) in detecting pancreatic carcinoma in patients with a suspicious-looking pancreatic mass on CT scan. Lastly, we focus on the use of FDG-PET as a modality for early monitoring of treatment response in patients with gastrointestinal stromal cell tumours. Without doubt, future developments will further establish the diagnostic role of the FDG-PET scan in the care of patients with gastrointestinal cancers.Evaluation of cyst fluid CEA analysis in the diagnosis of mucinous cysts of the pancreas.Although cyst fluid carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA; > 192 ng/ml) is the preferred test for identifying mucinous pancreatic cysts, the data are more robust for mucinous cystic neoplasms (MCN) than for intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMN). The role of cyst fluid CEA as a marker for either malignancy or malignant progression is uncertain.All patients with pancreatic cysts who had undergone endoscopic ultrasound with cyst fluid CEA measurement between 2001 and 2009 were identified. Patient outcomes and pathology from operative resections were recorded.Two hundred sixty-seven patients were identified; pathological diagnosis was obtained in 97. Mucinous cysts were identified in 66 of 97 (68%): benign IPMN, n = 42; malignant IPMN, n = 10; benign MCN, n = 12; malignant MCN, n = 2. CEA > 192 ng/mL had a sensitivity and specificity of 73% and 65% for identifying mucinous cysts; cyst fluid CEA was not associated with malignancy (p = 0.85). One hundred seventy-eight patients were managed with an initial non-operative strategy. Eight (4%) developed radiographic changes necessitating surgery; pathology demonstrated seven benign mucinous cysts and one retention cyst. CEA was not associated with radiographic progression (p = 0.37).Cyst fluid CEA is a useful test for identifying mucinous cysts, including MCN and IPMN. In mucinous cysts, cyst fluid CEA is not associated with malignancy or radiographic progression.Intraductal papillary mucinous tumour of the pancreas: differentiation of malignancy and benignancy by CT.To retrospectively identify signs predictive of malignant intraductal papillary mucinous tumour (IPMT) of the pancreas on computed tomography (CT) images.Thirty-four benign and 21 malignant pancreatic IPMTs were evaluated. Preoperative helical CT images in these 55 cases of pathologically proven pancreatic IPMT were reviewed by two radiologists unaware of the histological grading. Tumour morphological types, locations, numbers and sizes of cystic lesions, maximum main pancreatic duct diameters, the presence of septa, mural nodule, wall thickening, and calcification in cysts, communication with the main pancreatic duct, peripancreatic haziness, protrusion of duodenal papilla, pancreatic atrophy, lymphadenopathy and distant metastasis were analysed using univariate and multivariate analysis.Main duct IPMTs were more likely to be malignant (71%) than branch duct (23%) or combined type IPMTs (28%; p=0.002). Among the branch duct type and combined types, large cystic lesion (p=0.018), the presence of a mural nodule (p=0.018), a thickened wall (p=0.009), and peripancreatic haziness (p=0.039) were found to predict malignancy.CT is helpful in the preoperative differentiation of malignant and benign pancreatic IPMT. The presence of a dilated main pancreatic duct, mural nodules, thickened wall and peripancreatic haziness may be used as independent predictive signs of malignancy.Usefulness of multidetector computed tomography for detecting protruding lesions in intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas in comparison with single-detector computed tomography and endoscopic ultrasonography.To retrospectively evaluate the usefulness of multidetector computed tomography (MDCT) with multiplanar reformations (MPRs) and curved planar reformations (CPRs) for detecting protruding lesions in intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas (IPMNs) as compared with single-detector CT (SDCT) and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS).Eighty-six patients with IPMNs were imaged either with SDCT (n = 52) or MDCT with MPRs/CPRs and EUS (n = 34). The diagnostic accuracy of each imaging modality for identifying protruding lesions was compared with histological samples.Among the patients in whom protruding lesions were histopathologically identified, the lesions were detected in 9 of the 33 patients subjected to SDCT (51.9% accuracy), in 17 of the 25 patients subjected to MDCT with MPRs and CPRs (76.5% accuracy), and in 21 of the 25 patients subjected to EUS (70.6% accuracy). Thus, significant difference was observed between MDCT and SDCT regarding accuracy (P < 0.05); however, no significant difference was seen between MDCT and EUS. Protruding lesions of less than 10 mm in height were better visualized with MDCT (53.3%) than with SDCT (13.0%; P < 0.05).Multidetector computed tomography proved more useful than SDCT and equivalent to EUS in detecting protruding lesions in IPMNs.Pancreatic adenocarcinoma versus chronic pancreatitis: differentiation with triple-phase helical CT.Chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic adenocarcinoma often show similar clinical and imaging appearances. This study aims to differentiate chronic pancreatitis from pancreatic adenocarcinoma by defining enhancement patterns in both pathologic conditions during triple-phase helical CT.The study included 42 patients with chronic pancreatitis and 85 patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma. CT images obtained according to protocol A (scan delays, 30, 60, and 150 s; 300 mg I/mL contrast material) or protocol B (scan delays, 40, 70, and 150 s; 370 mg I/mL contrast material) were retrospectively evaluated.Mean contrast enhancement value of normal pancreas peaked in the first phase (early-washout pattern) while that of chronic pancreatitis peaked in the second phase (delayed-washout pattern), and that of pancreatic adenocarcinoma gradually rose (increasing pattern) in both protocols. Diagnostic indices for pancreatic adenocarcinoma were 82.4% and 94.1% for sensitivity, 83% and 83% for specificity, 82.7% and 90.4% for accuracy in protocols A and B, respectively, when differentiation between chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic adenocarcinoma was performed based on time-attenuation curve patterns.Our results indicate that time attenuation curves obtained from triple-phase helical CT in protocol B provide useful information in differentiating chronic pancreatitis from pancreatic adenocarcinoma.MDCT imaging findings for characterization pancreatic cystic lesion: differentiation between benign and malignant pattern.The purpose of the present study was to determine the characteristic imaging findings for diagnosis of the benign or malignant nature of pancreatic cystic lesions by 64 slice multidetector computed tomography (MDCT) for further investigation or treatment.A retrospective study was performed in 33 patients with pancreatic cystic lesion who underwent 64 slice MDCT to characterize and establish the diagnosis. The patients were enrolled between January 2004 and March 2009. The MDCT scan of abdomen from patients with pancreatic cystic lesion was retrospectively evaluated by two gastrointestinal radiologists without knowledge of the patient's history, clinical data, and final diagnosis. Sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, PPV, and NPV of CT scan for discriminate benign and malignant pancreatic cystic lesion were calculated. Weighted-kappa statistics were used to estimate agreement between readers.Thirty-three patients with pancreatic cystic lesion were included in the present study. Benign pancreatic cystic lesion are pancreatic pseudocyst (n = 16), serous cystadenoma (n = 4) and benign intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms IPMN (n = 2). Premalignant and malignant pancreatic cystic tumor are mucinous cystic tumor (n = 5) and include solid pseudopapillary epithelial neoplasm of pancreas (n = 3) and malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms IPMN (n = 3). The final diagnosis was established either by pathological diagnosis (20 patients), EUS with FNA (11 patients) or F/U clinical and imaging findings (2 patients). Pseudopod sign is a helpful finding for diagnosis pancreatic pseudocyst (3/16) and not observed in other types pancreatic cystic lesions. Type of cyst (unilocular, multilocular microcystic, multilocular macrocystic and solid component) is the only finding that has statistical significance for differentiating between the benign and malignant groups (p < 0.005). The overall sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of 64-slice MDCT to discriminate benign and malignant pancreatic cystic lesion were 36.3%, 100% and 78.8%, respectively. In addition, the PPV and NPV were 100% and 75.9%, respectively.The 64 sliced MDCT is a noninvasive method that can be used for discriminating between benign and malignant pancreatic cystic lesions, which is an important finding for further investigation and proper treatment.[Fine needle aspiration of pancreatic masses. A study of 81 cases].Study of 81 cases. Fine Needle Aspiration Biopsy (FNAB) was performed under computerized thomography scan (CT) in 81 patients with documented pancreatic mass (54 with neoplasia and 27 with chronic pancreatitis). This procedure, when associated to the immediate cytological evaluation of the adequacy of the smears, permits to obtain 100% in sensibility, specificity and predictive value of positive cases. These results and the study of the literature confirm CT-guided FNAB of the pancreas as the procedure of choice to resolve problems of differential diagnosis in pancreatic masses.Impact of FDG-PET/MRI image fusion on the detection of pancreatic cancer.This study assessed the value of image fusion with (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in patients suspected of having pancreatic cancer.32 patients (12 women, 20 men; age 24-79 years; mean 56.6 years) were included. All patients underwent whole-body FDG-PET examinations and contrast-enhanced MRI. Image fusion used a semiautomatic voxel-based algorithm. Separate reading, side-by-side analysis and evaluation of fused PET/MRI images were performed. Results were correlated to histopathology (n = 30), or clinical follow-up (n = 2).15/32 patients had pancreas cancer and 17/32 patients benign disease. The sensitivity and specificity for cancer detection by FDG-PET were 93 and 41% for visual and 86 and 58% for semiquantitative analysis whereas MRI achieved 100 and 76% respectively. Topographical assignment of PET foci by image fusion was superior to side-by-side analysis in 11/39 (28%) foci (in 8/32 patients). However, a true impact on therapeutic strategy was observed only in 1/8 patients as the presence of multiple metastases, irresectable primaries or medical reasons for inoperability prevented a curative setting.Compared to side-by-side analysis, PET/MRI image fusion improves the anatomical assignment and interpretation of FDG foci. The therapeutic benefit for the patient however is limited in patients with multiple lesions or incurable primaries.Comparison of MRI and endoscopic ultrasound in the characterization of pancreatic cystic lesions.The purpose of this study was to compare the diagnostic performance of MRI and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) for the characterization of cystic pancreatic lesions and prediction of malignancy.Fifty patients (24 women and 26 men; average age, 57 years) underwent both MRI and EUS. All pancreatic lesions (21 cystic and 29 solid lesions) were proven by histopathologic analysis. Two radiologists retrospectively examined MR images, and a single gastroenterologist reviewed EUS images. The MRI and EUS characterizations of morphologic features of the cystic lesions and predictions of malignancy were evaluated. The prediction of malignancy was done by receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis.There was no difference between the ability of MRI and EUS to correctly classify lesions as cystic or solid (accuracy, 90-98% vs 88%; p > 0.05). There was no difference between the sensitivity of MRI and EUS for the characterization of septa (94.4% for MRI vs 77.8% for EUS), mural nodule (66.7-58.3% for MRI vs 58.3% for EUS), main pancreatic duct dilatation (92.9-85.7% for MRI vs 85.7% for EUS), and communication with main pancreatic duct (100% for MRI vs 88.9% for EUS). The area under ROC curve values for predicting malignancy showed no statistical significance (0.755-0.774 for MRI vs 0.769 for EUS; p > 0.894).MRI and EUS are comparable in the characterization of cystic pancreatic lesions and prediction of malignancy.PDX-1 mRNA expression in endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle cytoaspirate: perspectives in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration is routinely used in the diagnostic work up of pancreatic cancer but has a low sensitivity. Studies showed that Pancreatic Duodenal Homeobox-1 (PDX-1) is expressed in pancreatic cancer, which is associated with a worse prognosis. We aimed to verify whether the assessment of PDX-1 in endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration samples may be helpful for the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.mRNA of 54 pancreatic cancer and 25 cystic lesions was extracted. PDX-1 expression was assessed by Real-Time PCR.In all but two patients with pancreatic cancer, PDX-1 was expressed and was found positive in 7 patients with pancreatic cancer in which cytology was negative. The positivity was associated with a probability of 0.98 (95% CI 0.90-1.00) of having cancer and the negativity with one of 0.08 (95% CI 0.01-0.27). The probability of cancer rose to 1.00 (95% CI 0.97-1.00) for patients positive to both PDX-1 and cytology and fell to 0.0 (95% CI 0.00-0.15) in patients negative for both.PDX-1mRNA is detectable in samples of pancreatic cancer. Its quantification may be helpful to improve the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.EUS and/or EUS-guided FNA in patients with CT and/or magnetic resonance imaging findings of enlarged pancreatic head or dilated pancreatic duct with or without a dilated common bile duct.Incidental findings of an enlarged head of pancreas (HOP) or dilated pancreatic duct (PD) with or without a dilated common bile duct (CBD) on CT or magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), in patients without obstructive jaundice, raise suspicion for a pancreatic neoplasm, but their clinical significance has not been established.To determine the prevalence of pancreatic neoplasm in this patient group.Retrospective analysis of a prospective database.Tertiary-care university hospital.Patients without obstructive jaundice at initial presentation, who underwent EUS and/or EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) for an abnormal CT and/or MRI with an enlarged HOP (n = 67) or a PD with or without a dilated CBD (n = 43). The final diagnosis was based on definitive cytology, surgical pathology, and clinical follow-up.An EUS examination was performed by using a radial echoendoscopy followed by a linear echoendoscopy, if a focal pancreatic lesion was identified. Fine-needle aspirates were stained with Diff-Quik and Papanicolaou's methods, and were immediately assessed by an attending cytopathologist.(1) The prevalence of pancreatic neoplasms and (2) performance characteristics of EUS-FNA for identifying malignant neoplasm, in this patient group.In 110 study patients, the final diagnosis included adenocarcinoma (n = 7), pancreatic intraepithelial neoplasia (n = 1), neuroendocrine tumor (n = 1), tumor metastasis (n = 1), and benign cyst (n = 3). Thirty-two patients had EUS evidence of chronic pancreatitis, and, in the remaining 65 patients, the pancreas was normal. The accuracy of EUS and EUS-FNA for diagnosing pancreatic neoplasm in these patients was 99.1%, with 88.8% sensitivity, 100% specificity, 99% negative predicative value, and 100% positive predictive value.A retrospective design and surgical confirmation in only a small number of study patients.A pancreatic neoplasm is seen in a clinically significant number of patients with "enlarged HOP" or "dilated PD with or without a dilated CBD" but without obstructive jaundice. EUS-FNA seems highly accurate for diagnosing pancreatic neoplasm in these patients.Accuracy of 18F-FDG PET/CT, Multidetector CT, and MR Imaging in the Diagnosis of Pancreatic Cysts: A Prospective Single-Center Study.Accurate diagnosis of the nature of pancreatic cysts is challenging but more important than ever, in part because of the increasing number of incidental cystic findings in the pancreas. Preliminary data suggest that (18)F-FDG PET/CT may have a significant influence on clinical decision making, although its role is still evolving. Our aim was to prospectively compare the accuracy of combined (18)F-FDG PET and contrast-enhanced CT ((18)F-FDG PET/CT), multidetector CT (MDCT), and MR imaging in differentiating malignant from benign pancreatic cysts.Thirty-one consecutive patients with pancreatic cysts were enrolled in the study. They underwent a protocol including (18)F-FDG PET/CT, MDCT, and MR imaging combined with MR cholangiopancreatography, all of which were evaluated in a masked manner. The findings were confirmed macroscopically at surgery or histopathologic analysis (n = 22) or at follow-up (n = 9).Of the 31 patients, 6 had malignant and 25 had benign lesions. The diagnostic accuracy was 94% for (18)F-FDG PET/CT, compared with 77% and 87% for MDCT (P < 0.05) and MR imaging, respectively. (18)F-FDG PET/CT had a negative predictive value of 100% and a positive predictive value of 75% for pancreatic cysts. The maximum standardized uptake value was significantly higher in malignant (7.4 ± 2.6) than in benign lesions (2.4 ± 0.8) (P < 0.05). When the maximum standardized uptake value was set at 3.6, the sensitivity and specificity were 100% and 88%, respectively. Furthermore, when compared with MDCT and MR imaging, respectively, (18)F-FDG PET/CT altered the clinical management of 5 and 3 patients, respectively.(18)F-FDG PET/CT is an accurate imaging modality for differentiating between benign and malignant pancreatic cysts. We recommend the use of (18)F-FDG PET/CT in the evaluation of diagnostically challenging pancreatic cysts.Differentiation between benign and malignant solid pseudopapillary tumor of the pancreas by MDCT.The purpose of this study was to determine if characteristic features on computed tomographic and (or) magnetic resonance imaging can differentiate benign and malignant solid pseudopapillary neoplasms (SPN).A total of 82 pathologically diagnosed SPN patients were included. CT and MRI were reviewed by 3 radiologists. Each tumor was analyzed through the clinical and imaging features.The highest occurrence of malignant SPN was observed in the group of patients (11-19 years old) followed by the group of patients (50-65 years old). When the tumor was located in the tail and the size was equal or larger than 6.0 cm, the positive and predictive value, the predictive value, sensitivity and specificity for a malignant SPN were 61.5%, 100%, 100% and 78.6%, respectively. Presence of complete encapsulation was more frequent in benign SPNs, but focal discontinuity in the malignant SPNs. Amorphous or scattered calcifications, all near-solid tumors and presence of upstream pancreatic ductal was found in the benign SPNs.A focal discontinuity of the capsule, large tumor size (>6.0 cm) and a pancreatic tail location may suggest malignancy of SPN. In contrast, tumors with amorphous or scattered calcifications, and all near-solid tumors may be indicative of benignancy. Age (less than 20 or more than 50 years old) is a possible risk factor of SPN. In comparison to other pancreatic neoplasms, such as ductal adenocarcinoma, a complete/incomplete pseudo-capsule, without upstream pancreatic duct dilatation and lymph nodes metastasis, and the presence of internal calcification and hemorrhage are more likely SPN.Clinical usefulness of KRAS mutational analysis in the diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma by means of endosonography-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy.To establish the usefulness of KRAS mutational analysis in the diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma by comparing this technique with conventional cytology in aspirates obtained by endosonography-guided fine-needle aspiration.All consecutive patients with pancreatic focal lesions undergoing endosonography-guided fine-needle aspiration were included. Samples were obtained with the concurrence of an attendant cytopathologist. Detection of codon-12 KRAS mutations was performed by the restriction fragment length polymorphism-polymerase chain reaction method. The effectiveness of conventional cytology, KRAS mutational analysis and their combination was established with respect to the definitive diagnosis. A cost-effectiveness analysis was also performed.Thirty-three patients had pancreatic adenocarcinoma and 24 patients had other lesions. A total of 136 samples was obtained. In patients in whom specimens were adequate (93% for cytology; 100% for mutational analysis), the specificity of both techniques was 100%, whereas the sensitivity favoured cytology (97% vs. 73%). When inadequate samples were considered as misdiagnosed, a combination of both techniques reached the highest overall accuracy (cytology, 91%; mutational analysis, 84%; combination of both, 98%).Cytology from aspirates obtained by endosonography-guided fine-needle aspiration is the most precise single technique for the diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma. However, when adequate specimens are not available to reach a cytological diagnosis, the addition of KRAS mutational analysis represents the best strategy.Determination of malignant and invasive predictors in branch duct type intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas: a suggested scoring formula.Prediction of malignancy or invasiveness of branch duct type intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (Br-IPMN) is difficult, and proper treatment strategy has not been well established. The authors investigated the characteristics of Br-IPMN and explored its malignancy or invasiveness predicting factors to suggest a scoring formula for predicting pathologic results. From 1994 to 2008, 237 patients who were diagnosed as Br-IPMN at 11 tertiary referral centers in Korea were retrospectively reviewed. The patients' mean age was 63.1 ± 9.2 yr. One hundred ninty-eight (83.5%) patients had nonmalignant IPMN (81 adenoma, 117 borderline atypia), and 39 (16.5%) had malignant IPMN (13 carcinoma in situ, 26 invasive carcinoma). Cyst size and mural nodule were malignancy determining factors by multivariate analysis. Elevated CEA, cyst size and mural nodule were factors determining invasiveness by multivariate analysis. Using the regression coefficient for significant predictors on multivariate analysis, we constructed a malignancy-predicting scoring formula: 22.4 (mural nodule [0 or 1]) + 0.5 (cyst size [mm]). In invasive IPMN, the formula was expressed as invasiveness-predicting score = 36.6 (mural nodule [0 or 1]) + 32.2 (elevated serum CEA [0 or 1]) + 0.6 (cyst size [mm]). Here we present a scoring formula for prediction of malignancy or invasiveness of Br-IPMN which can be used to determine a proper treatment strategy.Diagnostic performance of MRI and EUS in the differentiation of benign from malignant pancreatic cyst and cyst communication with the main duct.To assess the diagnostic ability of MRI and EUS for differentiating benign from malignant pancreatic cyst focusing on cyst communication with pancreatic duct.During 44 months, we performed MRI on 65 pancreatic cysts. Among them, 36 patients had confirmed cyst communication with duct by ERCP or surgery and 39 patients underwent EUS. Fifty-one had proven by surgery or aspiration. Among them, 36 had confirmed malignant cysts. Two radiologists independently graded cyst communication with duct and the likelihood of malignancy. When the readers' interpretations differed, third opinion was obtained. They also measured the size of cyst and main duct. The diagnostic performance was analyzed using the ROC curve. The Mann-Whitney U test and κ statistics were used to determine interobserver agreement.The Az of MRI and EUS for determining diagnostic performance regarding the cyst communication with duct, were 0.931 and 0.930, without statistically difference (p=0.6). Interobserver agreement was excellent (κ=0.81) on MRI and substantial (κ=0.69) on EUS. The Az of MRI and EUS for assessing diagnostic performance to differentiate malignant from benign cyst, was 0.902 and 0.923, without statistically difference (p=0.587). Interobserver agreement was excellent (κ=0.81) on MRI and moderate (κ=0.47) on EUS. The mean cyst size (3.98 cm+2.74: 3.17 cm+1.26, p=0.327) and the duct size (5.20 mm+3.22: 4.39 mm+4.12, p=0.227) showed no statistically difference between malignant and benign cysts.MRI and EUS can accurately assess pancreatic cyst communication with duct and are very useful for obtaining a differential diagnosis of malignant cyst versus benign pancreatic cyst.Diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer by endoscopic ultrasound.The aim of this study was to evaluate the usefulness of and problems associated with endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the diagnosis and pre-operative staging of pancreatic cancer. 96 patients suspected of having pancreatic cancer were pre-operatively examined with EUS. 37 of these 96 patients had pancreatic cancer. Results of the EUS imaging were compared with findings of histology and/or surgery, and the patient's clinical course. The sensitivity and specificity of EUS for diagnosing pancreatic cancer were 89% and 97%, respectively. EUS had excellent sensitivity regardless of tumour size or location. EUS was accurate (90%) in determining tumour size in pancreatic cancers less than 3 cm in maximum diameter, but not for tumours greater than 3 cm (30%). The accuracy of tumour (T) and nodal (N) staging were 64% and 50%, respectively. EUS is a promising method for the early diagnosis and pre-operative staging of pancreatic cancers, but requires further refinement.[Endosonographically controlled fine needle aspiration cytology--indications and results in routine diagnosis].The usefulness and clinical utility of routine EUS-guided fine needle aspiration cytology (FNA) in the diagnosis of lesions adjacent to the upper gastrointestinal tract was prospectively studied.EUS/FNA was performed in 122 patients for 125 lesions: Mediastinal lymph nodes (n = 56), pancreatic lesions (n = 45), paragastric masses (n = 12), submucosal tumors (n = 4) and small hepatic lesions (n = 2) were successfully punctured for cytological diagnosis.Adequate material was gained in 119 out of 125 punctures (95%). Overall sensitivity, specifity, positive and negative predictive value were 90%, 98%, 98% and 89%. Results of EUS/FNA in mediastinal lymph nodes were superior (95%, 100%, 100%, 90%) to those in pancreatic lesions (80%, 100%, 100%, 80%). In paragastric masses sensitivity was 100% whereas specifity was only 67%--due to one false-positive result. Out of four submucosal tumors diagnosis was revealed in three. Two liver metastasis were successfully punctured. 35 out of 56 mediastinal nodes showed malignancy. 27 metastases of lung-, three of gastric-, two of renal cancer and three Non-Hodgkins's lymphoma were diagnosed. The cytological results of 45 pancreatic lesions showed cancer in 19 and chronic inflammation in 21, two abscesses and three benign cysts. There were no complications. 37 patients were treated on outpatient's basis.EUS-guided FNA is an accurate and safe technique to sample cytology from lesions adjacent to the wall of the upper gastrointestinal tract. New indications may be established for the diagnosis of lung cancer or metastases of other spreading out into the mediastinum or the celiac axis.EUS-guided FNA diagnostic yield of malignancy in solid pancreatic masses: a benchmark for quality performance measurement.The diagnostic yield of EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) of solid pancreatic masses is a potential benchmark for EUS-FNA quality, because the majority of EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses should be diagnostic for malignancy.To determine the cytologic diagnostic rate of malignancy in EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses and to determine if variability exists among endoscopists and centers.Multicenter retrospective study.EUS centers provided cytology reports for all EUS-FNAs of solid, noncystic, >or=10-mm-diameter, solid pancreatic masses during a 1-year period.Cytology diagnostic of pancreatic malignancy.A total of 1075 patients underwent EUS-FNA at 21 centers (81% academic) with 41 endoscopists. The median number of EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses performed during the year per center was 46 (range, 4-177) and per endoscopist was 19 (range, 1-97). The mean mass dimensions were 32 x 27 mm, with 73% located in the head. The mean number of passes was 3.5. Of the centers, 90% used immediate cytologic evaluation. The overall diagnostic rate of malignancy was 71%, 95% confidence interval 0.69%-0.74%, with 5% suspicious for malignancy, 6% atypical cells, and 18% negative for malignancy. The median diagnostic rate per center was 78% (range, 39%-93%; 1st quartile, 61%) and per endoscopist was 75% (range, 0%-100%; 1st quartile, 52%).Retrospective study, participation bias, and varying chronic pancreatitis prevalence.(1) EUS-FNA cytology was diagnostic of malignancy in 71% of solid pancreatic masses and (2) endoscopists with a final cytologic diagnosis rate of malignancy for EUS-FNA of solid masses that was less than 52% were in the lowest quartile and should evaluate reasons for their low yield.Impact of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle biopsy for diagnosis of pancreatic masses.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of histological evaluation of pancreatic tissue samples obtained by a modified method for recovering and processing the endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) material in the differential diagnosis of pancreatic solid masses.Sixty-two consecutive patients with pancreatic masses were prospectively studied. EUS was performed by the linear scanning Pentax FG-38UX echoendoscope. Three FNAs (22G needle) were carried out during each procedure. The materials obtained with first and second punctures were processed for cytological study. Materials of the third puncture were recovered into 10% formol solution by careful injection of saline solution through the needle, and processed for histological study.Length of the core specimen obtained for histological analysis was 6.5 +/- 5.3 mm (range 1-22 mm). Cytological and histological samples were considered as adequate in 51 (82.3%) and 52 cases (83.9%), respectively. Overall sensitivity of both pancreatic cytology and histology for diagnosis of malignancy was 68.4%. Contrary to cytology, histology was able to diagnose tumours other than adenocarcinomas, and all cases of inflammatory masses. Combination of cytology and histology allowed obtaining an adequate sample in 56 cases (90.3%), with a global sensitivity of 84.21%, specificity of 100% and an overall accuracy of 90.32%. The complication rate was 1.6%.Adequate pancreatic core specimens for histological examination can be obtained by EUS-guided FNA. This technique is mainly useful for the diagnosis of different types of pancreatic tumours and evaluation of benign diseases.Characterization of focal pancreatic lesions using normalized apparent diffusion coefficient at 1.5-Tesla: preliminary experience.To compare the capabilities of apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC) and normalized ADC using the pancreatic parenchyma as reference organ in the characterization of focal pancreatic lesions.Thirty-six patients with focal pancreatic lesions (malignant, n=18; benign tumors, n=10; focal pancreatitis, n=8) underwent diffusion-weighted MR imaging (DWI) at 1.5-Tesla using 3 b values (b=0, 400, 800 s/mm(2)). Lesion ADC and normalized lesion ADC (defined as the ratio of lesion ADC to apparently normal adjacent pancreas) were compared between lesion types using nonparametric tests.Significant differences in ADC values were found between malignant (1.150 × 10(-3)mm(2)/s) and benign tumors (2.493 × 10(-3)mm(2)/s) (P=0.004) and between benign tumors and mass-forming pancreatitis (1.160 × 10(-3)mm(2)/s) (P=0.0005) but not between malignant tumors and mass-forming pancreatitis (P=0.1092). Using normalized ADC, significant differences were found between malignant tumors (0.933 × 10(-3)mm(2)/s), benign tumors (1.807 × 10(-3)mm(2)/s) and mass-forming pancreatitis (0.839 × 10(-3)mm(2)/s) (P<0.0001).Our preliminary results suggest that normalizing ADC of focal pancreatic lesions with ADC of apparently normal adjacent pancreatic parenchyma provides higher degrees of characterization of focal pancreatic lesions than the conventional ADC does.Cystic tumors of the pancreas: evaluation by ultrasonography and computed tomography.The personal series of 30 cystic tumors of the pancreas [12 serous cystic tumors (SCT) and 18 mucinous cystic tumors (MCT)] is presented. All neoplasms were evaluated with ultrasonography (US) 28 of 30 with computed tomography (CT); the tumoral histotype could be correctly defined in 73% of cases (seven of 12 SCT and 15 of 18 MCT). Percutaneous fine-needle aspiration (FNA) with diagnostic aims (preparation of cytological smears and/or biochemical assays) was performed in only 10 of 30 cases, yielding a 100% sensitivity; on the whole, the combined use of imaging modalities and FNA allowed correct characterization of the cystic tumors in 27 of 30 cases (90%). The usefulness of a precise diagnostic workup of these neoplasms is emphasized, due to their prognostic and therapeutic outcome.Surgical management of intraductal papillary mucinous tumor of the pancreas.Intraductal papillary mucinous tumor (IPMT) is a type of pancreatic cystic neoplasm. IPMT consists of intraductal papillary mucinous adenoma (benign IPMT) and intraductal papillary mucinous carcinoma (malignant IPMT). Preoperative diagnosis of malignancy is difficult; the invasiveness and metastatic character are not well known. The purpose of the study was to evaluate the optimal diagnostic and therapeutic strategy of IPMT.Medical charts of 38 patients with final diagnosis of IPMT in Kyoto University Hospital were retrospectively reviewed. Preoperative imaging, mode of operation, and clinical and histopathologic findings were analyzed.In 38 IPMTs, imaging of localization was correct in 82% by computed tomography, 90% by ultrasonography, 70% by endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, 100% by magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography, and 100% by endoscopic ultrasonography. Evaluation of malignancy by endoscopic ultrasonography resulted in sensitivity and specificity of 81% and 78%, respectively. Pylorus-preserving pancreaticoduodenectomy was preferably performed in 20 of 38 patients with IPMT. Twenty-two patients had histologically malignant disease. Half of them had an invasive component in the adjacent stroma. One case of malignant IPMT showed lymph node metastasis, and the patient had no recurrence after pancreaticoduodenectomy with regional lymphadenectomy. No case was diagnosed as margin positive; however, 27% showed a dysplasia with atypia in the epithelial cells of the cut edge of the pancreas. One patient with negative atypia at the cut edge of the pancreas developed a recurrent tumor in the remnant pancreas.The preoperative diagnosis of malignancy is difficult, and 50% of malignant IPMT showed an invasive component. Thus, radical resection of the pancreas with regional lymph node dissection should be the choice of treatment. Lymph node metastasis and intraductal distant invasion should be carefully managed in the surgical treatment of these lesions.Endosonographically guided transduodenal and transgastral fine-needle aspiration puncture of focal pancreatic lesions.Mass lesions of the pancreas can be clearly visualized by endoscopic ultrasonography. For the differentiation of benign from malignant mass lesions, however, cytological examination is still recommended. As transcutaneous fine-needle biopsies have a limited diagnostic value, we have evaluated the efficiency of transmural (trangastral, transduodenal) endosonographically guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-guided FNA) puncture for cytological confirmation of such pancreatic mass lesions. EUS-guided FNA puncture was performed in 11 patients with focal pancreatic solid lesions. In 4 patients a malignant mass lesion and in 2 patients a benign lesion were correctly identified by EUS-guided FNA puncture, while in 4 patients a false benign diagnosis was established and in 1 patient with a malignant mass lesion a sufficient cytological sample could not be obtained. Histological confirmation or rejection of the cytological diagnosis gained by EUS-guided FNA puncture was obtained in all patients by surgical biopsy or resection. It is concluded that transmural EUS-guided FNA puncture-with the application of a curved-array EUS transducer scanning parallel to the axis of the endoscope-is a new approach to the cytological diagnosis of pancreatic mass lesions. However, the of flexible puncture needles with a short needle tip-destined for multiple use-results in a considerable amount of false-negative diagnoses, as the needle tip frequently can only be advanced into the margin of the lesion. New prototypes of aspiration needles with an extending steel are presently under study for improved transmural EUS-guided FNA puncture.Main pancreatic duct intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms: accuracy of MR imaging in differentiation between benign and malignant tumors compared with histopathologic analysis.To retrospectively determine the accuracy of magnetic resonance (MR) imaging combined with MR cholangiopancreatography (CP) in differentiating benign from malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) involving the main pancreatic duct (MPD), with histopathologic analysis as the reference standard.The informed consent requirement was waived for this institutional review board-approved study. A total of 51 patients with histopathologically proved IPMNs (MPD IPMN, n = 29; mixed type IPMN, n = 22), underwent MR imaging, MR CP, and surgery, with a mean interval of 2.6 months between MR examination and surgery. Qualitative image analysis included assessment of the site of MPD dilatation (head of the pancreas, body and/or tail of the pancreas, or diffuse), presence or absence of duct wall nodules, and contrast enhancement of the MPD walls. Quantitative image analysis included measurement of the maximum diameter of the MPD. A comparison of adenomas and borderline IPMNs with cancerous IPMNs was performed with the Student t test or the Mann-Whitney U test for continuous variables.At histopathologic analysis, 27 IPMNs were classified as carcinomas; 13, as borderline tumors; and 11, as adenomas. MPD wall nodules were observed in 16 carcinomas involving the MPD and one adenoma or borderline neoplasm (P < .00001). Duct wall enhancement was observed in 20 MPD or mixed type carcinomas and five adenomas or borderline neoplasms (P = .0001). The median maximal diameter of the MPD was 18 mm in malignant MPD or mixed type IPMNs and 11 mm in benign borderline IPMNs (P = .038). No significant difference in the overall 5-year survival rate of patients with MPD IPMNs and those with mixed type IPMNs was observed (P = .813).Duct wall nodules and enhancement of the MPD walls are signs of malignant MPD or mixed type IPMNs.http://radiology.rsna.org/lookup/suppl/doi:10.1148/radiol.2531080604/-/DC1.A nine year retrospective analysis of resectable pancreatic cancer at the National Cancer Center Hospital in Tokyo: clues to diagnosis and diagnostic assessment.A nine year retrospective survey was carried out at the National Cancer Center Hospital in order to define the diagnostic clues and most suitable diagnostic assessment in resectable pancreatic cancer patients. Forty six cases were detected (27 pancreatic head cancers, 19 pancreatic body and tail cancers). There were 8, 26, 3 and 9 cases of t1, t2, t3 and t4 tumour size cancers, respectively. Abdominal pain and/or discomfort and back pain were the most common initial symptoms and chief complaints. Jaundice was present only in pancreatic head cancer cases. Abnormal GTT and CA 19-9 were the biochemical tests most commonly found abnormal, irrespective of tumour size. ERCP followed by US and CT were the most accurate technical tests. The best care toward the awareness of the initial symptoms needs to be followed, as a first choice, by a proper biochemical (CA 19-9, GTT) and technical (US, ERCP, CT) assessment in the hope of identifying those patients whose prognosis might be improved by an early operation.Non-operative differentiation between pancreatic cancer and chronic pancreatitis.Eighty-five of 186 patients investigated for suspected pancreatic cancer had an unequivocal final diagnosis of either pancreatic cancer (58 patients) or chronic pancreatitis (27 patients). They had been studied prospectively using ultrasonography, computerized tomography, radionuclide scanning, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), selective celiac and superior mesenteric angiography, duodenal drainage studies, cytologic studies, serum carcinoembryonic antigen assay, and pancreatic oncofetal antigen assay, The results were compared to determine which test would most frequently and reliably differentiate between pancreatic cancer and pancreatitis in a patient believed to have one or other disease. Criteria for interpreting results, first for highest rate of correct diagnoses, and second for highest accuracy were derived. Applying these criteria, ultrasonography achieved the highest rate of correct diagnoses (97% of patients diagnosed with 84% accuracy). ERCP, duodenal drainage studies, and cytology were the most accurate tests ((86% accuracy each test) but, with this accuracy, ERCP most frequently gave a diagnosis (diagnosis rate: ERCP--70%, duodenal drainage--32%, cytology--35%). The results suggest that ultrasonography is the best noninvasive test, and that a combination of ERCP, pancreatic juice assay and cytology in a single procedure may prove to be the best discriminating investigation.Neural network analysis of EUS images to differentiate between pancreatic malignancy and pancreatitis.The differentiation of focal pancreatitis and pancreatic adenocarcinoma is problematic and often resolved only by pancreaticoduodenectomy. EUS is the most sensitive imaging modality for both conditions, yet ultrasonic criteria for distinguishing the two have not been described and differentiation remains difficult. The aims of this study were to develop a self-learning computer program that can analyze EUS images and differentiate malignancy from pancreatitis, and to compare results obtained with this system with EUS interpretation by experienced endosonographers.Twenty-one patients with pancreatic cancer and 14 with focal pancreatitis were included. The diagnosis was confirmed histologically in all cases and each patient had undergone EUS. A single EUS image from each procedure was used for computer analysis. The results were compared with the EUS diagnosis reported at the actual procedure as well that of an endosonographer who reviewed videotapes of the procedures.The software program differentiated focal pancreatitis from malignancy with a maximal 89% accuracy. With sensitivity set at 100% for malignancy, the program was 50% specific and accuracy was 80%. Sensitivity and accuracy of the endosonographer's impression at the time of EUS were, respectively, 89% and 85%. A sensitivity of 73% and accuracy of 83% were achieved with blinded interpretation of EUS videotapes.Analysis of EUS images with computer software programs is feasible and compares favorably with human interpretation. The application of this technology to EUS and other imaging scenarios could be a useful adjunct to diagnostic endoscopy and warrants further investigation.Pancreatic cystic neoplasms: predictors of malignant behavior and management.Pancreatic cystic neoplasms are being increasingly identified with the widespread use of advanced imaging techniques. In the absence of a good radiologic or pathologic test to preoperatively determine the dianosis, clinical characteristics might be helpful. The objectives of this analysis were to define the incidence and predictors of malignancy in pancreatic cysts.Patients with true pancreatic cysts who were treated at our institution were included. Patients with documented pseudocysts were excluded. Demographic data, clinical manifestations, radiological, surgical, and pathological records of those patients were reviewed.Eighty-one patients had true pancreatic cyst. The mean age was 47 ± 15.5 years. There were 28.4% serous cystadenoma, 21% mucinous cystadenoma, 6.2% intraductal papillary tumors, 8.6% solid pseudopapillary tumors, 1.2% neuroendocrinal tumor, 3.7% ductal adenocarcinoma, and 30.9% mucinous cystadenocarcinoma. Malignancy was significantly associated with men (P = 0.04), older age (0.0001), cysts larger than 3 cm in diameter (P = 0.001), presence of solid component (P = 0.0001), and cyst wall thickening (P = 0.0001). The majority of patients with malignancy were symptomatic (26/28, 92.9%). The symptoms that correlated with malignancy included abdominal pain (P = 0.04) and weight loss (P = 0.0001). Surgical procedures were based on the location and extension of the lesion.The most common pancreatic cysts were serous and mucinous cysts. These tumors were more common in females. Old age, male gender, large tumor, presence of solid component, wall thickness, and presence of symptoms may predict malignancy in the cyst.Prediction of malignancy in cystic neoplasms of the pancreas: a population-based cohort study.Pancreatic cystic neoplasms (PCNs) are being detected with increased frequency. The aims of this study were to determine the incidence of malignancy and develop an imaging-based system for prediction of malignancy in PCN.We conducted a retrospective cohort study of patients ≥18 years of age with confirmed PCN from January 2005 to December 2010 in a community-based integrated care setting in Southern California. Patients with history of acute or chronic pancreatitis were excluded. Malignancy diagnosed within 3 months of cyst diagnosis was considered as pre-existing. Subsequent incidence of malignancy during surveillance was calculated based on person-time at risk. Age- and gender-adjusted standardized incidence ratio (SIR) was calculated with the non-cyst reference population. Recursive partitioning was used to develop a risk prediction model based on cyst imaging features.We identified 1,815 patients with confirmed PCN. A total of 53 (2.9%) of patients were diagnosed with cyst-related malignancy during the study period. The surveillance cohort consisted of 1,735 patients with median follow-up of 23.4 months. Incidence of malignancy was 0.4% per year during surveillance. The overall age- and gender-adjusted SIR for pancreatic malignancy was 35.0 (95% confidence level 26.6, 46.0). Using recursive partitioning, we stratified patients into low (<1%), intermediate (1-5%), and high (9-14%) risk of harboring malignant PCN based on four cross-sectional imaging features: size, pancreatic duct dilatation, septations with calcification as well as growth. Area under the receiver operator characteristic curve for the prediction model was 0.822 (training) and 0.808 (testing).Risk of pancreatic malignancy was lower than previous reports from surgical series but was still significantly higher than the reference population. A risk stratification system based on established imaging criteria may help guide future management decisions for patients with PCN.Contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration in the diagnosis of solid pancreatic lesions: a retrospective study.The negative predictive value of endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine needle aspiration for the diagnosis of solid pancreatic lesions remains low, and the biopsy specimens are sometimes inadequate for appropriate pathological diagnosis.To evaluate the usefulness of a novel method of contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration for the differential diagnosis and adequate sampling of solid pancreatic lesions.Patients with a diagnosis of solid pancreatic lesions who underwent fine-needle aspiration guided by contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasonography or by endoscopic ultrasonography from October 2010 to July 2013 were retrospectively identified and classified into the CH-EUS or EUS group, respectively. Surgical pathology and/or follow-up results were defined as the final diagnosis. Operating characteristics and adequacy of biopsy specimens by fine-needle aspiration were compared between the two groups.Operating characteristics for contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration in solid pancreatic lesions were as follows: area under the curve = 0.908, sensitivity = 81.6%, specificity = 100%, positive predictive value = 100%, negative predictive value = 74.1%, and accuracy = 87.9%. The percentage of adequate biopsy specimens in the CH-EUS group (96.6%) was greater than that in the EUS group (86.7%).Simultaneous contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasonography during fine-needle aspiration is useful for improving the diagnostic yield and adequate sampling of solid pancreatic lesions.Comparison between CT and CEUS in the diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma.The aim of this study is to compare CEUS and MDCT features of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma in relation to tumor size.All patients with pathological diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma and studied by means of CEUS and MDCT were enrolled in this study. Two radiologists evaluated tumor size, site and imaging appearance. Patients in which at least one method yielded a positive result were divided into 4 groups on the basis of lesion size. For each dimensional category, sensitivity of the two imaging methods was calculated and compared using McNemar test.One hundred thirty-three patients were included in this study. In 9 of 133 patients neither MDCT nor US/CEUS could identify the lesion, while in 9 of 133 patients only MDCT and in 13 of 133 only US/CEUS could identify the lesion. In the remaining 102 patients, both MDCT and US/CEUS yielded a positive result. US/CEUS sensitivity was 86.47% while MDCT sensitivity was 83.58%, with no statistically significant difference (p = 0.523). For lesions smaller than 2 cm US/CEUS had a 100% sensitivity, while MDCT had a 73.33% sensitivity with no statistically significant difference (p = 0.125). For lesions between 2.1 and 3 cm US/CEUS had a sensitivity of 95.35%, while MDCT had a sensitivity of 83.72% with no statistically significant difference (p = 0.180). For lesions between 3.1 and 4 cm, US/CEUS had a sensitivity of 87.88%, while MDCT had a sensitivity of 93.94% with no statistically significant difference (p = 0.688). For lesions larger than 4 cm US/CEUS, had a sensitivity of 90.91%, while MDCT had a sensitivity of 100% with no statistically significant difference (p = 0.250).US/CEUS sensitivity in diagnosing pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma is adequate and does not statistically differ from that of MDCT. US/CEUS sensitivity seems to be higher for small and medium lesions, while MDCT sensitivity is higher for large lesions. By combining both the imaging methods a higher accuracy in diagnosing pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma can be expected.Clinical usefulness of endoscopic ultrasonography with or without fine needle aspiration in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic carcinoma.The aims of this study was to show the accuracy and clinical usefulness of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) with EUS-guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer not obvious in computed tomographic (CT) scan abdomen imaging.Five male patients were evaluated; 4 presented with obstructive jaundice and 1 had unexplained loss of weight. The mean age was 66 years (range, 40 to 77). All had CT scan abdomen imaging which did not show any obvious pancreatic tumour. EUS with FNA was done for all cases when indicated. Surgical findings, if any, were obtained and compared to EUS findings.EUS easily detected the pancreatic tumour in all 5 cases. The tumour sizes detected ranged from 27 to 40 mm in diameter. These corresponded fairly accurately with that of surgical findings for all 3 who had surgery. EUS reported 3 cases with pathological lymph node involvement. All 5 cases were confirmed by FNA or surgery. EUS was also accurate in 4 cases, which reported the absence of portal vein or superior mesenteric vein invasion. Surgical documentation could not verify the fifth case. There were no complications at all from the EUS with/without FNA.This case series showed that EUS with/without FNA appears to be useful and safe in diagnosing and staging pancreatic head tumours not detectable by CT scanning.Is combined 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography superior to positron emission tomography or computed tomography alone for diagnosis, staging and restaging of pancreatic lesions?To evaluate whether combined 18F-FDG PET/CT has an additive value over 18F-FDG-PET or CT alone for diagnosis, staging and restaging of pancreatic lesions.Forty-six consecutive patients (23 women, 23 men; median age 62.5 years) underwent FDG-PET/CT. Analysis of PET, CT and fused PET/CT images was performed by 2 readers. Patients were divided into 2 groups: diagnosis and staging of primary tumours (n=34) and restaging: screening for recurrent or progressive pancreatic cancer (n=12). Accuracy analysis was performed lesion-by-lesion and patient-by-patient. Results were correlated with histopathology or clinical follow-up.Ninety-five foci were identified on PET, 140 lesions on CT and 119 on PET/CT. Thirty-four lesions were defined as 'definitely pathologic' and localised in pancreas, liver, lung or bone by all 3 techniques with equal certainty. In 11 patients malignancy was ruled out with the highest certainty by PET/CT. All 3 modalities made 2 false positive diagnoses of malignancy and missed metastases or vascular ingrowth in 7 patients. The accuracy rate of PET/CT (91.2%) for diagnosis of primary pancreatic lesions is higher compared to CT (88.2%) and PET alone (82.3%). Also for locoregional staging PET/CT has a higher accuracy rate (85.3%) compared to CT (83.8%) and PET (79.4%). When used for restaging, sensitivity (90.0%) and accuracy rate (91.6%) were highest for PET and PET/CT. CT had a lower sensitivity (80.0%).Topographical assignment of 'spots' with high FDG uptake is superior with PET/CT compared to PET alone. Fused PET/CT has a slightly higher sensitivity and accuracy rate for diagnosis and locoregional staging of primary pancreatic lesions compared to CT alone. PET and PET/CT perform equally well in screening for recurrent or progressive pancreatic cancer, with high accuracy. Due to its unlimited access, lower radiation exposure and cost, multidetector row CT remains the imaging technique of choice for diagnosis, staging and screening for recurrent pancreatic cancer.Fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography in pancreatic cancer: an unsolved problem.The aim of this study was to examine the significance and problems of 2-[fluorine-18]-2-deoxy-d-glucose (FDG) positron emission tomography (PET) in diagnosing pancreatic cancer and mass-forming pancreatitis (MFP). PET, X-ray computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance (MR) imaging were performed in 15 patients with pancreatic cancer and nine patients with MFP. The areas of the PET scan were determined according to the markers drawn on the patients at CT or MR imaging. Regions of interests (ROIs) were placed by reference to the CT or MR images corresponding to the PET images. Tissue metabolism was evaluated by the differential absorption ratio (DAR) at 50 min after intravenous injection of FDG [DAR = tissue tracer concentration/(injected dose/body weight). The DAR value differed significantly in pancreatic cancer (mean +/- SD, 4.64 +/- 1.94) and MFP (mean +/- SD, 2.84 +/- 2.22) (P < 0.05). In one false-negative case (mucinous adenocarcinoma), the tumour contained a small number of malignant cells. In one false-positive case, lymphocytes accumulated densely in the mass in the pancreatic head. Further studies are necessary to investigate the histopathological characteristics (especially the cellularity) and other factors affecting the FDG DAR on PET images.Comparison of the influence of plastic and fully covered metal biliary stents on the accuracy of EUS-FNA for the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.Prior studies have reported that the presence of prior biliary stent may interfere with EUS visualization of pancreatic tumors. We aimed to compare the influence of the biliary plastic and fully covered self-expanding metal stents (CSEMS) on the accuracy of EUS-FNA cytology in patients with solid pancreatic masses.We conducted a retrospective study evaluating 677 patients with solid pancreatic head/uncinate lesions and a previous biliary stent in whom EUS-FNA was performed. The patients were stratified into two groups: (1) those with a plastic stents and (2) those with CSEMS. Performance characteristics of EUS-FNA including the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy were compared between the two groups.The frequency of obtaining an adequate cytology by EUS-FNA was similar in both the CSEMS group and the plastic stent group (97 vs. 97.1 % respectively; p = 1.0). The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of EUS-FNA was not significantly different between patients with CSEMS and plastic stents (96.8, 100, 100 % and 97.3, 98, 99.8 %, respectively). The negative predictive value for EUS-FNA was lower in the CSEMS group compared to the plastic stent group (66.6 vs. 78.1 % respectively; p = 0.42). There was one false-positive cytology in the plastic stent group compared to none in the CSEMS group.In a retrospective cohort trial, EUS-FNA was found to be highly accurate and safe in diagnosing patients with suspected pancreatic cancer, even in the presence of a plastic or metallic biliary stent. The presence of a stent did not contribute to a higher false-positive cytology rate.Cystic neoplasms of the pancreas. A clinicopathologic study, including DNA flow cytometry.To review the classification, clinical behavior, and appropriate therapy for cystic neoplasms of the pancreas. We examined patient demographics, clinical parameters, preoperative imaging modalities, histologic findings, and tumor DNA content to determine which best predict outcome.Case series and survey of pathologic specimens.Tertiary care center.Twenty-two patients with cystic neoplasms of the pancreas treated at affiliates of Northwestern University Medical School, Chicago, Ill.Predictive value of preoperative testing, tumor DNA content, patient survival.In 20 patients undergoing computed tomographic scan, the tumor was visualized in every case. All other imaging studies evaluated were less likely to demonstrate the lesion. Eight of 10 patients with serous cystadenomas were alive with no evidence of disease at the time of this report; one patient was alive with local recurrence, and a second patient had died of unrelated causes. All patients with mucinous cystadenomas were alive with no evidence of disease. Three of seven patients with cystadenocarcinomas had aneuploid, high S-phase tumors, and one had a diploid, high S-phase tumor; all four died (mean survival, 4.8 months). Two patients with cystadenocarcinomas had diploid, low S-phase tumors; both were long-term survivors but died of their disease at 8.6 and 9.3 years.(1) Computed tomographic scan is the most valuable diagnostic imaging study for preoperative evaluation of these patients. (2) Precise preoperative determination of tumor type is not possible. (3) DNA flow cytometry may help identify patients with aggressive tumors who may benefit from adjuvant chemoradiation.The utility of UroVysion fluorescence in situ hybridization in pancreatic fine-needle aspiration samples directed and obtained by endoscopic ultrasonography.The diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma can be challenging for the pathologist. Endoscopic ultrasound-guided, fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) can be used to obtain samples of pancreatic masses. UroVysion fluorescence in situ hybridization (UFISH) has been reported to increase the sensitivity and to be very specific for the diagnosis of adenocarcinoma when combined with cytology in the diagnosis of biliary brushings and washings.To determine the sensitivity and specificity of UFISH on tissues obtained from pancreatic lesions suggestive of adenocarcinoma obtained by EUS-FNA, compared against fine-needle aspiration (FNA) results. Additionally, to use patient follow-up data to evaluate UFISH results in FNA samples that showed significant atypia but did not meet the criteria for malignancy.Sixty consecutive cases of pancreatic EUS-FNA from our institution submitted for UFISH testing.Polysomic UFISH has a sensitivity of 93% and a specificity of 100% when compared against FNA results. Follow-up studies showed that adding UFISH to FNA increased the sensitivity for patients with true-positive results from 83% to 94% and increased specificity from 85% to 100%. For 7 patients with suspicious FNA results who had sufficient follow-up, UFISH was 100% sensitive and 100% specific.UFISH can be used to confirm the diagnosis of malignancy in pancreatic adenocarcinoma. Because of the high specificity, polysomic UFISH may help establish a diagnosis of malignancy when the FNA features are suggestive of, but not conclusive for, malignancy. The most common cause for a false-negative UFISH result was insufficient numbers of malignant cells.High single-pass diagnostic yield of a new 25-gauge core biopsy needle for EUS-guided FNA biopsy in solid pancreatic lesions.Current limitations of EUS-guided FNA include the need for multiple passes and on-site cytology assessment and lack of core specimen. Recently, a new 25-gauge core biopsy needle (PC25) was developed to overcome these limitations.To determine the diagnostic yield of EUS-guided FNA aspiration biopsy (FNAB) when using the PC25 needle among patients with solid pancreatic lesions.Retrospective analysis.Academic tertiary referral center.Fifty consecutive patients with a solid pancreatic lesion underwent EUS-guided FNAB with PC25.EUS-guided FNAB with PC25.The primary outcome was the diagnostic yield in single and overall passes of EUS-guided FNAB when using the PC25 needle for pancreatic solid lesions.Cytologic analysis showed malignancy in 38 patients on the first pass, with a cumulative sensitivity of 83%, 91%, and 96% on passes 1, 2, and 3, respectively. Although visible core was reported in 46 patients (92%), histologic core was seen in 16 patients (32%). Histologic analysis showed malignancy in 29 patients on the first pass, with a cumulative sensitivity of 63% and 87% on pass 1 and passes 1 to 4, respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy in combined cytologic and histologic results were 85%, 100%, and 86% for single pass and 96%, 100%, and 96% on multiple passes, respectively. No complications were seen.A retrospective study design at a single center using a single arm.EUS-guided FNAB with the PC25 needle showed excellent single-pass and overall diagnostic yields. This needle appears to maintain a high cytologic yield, similar to standard 25-gauge FNA needles, while also providing some histologic core tissue.Impact of inconclusive endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration results in the management and outcome of patients with solid pancreatic masses.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) can be inconclusive in diagnosing solid pancreatic masses. The aim of the present study was to evaluate the impact of an inconclusive EUS-FNA in the management of patients with solid pancreatic masses.This is a retrospective analysis of a prospective database of patients with solid pancreatic masses referred for EUS-FNA between December 2011 and December 2013. Consecutive patients with inconclusive initial EUS-FNA were included. Demographic, clinical, procedural and outcome data were analyzed.Over the study period, 387 patients underwent EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses, of which 38 patients had inconclusive cytology. Of the 38 patients, 18 were categorized as atypical, two were categorized as indeterminate or suspicious for malignancy, and 18 were categorized as benign process. Subsequently, 24 (63.2%) patients achieved cytopathological diagnosis by repeat EUS-FNA (8), transcutaneous FNA (4) and surgery (12). Repeat EUS-FNA were done a median of 13 days after the index examination and resulted in conclusive diagnosis in 72.7% of cases. Five patients undergoing surgery were confirmed to have benign lesions. In 14 (36.8%) patients not receiving a positive cytopathological diagnosis, 11 were eventually confirmed to be malignant based on clinical outcome and imaging evidence.Inconclusive EUS-FNA could lead to unnecessary surgical procedures in patients with resectable solid pancreatic masses if no cytopathological diagnosis is obtained through either repeat or alternative diagnostic modalities. Repeat EUS-FNA provided a conclusive diagnosis in a majority of cases, and therefore should be strongly considered ahead of other modalities.Preliminary experience with a new cytology brush in EUS-guided FNA.Despite the high diagnostic yield of EUS-guided FNA, room for technical improvements remains. Recently, the EchoBrush (Cook Endoscopy, Winston-Salem, NC), a disposable cytologic brush, was introduced to the market. To date, only 1 study, limited to 10 pancreatic cyst cases, using this device has been published.To assess the diagnostic yield of the EchoBrush in a cohort of consecutive patients, irrespective of the target lesion.Case series.Tertiary care university hospital (Molinette Hospital, Turin, Italy).Thirty-nine consecutive patients (12 with solid pancreatic masses, 12 with pancreatic cysts, 7 with enlarged lymph nodes, and 8 with submucosal masses) were enrolled.The material collected with the EchoBrush and with a standard FNA needle was double-blind evaluated by 2 cytopathologists.Adequacy of the sample and sensitivity and specificity of the EchoBrush method.Adequate material for cytologic analysis was collected in 17 of 39 patients (43.6%) with a single pass of the EchoBrush. Results were better for pancreatic lesions (for solid and cystic lesions, the adequacy was 58.3% and 50%, respectively); adequacy was low (28.6% and 25%, respectively) for lymph nodes and submucosal masses. The overall sensitivity and specificity were 57.9% and 31.2%, respectively. There were no adverse events with the procedure.Preliminary study.This report suggests that the EchoBrush may provide adequate cellularity to diagnose solid and cystic pancreatic lesions. More extensive studies are needed to compare the EchoBrush and standard needles.Positron emission tomography/computed tomography influences on the management of resectable pancreatic cancer and its cost-effectiveness.We sought to determine the impact of positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) on the management of presumed resectable pancreatic cancer and to assess the cost of this new staging procedure.PET using 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) is increasingly used for the staging of pancreatic cancer, but anatomic information is limited. Integrated PET/CT enables optimal anatomic delineation of PET findings and identification of FDG-negative lesions on computed tomography (CT) images and might improve preoperative staging.Patients with suspected pancreatic cancer who had a PET/CT between June 2001 to April 2004 were entered into a prospective database. Routine staging included abdominal CT, chest x-ray, and CA 19-9 measurement. FDG-PET/CT was conducted according to a standardized protocol, and findings were confirmed by histology. Cost benefit analysis was performed based on charged cost of PET/CT and pancreatic resection and included the time frame of staging and surgery.Fifty-nine patients with a median age of 61 years (range, 40-80 years) were included in this analysis. Fifty-one patients had lesions in the head and 8 in the tail of the pancreas. The positive and negative predictive values for pancreatic cancer were 91% and 64%, respectively. PET/CT detected additional distant metastases in 5 and synchronous rectal cancer in 2 patients. PET/CT findings changed the management in 16% of patients with pancreatic cancer deemed resectable after routine staging (P = 0.031) and was cost saving.PET/CT represents an important staging procedure prior to pancreatic resection for cancer, since it significantly improves patient selection and is cost-effective.Value of EUS-FNA cytological preparations compared with cell block sections in the diagnosis of pancreatic solid tumours.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is performed in order to achieve a definite tissue diagnosis of pancreatic lesions. This in turn is a guide to the appropriate treatment for the patient. Tissue samples collected by the same needle for cytological preparations and cell block histological sections (often referred to as FNA-cytology and FNA-biopsy, respectively) are handled differently. The specific contribution of each of these tests was evaluated.One hundred and two consecutive patients underwent EUS-FNA while being investigated for pancreatic solid lesions. Diagnosis was made by cytology, cell block sections or both. The diagnosis was confirmed by clinical outcome.Male/female ratio was 61/41. Mean age was 65±12 years (range, 22-94). Mean lesion size was 3.1±1.8 cm (range, 0.6-10 cm); 68% were >2 cm and 75% were located in the pancreatic head. The average number of needle passes was two (range, 1-4 passes). Final tissue diagnosis was malignant in 66 (65%) patients. Sensitivity, specificity and accuracy were 73%, 94% and 81%, respectively, for cytology alone, and 63%, 100% and 78%, for cell blocks alone. Eighty-two patients (80%) had cytology and cell blocks, which matched in 64 (78%) patients. EUS-FNA results that relied on both techniques had 84% sensitivity, 94% specificity and 88% accuracy. Cytology revealed 13 malignancies not diagnosed on cell blocks, while cell blocks revealed five malignancies not diagnosed by cytology. Malignant lesions were more common in men; they were larger in size and located in the pancreatic head.EUS-FNA cytology was more sensitive than cell blocks but less specific for the diagnosis of solid pancreatic lesions. The two methods are complementary and implementing both improves the diagnostic value of EUS-FNA.A prospective comparison of current diagnostic tests for pancreatic cancer.In 70 patients suspected of having pancreatic cancer, we prospectively compared results of seven diagnostic tests. Subsequent exploration (of 68) and liver biopsy (of two) demonstrated pancreatic cancer in 30, pancreatitis in seven, nonpancreatic neoplasms in nine and nonpancreatic non-neoplastic disease (or no disease) in 24. For detection of pancreatic disease, the best tests were the pancreatic-function test (cholecystokinin-stimulated enzyme outputs) and ultrasonography. The pancreatic scan was nonspecific (P less than 0.001), and thermography was insensitive (P less than 0.001). Endoscopic retrograde pancreatography and arteriography were significantly more sensitive than cytologic study in diagnosis of pancreatic cancer (P less than 0.001). Therefore, when pancreatic cancer is suspected, abdominal ultrasound should be performed first, and if it is negative, a pancreatic-function test next. A positive result from either test warrants an endoscopic retrograde pancreatography for definitive diagnosis. This sequence identified 88 per cent of patients without pancreatic disease and 89 per cent with pancreatic cancer.Providing on-site diagnosis of malignancy on endoscopic-ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspirates: should it be done?Rapid and accurate tissue diagnosis for a deep-seated malignancy would allow treating physicians to provide disease-specific interventions and help patients make early informed management decisions. Providing on-site tissue diagnosis for fine-needle aspirate samples obtained with endosonography would help develop such efficient patient management issues. Here we report our experience of prospectively providing on-site diagnosis on 485 endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspirate samples.Four hundred eighty-five endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspirates from the pancreas (n= 305), lymph nodes (n = 91), biliary tree (n = 47), liver (n = 15), gastrointestinal tract (n = 19), and adrenal gland (n = 8) were reviewed. For all aspirates, the cytologic diagnoses, both preliminary and final, were categorized into the following: positive for malignancy, positive for neoplastic process, suspicious for malignancy, atypical cells, reactive process, and nondiagnostic.Of the 485 cases, 163 (33.6%) were diagnosed as benign, 43 (8.8%) as atypical, 21 (4.3%) as suspicious, 18 (3.7%) as positive for neoplasm, and 230 (47.4%) as malignant after final cytologic interpretation. A significantly (P < .001) higher degree of concordance was noted for unequivocal diagnosis of malignancy (196/198, 98.9%) vs nonmalignancy (200/250, 67.2%) between on-site and final cytologic diagnosis. Of the 52 discordant cases, 12 (2.6%) diagnoses were downgraded and 40 (8.9%) were upgraded from preliminary on-site diagnosis. Our overall sensitivity (87 vs 92), specificity (95% vs 100%), and accuracy (90% vs 94%) improved for final cytologic diagnosis.On-site diagnosis of malignancy could be used to initiate informed patient management decisions. Cases where a diagnosis of malignancy is not rendered at on-site interpretation need further cytologic evaluation.Incidental pancreatic cysts: natural history and diagnostic accuracy of a limited serial pancreatic cyst MRI protocol.To examine the natural history of incidentally detected pancreatic cysts and whether a simplified MRI protocol without gadolinium is adequate for lesion follow-up.Over a 10-year period, 301-patients with asymptomatic pancreatic cysts underwent follow-up (45 months ± 30). The magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) protocol included axial, coronal T2-weighted images, MR cholangiopancreatographic and fat suppressed T1-weighted sequences before and after gadolinium. Three radiologists independently reviewed the initial MRI, the follow-up studies using first only unenhanced images, then secondly gadolinium-enhanced-sequences. Lesion changes during follow-up were recorded and the added value of gadolinium-enhanced sequences was determined by classifying the lesions into risk categories.Three hundred and one patients (1,174 cysts) constituted the study population. Only 35/301 patients (12 %) showed significant lesion change on follow-up. Using multivariate analysis the only independent factor of lesion growth (OR = 2.4; 95 % CI, 1.7-3.3; P < 0.001) and mural nodule development (OR = 1.9; 95 % CI, 1.1-3.4, P = 0.03) during follow-up was initial lesion size. No patient with a lesion initial size less than 2 cm developed cancer during follow-up. Intra-observer agreement with and without gadolinium enhancement ranged from 0.86 to 0.97. After consensus review of discordant cases, gadolinium-enhanced sequences demonstrated no added value.Most incidental pancreatic cystic lesions did not demonstrate change during follow-up. The addition of gadolinium-enhanced-sequences had no added-value for risk assignment on serial follow-up.Significant growth of pancreatic cysts occurred in a minority of patients only. No lesion <2 cm demonstrated any change during the first year of follow-up. Intra-observer agreement between MR pancreatic protocols with and without gadolinium was excellent. Gadolinium application had limited value for follow-up of asymptomatic pancreatic cystic lesions.Fluorescence in situ hybridization and K-ras analyses improve diagnostic yield of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration of solid pancreatic masses.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine-needle aspiration (FNA) is the main diagnostic modality for pancreatic mass lesions. However, cytology is often indeterminate, leading to repeat FNAs and delay in care. Here, we evaluate whether combining routine cytology with fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) and K-ras/p53 analyses improves diagnostic yield of pancreatic EUS-FNA.Fifty EUS-FNAs of pancreatic masses in 46 patients were retrospectively analyzed. Mean follow-up was 68 months. Thirteen initial cytologic samples (26%) were benign, 23 malignant (46%), and 14 atypical (28%). We performed FISH for p16, p53, LPL, c-Myc, MALT1, topoisomerase 2/human epidermal growth factor receptor 2, and EGFR, as well as K-ras/p53 mutational analyses.On final diagnosis, 11 (79%) of atypical FNAs were malignant, and 3 benign (21%). Fluorescence in situ hybridization was negative in all benign and all atypical samples with final benign diagnosis. Fluorescence in situ hybridization plus K-ras analysis correctly identified 60% of atypical FNAs with final malignant diagnosis. Combination of routine cytology with positive FISH and K-ras analyses yielded 87.9% sensitivity, 93.8% specificity, 96.7% positive predictive value, 78.9% negative predictive value, and 89.8% accuracy.Combining routine cytology with FISH and K-ras analyses improves diagnostic yield of EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses. We propose to include these ancillary tests in the workup of atypical cytology from pancreatic EUS-FNA.Utility of 2-[18F] fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose positron emission tomography in differential diagnosis of benign and malignant intraductal papillary-mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas.Intraductal papillary-mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) of the pancreas presents in various histopathological stages from benign to malignant lesions. The differentiation between benign and malignant IPMN is important in order to determine the treatment of the patients. However, pre-operative differentiation remains difficult. The aim of this study was to assess the utility of 2-[18F] fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) in pre-operative differentiation of benign and malignant IPMN of the pancreas. In the present study we prospectively investigated 29 patients who underwent CT, FDG-PET, and surgery for IPMNs, followed by histopathological examination. The maximum standardized uptake value (SUVmax) was determined on FDG-PET, and differentiation of benign from malignant IPMN was tested using various SUVmax cut-off levels and various parameters derived from the CT. SUVmax was found to be significantly higher in malignant IPMNs (4.7+/-3.0) than that in benign IPMNs (1.8+/-0.3, P=0.0011). SUVmax values correlated with the histopathological types of IPMN (adenoma/borderline lesion/carcinoma in situ/invasive carcinoma) (Spearman rank correlation 0.865, P<0.0001). The specificity, sensitivity and accuracy values were best for SUVmax of 2.5 (100, 93, and 96%, respectively). The combination of mural nodule, detected on CT, and SUVmax of 2.5 offered the best diagnosis of malignant IPMN. These results suggest that FDG-PET is useful for differentiation of malignant IPMN of the pancreas, and that it should be performed in combination with other conventional imaging modalities.Cystic tumours of the pancreas: diagnostic accuracy, pathologic observations and surgical consequences.Cystic neoplasms of the pancreas account for only 1% of primary pancreatic lesions. However, patients with these tumors are diagnosed more frequently. Up to now, nonsurgical management is still the established form of treatment of benign cystic tumours of the pancreas.Between 1987 and 1996 we treated 51 patients with serous and mucinous cystadenoma and their malignant counterparts, serous and mucinous cystadenocarcinoma.Eighty-five percent of the patients presented symptoms. Computed tomography and endoscopic cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) were the most sensitive diagnostic techniques; however, in three patients with serous cystadenoma and in one patient with serous cystadenocarcinoma, ERCP findings were completely normal. The tumour was resected in all but one patient. There was no perioperative mortality. After dismissal from the hospital, all patients in whom benign tumours had been resected are still alive; however, the late mortality of mucinous cystadenocarcinoma was 36% after a median follow-up of 6 years.Surgical resection is recommended in all cystic tumours, even in serous cystic tumours, because symptoms may develop and malignant transformation to serous cystadenocarcinoma is possible.Efficacy of an artificial neural network-based approach to endoscopic ultrasound elastography in diagnosis of focal pancreatic masses.By using strain assessment, real-time endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) elastography provides additional information about a lesion's characteristics in the pancreas. We assessed the accuracy of real-time EUS elastography in focal pancreatic lesions using computer-aided diagnosis by artificial neural network analysis.We performed a prospective, blinded, multicentric study at of 258 patients (774 recordings from EUS elastography) who were diagnosed with chronic pancreatitis (n = 47) or pancreatic adenocarcinoma (n = 211) from 13 tertiary academic medical centers in Europe (the European EUS Elastography Multicentric Study Group). We used postprocessing software analysis to compute individual frames of elastography movies recorded by retrieving hue histogram data from a dynamic sequence of EUS elastography into a numeric matrix. The data then were analyzed in an extended neural network analysis, to automatically differentiate benign from malignant patterns.The neural computing approach had 91.14% training accuracy (95% confidence interval [CI], 89.87%-92.42%) and 84.27% testing accuracy (95% CI, 83.09%-85.44%). These results were obtained using the 10-fold cross-validation technique. The statistical analysis of the classification process showed a sensitivity of 87.59%, a specificity of 82.94%, a positive predictive value of 96.25%, and a negative predictive value of 57.22%. Moreover, the corresponding area under the receiver operating characteristic curve was 0.94 (95% CI, 0.91%-0.97%), which was significantly higher than the values obtained by simple mean hue histogram analysis, for which the area under the receiver operating characteristic was 0.85.Use of the artificial intelligence methodology via artificial neural networks supports the medical decision process, providing fast and accurate diagnoses.Accuracy of preoperative workup in a prospective series of surgically resected cystic pancreatic lesions.Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) are considered useful techniques in the evaluation of pancreatic cysts. Aim of this study was to prospectively compare the diagnostic value of these techniques.This study included consecutive patients who underwent MRI, EUS, and EUS-FNA for a pancreatic cyst that was eventually resected surgically. Observers scored for cyst characteristics, a distinction between mucinous and non-mucinous cysts and a suspicion of malignancy. The interobserver agreement between MRI and EUS was calculated.A total of 32 patients were included. Sensitivity for diagnosing a mucinous cyst was 78% for EUS versus 91% for MRI. Sensitivity for detecting malignancy was 25% (1/4) and 50% (2/4) for EUS and MRI respectively. Sensitivity of EUS-FNA for diagnosing a mucinous cyst (positive cytology and/or CEA >192 ng/ml) was 61%. Sensitivity for detecting malignancy (positive cytology) was 1/4 (25%). Interobserver agreement between MRI and EUS for the features was poor to fair.MRI and EUS are comparable techniques for the morphological characterization of pancreatic cysts. Combined sensitivity of EUS and MRI was higher than the sensitivity of one of the techniques alone. For diagnosing a mucinous cyst, FNA findings showed a low sensitivity, but a high specificity.Fine-needle aspiration cytology guided by endoscopic ultrasonography: results in 141 patients.Diagnosis of submucosal lesions, pancreatic tumors, and mediastinal or celiac lymph nodes or masses is possible using endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS), but histological confirmation to differentiate between benign and malignant lesions is still required. The aim of this study was to evaluate the efficacy of a new method of EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy of intramural and paramural lesions.From October 1991 to September 1994, EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy was carried out in 141 patients with findings of mediastinal masses (18 cases), mediastinal lymph nodes (24 cases), submucosal tumors (seven cases), celiac lymph nodes (26 cases), large gastric folds with negative endoscopic biopsy (13 cases), pancreatic tumors (43 cases), a small liver metastasis (five cases), retrorectal tumors (four cases), and an adrenal metastasis (one case). The EUS examination was performed using a Pentax-Hitachi FG 32-UA system.A malignant tumor was diagnosed in 110 of the 141 patients. EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration was positive in 85 cases. In 15 cases, an adequate specimen could not be obtained (10.6%). The sensitivity and specificity of the diagnosis of malignancy were 77.0% and 100%, respectively. Results were better for mediastinal masses (sensitivity 88%), mediastinal lymph nodes (81%), and celiac lymph nodes (80%) than for pancreatic tumors (75%) or submucosal tumors (60%).These results suggest that EUS-guided fine-needle biopsy using a curved-array transducer represents a step forward in the tissue diagnosis of gastrointestinal lesions.Fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography in the differential diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma: a report of 106 cases.The aim of this study was to evaluate fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography ([18F]FDG PET) as a tool for the differential diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma while taking into account serum glucose level. A group of 106 patients with unclear pancreatic masses were recruited for the study. PET was performed following intravenous administration of an average of 190 MBq [18F]FDG. Focally increased glucose utilisation was used as the criterion of malignancy. In addition, the "standardised uptake value" (SUV) was determined 45 min after injection. Carcinoma of the pancreas was demonstrated histologically in 74 cases, and chronic pancreatitis in 32 cases. Employing visual evaluation, 63 of the 74 (85%) pancreatic carcinomas were identified by PET. In 27 of the 32 cases (84%) of chronic pancreatitis it was possible to exclude malignancy. False-negative results (n=11) were obtained mostly in patients with raised serum glucose levels (10 out of 11), and false-positives (n=5) in patients with inflammatory processes of the pancreas. Thus PET showed an overall sensitivity of 85%, a specificity of 84%, a negative predictive value of 71%, and a positive predictive value of 93%. In a subgroup of patients with normal serum glucose levels (n=72), the results were 98%, 84%, 96% and 93%, respectively. Quantitative assessment yielded a mean SUV of 6.4+/-3.6 for pancreatic carcinoma as against a value of 3.6+/-1.7 for chronic pancreatitis (P<0.001), without increasing the diagnostic accuracy. This shows PET to be of value in assessing unclear pancreatic masses. The diagnostic accuracy of PET examinations is very dependent on serum glucose levels.Possible additional value of 18FDG-PET in managing pancreas intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms: preliminary results.Although some clinical and radiological features may predict malignancy presence in intraductal papillary mucinous pancreas neoplasms, preoperative diagnosis remains difficult. In this study we present 7 patients with Intraductal Papillary Mucinous Neoplasm (IPMN) studied both with 18FDG-PET and magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP). A focal hypermetabolism was documented in 2 patients (the standardized uptake value in the neoplastic foci was 6.7 and 9), while absence of FDG uptake in the neoplasm area was recorded in the remaining 5 cases. Mean follow-up was 27 months (range 21-34). The final judgement was benign IPMN in 5 cases and malignant IPMN in 2. PET scan always correctly predicted the presence or absence of malignancy, while MRCP failed to detect malignancy in 3/7 cases. In conclusion, this preliminary experience suggests that 18FDG-PET may prove useful for malignancy detection in IPMN, improving differential diagnosis with benign intraductal papillary growth by functional data.Pancreatic resections for cystic neoplasms: from the surgeon's presumption to the pathologist's reality.Current guidelines for the management of pancreatic cystic neoplasms are based on the assumption that these lesions can be classified correctly on the basis of features of cross-sectional imaging. However, a certain degree of overlap between different lesions exists, and little is known about the rate of inaccurate preoperative diagnoses. To address this issue, preoperative and final pathologic diagnoses of patients resected for a presumed pancreatic cystic neoplasm were compared.Retrospective analysis was undertaken of patients managed operatively between 2000 and 2010. Preoperative workup was reviewed to identify diagnostic pitfalls and potential risk factors for incorrect preoperative characterization of cystic lesions presumed to be neoplastic.We analyzed 476 patients. Final pathologic diagnosis matched the preoperative diagnosis in 78% of cases. The highest accuracy was reached for solid pseudopapillary neoplasms (95%) and for main duct/mixed duct intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (81%). Surprisingly, 23 cysts (5%) were found to be ductal adenocarcinoma, whereas 45 patients (9%) underwent a pancreatic resection for a non-neoplastic condition. The use of a routine radiologic workup, including contrast-enhanced ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging, was associated with a favorably correct characterization of the cystic lesion. Endoscopic ultrasonography did not seem to improve diagnostic accuracy. Increased levels of serum carbohydrate antigen (CA)19-9 resulted as risk factors for an incorrect diagnosis as well as for a final diagnosis of a ductal adenocarcinoma.The overall rate of inaccurate preoperative diagnoses in a tertiary care center with a broad experience in pancreatology approached 22%. Serum CA19-9 is an important complementary tool within the context of preoperative investigation of cystic neoplasms of the pancreas.The role of cytopathology and cyst fluid analysis in the preoperative diagnosis and management of pancreatic cysts >3 cm.Pancreatic cyst size >3 cm is a worrisome rather than high-risk feature for malignancy based on the 2012 International Guidelines for the management of mucinous cysts. The value of cytology in preoperative evaluation and surgical triage is unclear.All pancreatic cysts >3 cm resected over a 7-year period were evaluated for clinical, radiologic, and pathologic information. Performance of cytology for the detection of malignancy and surgical triage compared with imaging was assessed.There were 93 histologically confirmed cysts, 52 of which were mucinous and 41 of which were nonmucinous. Of these, 37% were malignant, including 16 nonmucinous malignancies and 18 mucinous cysts (12 with invasive carcinoma, 6 with high-grade dysplasia). Thirty-nine cysts (41% malignant, 59% benign) were not subject to endoscopic ultrasound-fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) prior to resection (average size, 6.0 cm). Fifty-four were evaluated by EUS-FNA, with 35 available for review (average size, 5.4 cm). Cytology/cyst fluid analysis had the highest specificity (88.9%) compared with imaging, whereas magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) showed the highest sensitivity (100%). MRI had the highest predictive value for mucinous (100%) versus nonmucinous cysts (100%). MRI and EUS were able to predict malignancy from the presence of high-risk imaging features in all cases. Some benign cases also showed high-risk imaging features on MRI (28.6%), computed tomography (32.3%), and EUS (45.8%). Cytology correctly classified 5 of 6 benign cysts with high-risk imaging as benign.Preoperative evaluation of pancreatic cysts >3 cm is warranted, as many are nonmucinous cysts and not high-grade. Cytology is more specific than imaging for the detection of malignancy in cysts >3 cm.Rapid on-site evaluation for endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle biopsy of the pancreas decreases the incidence of repeat biopsy procedures.Rapid on-site evaluation (ROSE) for endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) biopsy of the pancreas provides immediate feedback regarding cellular adequacy to aid in obtaining a definitive diagnosis and has the potential to avoid repeat procedures. The objective of the current study was to measure the impact of ROSE service on the incidence of repeat EUS FNA biopsy procedures.Over a consecutive 3-year period, the pathology database at Washington University Medical Center was searched for patients with both an initial and subsequent EUS FNA biopsy demonstrating a solid lesion of the pancreas. These were divided temporally between the time before and after the introduction of ROSE service. Reports were reviewed and results were recorded.A total of 379 patients underwent ROSE service and 377 patients did not. The percentage of repeat non-ROSE EUS FNA cases was 5.8% and the percentage of repeat ROSE EUS FNA cases was 2.9%. The use of the ROSE service was found to decrease the number of repeat procedures by approximately 50% (P = .024). For those patients who underwent a repeat EUS-FNA procedure, the ROSE service provided a higher rate of definitive diagnosis among patients undergoing repeat procedures (67%) versus the non-ROSE cohort (27%).The use of ROSE for EUS-FNA biopsy of the pancreas was found to result in fewer patients undergoing repeat procedures. Patients who required a repeat procedure with the use of ROSE had a higher percentage of definitive diagnostic categorization on the repeat biopsy. Initial use of ROSE for EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic lesions was found to decrease the number of patients who required a repeat procedure.Malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas: in situ versus invasive carcinoma surgical resectability.To retrospectively evaluate computed tomographic (CT) findings in patients with in situ and invasive malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) of the pancreas and to evaluate the accuracy for surgical resectability, with surgery and pathologic analysis as the reference standards.Institutional review board approval was obtained, and the informed consent requirement was waived. Forty-six patients with malignant IPMN proved at pathologic examination of the surgically resected specimen (n = 44) or laparotomy (n = 2) underwent surgery after multidetector CT was performed. CT findings were retrospectively evaluated to determine if a pancreatic malignant IPMN tumor was present; to make this determination, CT criteria were used to differentiate in situ from invasive tumors and signs of unresectability (liver metastasis, vascular CT pattern of encasement, or regional lymph node metastasis). The extent of the vascular CT pattern of encasement was recorded for each patient (no obliteration of the fat plane, obliteration of the fat plane of <50%, or obliteration of the fat plane of > or =50%). Statistical analysis was performed with the chi(2) and Student t tests.CT revealed a mural nodule in the pancreatic duct wall in 14 patients with in situ carcinoma and one patient with invasive carcinoma (P < .003). CT revealed an infiltrative pancreatic mass in 17 patients with invasive carcinoma and two patients with in situ carcinoma (P < .02). Of the mural nodules, 93% were seen in patients with in situ carcinoma, whereas 90% of infiltrative pancreatic masses were observed in patients with invasive carcinomas. The positive predictive value of CT for determining resectability was 100%, and the overall accuracy of CT for determining resectability and unresectability was 74%. The positive predictive value of CT for determining unresectability was 17%, mainly owing to overestimation of arterial invasion.CT is helpful in the differentiation of in situ and invasive IPMN. Classic vascular invasion criteria lead to the overestimation of surgical tumor unresectability in patients with malignant IPMN.Interobserver agreement for detection of malignant features of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas on MDCT.The purpose of this retrospective study was to measure interobserver agreement in the assessment of malignant imaging features of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) on MDCT.Pancreatic protocol CT studies were reviewed for 84 patients with resected IPMNs. Maximal diameter of the dominant cyst, presence of a mural nodule, presence of a solid component, and diameters of the main pancreatic duct (MPD) and common bile duct (CBD) were measured by four radiologists independently. In each patient, the IPMN was classified into one of three types: main duct, branch duct, or mixed IPMN. Interobserver agreement of lesion features was examined using the intraclass correlation coefficient (ICC) for continuous features and Fleiss kappa for categorical features.The final dataset included 55 branch duct IPMNs, nine main duct IPMNs, and 20 mixed IPMNs. Moderate agreement (ĸ = 0.458; 95% CI, 0.345-0.564) was observed in assigning branch duct, main duct, or mixed IPMN subtypes. Measurement agreement was substantial to excellent for dominant cyst (ICC = 0.852; 95% CI, 0.777-0.907), MPD (0.753, 0.655-0.837), and CBD (0.608, 0.463-0.724) but only fair to moderate for the detection of the presence of mural nodule (ĸ = 0.284, 0.125-0.432) or solid component (ĸ = 0.405, 0211-0.577).Substantial to excellent interobserver agreement in the measurement of cyst diameter, MPD, and CBD support their use for characterizing malignant features of IPMN on MDCT. However, the subjective interpretation of the presence of solid components and mural nodules by individual radiologists was more variable.Value of diffusion-weighted MRI for differentiating malignant from benign intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas.The purpose of this study was to evaluate whether the use of diffusion-weighted MRI (DWI) increases diagnostic accuracy in the differentiation of malignant from benign intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) of the pancreas over the accuracy of contrast-enhanced MRI with MRCP.A total of 61 patients with surgically resected IPMNs (19 malignant, 42 benign) who underwent gadoxetic acid-enhanced MRI, DWI, and MRCP were included. Two blinded observers evaluated two image sets, that is, conventional MRI with MRCP images versus combined conventional MRI with MRCP and DW images, and scored their confidence for malignancy of IPMNs. Qualitative analyses of the IPMNs were also conducted. Diagnostic performance (ROC curve analysis), accuracy, sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), and negative predictive value (NPV) were evaluated. The Fisher exact test was used to compare groups.The diagnostic performance (area under the ROC curve [Az]) with respect to predicting malignancy of IPMNs improved significantly for both observers after additional review of DW images (p < 0.05). The diagnostic accuracy, sensitivity, specificity, PPV, and NPV of combined conventional and DW images were higher than those of conventional MR images alone. Diffusion restriction was more often present in malignant IPMNs (78.9%) than in benign IPMNs (16.7%) (p < 0.001) with excellent interobserver agreement (ĸ = 0.965).Compared with conventional MRI alone, adding DWI to conventional MRI improves diagnostic accuracy with increased specificity for differentiating malignant from benign IPMNs of the pancreas.[Is accurate preoperative assessment of pancreatic cystic lesions possible?].Cystic lesions of the pancreas (CLP) are of different origin and behaviour. Mucinous lesions with the risk of invasive cancer represent an important subgroup. The key point in differential diagnosis of CLP is to distinguish malignant and benign lesions and also correct indication for surgery in order to minimize the impact of serious complications after resection. Different and unsatisfying predictive values of each of the examinations make proper diagnosis challenging. We focused on overall diagnostic accuracy of preoperative imaging and analytic studies. We studied the accuracy of distinguishing between non-neoplastic vs. neoplastic and bening vs. malignant lesions.We retrospectively analyzed all of the patients (N=72) with CLP (median of age 58 years, range 22-79) recommended for surgery. CT, EUS, ERCP, MRCP findings, cytology and aspirate analysis were used to establish preoperative diagnosis. Finally, preoperative diagnoses were compared with postoperative pathological findings to establish overall accuracy of preoperative assessment.During 5 years, 72 patients underwent resection for CLP. We performed 66 (92%) resection and 6 (8%) palliative procedures with 32% morbidity and 7% of one hospital stay mortality. All the patients were examined by CT and EUS. FNA was performed in 44 (61%) patients. Cytology was evaluable in 39 (88%) cases. ERCP was done in 40 (55%) patients. Pathology revealed non-neoplastic CLP in 25 (35%) and neoplastic lesions in 47 (65%) specimens. Mucinous lesions accounted for 25%. Malignant or potentially malignant CLP were found in 37 (51%) patients. Sensitivity, specificity and diagnostic accuracy of preoperative diagnosis for distinguishing between inflammatory and neoplastic, and benign and malignant was 100%, 46%, 85% and 61%, 61%, 44%, respectively.Correct and accurate preoperative assessment of CLP remains challenging. Despite the wide range of diagnostic modalities, the definitive preoperative identification of malignant or high-risk CLP is inaccurate. Because of this, a significant portion of the patients undergo pancreatic resection for benign or inflammatory lesions that are not potentially life-threatening. Possible serious complications after pancreatic surgery are the main reason for precise selection of patients with cystic affections recommended for surgery.Contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasound in solid lesions of the pancreas: results of a pilot study.Distinguishing pancreatic adenocarcinoma from other pancreatic masses remains challenging with current imaging techniques. This prospective study aimed to evaluate the accuracy of a new procedure, imaging the microcirculation pattern of the pancreas by contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasound (CEH-EUS) with a new Olympus prototype echo endoscope.35 patients presenting with solid pancreatic lesions were prospectively enrolled. All patients had conventional B mode and power Doppler EUS. After an intravenous bolus injection of 2.4 ml of a second-generation ultrasound contrast agent (SonoVue) CEH-EUS was then performed with a new Olympus prototype echo endoscope (xGF-UCT 180). The microvascular pattern was compared with the final diagnosis based on the pathological examination of specimens from surgery or EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) or on follow-up for at least 12 months.The final diagnoses were: 18 adenocarcinomas, 9 neuroendocrine tumors, 7 chronic pancreatitis, and 1 stromal tumor. Power Doppler failed to display microcirculation, whereas harmonic imaging demonstrated it in all cases. Out of 18 lesions with a hypointense signal on CEH-EUS, 16 were adenocarcinomas. The sensitivity, specificity, negative predictive value (NPV), positive predictive value (PPV), and accuracy of hypointensity for diagnosing pancreatic adenocarcinoma were 89 %, 88 %, 88 %, 89 %, and 88.5 %, compared with corresponding values of 72 %, 100 %, 77 %, 100 %, and 86 % for EUS-FNA. Of five adenocarcinomas with false-negative results at EUS-FNA, four had a hypointense echo signal at CEH-EUS.CEH-EUS with the new Olympus prototype device successfully visualizes the microvascular pattern in pancreatic solid lesions, and may be useful for distinguishing adenocarcinomas from other pancreatic masses.Value of repeat endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration for suspected pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is a safe and accurate technique for diagnosing pancreatic cancer. The value of repeat EUS-FNA in patients with high clinical suspicion for pancreatic cancer after an inconclusive index study is unknown. Our aims were to determine the yield and success of repeat EUS-FNA and the reasons for failure of initial EUS-FNA.This was a retrospective analysis of prospectively collected data in a tertiary University based referral center for pancreatico-biliary disorders. All patients who underwent more then one EUS-FNA for evaluation of suspected pancreatic cancer over a five and a half year period were included in this analysis.Of the 547 procedures performed on 517 patients, 24 (4.6%) patients underwent 51 repeat EUS-FNA procedures. Initial EUS-FNA was atypical/suspicious in 10 (41.6%), benign in 10 (41.6%), malignant in two (8.3%), and failed/indeterminate in two (8.3%) patients. Eight of 10 (80%) patients with atypical/suspicious findings at initial EUS-FNA were diagnosed with malignancy on repeat EUS-FNA. Of the 10 patients with benign findings at initial EUS-FNA, repeat study diagnosed two (20%) with malignancy and the rest were confirmed benign on long-term follow up (average 530 days, SD 369 days). Of the two patients with indeterminate findings at initial EUS-FNA, repeat study diagnosed one patient with malignant disease and the other with benign disease that was confirmed by long-term follow up. Of the two patients diagnosed with neoplastic disease at initial EUS-FNA, repeat EUS-FNA with immunostains downgraded both to chronic pancreatitis. Repeat EUS-FNA facilitated determination of the true status of disease in 20 of 24 patients (accuracy 84%). Suspected reasons for failed initial EUS-FNA were: coexisting pancreatitis (n = 10; 42%), technical difficulty due to scope positioning in uncinate lesion/sedation failure (n = 4; 16.7%), difficult cytology (partly cystic, extensive necrosis, well-differentiated adenocarcinoma) (n = 4; 16.7%), presence of ascites or collaterals (n = 3; 12.5%), pathologist's interobserver variation (n = 2; 8.33%), and unknown reason in one patient.Repeat EUS-FNA is warranted in patients with high clinical suspicion for pancreatic cancer despite indeterminate or negative findings at initial EUS-FNA.[The value of magnetic resonance tomography (MRT), magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the diagnosis of pancreatic tumors].To prospectively evaluate the role of MRI including MR cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) compared to endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.ERCP and MRI including MRCP were performed in 52 patients with suspected pancreatic cancer. MRCP was obtained using a single-shot RARE technique. The results of axial images and MRCP were compared to concurrently performed ERCP examinations. The standards of reference were the surgical and pathological findings, respectively. Image quality of MRCP was assessed using a three-step-score (1 = good, 2 = fair, 3 = nondiagnostic).In 88% of the cases the MRCP was of good quality. Only in 4% was MRCP non-diagnostic. The combination of MRI and MRCP showed an overall accuracy of 88%, whereas the overall accuracies of MRCP alone and ERCP were 80%, and 85%, respectively. The positive predictive values of MRI/MRCP, MRCP alone, and ERCP were 91%, 85%, and 88%, respectively.For the detection of pancreatic cancer MRI including MRCP is comparable to ERCP and can be regarded as the method of choice in patients with suspected pancreatic cancer. ERCP is the procedure of choice in patients with contraindications to MRI and in patients in whom additional therapeutic procedures are performed.Endoscopic ultrasound elastography for evaluation of lymph nodes and pancreatic masses: a multicenter study.To evaluate the ability of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) elastography to distinguish benign from malignant pancreatic masses and lymph nodes.A multicenter study was conducted and included 222 patients who underwent EUS examination with assessment of a pancreatic mass (n = 121) or lymph node (n = 101). The classification as benign or malignant, based on the real time elastography pattern, was compared with the classification based on the B-mode EUS images and with the final diagnosis obtained by EUS-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) and/or by surgical pathology. An interobserver study was performed.The sensitivity and specificity of EUS elastography to differentiate benign from malignant pancreatic lesions are 92.3% and 80.0%, respectively, compared to 92.3% and 68.9%, respectively, for the conventional B-mode images. The sensitivity and specificity of EUS elastography to differentiate benign from malignant lymph nodes was 91.8% and 82.5%, respectively, compared to 78.6% and 50.0%, respectively, for the B-mode images. The kappa coefficient was 0.785 for the pancreatic masses and 0.657 for the lymph nodes.EUS elastography is superior compared to conventional B-mode imaging and appears to be able to distinguish benign from malignant pancreatic masses and lymph nodes with a high sensitivity, specificity and accuracy. It might be reserved as a second line examination to help characterise pancreatic masses after negative EUS-FNA and might increase the yield of EUS-FNA for lymph nodes.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration and biopsy using a 22-gauge needle with side fenestration in pancreatic cystic lesions.Cytologic diagnosis by endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration is associated with low sensitivity and adequacy. A newly designed endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle biopsy device, endowed with a side fenestration, is now available.We carried out a study with the aim of evaluating the feasibility, safety, and diagnostic yield of the 22-gauge needle with side fenestration for endoscopic ultrasound fine needle aspiration and biopsy of pancreatic cystic lesions.58 patients with 60 pancreatic cystic lesions consecutively referred for endoscopic ultrasound guided-fine needle aspiration were enrolled in a prospective, dual centre study, and underwent fine needle aspiration and biopsy with the 22-gauge needle with side fenestration.Fine needle aspiration and biopsy was technically feasible in all cases. In 39/60 (65%) pancreatic cystic lesions, the specimens were adequate for cyto-histologic assessment. In lesions with solid components, and in malignant lesions, adequacy was 94.4% (p = 0.0149) and 100% (p = 0.0069), respectively. Samples were adequate for histologic evaluation in 18/39 (46.1%) cases. There were only 2 (3.3%) mild complications.Fine needle aspiration and biopsy with the 22-gauge needle with side fenestration is feasible, and superior to conventional endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration cytology from cystic fluid, particularly in pancreatic cystic lesions with solid component or malignancy, with a higher diagnostic yield and with no increase in complication rate.Intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas: the preoperative value of cytologic and histopathologic diagnosis.The preoperative diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas must be as certain as possible because removal of a large portion of the pancreas or even total pancreatectomy may be necessary. The value of cytologic and histopathologic analysis of specimens obtained by preoperative endoscopic investigations is unknown. The aim of this study was to assess the value of such analyses of specimens obtained by EUS-guided FNA and/or biopsy, or transpapillary biopsy specimens obtained during endoscopic retrograde pancreatography for the diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas and for the detection of malignancy.Between 1992 and 2001, 42 patients (22 men, 20 women; median age 64 years) underwent surgical resection for intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas and had preoperative pancreatic tissue sampling. In the case of isolated dilatation of pancreatic ducts, pancreatic juice was obtained by EUS-guided FNA for cytologic analysis. In the presence of a solid lesion or main pancreatic duct stenosis, biopsy specimens were obtained by EUS-guided FNA biopsy or endoscopic retrograde pancreatography, which permitted histopathologic assessment. The accuracy of cytology and histopathology was evaluated for the following: (1) positive diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas and (2) assessment of malignancy, by comparison with histopathologic examination of surgical resection specimens.Cytologic analysis was performed in 19 patients; it was positive in 4 (21%) and noninformative in 15 (79%). Histopathologic analysis was performed in 23 patients; it was positive in 21 (91%) and negative in 2 (9%). Histopathologic analysis yielded a positive result in 83% of patients who did not have extrusion of mucus from a patulous papilla. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of histopathologic analysis for the diagnosis of malignancy were, respectively, 44%, 100%, 100%, and 33%. When histopathologic analysis was positive, the tumor grade was similar to that determined by final histopathologic examination in 38% of patients, whereas the grade was underestimated in 62%. No complication occurred as a result of tissue sampling.The sensitivity of histopathologic analysis of EUS-guided FNA biopsy specimens or transpapillary biopsy specimens is 91% for the positive diagnosis of intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas with a solid component, which is of particular interest as extrusion mucus from the papilla was absent in most patients. Histopathologic analysis of biopsy specimens of malignant intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas often underestimates tumor grade. The result for cytologic analysis of juice obtained from dilated pancreatic ducts is disappointing.Endosonography-guided real-time fine-needle aspiration biopsy.Twenty-six patients were prospectively evaluated with endosonography-guided real-time fine-needle-aspiration biopsy. This cohort comprised 14 patients with a pancreatic mass revealed by CT or a stricture of the main pancreatic duct seen at ERCP, 7 patients with mediastinal lymphadenopathy, 3 patients with extrapancreatic abdominal masses, and 2 patients with subepithelial or infiltrative lesions. Endosonography-guided real-time fine-needle-aspiration biopsy was diagnostic in 18 of 20 patients in whom surgical confirmation was available or in whom malignancy was found and confirmed by clinical follow-up (accuracy of 90%). In the subgroup of patients with pancreatic lesions, 3 had previously undergone nondiagnostic CT-guided fine-needle-aspiration biopsy and 2 did not have evidence of a mass by CT. Real-time fine-needle-aspiration biopsy was diagnostic for malignancy in 4 of these individuals. In the 7 patients with mediastinal lymph nodes, 2 had nondiagnostic transbronchial biopsy and 2 had no evidence of mediastinal lymphadenopathy by CT scan. Endosonography-guided real-time fine-needle-aspiration biopsy diagnosed malignancy in both individuals with nondiagnostic transbronchial studies and was able to identify mediastinal lymphadenopathy in the 2 patients with negative CT scans (malignancy confirmed with real-time fine-needle-aspiration biopsy in 1). Overall, in 9 of 10 lesions in which visualization by CT was not possible (5), CT-guided fine-needle aspiration was unsuccessful (3), or prior nonsurgical biopsy techniques were unsuccessful (2), real-time fine-needle-aspiration biopsy was diagnostic.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Duct-penetrating sign at MRCP: usefulness for differentiating inflammatory pancreatic mass from pancreatic carcinomas.To define the duct-penetrating sign at magnetic resonance (MR) cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and to assess the usefulness of this sign for distinguishing an inflammatory pancreatic mass (IPM) from a conventional pancreatic carcinoma (CPC) compared with arterial phase computed tomography (hereafter, CT) and arterial phase MR imaging (hereafter, MR imaging).MRCP, CT, and MR images were compared by means of receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis for 11 IPMs and 43 CPCs. With the MRCP images, a morphologic classification of the main pancreatic duct (MPD) was attempted for all lesions. On the basis of this classification and the enhancement patterns of a lesion, all readers graded the presence of IPM or CPC on a five-point scale for all images.On the MRCP images, the morphologic characteristics of the MPD were nonobstruction for IPM (28 of 33, 85%) and obstruction or irregular stenosis for CPC (124 of 129, 96%). At ROC analysis among all the techniques, MRCP images had the highest value (0.98) for significant areas under the ROC curve (CT, 0.84; MR, 0.76) (P <.001). For the duct-penetrating sign in the broad sense (nonobstructed MPD) and the sign in the narrow sense (only normal MPD), the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy for diagnosis of IPM were 85%, 96%, and 94%, respectively, and 36%, 100%, and 87%, respectively.The duct-penetrating sign on MRCP images was more helpful to distinguish IPM from CPC than were the enhancement patterns on CT and MR images.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration.Thirty-eight consecutive patients underwent endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration. Of 46 lesions, 34 were extraluminal (12 pancreatic masses, 8 periesophageal nodes, 6 celiac nodes, 2 pericolonic masses, 1 mediastinal mass, 1 perigastric mass, 1 liver, 1 periduodenal node, 1 perirectal mass, 1 perirectal node) and 12 were submucosal (8 gastric, 3 duodenal, 1 esophageal). One hundred sixty-three passes were made, with an average of 3.5 passes per lesion and 4.3 passes per patient (range, 1 to 8). Adequate specimens were obtained from 91% of targeted lesions. The overall diagnostic accuracy was 87%. In patients with malignant lesions, sensitivity was 91% and specificity 100%. Celiac nodes were successfully sampled and diagnostic in 5 of 6 (83%) patients. No complications occurred. Using this technique, an initial tissue diagnosis of malignancy was made in 66% of cancer patients without a previous diagnosis and the preoperative stage was changed in 44% of cancer patients. The additional information gained by this modality directly influenced the decision not to perform surgery in 26% of patients with a primary malignancy. Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration is feasible and can be safely used to evaluate submucosal and extraluminal lesions in both the upper and lower gastrointestinal tract with a high degree of diagnostic accuracy.The usefulness of S100P, mesothelin, fascin, prostate stem cell antigen, and 14-3-3 sigma in diagnosing pancreatic adenocarcinoma in cytological specimens obtained by endoscopic ultrasound guided fine-needle aspiration.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) of the pancreas is an efficient and minimally invasive procedure for the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic adenocarcinoma. Because of some limitations of EUS-FNA in diagnosis of well-differentiated or early stage cancers, the purpose of this study is to assess the added benefit of immunohistochemistry. We studied five proteins overexpressed in pancreatic adenocarcinoma, namely, prostate stem cell antigen, fascin, 14-3-3 sigma, mesothelin and S100P utilizing immunohistochemistry on paraffin sections from cellblocks obtained by EUS-FNA. Sixty-two cases of EUS-FNA of the pancreas that had follow-up histological and/or clinical diagnosis and sufficient material in cell blocks were included. Using histological diagnosis and/or clinical outcome as the reference standard, EUS-FNA shows the highest sensitivity (95%) and specificity (91%) and is superior to any marker in this study. Among five antibodies, S100P reveals the best diagnostic characters showing 90% of sensitivity and 67% of specificity. Fascin shows high specificity (92%) but low sensitivity (38%). Mesothelin has a moderate sensitivity (74%) and low specificity (33%), PSCA and 14-3-3 show high sensitivity but zero specificity. S100P and mesothelin were useful in nine indeterminate cases. S100P correctly predicted six of seven cancers and one of one without cancer and mesothelin correctly diagnosed five of seven cancers and one of two noncancers in this group. EUS-FNA cytomorphology is superior to any of the immunohistochemical markers used in this study. Use of S100P and mesothelin in cytologically borderline cases can increase the diagnostic accuracy in this group.Ratio of pancreatic duct caliber to width of pancreatic gland by endosonography is predictive of pancreatic cancer.This study aimed to determine whether (1) a pancreatic duct (PD) diameter to pancreatic gland width (G) ratio (PDG) by endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) predicts pancreatic cancer (PC) and (2) whether this ratio better indicates PC compared to PD dilation alone.Patients presenting for EUS were classified into the following 4 categories: (1) normal, (2) noncalcific chronic pancreatitis (NCCP), (3) calcific CP (CCP), and (4) PC.There were 198 patients enrolled. Final diagnoses were PC (n = 34), CCP (n = 16), and normal/NCCP (n = 148). The median PD diameter (8, 5, and 2 mm, respectively; P = <0.001), G (16, 20, and 17 mm, respectively; P = 0.002), and PDG ratio were significantly different among groups (0.54, 0.25, and 0.12, respectively; P < 0.001). Patients with PC were more likely to have a PDG ratio of greater than or equal to 0.34 compared to CCP, and normal/NCCP groups (94%, 19%, 1.3%, respectively; P < 0.001). The positive predictive value, negative predictive value, sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of PDG greater than or equal to 0.34 for detecting cancer were 87%, 99%, 94%, 97%, and 97%, respectively. The accuracy and positive predictive value of PD dilation alone for diagnosing PC were 83% and 50%, respectively.A PDG ratio is a good predictor of PC and is better than PD dilation. This sign should be routinely used by endosonographers to improve EUS diagnostic capability of PC.Clinical utility and diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration of pancreatic lesions: Saudi Arabian experience.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) has emerged as a new and effective tool in the evaluation of pancreatic mass lesions. It has proven to be a safe, accurate, and reliable diagnostic procedure and should be performed in centers with experienced gastroenterologists and cytopathologists for optimum results. In this study, we elaborate on our experience of specimen adequacy criteria, overall efficiency of the technique, and the cytomorphologic features of various pancreatic lesions.EUS-FNA of the pancreas and subsequent surgical and/or clinical follow-up of all cases performed at King Khalid University Hospital, King Saud University, Riyadh, Saudi Arabia, from November 2006 to January 2010, were retrospectively reviewed. Diff-Quik and Papanicolaou staining methods were used. Immunohistochemistry stains on cell-block preparations were applied whenever available and required. A total of 43 aspirates from 42 patients were available for retrospective review, including 37 (86%) adequate/diagnostic and 6 (14%) inadequate/non-diagnostic cases. The diagnostic group included 17 (46%) malignant and 20 (54%) benign cases. Of the malignant category (17 cases), 11 (65%) were diagnosed as positive for adenocarcinoma, 4 (23%) as neuroendocrine tumor, 1 (6%) as solid pseudo-papillary neoplasm, and 1 (6%) as non-Hodgkin's lymphoma. The benign category (20 cases) included 5 (25%) cysts/pseudo-cysts, 8 (40%) non-specific pancreatitis, 4 (20%) granulomatous/tuberculous pancreatitis, 1 (5%) benign neoplasm, and 2 (10%) benign not otherwise specified, both were proven to be false-negative cases. The sensitivity, specificity and accuracy rate for the diagnosis of cancers were 74, 100, and 86%, respectively. No false-positive results were reported. All malignant cases showed characteristic cytomorphologic features that were sufficient for their diagnosis.EUS-FNA in adequate samples is an efficient and accurate modality in the diagnosis of pancreatic lesions. Applying immunohistochemical studies on cell-block preparation can facilitate the final, definitive, and specific diagnosis of some difficult pancreatic neoplasms.Clinical impact of on-site cytopathology interpretation on endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-guided FNA) is becoming a preferred modality for diagnosing and staging GI and mediastinal malignancies. Although experts advocate on-site cytopathology assessment for tissue sample adequacy, there are few data to support this claim. Our goal was to determine whether on-site cytopathology interpretation improves the diagnostic yield of EUS-guided FNA.EUS-guided FNA results from two university hospital centers were reviewed and compared. At center 1, where EUS-guided FNA was performed with a cytopathologist on site, the results of 108 consecutive patients were evaluated. At center 2, where a cytopathologist is unavailable, the results of 87 consecutive patients were reviewed. One endoscopist performed all procedures at both institutions. Cytologic diagnoses were categorized as positive or negative for malignancy, suspicious for malignancy, atypical/indeterminate, or unsatisfactory. The number of repeat procedures, needle passes, medication use, target site, age, and sex were compared between the two sites.Patients at center 2 were older (p = 0.04) and predominantly female (p = 0.03). Pancreas was the most common target site at center 2, whereas thoraco-abdominal nodes were the most common at center 1 (p = 0.0001). Patients at center 1 had a diagnosis of positive or negative for malignancy more frequently (p = 0.001) and were less likely to have an unsatisfactory specimen (p = 0.035) or repeat procedure, although the latter was not significant (p = 0.156).On-site cytopathology interpretation improves the diagnostic yield of EUS-guided FNA. EUS centers should allocate resources to cover for on-site cytopathology evaluation.[Cystic space-occupying lesion of the pancreas. Invasive mucinous cystadenocarcinoma of the tail of the pancreas].Can long-term follow-up strategies be determined using a nomogram-based prediction model of malignancy among intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas?This study investigated whether a risk assessment nomogram can predict the malignant potential of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) and provide valuable information for the follow-up and counseling strategies of such patients.We studied 126 of 589 patients with IPMN who were followed up for at least 36 months with annual endoscopic ultrasonography. We analyzed scores derived from our nomogram, incorporating the parameters of sex, lesion type, mural nodule height, and pancreatic juice cytology determined at the initial IPMN evaluation.The rate of malignant IPMNs was 5.5% (7/126). The initial average nomogram score was 19.8 (range, 0-55), and the final follow-up average was 23.8 (range, 0-109). When a cutoff score was set at 35 points, the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of the nomogram to assess malignancy risk were 87.5%, 96.6%, and 96%, respectively. The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve of malignant IPMN prediction during follow-up was 0.865.The ability of the nomogram to predict malignancy in patients with IPMN was validated. Our findings can suggest that a follow-up for patients at high and low risk for cancer progression could be scheduled every 3 to 6 and 12 months, respectively.Correlation between CT patterns and pathological classification of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm.To examine CT patterns of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN), analyze their correlation with pathologic classification, and discuss the value of CT in the diagnosis and differential diagnosis of IPMN.CT patterns of 39 IPMN patients, whose clinical data were complete and whose diagnosis was confirmed by surgery and pathology, were classified into three types: (1) simple main pancreatic duct (MPD) dilation type, (2) MPD dilation with pancreatic cystic lesion type, and (3) simple pancreatic cystic lesion type. Correlations between the three CT types and Takada pathologic classification (MPD type, furcation type and mixture type) were analyzed. The 39 IPMN cases were pathologically classified as the benign group and the malignant/borderline group. CT characteristics including the presence or absence of mural nodules, intrafocal partitions, focal size and the degree of MPD and common bile duct (CBD) dilation were analyzed statistically.A correlation was found between the CT simple MPD dilation type and the pathological MPD type, between the MPD dilation with pancreatic cystic lesion type and the furcation and mixture types, and between the simple cystic lesion type and the furcation type (p<0.001). The benign rate was 92% in patients without intrafocal mural nodules, and 42% in patients with intrafocal mural nodules. The difference between the two groups was statistically significant (p=0.003). The presence or absence of intrafocal partitions was not correlated with benignancy or malignancy (p=0.793). The maximum diameter of malignant/borderline lesions was bigger than that of benign ones (p=0.016). There was no significant difference in MPD and CBD diameters between the benign and malignant/borderline groups. Regardless of pathological classification, the MPD diameter was larger than the CBD diameter in all cases (p=0.02).The three CT types of IPMN well correlated with the pathologic classification, which is helpful for analyzing CT manifestations and improving the accuracy of diagnosis. MPD dilation is usually larger than CBD dilation in IPMN patients, which is also helpful in the diagnosis and differential diagnosis of IPMN in the context of other related findings.Factors predictive of adverse events associated with endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration of pancreatic solid lesions.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) provides high diagnostic accuracy with a low incidence of procedural complications. However, it occasionally causes serious complications, and factors that increase the susceptibility to such adverse events remain unknown.We aimed to examine post-procedural events and determine risk factors associated with EUS-FNA of pancreatic solid lesions.This single-center retrospective study included 316 consecutive patients with pancreatic solid lesions who underwent 327 EUS-FNA procedures from April 2003 to September 2011. We registered all patients undergoing EUS-FNA in the database and retrospectively ascertained the presence/absence of post-procedural adverse events.The incidence of post-procedural adverse events, including moderate to mild pancreatitis, mild abdominal pain, and mild bleeding, was 3.4 %. Univariate analysis showed that the incidence of post-procedural events was significantly increased in patients with tumors less than or equal to 20 mm in diameter (P < 0.001), those with pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (PNET) (P = 0.012), and patients who had intervening normal pancreas for accessing the lesion (P = 0.048). Multivariate analysis identified tumors measuring less than or equal to 20 mm in diameter (OR 18.48; 95 % CI 3.55-96.17) and case of PNETs (OR 36.50; 95 % CI 1.73-771.83) were an independent risk factors.EUS-FNA of pancreatic solid lesions is a safe procedure. However, pancreatic lesions with small diameters and pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors are important factors associated with adverse events after EUS-FNA.Endoscopic ultrasound guided fine needle aspiration of malignant pancreatic lesions.To evaluate the accuracy, safety, and clinical utility of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) of pancreatic masses.Forty-seven patients were referred for EUS with a pancreatic mass and suspicion of pancreatic cancer based upon painless obstructive jaundice, epigastric abdominal pain plus weight loss/anorexia, or idiopathic pancreatitis. All patients underwent EUS with both radial (Olympus UM20) and linear array (Pentax FG32-UA) systems. After TNM staging by EUS, ultrasound directed FNA of the pancreatic mass was performed using a 23 gauge, 4 cm long needle.EUS-guided FNA was performed in all 47 patients. Results: successful targeting = 100%, adequate cellularity = 100%,adeno Ca = 25, squamous cell Ca = 1, lymphoma = 1, poorly differentiated Ca= 1, atypical cytology or suspicious for carcinoma = 9, no malignant cells = 10. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of EUS-guided pancreatic FNA for the diagnosis of malignancy was 64%, 100%, 100% and 16% respectively.EUS with FNA is useful for detection of malignancy in a pancreatic mass. The procedure appears to have a complication rate of 2%. Impact of this technique on clinical management of patients needs further evaluation.Value of 18-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography in the management of patients with cystic tumors of the pancreas.To assess the reliability of 18-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (18-FDG PET) in distinguishing benign from malignant cystic lesions of the pancreas.The preoperative differential diagnosis of cystic lesions of the pancreas remains difficult: the most important point is to identify malignant or premalignant cysts that require resection. 18-FDG PET is a new imaging procedure based on the increased glucose metabolism by tumor cells and has been proposed for the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer.During a 4-year period, 56 patients with a suspected cystic tumor of the pancreas underwent 18-FDG PET in addition to computed tomography scanning, serum CA 19-9 assay, and in some instances magnetic resonance imaging or endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography. The 18-FDG PET was analyzed visually and semiquantitatively using the standard uptake value. The accuracy of 18-FDG PET and computed tomography was determined for preoperative diagnosis of a malignant cyst.Seventeen patients had malignant tumors. Sixteen patients (94%) showed 18-FDG uptake with a standard uptake value of 2.6 to 12.0. Twelve patients (70%) were correctly identified as having malignancy by computed tomography, CA 19-9 assay, or both. Thirty-nine patients had benign tumors: only one mucinous cystadenoma showed increased 18-FDG uptake (standard uptake value 2.6). Five patients with benign cysts showed computed tomography findings of malignancy. Sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for 18-FDG PET and computed tomography scanning in detecting malignant tumors were 94%, 97%, 94%, and 97% and 65%, 87%, 69%, and 85%, respectively.18-FDG PET is more accurate than computed tomography in identifying malignant pancreatic cystic lesions and should be used, in combination with computed tomography and tumor markers assay, in the preoperative evaluation of patients with pancreatic cystic lesions. A positive result on 18-FDG PET strongly suggests malignancy and, therefore, a need for resection; a negative result shows a benign tumor that may be treated with limited resection or, in selected high-risk patients, with biopsy, follow-up, or both.Efficacy of endoscopic ultrasound guided fine needle aspiration in patients with solid pancreatic neoplasms.Endosonography is a distinct method for evaluating the structural lesions of the gastrointestinal (GI) tract, particularly the pancreatobilliary region. This procedure has made a fundamental change in the diagnosis of pancreatic mass lesion through providing fine needle aspiration. This study aims at evaluating the results and efficacy of endoscopic ultrasound fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in patients with pancreatic solid mass.The present study is an observational, prospective case series nature, evaluated patients with pancreatic solid mass referred to Imam Khomeini educational hospital in Tehran for a duration of one year since November 2010. In order to determine the false negative cases, the patients were followed-up from 6 to 12 months.EUS-FNA was conducted on all 53 patients without any complication. The majority of patients included in the study were males (68%) and 81% of patients had a mass in the head of pancreas. The result of cytopathology revealed 36 adenocarcinomas (68%), 7 other malignancies (13%), benign lesions (6%) and 7 non-diagnostic cases (13%). The frequency of non-diagnostic results was significantly high in masses smaller than 3 cm (6 vs. 1, P < 0.002). Patients with non-diagnostic result were younger than those with malignant cytopathology (52 ± 7.5 vs. 66 ± 7.5 years, P < 0.001).. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and accuracy of this procedure concerning Adenocarcinoma were 88%, 100%, 100%, 70% and 90%, respectively.EUS - FNA is an effective and safe procedure in histopathologic diagnosis of pancreatic tumors. This procedure is useful in all pancreatic mass cases including resectable and non-resectable ones.Contrast-Enhanced Endoscopic Ultrasonography for Pancreatic Tumors.To investigate the usefulness of contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasonography (CE-EUS) for histological differentiation of pancreatic tumors.CE-EUS was performed for consecutive patients having a pancreatic solid lesion, and tumors were classified into three vascular patterns (hypervascular, isovascular, and hypovascular) at two time phases (early-phase and late-phase). Correlation between vascular patterns and histopathology of resected pancreatic cancer (PC) tissues was ascertained.The final diagnoses of 147 examined tumors were PC (n = 109), inflammatory mass (n = 11), autoimmune pancreatitis (n = 9), neuroendocrine tumor (n = 8), and others (n = 10). In late-phase images, 104 of 109 PCs had the hypovascular pattern, for a diagnostic sensitivity and specificity of 94% and 71%, respectively. Of 28 resected PCs, 10 had isovascular, and 18 hypovascular, patterns on the early-phase image. Early-phase isovascular PCs were more likely to be differentiated than were early-phase hypovascular PCs (6 well and 4 moderately differentiated versus 3 well, 14 moderately, and 1 poorly differentiated, P = 0.028). Immunostaining revealed that hypovascular areas of early-phase images reflected heterogeneous tumor cells with fibrous tissue, necrosis, and few vessels.CE-EUS could be useful for distinguishing PC from other solid pancreatic lesions and for histological differentiation of PCs.CT diagnosis of intraductal papillary neoplasm of the pancreas in comparison with histopathologic findings.The existence of excrescent nodules in the cystic component of intraductal papillary neoplasms (IPN) on computed tomography (CT) is useful for differentiating between malignant and benign lesions.We sought to evaluate the ability of CT to differentiate malignant from benign lesions in IPN of the pancreas.CT findings in 20 cases of IPN (11 benign and 9 malignant lesions) were compared with histopathological findings from subsequent surgery.The size of the cystic portion on CT did not correlate with the malignant potential of the lesion. Seven (78%) of 9 malignant lesions had excrescent nodules on CT, whereas 1 (9%) of 11 benign lesions did.International Consensus Guidelines parameters for the prediction of malignancy in intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm are not properly weighted and are not cumulative.The International Consensus Guidelines (ICG) stratify risk for malignancy in patients with intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) into three progressive categories according to whether patients show 'no criteria', 'worrisome features' (WFs) or 'high-risk stigmata' (HRS).This study was conducted to test the hypothesis that type (clinical versus radiological) and quantity of ICG WFs and HRS carry unequal weight and are not cumulative in the prediction of risk for malignancy or invasiveness in IPMN.A retrospective review of a prospectively maintained database of patients who underwent surgical resection for IPMN at a single, university-based medical centre during 1992-2012 was performed. Differences that achieved a P-value of <0.05 were considered significant.Of 362 patients, 340 were eligible for entry into the study and were categorized as demonstrating no criteria (n = 70), WFs (n = 185) or HRS (n = 85). Patients in the WFs group had higher rates of malignant and invasive IPMN than those in the no-criteria group [26.5% versus 4.3% (P < 0.0001) and 15.7% versus 4.3% (P = 0.02), respectively]. Patients in the HRS group had higher rates of malignant and invasive IPMN than those in the WFs group [56.5% versus 26.5% (P = 0.0001) and 42.4% versus 15.7% (P = 0.0001), respectively]. When radiological parameters only were considered for WFs versus HRS, no difference was found in rates of malignant or invasive IPMN. By contrast, when clinical parameters only were considered, patients in the HRS group had higher rates of malignant or invasive IPMN [66.7% versus 8.1% (P = 0.04) and 66.7% versus 2.7% (P = 0.01), respectively]. There was no stepwise increase in rates of malignant or invasive IPMN with the number of WFs. However, patients with only one WF had a lower risk for malignancy than patients with two or more WFs.The type and quantity of ICG WFs and HRS carry unequal weight and are not cumulative in the prediction of risk for malignancy or invasiveness in IPMN.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration with cyst fluid analysis in pancreatic cystic neoplasms.Pancreatic cystic neoplasms represent a heterogeneous group of tumors with varied malignant potential. The aim of this prospective study was to evaluate EUS, EUS-FNA and cyst fluid analysis in distinguishing serous cystadenomas (SCA) and mucinous cystic neoplasms (MCN).Twelve patients with SCA (4 men, 8 women, mean age 58), 16 with MCN (3 men, 13 women, mean age 53) and 10 pancreatic non-tumorous cysts as controls (1 man, 9 women, mean age 43) were investigated by EUS-FNA from January 2003 to February 2006. Cyst fluid evaluation was done for cytology, amylase, CEA, CA 19-9, CA 72-4 and CA 15-3 (RIA). The final diagnosis was based on surgery & histology (14 patients) and/or follow-up after EUS-FNA (mean 15 months).In the MCN-group 13 mucinous cystadenomas, 2 cystadenocarcinomas and 1 malignant IPMT were found. EUS-FNA results: cytology (including staining for mucin) was diagnostic in 2/12 SCA (17%), 10/16 MCN (63%) and negative in all controls. Fluid CEA in MCN-group (mean 9487, 95%CI 0-23637) was significantly higher compared both with SCA-group (mean 22, 95%CI 0-54, p<0.001) and controls (mean 4, 95%CI 0.5-8, p<0.001). Similar results were found in fluid CA72-4 and fluid CA19-9. Accuracy of EUS-FNA with final diagnosis was 93%.EUS-FNA with cyst fluid CEA, CA72-4, CA19-9 and cytology are useful tools in differentiating SCA, MCN and non-tumorous cysts.Diagnostic ability and factors affecting accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration for pancreatic solid lesions: Japanese large single center experience.Several studies have investigated the diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) for pancreatic lesions, but they have included only limited patient populations. This study aimed to clarify the diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA in a large number of pancreatic lesions, and to describe the factors that influence it.From March 1997 to May 2010, 944 consecutive patients who had undergone EUS-FNA for pancreatic solid lesions were evaluated retrospectively. Factors affecting EUS-FNA accuracy were then analyzed.A total of 996 solid pancreatic lesions were sampled by EUS-FNA. The overall sampling adequacy and diagnostic accuracy of these lesions were 99.3 % (989/996) and 91.8 % (918/996), respectively. The sensitivity and specificity for differentiating malignant from benign lesions were 91.5 % (793/867) and 97.7 % (126/129), respectively. The diagnostic performance was significantly higher when both cytological and cell-block examinations were carried out than with only cytological examination. In multivariate analysis, final diagnosis, location of lesion, lesion size, availability of on-site cytopathological evaluation, and experience of EUS-FNA procedure were independent factors affecting the accuracy of EUS-FNA. On-site cytopathological evaluation and lesion size were found to be the most weighted factors affecting diagnostic accuracy.EUS-FNA for pancreatic solid lesions yielded a high accuracy and low complication rate. Both cytological and cell-block preparations and on-site cytopathological evaluation contributed to improve the accuracy. The diagnostic ability of EUS-FNA was less for smaller lesions, and repeated procedures may be needed if malignancy is suspected.Small and potentially resectable focal pancreatic lesions noted on CT/MRI scans in nonjaundiced patients: likelihood of neoplasia and utility of EUS.Management of small and potentially resectable "mass" lesions encountered on CT/MRI scans in patients without obstructive jaundice (ObJ) is rather empirical since there is scant data on likelihood of neoplasm to formulate treatment strategies. We evaluated (1) the prevalence of neoplasm and (2) performance characteristics of EUS-FNA for diagnosing neoplasm in above-mentioned subset of patients.This is a retrospective analysis of 232 patients (without ObJ) with a focal pancreatic lesion, ≤ 25 mm and potentially resectable on CT/MRI who underwent EUS-FNA from 2002 to 2009.Seventy-five patients (32.3%, 95% CI 26.6, 38.6) were finally diagnosed to have a neoplasm. Four of 92 (4.3%) lesions ≤ 15 mm, 13 of 57(22.8%) lesions 16-20 mm, and 35 of 83 (42.1%) lesions 21-25 mm had an adenocarcinoma. Larger lesion size, older patient age, and h/o recent weight loss significantly increased the likelihood of adenocarcinoma. EUS-FNA had 98.2% overall accuracy and 98.1% NPV with no significant differences based on lesion size.In nonjaundiced patient with a potentially resectable pancreatic lesion ≤25 mm in size noted on CT/MRI scanning, EUS-FNA can provide useful adjunctive information to optimize the use of surgery and can potentially obviate the need for "wait and watch approach" with repeat imaging in their clinical management.Comparison of contrast-enhanced sonography and MRI in displaying anatomic features of cystic pancreatic masses.The purpose of this study was to compare the accuracy rates of unenhanced sonography, contrast-enhanced sonography, and MRI in displaying the anatomic features of cystic pancreatic masses larger than 1.5 mm in diameter.Unenhanced and contrast-enhanced sonographic and MRI examinations of 33 patients who underwent resection of a cystic pancreatic mass were retrospectively reviewed. Two radiologists blinded to the final histologic diagnosis reviewed the images, specifically assessing the presence of intralesional mural nodules and septa. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy were calculated on the basis of correlation with surgical findings. Results of unenhanced sonography, contrast-enhanced sonography, and MRI were compared by McNemar test. Correlation of unenhanced and contrast-enhanced sonographic versus pathologic results was established with Spearman's test. Interobserver variability was determined.Contrast-enhanced sonography correctly depicted intralesional septa in 14 of 15 lesions (sensitivity, 93.3%; specificity, 88.8%; positive predictive value, 87.5%; negative predictive value, 94.1%; accuracy, 90.9%) and nodules in six of eight lesions (sensitivity, 75%; specificity, 96%; positive predictive value, 85.7%; negative predictive value, 92.3%; accuracy, 90.9%). MRI correctly depicted intralesional septa in 14 of 15 lesions (sensitivity, 93.3%; specificity, 61.1%; positive predictive value, 66.6%; negative predictive value, 91.6%; accuracy, 75.7%) and nodules in seven of eight lesions (sensitivity, 87.5%; specificity, 80%; positive predictive value, 58.3%; negative predictive value, 95.2%; accuracy, 81.8%). The difference between the diagnostic accuracy of contrast-enhanced sonography and that of MRI was not significant (p = 0.05, McNemar test) in the identification of septa and nodules. The correlation between contrast-enhanced sonographic findings and pathologic results (Rs = 0.93; p < 0.001) was significantly better than that between sonographic and pathologic results (Rs = 0.52; p < 0.0001). Interobserver agreement had a kappa value of 0.86-0.94.Contrast-enhanced sonography compares favorably with MRI in displaying the anatomic features of cystic pancreatic masses seen on transabdominal sonography.Value of endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) in the diagnosis of neoplastic tumor(-like) pancreatic lesions in daily clinical practice.To investigate the value of EUS-guided FNA in the diagnosis of solid and cystic pancreatic tumor(-like) lesions as well as metastatic tumor growth within peripancreatic lymph nodes and its impact on therapeutic decision-making. The results of the cytologic and pathohistological investigation were compared with i) each other and ii) the detection rates of various imaging procedures.Overall, 153 patients (mean age, 56.9 years) underwent EUS-guided FNA from I/ 2000 - III/ 2003.Comparing various imaging procedures such as CT scan (80 %), MRI (57.1 %) and abdominal US (88.8 %), EUS achieved the highest diagnostic accuracy: 100 %. For EUS-based T-staging in 26 patients with malignant tumor lesions undergoing surgical intervention, there was a sensitivity of 73.3 % (specificity, 85.9 %; PPV, 69.2 %; NPV, 84.4 %), while the parameters for N-staging (n = 25) were: sensitivity, 61.5 %; specificity, 75 %; NPV, 64.3 %; PPV, 72.7 %. While the sensitivity of EUS-guided FNA in the group of patients who underwent surgical intervention (n = 55) was 81.4 % (specificity, 75 %; PPV, 92.1 %; NPV, 52.9 %), the parameters were as follows in the subgroup of individuals with chronic pancreatitis (n = 30): sensitivity in detecting a malignant pancreatic tumor lesion, 50 %; specificity, 91.7 %; PPV, 60 %; NPV, 88 %. Based on preoperative characteristics such as suspected diagnosis, TNM stage and tumor entity, a surgical intervention could be avoided in 29 / 153 patients (19 %).EUS-guided FNA allows more precise diagnosis clarification (malignant tumor growth and tumor entity) in solid and cystic pancreatic tumor(-like) lesions, which may assist in early and sufficient therapeutic decision-making.Diagnostic value of unusual gross appearance of aspirated material from endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration of pancreatic and peripancreatic cystic lesions.To evaluate the diagnostic value of the gross appearance of aspirated material from endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) of pancreatic orperipancreatic cystic lesions.This study focuses on nonneoplastic (peri)-pancreatic cystic lesions on EUS-FNA. Eight cases were identified with distinct gross appearances of aspirated material by the authors' experience and by computerized review. Gross observations are evaluated together with clinical data, radiologic findings, laboratory markers and cytologic and surgical microscopy findings.Aspiration of cystic lesions often results in nonspecific cytologic findings. Gross and microscopic appearance of aspirated material can provide valuable information. We divide findings of 8 cystic lesions into 3 different patterns according to their gross appearance at on-site EUS-FNA: Pattern 1, 2 cases of biloma; Pattern 2, 1 case of lymphoepithelial cyst with sebaceous differentiation; Pattern 3, 3 cases of regular lymphoepithelial cysts and 2 cases ofpancreatic pseudocyst.The full value of FNA is achieved only with the integrated approach, including the gross appearance of the cytology specimens. Certain unusual gross appearances of the aspirated material can add valuable information toward a pathologic diagnosis.Intraductal papillary-mucinous tumors of the pancreas: differential diagnosis between benign and malignant tumors by endoscopic ultrasonography.Recently, intraductal papillary-mucinous tumor (IPMT) of the pancreas has increasingly been recognized. However, differential diagnosis between benign and malignant IPMT is often difficult using conventional imaging modalities. The purpose of this study was to retrospectively investigate the value of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) for differentiating malignant from benign IPMT.A total of 51 patients with IPMT were preoperatively examined by EUS. The endosonograhic findings were compared with histopathological findings of the resected specimens.In main duct type IPMT, the diameter of the main pancreatic duct (MPD) was > or =10 mm in seven of the eight malignant tumors, compared with two of the seven benign tumors (p < 0.05). In branch duct type IPMT, three of the four large tumors (>40 mm) with irregular thick septa were malignant lesions. In both main duct type IPMT and branch duct IPMT, eight patients had large mural nodules (>10 mm); seven of the eight tumors were malignant and one of the eight tumors was benign. When the tumor was diagnosed as malignant according to above three findings, EUS was able to differentiate between malignant and benign IPMT with an accuracy of 86%.Main duct type tumors with > or =10 mm dilated MPD, branch duct type tumors (>40 mm) with irregular septa, and large mural nodules (>10 mm) strongly suggest malignancy on EUS. EUS would be a useful modality for differentiating between benign and malignant IPMT.Quantitative analysis of diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging of the pancreas: usefulness in characterizing solid pancreatic masses.To evaluate whether measurement of apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC) and pure diffusion coefficient (D) can help to characterize solid pancreatic masses.Diffusion-weighted MR imaging was performed in both a patient group (n = 71; pancreatic cancer [n = 47], mass-forming pancreatitis [n = 13], solid pseudopapillary neoplasm [n = 6], and neuroendocrine tumor [n = 5]) and a normal control group (n = 11) by applying three b-factors of 0, 500, and 1000 sec/mm(2). ADC(500), ADC(1000), D (ADC using b = 500 and 1000 sec/mm(2)), and perfusion fraction (f, 1- exp [-500 sec/mm(2) x (ADC(500) - D)]) of normal pancreas, pancreatic cancer, and mass-forming pancreatitis were compared using the Kruskal-Wallis test. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis was performed to evaluate the diagnostic performance and optimal cutoff value of these parameters in differentiating pancreatic cancer from mass-forming pancreatitis.Normal pancreas had significantly higher mean ADC(500), ADC(1000), and f than either pancreatic cancer (P < 0.001, < 0.001, and 0.004, respectively) or mass-forming pancreatitis (P < 0.001, < 0.001, and 0.002, respectively). ADC(500), ADC(1000), and D of mass-forming pancreatitis were significantly lower than those of pancreatic cancer (P = 0.002, 0.004, and 0.014, respectively). Sensitivities and specificities in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer were 72.3% and 76.9% for ADC(500), 87.2% and 69.2% for ADC(1000), 87.2% and 61.5% for D, and 42.6% and 92.3% for f, respectively.Measurement of ADC and D may be helpful in differentiating pancreatic cancers from mass-forming pancreatitis.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration for diagnosis of solid pseudopapillary tumors of the pancreas: a multicenter experience.Solid pseudopapillary tumors of the pancreas are rare, low-grade, epithelial neoplasms that are usually discovered incidentally in young women. Distinguishing solid pseudopapillary tumors from other pancreatic tumors, especially pancreatic endocrine tumors, can be challenging. The role of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in this context remains unclear. The purpose of this study was to describe the endoscopic ultrasound features of solid pseudopapillary tumors and the role of EUS-FNA in the preoperative diagnosis of these tumors.Patients from five tertiary referral centers with surgically confirmed solid pseudopapillary tumors who had undergone preoperative EUS-FNA were included. The endoscopic ultrasound findings, cytologic descriptions, immunostaining results, operative records, surgical pathology, and results of the most recent clinical follow-up were reviewed.A total of 28 patients were identified (four men [14 %], 24 women [86 %], mean age +/- standard deviation [SD] 35 +/- 10 years). Solid pseudopapillary tumors had been found as incidental findings on cross-sectional imaging in 50 % of cases. The mean tumor size +/- SD was 42 +/- 19.5 mm and the majority were located in the pancreatic body and tail. The endoscopic ultrasound report described a well-defined, echo-poor mass in 86 %; the tumors were solid in 14 patients (50 %), mixed solid and cystic in 11 patients (39 %), and cystic in three patients (11 %). A preoperative diagnosis of solid pseudopapillary tumor was made in 21 patients (75 %) on the basis of EUS-FNA cytology. Surgical resection was performed in all cases. Laparoscopic resection was performed in eight of these patients (29 %).A solid pseudopapillary tumor should be included in the differential diagnosis of any well-demarcated, echo-poor, solid or mixed solid/cystic pancreatic lesion seen during endoscopic ultrasound, particularly in young women. The diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA for solid pseudopapillary tumors was 75 % in this study. A definitive preoperative diagnosis can guide the surgical approach in selected cases.The role of pancreatic cyst fluid molecular analysis in predicting cyst pathology.Current methods to detect malignancy in mucinous cystic neoplasms of the pancreas remain inadequate. The role of detailed molecular analysis in this context was investigated.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided pancreatic cyst aspirates were prospectively collected during a period of 19 months and studied for cytology, carcinoembryonic antigen level, and molecular analysis. Molecular evaluation incorporated DNA quantification (amount and quality), k-ras point mutation, and broad panel tumor suppressor linked microsatellite marker allelic loss analysis by using fluorescent capillary electrophoresis. The sequence of mutation acquisition was also calculated on the basis of a clonal expansion model, and comparison was made to the final pathology.Thirty-six cysts with confirmed histology were analyzed. There were 11 malignant, 15 premalignant, and 10 benign cysts. Malignant cysts could be differentiated from premalignant cysts on the basis of fluid carcinoembryonic antigen level (P=.034), DNA quality (P=.009), number of mutations (P=.002), and on the sequence of mutations acquired (P<.001). Early k-ras mutation followed by allelic loss was the most predictive of a malignant cyst (sensitivity, 91%; specificity, 93%).Malignant cyst fluid contains adequate DNA to allow mutational analysis. A first hit k-ras mutation followed by allelic loss is most predictive of the presence of malignancy in a pancreatic cyst. This approach should serve as an ancillary tool to the conventional work-up of pancreatic cysts. Cumulative amount and timing of detectable mutational damage can assist in diagnosis and clinical management.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided trucut biopsy of the cyst wall for diagnosing cystic pancreatic tumors.Nonoperative methods for diagnosis of pancreas cysts often lack sufficient accuracy. Accurate diagnosis is needed to determine prognosis and guide clinical management. The aim of this study was to determine whether the tissue obtained by endoscopic ultrasound-guided trucut biopsy (EUS TCB) is sufficient for histologic diagnosis of cystic pancreatic tumors (CPTs).EUS TCB was performed in patients with a suspected CPT. A dedicated gastrointestinal pathologist reviewed the core biopsies. The final diagnosis was based on clinical, laboratory, imaging, and biopsy findings, and resected specimens when available.EUS TCB was performed in 10 patients with a suspected CPT. Final diagnoses included serous cystadenoma (SCA, n=5), islet cell tumor (n=2), mixed seromucinous lesion (n=1), polycystic disease of the pancreas (n=1), and pseudocyst (n=1). EUS TCB was nondiagnostic in 3 of 10 patients. Among the other 7 patients, TCB diagnosed 4 SCAs, obviating the need for planned surgery in 3 patients. In the fourth patient with an SCA, the TCB result ruled out metastatic disease from locally recurrent lung cancer, allowing a narrowed radiation field. EUS TCB confirmed the need for surgery in 2 patients with an islet cell tumor. In 1 patient, EUS TCB findings were "partially" diagnostic, leading to previously unplanned surgery.This report establishes the capability and safety of EUS TCB to collect sufficient tissue for diagnosing CPTs. The results might help guide clinical management.Decision making for pancreatic resection in patients with intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms.To identify a practical approach for preoperative decision-making in patients with intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) of the pancreas.Between March 1999 and November 2006, the clinical characteristics, pathological data and computed tomography/magnetic resonance imaging (CT/MRI) of 54 IPMNs cases were retrieved and analyzed. The relationships between the above data and decision-making for pancreatic resection were analyzed using SPSS 13.0 software. Univariate analysis of risk factors for malignant or invasive IPMNs was performed with regard to the following variables: carcinoembryonic antigen, carbohydrate antigen 19-9 (CA19-9) and the characteristics from CT/MRI images. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis for pancreatic resection was performed using significant factors from the univariate analysis.CT/MRI images, including main and mixed duct IPMNs, tumor size > 30 mm or a solid component appearance in the lesion, and preoperative serum CA19-9 > 37 U/mL had good predictive value for determining pancreatic resection (P < 0.05), but with limitations. Combining the above factors (CT/MRI images and CA19-9) improved the accuracy and sensitivity for determining pancreatic resection in IPMNs. Using ROC analysis, the area under the curve reached 0.893 (P < 0.01, 95%CI: 0.763-1.023), with a sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of 95.2%, 83.3%, 95.2% and 83.3%, respectively.Combining preoperative CT/MRI images and CA19-9 level may provide useful information for surgical decision-making in IPMNs.A comparative analysis of pancreas cyst fluid CEA and histology with DNA mutational analysis in the detection of mucin producing or malignant cysts.The main objective of pancreatic cyst fluid analysis is to differentiate mucin-producing or malignant cysts from other cysts which have a benign course. K-ras-2 point mutation and at least two mutations of allelic imbalance or loss of heterozygosity with good quality DNA has been suggested to predict mucinous cystic neoplasm (MCN). Elevated carcinogenic embryonic antigen (CEA) level in cyst fluid has also been shown to be predictive of mucinous or malignant cysts.Identify the clinical impact of DNA mutational analysis of pancreatic cyst fluid with its correlation to cyst fluid chemistry and histologic analysis.This retrospective analysis included all consecutive patients with pancreatic cysts who presented for evaluation by endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) with fine needle aspiration (FNA) over an 18 month period until November 2007.DNA analysis performed by Pathfinder TG (RedPath Integrated Pathology, Inc., Pittsburgh, PA, USA) and fluid CEA exceeding 192 ng/dL were used to suggest mucinous or malignant cysts. These parameters were compared to surgical histology or cytopathology of FNA specimens.Twenty-seven consecutive patients with cysts had samples submitted for DNA analysis which included 15 men and 12 women (mean age 62.8 and 61.3 years, respectively). In 20 patients, all parameters including cyst fluid, DNA analysis, and histology were available for comparison. Consistent findings were seen in 7/20 (35%) in which all parameters suggested negative benign findings. CEA level was elevated in 7 patients of which 4 had mucinous or malignant histology. In the remaining 13 patients with low CEA levels, 11 had negative histology. The sensitivity and specificity of CEA based on these results was 66% and 78.6% respectively. The positive predictive value (PPV) of CEA was 57% and the negative predictive value (NPV) was 84.6%. K-ras-2 mutation was detected in 3 patients, absent in 17 patients and falsely negative in 4 cases based on histology. The sensitivity and specificity were 33% and 92.6% respectively. The PPV was 66% and NPV was 76%. Detection of loss of heterozygosity mutations was noted in 7 patients, of which 4 were falsely positive. In the remaining 13 patients, 3 were falsely negative. The sensitivity and specificity were 50% and 71% respectively. The PPV was 42.9% and NPV was 76.9%. In a group of 6 patients with available surgical histology demonstrating mucin-producing or malignant cysts, fluid CEA level had a sensitivity of 66.7%. However, K-ras-2 and loss of heterozygosity mutational analysis had a much lower sensitivity at 33% and 50% respectively.Consistency in histology, CEA levels, and K-ras-2 and loss of heterozygosity mutations was seen in only 35% of cases, all of which were benign cysts. In the detection of malignant cysts, elevated CEA levels were more predictive of histology in comparison to K-ras-2 or loss of heterozygosity mutations. Additionally, false positivity of loss of heterozygosity mutations was noted to be considerably higher than K-ras-2 mutations or even fluid CEA levels. These findings suggest that DNA mutation analysis should not be used routinely but rather selectively in the evaluation of pancreatic cysts.Role of cystic fluid in diagnosis of the pancreatic cystadenoma and cystadenocarcinoma.Early and accurate diagnosis of cystic neoplasm of the pancreas is difficult especially for the differentiation of benign or malignancy. In this study, we try to compare EUS-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy combined with measurement of the cyst fluid and serum levels of CEA, and CA19-9 for the preoperative diagnosis of pancreatic cystadenoma or cystadenocarcinoma.Retrospective analysis was made on the clinical data of 37 patients with pancreatic cystadenoma and 48 patients with cystadenocarcinoma from 1998 to 2005.Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), and CA19-9 of the cyst fluid and serum combined with EUS-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy was made. Examination of serum CEA, and CA19-9 resulted in 21.0+/-18.0, 2.7+/-1.7 U/L and 18.7+/-17.5, 269.0+/-182.0 U/L for cystadenoma and cystadenocarcinoma respectively (P<0.05). The sensitivity of cyst fluid combined with biopsy was higher than that of a single marker. However, the sensitivity and specificity of tumor markers of cystic fluid were much higher than that of the serum (P<0.05).EUS-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy combined with examination of cyst fluid level of CEA and CA19-9 will be a credible means for early diagnosis of pancreatic cystadenoma and cystadenocarcinoma.Differential diagnosis of cystic tumors of the pancreas by endoscopic ultrasonography.Generally, cystic tumors are divided into two categories: neoplastic cystic tumors and non-neoplastic cystic (NNC) tumors. Neoplastic cystic tumors include mucinous cystic neoplasm (MCN), intraductal papillary-mucinous neoplasm (IPMN), and serous cystic neoplasm (SCN). MCNs and IPMNs have the potential to progress to a malignant state, whereas SCNs are known for their almost benign behavior. Thus, in order to make management decisions, it is important to distinguish between potentially malignant (MCN and IPMN), and benign (SCN and NNC) tumors. The aim of this study was to retrospectively investigate the value of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) for the differential diagnosis of cystic tumors of the pancreas.A total of 76 patients with cystic tumors of the pancreas were preoperatively examined by EUS. Eight cases were MCNs, 45 were IPMNs, 13 were SCNs, and 10 were NNC tumors. The EUS findings relevant to distinguishing between potentially malignant and benign were analyzed statistically.All patients with MCNs were female and all these tumors were located in the pancreatic body/tail. IPMN, however, occurred predominantly in men, and in the pancreatic head. Eight of 11 monolocular cystic tumors were NNC in nature. Eleven of 13 SCNs included microcystic areas within the tumors. All MCNs were round in appearance, whereas 93 % of IPMNs were not round in appearance. Mural nodules were present in 25 % of MCN and 38 % of IPMN cases. In univariate analysis, age, tumor size, locularity, the number of cystic formation, cystic component, and appearance were significant variables. In multivariate analysis, locularity and cystic component were important for differential diagnosis of potentially malignant cystic tumors.The characteristics of cystic tumors of the pancreas revealed by EUS are useful for their differential diagnosis.Preliminary experience comparing routine cytology results with the composite results of digital image analysis and fluorescence in situ hybridization in patients undergoing EUS-guided FNA.Studies indicate enhanced diagnostic accuracy for digital image analysis (DIA) and fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) versus routine cytology examination (RC) when biliary strictures are evaluated. These tumor markers have not been applied to EUS-guided FNA.Our purpose was to determine the accuracy of RC versus the composite results of DIA/FISH.Patients enrolled with known or suspected malignancy. The final diagnosis was based on strict cytopathologic and imaging criteria and 12-month follow-up.Tertiary referral center.A total of 39 patients were enrolled in whom each diagnostic test was performed on samples from 42 sites to evaluate lymphadenopathy (n=19), pancreatic mass (n=19), esophageal or gastric wall mass (n=3), and thyroid mass (n=1).EUS-guided FNA with RC, DIA, and FISH.Diagnostic accuracy of RC, DIA, and FISH.Malignancy was diagnosed in 30 of 42 patients, including esophageal squamous cell carcinoma, esophageal adenocarcinoma, gastric adenocarcinoma, pancreatic adenocarcinoma, pancreatic mucinous cystic neoplasia, intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasia, metastatic forearm sarcoma, small cell and non-small cell lung cancer, thyroid carcinoma, malignant GI stromal tumor, melanoma, adenocarcinoma of unknown primary, and lymphoma. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of DIA/FISH versus RC for detecting malignancy were 97%, 100%, and 98% versus 87%, 100%, and 90%, respectively.Single-center pilot study.Our findings suggest that DIA and FISH processing of EUS-guided FNA specimens provides higher diagnostic accuracy than RC does. These data suggest that these tumor markers incorporate generic targets as suggested by the high diagnostic sensitivity in this patient cohort with diverse pathologic conditions.Quantitative contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasonography for the discrimination of solid pancreatic masses.Contrast-enhanced harmonic endoscopic ultrasonography (CEH-EUS) for the assessment of microcirculation and the delineation of pancreatic tumors in order to characterize and stage them has only recently become available for commercial use, and few reports have been published. The purpose of the study was the qualitative and quantitative digital image analysis of pancreatic adenocarcinomas using conventional endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and CEH-EUS and the evaluation of whether contrast medium injection modified adenocarcinoma staging and patient management.In each of 30 prospectively examined patients with suspected pancreatic solid lesions, CEH-EUS was performed using the same quantity of the contrast agent SonoVue and a low mechanical index (0.3 - 0.4), followed by EUS-FNA. The histology, based on EUS-FNA or surgery and 9 months of follow-up, was: pancreatic adenocarcinoma (n = 15), pseudotumoral chronic pancreatitis (n = 12), neuroendocrine tumor (n = 1), common bile duct tumor (n = 1), lymph node metastases of gastric cancer (n = 1). The quantitative analysis was based on histograms obtained from each CEH-EUS video recording.CEH-EUS showed a hypoenhanced pattern in 14 cases of adenocarcinoma and in 10 cases of chronic pancreatitis. The index of the contrast uptake ratio was significantly lower in adenocarcinoma than in mass-forming chronic pancreatitis. A cut-off uptake ratio index value of 0.17 for diagnosing adenocarcinoma corresponded to an AUC (CI 95%) of 0.86 (0.67 - 1.00) with a sensitivity of 80%, a specificity of 91.7%, a positive predictive value of 92.8%, and a negative predictive value of 78%. The size of the pancreatic mass was assessed significantly more effectively by CEH-EUS but adenocarcinoma staging was not modified.The majority of cases of both pancreatic adenocarcinoma and chronic pancreatitis were hypoenhanced and visual discrimination was not possible. This is the first study about CEH-EUS for the quantitative assessment of uptake after contrast injection which has shown that it can aid differentiation between benign and malignant masses but cannot replace EUS-FNA. Neither tumor stage nor therapeutic management have changed after contrast medium injection during CEH-EUS.CT vs MRCP: optimal classification of IPMN type and extent.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) of the pancreas are being diagnosed with increased frequency. CT scanning commonly serves as the primary imaging modality before surgery. We hypothesized MRCP provides better characterization of IPMN type/extent, which more closely matches actual pathology.Of 214 patients treated with IPMN (1991-2006), 30 had both preoperative CT and MRCP. Of these, 18 met imaging study criteria. Independent readers performed retrospective, blinded analyses using standardized criteria for IPMN type and extent.A ductal connection was detected on 73% of MRCP scans and only 18% of CT. IPMN type was classified differently in seven (39%); four (22%) of which were read on CT as having main duct involvement where this was not appreciated on MRCP or found on surgical pathology. MRCP showed multifocal disease in 13(72%) versus only 9(50%) on CT. A different disease distribution was seen in 9(50%). Finally, 101 branch lesions were identified on MRCP compared to 46 on CT.CT falls short of MRCP in detecting a ductal connection, estimating main duct involvement, and identification of small branch duct cysts. These factors influence diagnostic accuracy, cancer risk stratification and operative strategy. MRCP should be employed for optimal management of patients with IPMN.Preoperative evaluation of pancreatic masses with positron emission tomography using 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose: diagnostic limitations.Identification of pancreatic cancer in patients presenting with an enlarged pancreatic mass is a major diagnostic problem. Positron emission tomography (PET) using the radiolabeled glucose analogue 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) has been suggested to provide excellent accuracy for noninvasive determination of suspicious pancreatic masses. We conducted a prospective study to verify these results. Forty-two patients admitted for pancreatic surgery underwent PET scanning. Image analysis was based on visual film evaluation and quantification of regional tracer uptake. PET imaging was visually analyzed by three observers blinded for the results of other diagnostic tests; they qualitatively graded the scans using a five-point scale (I = low to V = high) for the presence and intensity of focal FDG uptake. Diagnosis was proven by histology (n = 38) or follow-up (n = 4). Furthermore, the results of PET were compared with helical computed tomography (CT) and conventional ultrasonography (US), done during the routine diagnostic workup before pancreatic cancer surgery. Regarding only the results with scores of IV and V as positive for representing definite malignancy yielded a sensitivity of 71% and a specificity of 64% for film reading. Quantification of regional tracer uptake contributed no significant diagnostic advantage for differentiation between benign and malignant tumors. Helical CT revealed a sensitivity of 74% and a specificity of 45.5% and abdominal US 56% and 50%, respectively. We concluded that PET imaging provides only fair diagnostic accuracy (69%) for characterizing enlarged pancreatic masses. PET does not allow exclusion of malignant tumors. In doubtful cases, the method must be combined with other imaging modalities, such as helical CT. The results indicate that the number of invasive procedures is not significantly reduced by PET imaging.Intravoxel incoherent motion diffusion-weighted MR imaging for characterization of focal pancreatic lesions.To evaluate the diagnostic potential of apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC) and intravoxel incoherent motion (IVIM)-derived parameters for differentiation of common pancreatic tumors, chronic pancreatitis, and normal pancreas and for characterization of the malignancy potential of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs).The institutional review board approved this retrospective study, and informed consent was waived. Ninety-three consecutive patients with surgically resected and pathologically confirmed pancreatic tumors (39 pancreatic adenocarcinomas [PACs], 17 neuroendocrine tumors [NETs], and 37 IPMNs), seven patients with chronic pancreatitis, and 26 patients with a normal pancreas were included in this study. All patients underwent pancreatic 3.0-T magnetic resonance imaging, including IVIM diffusion-weighted imaging with 10 b values used (from 0 to 1000 sec/mm(2)). The ADC, slow component of diffusion (D(slow)), incoherent microcirculation (D(fast)), and perfusion fraction (f) were calculated. Steel-Dwass and Mann-Whitney U tests were used for comparison. The diagnostic performance of the parameters was evaluated by using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis with Bonferroni correction.Among ADC- and IVIM-derived parameters, D(fast) and f values of PACs were significantly lower than those of normal pancreas, chronic pancreatitis, and NETs (all P < .05 in post hoc analyses). For differentiation of PACs from NETs, f and D(fast) showed a significant difference (P < .0001 for both) and were more useful parameters than ADC and D(slow) in ROC analysis (all P < .05). Malignant IPMNs had significantly lower ADC and D(slow) values and higher D(fast) and f values when compared with benign IPMNs (all P < .05). In ROC analysis, f showed the highest area under the ROC curve value for distinguishing malignant from benign IPMNs.IVIM-derived perfusion-related parameters could be helpful for the differentiation of common malignant tumors in the pancreas and for distinguishing malignant from benign IPMNs. D(fast) and f were more valuable parameters in the differentiation of PACs from NETs than were ADC and D(slow).EUS, PET, and CT scanning for evaluation of pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Preoperative diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma can be difficult. Computed tomography (CT) is the standard, noninvasive imaging method for evaluation of suspected pancreatic adenocarcinoma, but it has limited sensitivity for diagnosis, local staging, and metastases. Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and fluoro-deoxyglucose/positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) are imaging methods that may improve diagnostic accuracy.Thirty-five patients with presumed resectable pancreatic adenocarcinoma were prospectively evaluated with helical CT, EUS, and FDG-PET.Sensitivity for the detection of pancreatic cancer was higher for EUS (93%) and FDG-PET (87%) than for CT (53%). EUS was more sensitive than CT for local vascular invasion of the portal and superior mesenteric veins. EUS diagnosis of vascular invasion was associated with poor outcome after surgery. EUS-guided, fine-needle aspiration allowed tissue diagnosis in 14 of 21 attempts (67%). FDG-PET diagnosed 7 of 9 cases of proven metastatic disease, 4 of which were missed by CT. Two of three metastatic liver lesions suspected by CT were indeterminate for metastases. FDG-PET confirmed metastases.EUS and PET improve diagnostic capability in pancreatic adenocarcinoma. EUS is useful in determining local vascular invasion and obtaining tissue diagnosis. FDG-PET is useful in identifying metastatic disease. Both techniques are more sensitive than helical CT for identification of the primary tumor. (Gastrointest Endosc 2000;52:367-71).A new criterion in differentiation of pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma: artery-to-vein ratio using the superior mesenteric vessels.Evaluation of infiltration of the superior mesenteric vein (SMV) and artery (SMA) fat planes has been considered in differentiating pancreatic carcinoma from pancreatitis. Some pancreatitis cases, however, can cause perivascular fat plane obliteration due to extension of the inflammatory process, mimicking appearances of carcinoma. This study investigated the diameters of SMV and SMA on CT scans, just caudal to the origin of SMA and portal confluens, in 68 pancreatitis and in 48 pancreatic carcinoma patients. SMA-to-SMV diameters (A/V diameter) were compared and ratios were obtained. In conclusion, it appears that when the A/V ratio is over 1.0, a malignant condition can be suspected. This may be used as a secondary criterion in the differential diagnosis of pancreatitis and pancreatic carcinoma.A triple approach for diagnostic assessment of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration in pancreatic solid masses and lymph nodes.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) has been becoming the standard tool for acquiring pancreatic lesion tissue. However, a single cytologic or histologic evaluation is not satisfactory for diagnosis. In this study, we evaluated the diagnostic yield of EUS-FNA for pancreatic solid masses and intra-abdominal lymph nodes using a triple approach.This study included patients undergoing evaluation for a solid pancreatic mass (n = 59) or intra-abdominal lymph nodes (n = 16) using EUS-FNA with a 22- or 25-gauge (G) needle, respectively. The specimens from each pass were analyzed by on-site cytology using Diff-Quick stain, cytology using Papanicolaou stain, and histology with immunohistochemical (IHC) staining.A total of 75 patients (49 males; mean age; 63.7 years) were included. The median number of needle pass for diagnosis of malignancy was 2.0, and there was no technical failure. The diagnostic accuracies with on-site cytology, cytology using Papanicolaou staining, and histology were 70.7, 80.0, and 80.0 %, respectively. The diagnostic accuracy using a triple approach was significantly greater than cytology using Papanicolaou staining alone (94.7 vs. 80.0 %; p = 0.007). In patients with malignant lesions, cytology identified 12 of 71 (16.9 %) malignant lesions that were not diagnosed by histology using IHC, and histology identified six (8.5 %) malignant lesions that were not diagnosed by cytology.On-site cytopathologic evaluation combined with cytologic and histologic analysis with IHC stain for one-pass specimen is considered to be able to increase the overall accuracy of EUS-FNA in pancreatic solid masses and lymph nodes.Interobserver agreement among endosonographers for the diagnosis of neoplastic versus non-neoplastic pancreatic cystic lesions.The aim of this study was to evaluate the degree of agreement among endosonographers for EUS diagnosis of neoplastic versus non-neoplastic pancreatic cystic lesions and the specific type of cystic lesion.Videotapes of EUS procedures from 31 consecutive cases of a range of histopathologically proven lesions, including mucinous cystic neoplasm, serous cystadenoma, neuroendocrine tumor, intraductal papillary mucinous tumor, and pseudocyst, were used to make a study videotape, which was reviewed by 8 experienced endosonographers. The reviewers, blinded to clinical and surgical histopathology results, reviewed each case for the presence or absence of the following features: abnormality of pancreatic duct and parenchyma, margins, solid component, debris, and septations. They were asked to identify each lesion as neoplastic or non-neoplastic and to give a specific diagnosis for each lesion.There was fair agreement between endosonographers for diagnosis of neoplastic versus non-neoplastic lesions (kappa = 0.24). Agreement for individual types of lesions was moderately good for serous cystadenomas (kappa = 0.46) but fair for the remainder. Agreement was moderately good for presence or absence of solid component (kappa = 0.43); fair for presence or absence of abnormal pancreatic duct (kappa = 0.29), debris (kappa = 0.21), and septations (kappa = 0.30); and slight for presence or absence of margins (kappa = 0.01) and abnormal pancreatic parenchyma (kappa = 0.01). Accuracy rates of EUS for the diagnosis of neoplastic versus non-neoplastic lesions ranged from 40% to 93%.There is little more than chance interobserver agreement among experienced endosonographers for diagnosis of neoplastic versus non-neoplastic, specific type, and EUS features of pancreatic cystic lesions.Diagnostic accuracy of quantitative EUS elastography for discriminating malignant from benign solid pancreatic masses: a prospective, single-center study.Recent data suggest that quantitative EUS elastography, a novel technique that allows real-time quantification of tissue stiffness, can accurately differentiate malignant from benign solid pancreatic masses.To externally validate the diagnostic utility of this technique in an independent cohort.Prospective, single-center study. PATIENTS, INTERVENTIONS, AND METHODS: A total of 104 patients with evidence of a solid pancreatic mass on cross-sectional imaging and/or endosonography underwent 111 quantitative EUS elastography procedures. Multiple elastographic measurements of the mass lesion and soft-tissue reference areas were undertaken, and the corresponding strain ratios (SRs) were calculated. The final diagnosis was based on pancreatic cytology or histology.The area under the receiver-operating characteristic curve, sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and overall accuracy of quantitative EUS elastography for discriminating malignant from benign pancreatic masses.The final diagnoses were primary pancreatic carcinoma (71.2%), neuroendocrine tumor (10.6%), metastatic cancer (1.9%), and pancreatitis (16.3%). Malignant masses had a higher SR (P = .01) and lower mass elasticity (P = .003) than inflammatory ones. The areas under the receiver-operating characteristic curve for the detection of pancreatic malignancy of both SR and mass elasticity (0.69 and 0.72, respectively) were less favorable than reported recently. At the cut points providing the highest accuracy in this cohort (4.65 for SR and 0.27% for mass elasticity), quantitative EUS elastography had a sensitivity of 100.0% and 95.7%, specificity of 16.7% and 22.2%, positive predictive value of 86.1% and 86.4%, negative predictive value of 100.0% and 50.0%, and overall accuracy of 86.5% and 83.8%, respectively.Relatively small number of patients with benign disease.In the largest single-center study to date, the diagnostic utility of quantitative EUS elastography for discriminating pancreatic masses was modest, suggesting that it may only supplement rather than supplant the role of pancreatic tissue sampling in the future.Retrospective digital image fusion of multidetector CT and 18F-FDG PET: clinical value in pancreatic lesions--a prospective study with 104 patients.Differential diagnosis of pancreatic lesions still remains a problem. Whereas CT provides high spatial resolution, PET detects malignant lesions with high sensitivity. The objective of this study was to evaluate the clinical benefit of PET/CT image fusion in the diagnostic workup of pancreatic cancer.One hundred four patients with suspected pancreatic lesion underwent triple-phase multidetector CT and (18)F-FDG PET scanning. Voxel-based retrospective registration and fusion of CT and PET were performed with recently developed software. CT, PET, and fused images were assessed by 2 radiologists with regard to the detection of malignancies, possible infiltration of adjacent tissue or lymph nodes, or distant metastases.Fusion of CT and PET images was technically successful in 96.2%. In 2 cases, paraaortic lymph node infiltration was detected only by image fusion; in a further 8 cases, lymph node metastases were confirmed with improved localization. In 5 patients, additional pancreatic tumors or distant metastases only suspected during PET scanning were confirmed. Image fusion improved the sensitivity of malignancy detection from 76.6% (CT) and 84.4% (PET) to 89.1% (image fusion). Compared with CT alone, image fusion increased the sensitivity of detecting tissue infiltration to 68.2%, but at the cost of decreased specificity.The most important supplementary finding supplied by image fusion is a more precise correlation with focal tracer hot spots in PET. Image fusion improved the sensitivity of differentiating between benign and malignant pancreatic lesions with no significant change in specificity. All image modalities failed to stage lymph node involvement.Role of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration in the diagnosis of solid pancreatic and peripancreatic lesions: is onsite cytopathology necessary?The reported median diagnostic yield from endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) fine-needle aspiration (FNA) cytology is 78% (range 39-93%). The aim of this study is to describe a single-centre experience in the diagnostic work-up of solid pancreatic and peripancreatic masses without the benefit of an onsite cytopathologist.In a consecutive series of 429 EUS examinations performed over a 12-month period by a single operator, 108 were on non-cystic pancreatic or biliary lesions. Data were collected prospectively and the accuracy of FNA was assessed retrospectively using either surgery or repeat imaging as the benchmark in the presence or absence of malignancy.Of the 108 FNAs, 102 (94%) were diagnostic, four were falsely negative (FN) and two were atypical and considered equivocal. There were 78 pancreatic lesions, of which 65 were true positives (TP), 11 true negatives (TN) and two FN, giving an overall accuracy of 97% (76/78). Of nine periampullary lesions, two were TP, six were TN and one was FN, giving an overall accuracy of 89% (8/9). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive value (NPV) and accuracy of EUS-FNA for pancreatic and periampullary lesions combined were 96%, 100%, 100% [95% confidence interval (CI) 95-100%], 85% (95% CI 62-97%) and 97%, respectively. There were 21 bile duct lesions, of which 10 were TP, eight TN, two atypical and one FN, giving an overall accuracy of 86% (18/21). The sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV and accuracy of EUS-FNA for biliary lesions were 91%, 100%, 100% (95% CI 69-100%), 91% (95% CI 59-100%) and 95%, respectively.The diagnostic accuracy of EUS-FNA for pancreatic lesions in our series was 97% and the PPV for the three subgroups of lesion type was 100%; these figures are comparable with the best rates reported in the literature, despite the absence of onsite cytopathology. These rates are potentially a direct result of high-volume practice, dedicated endosonography and cytopathology. These results show that it is possible to achieve high rates of accuracy in places where logistical issues make it impossible to maintain a cytopathologist in the endoscopy suite. In addition, our results contribute to the limited, collective global experience on the effectiveness of EUS-FNA in periampullary and biliary lesions.Integration of KRAS testing in the diagnosis of pancreatic cystic lesions: a clinical experience of 618 pancreatic cysts.With improvements in abdominal imaging, detection of incidental pancreatic cysts are becoming increasingly common. Analysis of pancreatic cyst fluid from fine-needle aspiration is particularly important in identifying intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) and mucinous cystic neoplasms (MCNs), which have significant implications in clinical intervention and follow-up. Previous controlled studies have shown that KRAS mutations in cyst fluid are highly specific for mucinous differentiation in pancreatic cysts; however, this has not been examined in the clinical setting. Over a 6-year study period, 618 pancreatic cyst fluids obtained by fine-needle aspiration at the time of endoscopic ultrasound were tested for KRAS mutations as part of routine evaluation for a cystic neoplasm. Of the 618 specimens, 603 (98%) from 546 patients were satisfactory for molecular analysis. Patients ranged in age from 17 to 90 years (mean, 63.9 years) and were predominantly female (68%). Pancreatic cysts were relatively evenly distributed throughout the pancreas and ranged in size from 0.6 to 11.0 cm (mean, 2.3 cm). Mutations in KRAS were detected in 232 of 603 (38%) aspirates. Although sufficient for molecular analysis, 320 of 603 (53%) specimens were either less than optimal (38%) or unsatisfactory (15%) for cytopathologic diagnosis. Surgical follow-up information was available for 142 (26%) patients and consisted of 53 KRAS-mutated and 89 KRAS-wild-type cysts. Overall, KRAS mutations had a specificity of 100%, but a sensitivity of 54% for mucinous differentiation. When stratified by cyst type, KRAS had a sensitivity of 67% and 14% for IPMNs and MCNs, respectively. In summary, KRAS mutations were highly specific for mucinous differentiation, but were inadequate in identifying MCNs. Future molecular studies and the combination of other fluid markers are required to improve the detection and classification of pancreatic mucinous neoplasms by endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspiration. Prospective pilot evaluation of a new needle prototype for endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration: comparison of cytology and histology yield.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) with the adjunct of EUS-guided fine needle aspiration has become an important diagnostic modality in gastroenterologic oncology. EUS-guided fine needle aspiration mainly relies on cytology; data are scarce that compare cytology and histology. While testing a 22-gauge prototype needle, we prospectively compared the yield for both.Forty-two consecutive patients (27 male, 15 female; mean age 59.2 years, range: 17-90 years) were included. In each patient we aimed to make two needle passes, and if the material acquired appeared insufficient macroscopically (no in-room cytopathology was available), further passes were done. The material was sent for cytological and histological assessment.A median number of two passes (range: 2-3) were uneventfully performed for pancreatic lesions (n=30), mediastinal and other lymph nodes/masses (n=8) and various other lesions (n=4) and yielded adequate material for cytology, histology or at least one of the two investigations in 62, 67 and 74% of patients, respectively. No false positive results were found (specificity 100%). Sensitivities were 58.6 and 65.5%, respectively, for cytology and histology alone; combined assessment increased sensitivity to 79.3%. When adjusted values were calculated, based only on those cases with adequate material, sensitivity was 89.5% for cytology and 85.7% for histology, and increased to 100% with combined assessment.The new needle achieves sensitivities similar to those previously reported with no significant differences in sensitivity between cytology and histology. More effective tissue acquisition methods must be sought to improve overall results.Determination of qualitative telomerase activity as an adjunct to the diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma by EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration.Telomerase activity is up-regulated in pancreatic cancer. Hence, measurement of telomerase activity in pancreatic needle-biopsy specimens could assist in establishing a positive diagnosis in specimens that are inadequate for cytology.To determine the sensitivity and specificity of telomerase activity for neoplasia in a series of EUS-guided fine-needle aspirate (EUS-FNA) biopsies of pancreatic mass lesions.Prospective, consecutive, non-randomized cohort.Academic hospital, tertiary referral center.Seventy-one patients with a pancreatic mass diagnosed by cross-sectional imaging.EUS-FNA of 52 solid and 18 cystic pancreatic lesions.(1) Cytologic diagnosis; (2) tissue telomerase activity by semi-quantitative polymerase chain reaction; (3) patient demographics; (4) clinical outcomes.Cytology results were positive for adenocarcinoma in 40 patients with a solid pancreatic mass; of these, telomerase activity was detected in 31. There were no telomerase false-positive results. Telomerase results were positive in 6 of the 7 patients (86%) who had negative cytology results and who eventually were found to have biopsy-proven adenocarcinoma. The sensitivity and specificity of telomerase activity for detecting pancreatic adenocarcinoma in solid masses was 79% (95% CI, 64%-89%) and 100% (95% CI, 55%-100%).Extremely high sensitivity and specificity of EUS-FNA cytology in solid lesions minimized the incremental benefit of telomerase.Telomerase activity can be measured readily in specimens obtained at EUS-FNA and accurately predicts malignancy. Used in combination with cytology, telomerase increased the sensitivity from 85% to 98% while maintaining the specificity at 100%. Lesions with negative cytology result and positive telomerase activity should be evaluated aggressively to exclude malignancy.Fine-needle aspiration cytology of intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas.Intraductal papillary mucinous tumors (IPMT) account for 5% of pancreatic neoplasms. Preoperative identification is important because of their frequent multifocal or diffuse involvement in pancreatic ducts, which makes extensive surgery necessary even in benign cases. To the authors' knowledge, the cytologic features of this entity in fine-needle aspiration biopsy (FNAB) specimens have seldom been described and are poorly standardized.Eleven consecutive cases of surgically proven IPMT with previous endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS)-guided FNAB were collected for retrospective analysis. EUS-FNAB had been performed with on-site attendance of a cytopathologist in all cases. Macroscopic and microscopic appearance of mucin, cellular type and arrangement, presence of nuclear grooves, and degree of nuclear atypia were recorded.Final diagnosis was benign IPMT (B) in four cases, borderline IPMT (Bo) in two cases, malignant IPMT (M) in one case, and IPMT associated with invasive carcinoma (Ca) in four. Retrospective analysis found moderate to high levels of extracellular mucin in 10 of the 11 cases. The other case (one Ca) showed a small amount of thick mucin. In all cases, epithelial cells were identified, although cellularity was very low in four cases (three B and one Bo). Atypia was absent in two cases (two B) slight in two cases (two B), moderate in three cases (one Bo and two Ca), and severe in four cases (one Bo, one M, and two Ca). Mucinous epithelium was found in nine cases and nonmucinous epithelium in five cases (one Bo and four Ca). Papillary structures were observed in five cases (two Bo and three Ca), sheets in eight cases (four B, one Bo, one M, and two Ca), single atypical cells in five cases (one Bo and four Ca), irregular clusters in three cases (one Bo and two Ca), and nuclear grooves in two cases (one B and one Bo).The most common features of IPMT were extracellular mucin and sheets of mucinous epithelium. Papillae and nuclear grooves were not consistently found. Nonmucinous epithelium, severe atypia, single atypical cells, and irregular clusters indicated a high probability of malignant transformation. Even in the absence of atypia, a clinically significant diagnostic orientation can be established in most cases on the basis of the characteristic cytologic picture.Clinical significance of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography for the diagnosis of cystic tumor of the pancreas compared with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and computed tomography.Cystic tumor of the pancreas has been investigated by a variety of imaging techniques. Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) is being widely used as a non-invasive diagnostic modality for investigation of the biliary tree and pancreatic duct system. The purpose of this study was to compare MRCP images with those of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) and computed tomography (CT) in order to clarify the diagnostic efficacy of MRCP for cystic tumor of the pancreas.We retrospectively studied 15 patients with cystic tumor of the pancreas that had been surgically resected and histopathologically confirmed. There were five cases of intraductal papillary adenocarcinoma, five of intraductal papillary adenoma, two of serous cyst adenoma, two of retention cyst associated with invasive ductal adenocarcinoma and one of solid cystic tumor.In all cases MRCP correctly identified the main pancreatic duct (MPD) and showed the entire cystic tumor and the communication between the tumor and the MPD. On the other hand, the detection rate by ERCP of the cystic tumor and the communication between the cystic tumor and the MPD was only 60%. Although the detection rates by CT for the septum and solid components inside the cystic tumor were 100 and 90.0%, respectively, those of MRCP for each were 58.3 and 20.0%.MRCP is capable of providing diagnostic information superior to ERCP for the diagnosis of cystic tumor of the pancreas. Although MRCP may provide complementary information about the whole lesion of interest, the characteristic internal features of cystic tumor of the pancrease should be carefully diagnosed in combination with CT.Frequency of major complications after EUS-guided FNA of solid pancreatic masses: a prospective evaluation.EUS-guided FNA is effective for establishing tissue diagnosis in suspected pancreatic cancer. However, data on the frequency of major complications following EUS-FNA are limited.To evaluate the frequency of major complications after EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses.Prospective cohort study.Tertiary University based referral center for pancreatico-biliary disorder.Consecutive patients who underwent EUS-FNA of a solid pancreatic over a 42-month period. All immediate complications were recorded by the endosonographer. Late complications were assessed at 72 hours and at 30-days after the procedure.Major complications were defined as acute pancreatitis, bleeding, infection, perforation, use of reversal medication, hospitalization or death.A total of 355 consecutive patients with a solid pancreatic mass underwent EUS FNA. Major complications were encountered in 9 patients (2.54%, 95% CI 1.17-4.76). Acute pancreatitis occurred in 3 of 355 (0.85 %, 95% CI 0.17-2.45); 2 patients were hospitalized, and 1 patient recovered with outpatient analgesics. Three patients were admitted for severe pain after the procedure; all were treated with analgesics and subsequently discharged with no sequela. Two patients (0.56%, 95% CI 0.07-2.02) developed fever and were admitted for intravenous antibiotics; 1 patient recovered with intravenous antibiotics and the other required surgical debridement for necrosis. One patient required the use of reversal medication. Overall, 1.97% (95% CI 0.80-4.02) of the patients were hospitalized for complications (range 1-16 days). None of the patients experienced clinically significant hemorrhage, perforation, or death. No clear predisposing risk factors were identified.Lack of surgical gold standard and referral to a tertiary center.EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses infrequently leads to major complications. Our results can be used by endosonographers to counsel patients before EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses.Diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration in patients with presumed pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine-needle aspiration (FNA) of the pancreas allows the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer to be established without exploratory surgery. We reviewed our recent experience with EUS-FNA in patients with presumed pancreatic cancer and report the diagnostic accuracy and complications of this procedure. Data were reviewed from all patients who presented with CT evidence of a pancreatic mass or a malignant biliary stricture and underwent EUS-FNA at our institution between November 1, 1999, and October 1, 2001. Based on the findings of contrast-enhanced, multislice CT scanning, patients were categorized as having resectable, locally advanced, or metastatic disease. EUS-FNA was performed in 233 patients. A final diagnosis of cancer was established in 216 patients (93%), 15 patients (6%) were found to have benign disease, and the final diagnosis remains unknown in two patients (1%). The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of EUS-FNA for diagnosis of a pancreatic malignancy were 91%, 100%, and 92%, respectively. For the 216 patients subsequently proven to have cancer, the results of EUS-FNA were diagnostic in 197 (91%); 96 (90%) of 107 patients with resectable disease, 62 (97%) of 64 with locally advanced disease, and 39 (87%) of 45 with metastatic disease. Four patients (2%) developed a clinically apparent complication that required hospital admission, including two patients who required surgery for duodenal perforation. There were no EUS-related deaths. We conclude that EUS-FNA can safely and accurately establish a cytologic diagnosis in patients with both early-stage and advanced pancreatic cancer. This enables consideration of all treatment options including protocol-based therapy.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration and multidetector spiral CT in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is now established as a valuable imaging test for diagnosing and staging pancreatic cancer. But, with significant recent improvements in spiral CT scanners, particularly higher resolution and ability to reconstruct 3D images, spiral CT is now increasingly accepted as being better for pancreatic cancer staging. The debate continues, however, about the best diagnostic test or combination of tests in patients with suspected pancreatic cancer. Spiral CT is more readily available than EUS-FNA and, therefore, more frequently used. In this study, we evaluated the use of EUS-FNA in conjunction with spiral CT for suspected pancreatic cancer.We retrospectively evaluated 81 consecutive patients who underwent EUS and EUS-FNA for clinical suspicion of a pancreatic cancer from November 2000 to November 2001. All patients had spiral CT with a multiphasic pancreatic protocol using multidetector spiral CT scanners. In all patients, EUS-FNA and spiral CT examinations were performed less than 3 wk apart.Overall, the accuracy of spiral CT, EUS, and EUS-FNA was 74% (n = 60/81, CI 63-83%), 94% (n = 76/81, CI 87-98%), and 88% (n = 73/81, CI 81-96%), respectively, for diagnosing pancreatic cancer. In patients without an identifiable mass on spiral CT, the diagnostic accuracy of EUS and EUS-FNA for pancreatic tumors was 92% (n = 23/25, CI 74-99%). Absence of a focal "mass" lesion on EUS reliably excluded pancreatic cancer irrespective of clinical presentation (NPV 100% n = 5/5, CI 48-100%). The negative predictive value of EUS-FNA was only 22% (n = 2/9, CI 3-60%) in patients with obstructive jaundice and biliary stricture. However, in patients without obstructive jaundice at initial presentation, EUS-FNA was highly accurate (accuracy 97%, n = 33/34, CI 85-100%) and was reliable for ruling out malignancy (NPV 89%, n = 8/9, CI 52-100%). Cytologic assessment of EUS-FNA specimens was 89% accurate for identifying malignancy in suspicious lesions visualized on EUS.The EUS with FNA can be a valuable adjunct to newer high-resolution multidetector spiral CT for diagnostic evaluation of patients with suspected pancreatic cancer.Differentiation of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma from other neoplastic solid pancreatic lesions: a tertiary oncology center experience.Pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma (PDAC), pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors (pNET), and metastatic lesions (pMET) are the most common neoplastic solid pancreatic lesions (SPLs). Early diagnosis enables prompt treatment.To identify factors differentiating PDAC from non-PDAC lesions and assess the accuracy of EUS-guided FNA.Retrospective tertiary center.Consecutive patients referred for EUS evaluation of SPLs from 2004 to 2011.Pretest (preceding EUS-guided FNA [EUS-FNA]) predictors of PDAC among neoplastic SPLs and accuracy of EUS-FNA.A total of 1333 EUS scans with 1108 EUS-FNAs were performed for pancreatic lesions. Of the 672 patients with neoplastic SPLs, 528 had PDAC and 144 non-PDAC. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and accuracy of EUS-FNA for the diagnosis of PDAC were 97.3%, 99.3%, 99.8%, and 97.8%, respectively. Years of EUS experience significantly correlated with fewer needle passes (Rs = -0.18, P < .001). Controlling for all potential confounders, multivariable regression analysis demonstrated that patients with PDAC compared with pNETs and pMETs were older (odds ratio [OR] 4.42; 95% confidence interval [CI], 2.1-9.5; P < .001), had weight loss (OR 3.0; 95% CI, 1.6-5.4; P < .001), hyperbilirubinemia (OR 3.7; 95% CI, 1.8-7.5; P < .001), elevated CA19-9 (OR 6.9; 95% CI, 2.4-20.3; P < .01), evidence of arterial invasion (OR 6.5; 95% CI, 2.7-15.4; P < .001), and PD dilation (OR 3.3; 95% CI, 1.8-5.9; P < .001).Retrospective design, single center.When evaluating neoplastic SPLs, demographic, clinical, laboratory, and imaging characteristics can reliably discern and suggest PDAC. In addition, EUS-FNA is exceedingly sensitive and specific for PDAC.18FDG-positron emission tomography in pancreatic cancer.POSITRON EMISSION TOMOGRAPHY: Malignant cells present an increased glucose consumption compared to normal pancreatic tissue. Positron emission tomography with 18F fluoro-D-deoxyglucose is a new imaging tool to in vivo assess the amount of glucose metabolism. This method provides metabolic information on tumors rather than morphological information.In most PET centers a static emission scan of the upper abdomen is performed 45-60 minutes after intravenous administration of the radiotracer. To obtain quantitative parameter an additional transmission scan is necessary to correct for attenuation. Today, both visual analysis and semiquantitative parameters of glucose consumption as the Standardized Uptake Value (SUV) are used for image interpretation. To allow coregistration of the metabolic PET images and morphological imaging tools as CT or MRI external markers may be used. Following exact reorientation both the metabolic information (PET) and the morphologic information (MRI/CT) can be merged in one 3D data set (image fusion).In our series of patients the sensitivity for PET to detect pancreatic cancer was 85%, the specificity 84%. False negative results were obtained in patients with hyperglycemia, false positive results in patients with chronic active pancreatitis. Excluding hyperglycemic patients the sensitivity for PET increased to 98%. In a sample statistics of 305 euglycemic patients sensitivity, specificity and accuracy were 92%, 79%, and 87%, respectively. Image fusion of metabolic (PET) and morphologic data (MRI/CT) can help to better localize the focus of increased glucose consumption demonstrated with PET and to differentiate multifocal cancer from lymph node metastases.18FDG PET is a feasible diagnostic modality to differentiate benign and malignant pancreatic masses when morphological imaging is equivocal. Image fusion of PET and CT or MRI can combine the advantages of both modalities in one image-detailed anatomic information combined with accurate metabolic data.Prospective analysis of atypical epithelial cells as a high-risk cytologic feature for malignancy in pancreatic cysts.Pancreatic cysts are aspirated to assess whether a cyst is mucinous on one hand and malignant on the other. The authors' retrospective data have indicated that high-grade atypical epithelial cells (AECs) identified on cytology are a high-risk feature and a better threshold than "positive" for detecting malignancy. The objective of the current study was to assess the accuracy of AECs in predicting malignancy in pancreatic cysts.Cysts aspirated by endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNAs) obtained between January 2006 and June 2011 were evaluated. Cytologic, histologic, imaging, and cyst fluid analysis data were recorded. AECs were defined as cells that had an increased nuclear-to-cytoplasmic ratio and nuclear hyperchromasia with or without membrane abnormalities and with or without cytoplasmic vacuoles, but of insufficient quality and quantity for a "positive" interpretation. Malignancy included mucinous cysts with high-grade dysplasia and invasive carcinoma. Performance characteristics of cytology with AECs or worse (high-grade atypia [HGA]) for predicting malignancy were assessed.There were 70 FNAs that had histologic confirmation from 404 EUS-FNAs in 352 patients. Excluding 4 nondiagnostic FNAs, the study cohort consisted of 66 FNAs for analysis. There were 24 malignant cysts with 20 true-positive, 4 false-negative, 36 true-negative, and 6 false-positive results. For the detection of malignancy, HGA had 83% sensitivity, 86% specificity, a positive predictive value of 77%, a negative predictive value of 90%, and 85% overall accuracy. The lower threshold for malignancy with AECs resulted in a 12% increase in the detection of malignancy.A finding of AECs on cytology is a high-risk feature for malignancy and is an accurate triage threshold for resection. Cancer (Cancer Cytopathol) 2013;121:29-36 © 2012 American Cancer Society.Diagnostic usefulness of FDG PET for pancreatic mass lesions.The purpose of this study was to investigate the feasibility of [18F]2-deoxy-2-fluoro-D-glucose (FDG) positron emission tomography (PET) in patients with a pancreatic mass by comparing the results with those of X-ray computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance (MR) imaging.Eighty-six patients with pancreatic lesions, included 65 malignant tumors and 21 benign masses (55 masses were proven histologically and the others were diagnosed clinically), were studied. The diagnostic factors of CT and MR imaging were evaluated, and those of FDG PET were also evaluated for malignant and benign masses by visual interpretation and quantitative interpretation with the standardized uptake value (SUV) and SUVgluc which was designed to reduce the effects of a high blood sugar level. Visual interpretations were evaluated only in FDG PET images, and quantitative interpretations were evaluated by referring to CT and/or MR imaging. The correlation between SUV and the degree of histological differentiation in pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma was investigated.Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive value (NPV) and accuracy for CT imaging were 91, 62, 88, 68 and 84%, and for MR imaging 78, 70, 88, 54 and 76%, respectively. In visual interpretation of FDG PET images, the sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV and accuracy were 82, 81, 93, 59 and 81%, respectively. Significant differences between malignant and benign lesions existed in SUV and SUVgluc (p < 0.0001, each). With the cutoff value of SUV as 2.1 and SUVgluc as 2.2, the accuracy of diagnosis was maximal. With that cutoff value, the sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV and accuracy for SUV were 89, 76, 92, 70 and 86%, and for SUVgluc 91, 76, 92, 73 and 87%, respectively. The sensitivity and NPV of SUVgluc were higher than those of SUV, which suggests that SUVgluc may be more useful in reducing the number of overlooked malignant tumors. The specificity and PPV of FDG PET were superior to those of CT and MR imaging. There were no significant differences between the SUVs of moderately differentiated adenocarcinomas and those of well differentiated adenocarcinomas.To improve the diagnostic procedure for classifying masses, FDG PET with not only SUV but also SUV corrected by the blood sugar level is required in addition to morphological diagnosis by CT and/or MR imaging.Intraductal papillary-mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas. The findings and limitations of cytologic samples obtained by endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration.All clinically and ultrasonographically suspected examples of intraductal papillary-mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) aspirated during a 17-month period were reviewed and analyzed for follow-up. We identified 18 cases of suspected IPMN in patients 52 to 87 years old. All patients had dilated pancreatic ducts, with 3 showing sonographically apparent intraductal papillary lesions; 5 had adjacent cystic or solid pancreatic masses. Cytologic preparations showed thick, glistening, viscid, abnormal mucus in all cases. Aspirates from 13 lesions (72%) were acellular or sparsely cellular, but entrapped single or loosely cohesive neoplastic cells were identified in 16 cases (89%). Goblet cell morphologic features were common (6/18 [33%]), but papillary clusters and dysplastic changes were infrequent (3 [17%] each). In keeping with current therapeutic thinking, confirmatory histologic follow-up was available for only 4 patients (22%), as most people with lesions clinically, sonographically, and cytologically consistent with IPMN are elderly and often have comorbid conditions. Although endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration has important limitations, gross and cytologic findings can aid in confirming the suspected diagnosis, and integration of complete clinical, sonographic, and cytologic information may be the best way to reach the most accurate diagnosis possible.Usefulness of dual-phase 18F-FDG PET/CT for diagnosing small pancreatic tumors.The usefulness of dual-phase F-fluorodeoxyglucose (F-FDG) positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) for pancreatic tumors was investigated including numerous small tumors.Consecutive 116 patients with solid pancreatic tumors were subjected. Maximum standard uptake values (SUVmax) at 1 and 2 hours after FDG injection were defined as early and delayed SUVmax, respectively. Receiver operating characteristic curve was used to determine the optimal cutoff value of early SUVmax. Diagnostic accuracy of dual-phase FDG PET/CT was compared with that of single phase.The mean ± SD tumor size was 25 ±12 mm in diameter. The level of early SUVmax and proportion of elevated SUVmax in delayed phase were significantly higher in malignancy than those in benignancy for less than 25 mm tumors (4.1 ± 2.6 vs 1.9 ± 0.5, P < 0.001; 89% vs 17%, P < 0.0001) although they did not reach statistical significance for greater than or equal to 25 mm tumors. When diagnostic criteria of dual-phase FDG PET/CT for less than 25 mm tumors were determined as (1) early SUVmax greater than or equal to 2.1 and/or (2) delayed SUVmax greater than early SUVmax, sensitivity, specificity, and over all accuracy of dual-phase FDG PET/CT were better than that of single phase for less than 25 mm tumor (93%, 83%, and 91% vs 79%, 83%, and 80%, respectively).Dual-phase FDG PET/CT might be useful for diagnosing small pancreatic tumors.The usefulness of (18)F-FDG PET/MRI fusion image in diagnosing pancreatic tumor: comparison with (18)F-FDG PET/CT.This study aimed at demonstrating the feasibility of retrospectively fused (18)F FDG-PET and MRI (PET/MRI fusion image) in diagnosing pancreatic tumor, in particular differentiating malignant tumor from benign lesions. In addition, we evaluated additional findings characterizing pancreatic lesions by FDG-PET/MRI fusion image.We analyzed retrospectively 119 patients: 96 cancers and 23 benign lesions. FDG-PET/MRI fusion images (PET/T1 WI or PET/T2WI) were made by dedicated software using 1.5 Tesla (T) MRI image and FDG-PET images. These images were interpreted by two well-trained radiologists without knowledge of clinical information and compared with FDG-PET/CT images. We compared the differential diagnostic capability between PET/CT and FDG-PET/MRI fusion image. In addition, we evaluated additional findings such as tumor structure and tumor invasion.FDG-PET/MRI fusion image significantly improved accuracy compared with that of PET/CT (96.6 vs. 86.6 %). As additional finding, dilatation of main pancreatic duct was noted in 65.9 % of solid types and in 22.6 % of cystic types, on PET/MRI-T2 fusion image. Similarly, encasement of adjacent vessels was noted in 43.1 % of solid types and in 6.5 % of cystic types. Particularly in cystic types, intra-tumor structures such as mural nodule (35.4 %) or intra-cystic septum (74.2 %) were detected additionally. Besides, PET/MRI-T2 fusion image could detect extra benign cystic lesions (9.1 % in solid type and 9.7 % in cystic type) that were not noted by PET/CT.In diagnosing pancreatic lesions, FDG-PET/MRI fusion image was useful in differentiating pancreatic cancer from benign lesions. Furthermore, it was helpful in evaluating relationship between lesions and surrounding tissues as well as in detecting extra benign cysts.Accuracy of contrast-enhanced harmonic EUS with a second-generation perflutren lipid microsphere contrast agent (with video).EUS-FNA has limitations in cancer diagnosis/staging. New contrast agents, transducers, and processors have improved the potential of contrast-enhanced harmonic (CEH)-EUS.To determine optimal settings and preliminary accuracy of CEH-EUS by using a second-generation perflutren lipid microsphere contrast agent and a prototype linear echoendoscope.Prospective, comparative, pilot study.Tertiary-care medical center.This study involved patients with esophageal/pancreatic/liver tumors or adenopathy.Contrast agent was injected (10 μL/kg intravenously in 1-2 doses), and the mechanical index was optimized over 5 cases (0.3). Intermittent/continuous imaging was used with extended pure harmonic detection.Before-contrast and after-contrast predictions of neoplasia (5-point Likert scale). The reference standard was positive tissue or 6-month follow-up. Perfusion factors (sequence, pattern, washout) were noted, and phases were video recorded (arterial, venous, and postvenous).Thirty sites (7 nodes and 16 pancreatic and 7 nonpancreatic masses) were imaged in 21 patients; 21 of 30 had FNA, and 5 had surgery. Four cases (13.3%) were rated as undecided/indeterminate with EUS (vs 1 [3.3%] with CEH-EUS; P = .35). Twenty-four cases with confirmed diagnoses (12 malignant and 12 benign) were used for test performance: positive/negative predictive values for CEH-EUS were 80.0% (95% confidence interval, 51.9%-95.7%)/100.0% (95% confidence interval, 63.0%-100.0%) versus 84.6%/100.0% for EUS. Accuracies, counting "undecided" (1 in CEH-EUS and 4 in EUS) as incorrect, were 83.3% and 79.2%. In 2 cases, management would change significantly: (1) liver hemangioma, avoiding FNA; and (2) mediastinal "cyst" confirmed as solid.Small sample. Tissue not always available.CEH-EUS adds minimal imaging time and is accurate, with small improvement over EUS. Added information in vascular and cystic lesions can potentially change management.EUS for pancreas cysts: what should we be sampling?Pancreatic cancer detection with magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography: a prospective controlled study.Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) is a non-invasive and increasingly used procedure in cases involving biliary and pancreatic diseases. However, the accuracy of MRCP in differential diagnosis between pancreatic cancer and chronic pancreatitis has never been documented in a large prospective controlled study.124 patients were recruited for the study, selected from 141 consecutive patients with an average age of 55 years (range 19-80) who presented to our department between February, 1996, and January, 1998, with a strong clinical suspicion of pancreatic cancer. MRCP images were interpreted by a radiologist and a gastroenterologist who were unaware of the clinical diagnosis of patients. The exact diagnosis was based upon histological evidence from biopsy examination (surgical and fine needle biopsy) or a follow-up of at least 12 months.Of the 124 patients, 37 (30%) had pancreatic carcinoma; 17 (14%) had other neoplastic pancreatic diseases; 57 (46%) had chronic pancreatitis; 13 (10%) pancreatic ducts were clear. The sensitivity of MRCP with respect to diagnosing pancreatic cancer was 84% and its specificity 97%. The corresponding values for endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) were 70% and 94%, respectively.MRCP is as sensitive as ERCP when detecting pancreatic carcinomas. Furthermore, it is feasible to presume that the use of MRCP may prevent inappropriate explorations of the pancreatic and common bileducts in cases of suspected pancreatic carcinomas, where interventional endoscopic therapy (ie, palliative common-bileduct drainage) is unlikely.A prospective evaluation of an algorithm incorporating routine preoperative endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration in suspected pancreatic cancer.Whether tissue diagnosis is required in the preoperative evaluation of patients with suspected pancreatic cancer remains controversial. We prospectively evaluated the accuracy, safety, and potential impact on surgical intervention of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in the preoperative evaluation of suspected pancreatic cancer.All patients who underwent EUS-FNA at our institution (n = 547) over a 4.5-year period were enrolled. Patients underwent surgical exploration and resection based on their comorbidity status, evidence of resectability based on spiral computed tomography (CT) and EUS imaging reviewed in a multidisciplinary approach.Of 547 patients enrolled (median age 64 years, 60% male), 49% presented with obstructive jaundice. The operating characteristics of EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses were: sensitivity 95% (95% CI: 93.2-95.4), specificity 92% (95% CI: 86.6-95.7), positive predictive value 98% (95% CI: 97-99), negative predictive value 80% (95% CI: 74.9-82.7). The overall accuracy of EUS-FNA was 94.1% (95% CI: 92.0-94). Of the 414 true positive patients by EUS-FNA, 138 (33%) were explored. Of patients deemed operable by combined imaging, 42% had surgical resection. Eighty-two percent of true positive patients were ultimately found inoperable and received palliative therapy or chemotherapy. Of the 94 patients with true negative cytology based on extended follow-up, only 7 (7%) underwent surgical resection. Of those with false negative diagnoses (n = 24), 5 patients underwent exploration/resection based on detection of mass lesions by EUS. The remaining patients had unresectable disease. Mild self-limiting pancreatitis occurred in (0.91%).EUS-FNA is a safe and highly accurate method for tissue diagnosis in suspected pancreatic cancer. This approach allows for preoperative counseling of patients, minimizing surgeon's operative time in cases of unresectable disease, and avoids surgical biopsies in the majority of patients with inoperable disease. In addition, it allows for conservative management of patients with benign biopsies. We still, however, recommend exploration of patients with clinical scenario suspicious for pancreatic cancer, a mass found on EUS or CT, but inconclusive or negative cytology.Positron emission tomography/computed tomography influences on the management of resectable pancreatic cancer and its cost-effectiveness.Distinguishing benign from malignant intraductal papillary mucinous tumors of the pancreas by imaging techniques.It is often difficult to differentiate benign from malignant intraductal papillary mucinous tumors (IPMTs). This study aimed to differentiate them using various imaging techniques.Receiver operating characteristic curves were used to establish optimal cutoff values to differentiate benign from malignant tumors in 121 patients with histologically confirmed IPMTs.For branch duct type, accuracy for malignancy was highest using endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) to measure the cyst diameter, and accuracy was 68.2% at a cutoff value of 33.9 mm. For main duct type, accuracy was highest, 71.1% at a cutoff value of 8.4 mm for main duct diameter, with magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography. For all imaging techniques and findings, accuracy was highest using EUS, 76.4% at a cutoff value of 5.4 mm for height of protrusion. Each imaging technique had a positive predictive value of 80% if the cut off value for the height of the protruding lesion was met.Malignancy can be strongly suspected when the height of protrusion exceeds the respective cutoff values. EUS was most effective to differentiate benign IPMTs from malignant tumors by assessing the height of protrusion.Added value of diffusion-weighted imaging to MR cholangiopancreatography with unenhanced mr imaging for predicting malignancy or invasiveness of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas.To investigate the added value of diffusion-weighted imaging (DWI) to magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) with unenhanced MR imaging for predicting the malignancy or invasiveness of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs).Following Institutional Review Board (IRB) approval, this retrospective study included 52 patients with surgically resected IPMNs and who underwent MRCP, unenhanced MRI, and DWI. Three blinded radiologists evaluated the two image sets, ie, MRCP with unenhanced MR images vs. the combined set with MRCP, unenhanced MR images, and DWI, and scored their confidence for malignancy or for invasiveness of IPMNs. The mean apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC) values of benign IPMNs and of intraductal mucinous carcinomas (IPMCs) were compared. The diagnostic accuracy was calculated using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis.The mean ADC of malignant IPMNs (2.05 ± 0.66 × 10(-3) mm(2) /sec) was significantly lower than that of benign IPMNs (2.95 ± 0.32 × 10(-3) mm(2) /sec, P < 0.0001). Invasive IPMCs (1.51 ± 0.32 × 10(-3) mm(2) /sec) showed significantly lower ADC than that of noninvasive IPMCs (2.67 ± 0.23 × 10(-3) mm(2) /sec, P = 0.0003). The area of diffusion restriction was more frequently seen in malignant IPMNs than in benign IPMNs (P < 0.00001). The addition of DWI to MRCP with unenhanced MRI did not show a significant improvement for predicting malignant IPMN (P> 0.05), but resulted in a tendency to improve the diagnostic accuracy for the prediction of invasive IPMN in two observers (P = 0.072, P = 0.085).The addition of DWI to MRCP with unenhanced MRI may improve the diagnosis of malignant IPMN and further increase the prediction of invasive IPMC.Optimal number of EUS-guided fine needle passes needed to obtain a correct diagnosis.The immediate assistance of a cytologist during EUS-guided FNA is not universal. The optimal number of fine needle passes during EUS-guided FNA has not been determined in a prospective study. The aim of this study was to determine the optimal number of passes required to obtain a correct diagnosis.Seven or more passes were made with a fine needle into a variety of lesions during EUS-guided FNA. Adequacy of the aspirate, diagnosis, and a "certainty score" were recorded after each pass and interpreted sequentially by a cytopathologist. Surgical histopathology and 1-year clinical follow-up were used as reference standards. The percentage of correctly diagnosed cases was calculated and stratified according to organ, disease group, and EUS characteristics of the lesion.Lesions from 95 patients were categorized into the following locations: pancreas, lymph node, and miscellaneous. The sensitivity and specificity for 7 passes from the pancreas and miscellaneous lesion groups were, respectively, 83% and 100%. The sensitivity and specificity for 5 passes from the lymph node group were, respectively, 77% and 100%.During EUS-guided FNA, at least 7 passes with a fine needle into pancreatic and miscellaneous lesions, and 5 passes into lymph nodes are needed to ensure a high degree of certainty for making a correct diagnosis.Imaging features of small (≤ 3 cm) pancreatic solid tumors on gadoxetic-acid-enhanced MR imaging and diffusion-weighted imaging: an initial experience.The objective was to determine imaging features that distinguish small (≤3cm) solid pancreatic adenocarcinoma, neuroendocrine tumor (NET) and solid pseudopapillary tumor (SPT) on gadoxetic-acid-enhanced magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and diffusion-weighed imaging (DWI).Twenty-four adenocarcinomas, 10 NETs and 8 SPTs were retrospectively included. Two radiologists analyzed morphologic features, signal intensity of the tumors on MR images including DWI (b=800) and dynamic enhancement pattern with consensus. Tumor-to-parenchyma ratio and tumor apparent diffusion coefficients (ADCs) were quantitatively assessed.All adenocarcinomas had an ill-defined margin and irregular shape, and more frequently had pancreatic duct dilatation compared with other tumors (P<.05). All SPTs and all but one of the adenocarcinomas (95.8%) had no arterial enhancement with progressively increased enhancement, whereas seven NETs (70%) had arterial enhancement with progressively decreased enhancement (P<.01). The mean value of tumor-to-parenchyma ratio on arterial and portal phases was significantly higher for NETs, and the mean value of tumor ADCs was significantly lower for SPTs than for other tumors (P<.05).Gadoxetic-acid-enhanced MRI may aid in differentiation between small adenocarcinomas, NETs and SPTs based on morphologic features with dynamic enhancement pattern in adenocarcinomas, dynamic enhancement pattern with tumor-to-parenchyma ration on arterial and portal phases in NETs, and dynamic enhancement pattern with lower ADC value in SPTs.Relative accuracy of CT and MRI in the differentiation of benign from malignant pancreatic cystic lesions.To assess the diagnostic accuracies of multidetector computed tomography (MDCT) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) for differentiating benign from malignant lesions and suggesting the specific diagnoses for pancreatic cystic lesions, and to assess whether review of both MDCT and MRI is beneficial.Patients with various neoplastic and non-neoplastic pancreatic cystic lesions that were identifiable by biopsy or surgery, who underwent both MRI and MDCT (n=63), were retrospectively reviewed by three reviewers. The likelihood of malignancy was recorded on a five-point scale, and a specific diagnosis was given. ROC analysis was performed and the sensitivity, specificity for the characterization of malignancy, and the accuracy of specific diagnoses were calculated.MDCT and MRI yielded comparable results for the characterization of malignancy (Az: 0.639, 0.735, 0.806 for MDCT and 0.732, 0.753, 0.792 for MRI, for each reviewer). The accuracies of specific diagnosis based on MDCT or MRI were 61.9 versus 55.6% for reviewer 1; 76.2 versus 76.2% for reviewer 2; and 65.1 versus 61.9% for reviewer 3. There was a trend toward better prediction of malignancy (Az: 0.787, 0.745, 0.849 for each reviewer), and better accuracy in suggesting a specific diagnosis (77.8, 73, and 73% for each reviewer) for MDCT+MRI over MDCT or MRI alone, although it was statistically significant for one reviewer in the comparison of MDCT versus MDCT+MRI for the prediction of malignancy, and MRI versus MDCT for suggesting a specific diagnosis.MDCT and MRI have equivalent accuracy for characterizing pancreatic cystic lesions as benign or malignant, and suggesting a specific diagnosis. Combined review of MDCT and MRI was not significantly better but may have the potential to improve diagnostic accuracy in equivocal cases.18-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography enhances computed tomography diagnosis of malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas.To assess the reliability of 18-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (18-FDG PET) in distinguishing benign from malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) of the pancreas and its contribution to surgical decision making.Pancreatic IPMNs are increasingly recognized, often as incidental findings, especially in people over age 70 and 80. Computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance (MR) are unreliable in discriminating a benign from a malignant neoplasm. 18-FDG PET as imaging procedure based on the increased glucose uptake by tumor cells has been suggested for diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer.From January 1998 to December 2005, 64 patients with suspected IPMNs were prospectively investigated with 18-FDG PET in addition to conventional imaging techniques [helical-CT in all and MR and magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) in 60]. 18-FDG PET was analyzed visually and semiquantitatively using the standard uptake value (SUV). The validation of the diagnosis was made by a surgical procedure (n = 44), a percutaneous biopsy (n = 2), main duct cytology (n = 1), or follow-up (n = 17). Mean and median follow-up times were 25 and 27.5 months, respectively (range, 12-90 months).Twenty-seven patients (42%) were asymptomatic. Forty-two patients underwent pancreatic resection, 2 palliative surgery, and 20 did not undergo surgery. An adenoma was diagnosed in 13 patients, a borderline tumor in 8, a carcinoma in situ in 5, and an invasive cancer in 21; in 17 patients a tumor sampling was not performed and therefore the histology remained undetermined. Positive criteria of increased uptake on 18-FDG PET was absent in 13 of 13 adenomas and 7 of 8 borderline IPMNs, but was present in 4 of 5 carcinoma in situ (80%) and in 20 of 21 invasive cancers (95%). Conventional imaging technique was strongly suggestive of malignancy in 2 of 5 carcinomas in situ and in 13 of 21 invasive carcinomas (62%). Furthermore, conventional imaging had findings that would be considered falsely positive in 1 of 13 adenomas (8%) and in 3 of 8 borderline neoplasms (37.5%). Therefore, positive 18-FDG PET influenced surgical decision making in 10 patients with malignant IPMN. Furthermore, negative findings on 18-FDG PET prompted us to use a more limited resection in 15 patients, and offered a follow-up strategy in 18 patients (3 positive at CT scan) for the future development of a malignancy.18-FDG PET is more accurate than conventional imaging techniques (CT and MR) in distinguishing benign from malignant (invasive and noninvasive) IPMNs. 18-FDG PET seems to be much better than conventional imaging techniques in selecting IPMNs patients, especially when old and asymptomatic, for surgical treatment or follow-up.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration or fine needle biopsy: the beauty is in the eye of the beholder.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm of the pancreas: cytologic features predict histologic grade.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) is an increasingly recognized cystic neoplasm of the pancreas, histologically classified by the degree of epithelial atypia and by the presence or absence of invasion of the cyst wall. To the authors' knowledge, the cytologic features of this neoplasm are poorly characterized, especially with respect to tumor grade.Thirty-three endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided pancreatic fine-needle aspiration biopsy (FNAB) samples and 1 pancreatic duct brush specimen from 25 patients with a histologically confirmed IPMN were retrospectively reviewed. Blinded to tumor grade, background mucin, inflammation, necrosis, overall cellularity, the presence of gastrointestinal-contaminating epithelium, architecture of cell clusters, and nuclear and cellular morphology were evaluated. In cases in which special stains for mucin were performed, the diagnostic utility of these stains was assessed. These cytologic features were subsequently correlated with the histologic diagnosis.The 34 cytology samples represented 4 adenomas, 15 IPMN-moderate dysplasias, 7 intraductal carcinomas, and 8 IPMNs with invasive carcinoma. Extracellular mucin was present in 97% of all cases; 53% had thick, viscous, "colloid-like" mucin. Special stains for mucin were positive in 6 of 11 cases (54%), helping to identify thin mucin in only 2 cases. Gastrointestinal contamination did not appear to create diagnostic difficulty due to an apparent dual (dysplastic-nondysplastic) epithelial population, but only 4 adenomas were evaluated in this study. Necrosis distinguished IPMN with carcinoma from IPMN-adenomas and IPMN with moderate dysplasia (P < .00001), and was more often observed with invasion than IPMN-carcinoma in situ (P < .05). Tight epithelial cell clusters with hyperchromatic nuclei and a high nuclear to cytoplasmic ratio was more significant in IPMN of at least moderate dysplasia (P = .03). Pale nuclei with parachromatin clearing was found to be a nuclear feature that was suspicious for at least carcinoma in situ (P < .001). In addition, significant background inflammation (neutrophils and histiocytes) was found to be more characteristic of IPMN with at least carcinoma in situ (P = .002).The presence of thick, "colloid-like" mucin is noted in half of the IPMN cases, but was not found to be specific to grade. The absence of such mucin does not exclude an IPMN. The presence of tight epithelial cell clusters is consistent with a neoplasm of at least moderate dysplasia, and abundant background inflammation and parachromatin clearing correlated with the presence of at least carcinoma in situ. Necrosis was the only feature found to be strongly suggestive of invasion.Diagnostic value of priming the endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration needle with heparin to improve specimen quality.Invasive carcinomas originating from intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas: conspicuity and primary sites of the solid masses on triple-phase dynamic CT imaging.To assess the conspicuity of invasive carcinomas (solid masses) originating from pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (invasive IPMNs) and the primary sites of the solid masses on thin-slice dynamic CT.Twenty patients with pathologically proven invasive IPMNs underwent triple-phase dynamic CT examinations (arterial, portal, and delayed phases). Qualitative and quantitative analyses of conspicuity of the solid masses were performed for all phases. The primary sites [branch duct and/or main pancreatic duct (MPD)] of the solid masses were evaluated on CT in comparison to the pathologic findings.The qualitative and quantitative analyses of the conspicuity of the solid masses showed that the arterial phase images were superior to those of the portal and delayed phases. The primary sites of the solid mass were histopathologically diagnosed as branch ducts in 6 (30%) patients, MPD in 13 (65%), and both branch ducts and the MPD in one (5%). The sensitivity and specificity of the CT evaluation of the primary sites were 100% for the branch ducts, and for the MPD 93% and 100%, respectively.Arterial phase images are useful for the diagnosis of invasive IPMNs, and attention should be paid to pancreatic parenchyma surrounding the MPD when detecting invasive carcinomas.Efficacy of endoscopic ultrasound in characterizing mass lesions in chronic pancreatitis.The aim of this study is to determine the influence of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) in the detection of chronic pancreatitis and identification of pancreatic masses suspected by other radiographic imaging modalities in such a clinical background.Retrospective analysis was performed on 105 consecutive pancreatic EUS examinations in an 18-month period at a single tertiary care referral center. Analysis included 75 patients with a suspected pancreatic mass by computerized axial tomography, magnetic resonance imaging, ultrasound, or endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreotography. All patients underwent EUS examination and if a mass was visualized, fine-needle aspiration biopsy was performed. Patients underwent either surgical exploration or clinical and radiographic follow-up for 6 months to confirm EUS findings.Chronic pancreatitis was suspected in 53 individuals by clinical or radiographic methods. Using standard EUS parenchymal and ductal criteria, chronic pancreatitis was confirmed in 41 (77%) of patients. In 33 patients with chronic pancreatitis detected by EUS, initial referral was for pancreatic mass. Twenty-eight (85%) patients had an actual mass and the remainder were false-positive clinical findings. Thirty-two percent of pancreatic masses in chronic pancreatitis were found to be malignant adenocarcinoma and the rest were inflammatory in nature. Subset analysis showed EUS-fine-needle aspiration of solid lesions to have a sensitivity and specificity of 87.9% and 100%, respectively. Detection of cystic lesions had a sensitivity and specificity of 88.5% and 100%, respectively.EUS is superior to other radiographic modalities in the determination of chronic pancreatitis and detection of mass lesions.Optimal interpretation of FDG PET in the diagnosis, staging and management of pancreatic carcinoma.This study had two purposes: to optimize the semiquantitative interpretation of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) PET scans in the diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma by analyzing different cutoff levels for the standardized uptake value (SUV), with and without correction for serum glucose level (SUV(gluc)); and to evaluate the usefulness of FDG PET when used in addition to CT for the staging and management of patients with pancreatic cancer.Sixty-five patients who presented with suspected pancreatic carcinoma underwent whole-body FDG PET in addition to CT imaging. The PET images were analyzed visually and semiquantitatively using the SUV and SUV(gluc). The final diagnosis was obtained by pathologic (n = 56) or clinical and radiologic follow-up (n = 9). The performance of CT and PET at different cutoff levels of SUV was determined, and the impact of FDG PET in addition to CT on patient management was reviewed retrospectively.Fifty-two patients had proven pancreatic carcinoma, whereas 13 had benign lesions, including chronic pancreatitis (n = 10), benign biliary stricture (n = 1), pancreatic complex cyst (n = 1) and no pancreatic pathology (n = 1). Areas under receiver operating characteristic curves were not significantly different for SUV and SUV(gluc). Using a cutoff level of 3.0 for the SUV, FDG PET had higher sensitivity and specificity than CT in correctly diagnosing pancreatic carcinoma (92% and 85% versus 65% and 61%). There were 2 false-positive PET (chronic pancreatitis, also false-positive with CT) and 4 false-negative PET (all with true-positive CT, abnormal but nondiagnostic) examinations. There were 5 false-positive CT (4 chronic pancreatitis and 1 pancreatic cyst) and 18 false-negative CT (all with true-positive FDG PET scans) examinations. FDG PET clarified indeterminate hepatic lesions or identified additional distant metastases (or both) in 7 patients compared with CT. Overall, FDG PET altered the management of 28 of 65 patients (43%).FDG PET is more accurate than CT in the detection of primary tumors and in the clarification and identification of hepatic and distant metastases. The optimal cutoff value of FDG uptake to differentiate benign from malignant pancreatic lesions was 2.0. Correction for serum glucose did not significantly improve the accuracy of FDG PET. Although FDG PET cannot replace CT in defining local tumor extension, the application of FDG PET in addition to CT alters the management in up to 43% of patients with suspected pancreatic cancer.Pancreatic cystic lesions: clinical predictors of malignancy in patients undergoing surgery.Despite advances in cross-sectional imaging and the use of molecular markers, distinguishing between benign and malignant cysts remains a clinical challenge.To identify both preoperative clinical and cyst characteristics at the time of EUS that predict malignancy.A retrospective analysis was performed on consecutive patients with pancreatic cysts who underwent endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and surgical resection from May 1996 to December 2007 at a tertiary centre. Clinical history, EUS characteristics, cytology, tumour markers and surgical histology were collected. Predictors of malignancy were determined by univariate and multivariate analysis using logistic regression.A total of 153 patients underwent a EUS and subsequent surgical intervention.Of the 153 patients, 57 (37%) had a histological diagnosis of malignancy. On univariate analysis, older age (P < 0.001), male gender (P = 0.010), jaundice (P = 0.039), history of other malignancy (P = 0.036), associated mass in cyst (P = 0.004) and malignant cytology (P < 0.001) were found to be associated with malignancy. History of pancreatitis (P = 0.008) and endoscopist impression of pseudocyst (P = 0.001) were found to be associated with benign cysts. Multivariate analysis found that only older age [Odds ratio (OR), 1.04; 95% confidence interval (CI), 1.01-1.08], male gender (OR, 2.26; 95% CI, 1.08-4.73) and malignant cytology (OR, 6.60; 95% CI, 2.02-21.58) were independent predictors of malignancy.Older age, male gender and malignant cytology from EUS predict malignancy at surgical resection. These characteristics may be used to estimate the probability of malignancy in a cyst and aid in management.[Malignancy predictive factors in pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm].Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) is a premalignant lesion of the pancreas. Its natural history is not well known. We evaluated the characteristics and predictor factors of malignancy of IPMN.A retrospective analysis was performed in 88 patients diagnosed with IPMN between January 1997 and December 2008. The diagnosis was done by abdominal computed tomography (CT), pancreatic-magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and/or endoscopic ultrasound (EUS). Gender, age, symptoms, origin, location, CA 19.9 serum levels, size of tumours and nodules by imaging techniques, type of surgery, malignancy and survival were evaluated. Nine pre-surgical variables were selected, and univariate and multivariate analysis to identify independent prognostic factors of malignancy were performed.The mean age was 64 years and 53% were men. 39% of tumours were incidental. 50% had their origin on the main pancreatic duct, 37% on collateral branchs and 13% were multifocal. 68% patients were operated: 42% had malignant neoplasms (32% carcinoma in situ and 68% invasive). Twelve patients died (1 benign, 1 in situ and 10 invasive). Univariate and multivariate analysis identified the symptoms and the tumour size (≥ 22 mm [median of our serie] and ≥ 30 mm [size accepted in literature]) as independent predictor factors of malignancy.Many IPMN are incidental findings. The presence of symptoms and size of the tumour are independent prognostic factors of malignancy and they should be considered to decide therapeutic actions.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy coupled with a KRAS mutation assay using allelic discrimination improves the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer.Mutation of the KRAS oncogene is present in 75% to 95% of pancreatic cancer tissues. This study aimed to evaluate whether endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA), combined with analysis of the KRAS mutation, improves the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer in cases of inconclusive or doubtful cytopathologic analysis.We prospectively included 186 patients with a pancreatic mass (103 men; mean age: 62 y). Cytopathology and KRAS mutations, using TaqMan MGB allelic discrimination, were performed on EUS-FNA material. A final diagnosis was obtained from EUS-FNA analysis and/or a subsequent biopsy if necessary, and/or surgery, and follow-up: these were pancreatic adenocarcinoma (n=104), other malignant pancreatic tumors (n=22), and benign lesions (n=60, including 35 cases of chronic pancreatitis).Inconclusive or doubtful (low-grade dysplasia or atypia) cytopathology was found in 68 cases. Of these, 29 patients who had adenocarcinoma were subsequently diagnosed, including 19 cases with a former KRAS mutation. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and overall accuracy of cytopathology alone to diagnose adenocarcinoma were 73%, 100%, 100%, 75%, and 85%, respectively. When KRAS mutation analysis was combined with pathology, these values reached 88%, 99%, 99%, 89%, and 93%, respectively. The performance of EUS-FNA to diagnose malignancy was similarly improved after the KRAS-mutation assay (negative predictive value increased from 67% to 88%; accuracy increased from 85% to 94%).EUS-FNA plus KRAS-mutation analysis, using allelic discrimination, is accurate and improves the diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma when pathology is inconclusive or doubtful.[Characterization and diagnostic accuracy of serous cystadenomas and mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas with multi-slice helical computed tomography].To evaluate the feasibility of using multi-slice helical computed tomography (MS-CT) to accurately distinguish serous cystadenomas from mucinous cystadenomas or cystadenocarcinomas of the pancreas and to determine their radiographic appearances that can be applied for differentiative diagnosis.We performed a single-blind retrospective analysis of CT images of 30 patients with pathologically proven primary cystic pancreatic neoplasms (12 cases of serous cystadenomas, 14 cases of mucinous cystadenomas, and 4 cases of mucinous cystadenocarcinomas) to reach a diagnosis of either serous cystadenoma or mucinous cystic tumor. CT features such as tumor location, septations, presence of calcification, features of cystic wall, papillary excrescences, and size of the largest cyst were recorded. Statistical analysis was performed to evaluate the efficacy of certain CT findings in the differentiation of serous cystadenomas and mucinous neoplasms.Totally 9 (75.0%) serous cystadenomas and 16 (88.9%) mucinous tumors were correctly diagnosed. Three serous cystadenomas were misdiagnosed as mucinous cystadenomas, while 2 mucinous neoplasms were misdiagnosed as serous cystadenomas. And 9 (75.0%) serous cystadenomas were located at the pancreatic head and neck areas, while 12 (66.7%) mucinous neoplasms were located at the pancreatic body and tail areas (P < 0.05). The presence of calcification, especially central calcification, had statistical significance in differentiating serous cystadenoma from mucinous neoplasms (P < 0.05). The size of the largest cyst over 2 cm was positive associated with mucinous neoplasms (P < 0.05).CT characteristics between serous cystadenomas and mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas have distinct difference, which validates the values of CT in differentiating these tumors. However, atypical CT appearances may compromise its diagnostic accuracy.[Computed tomographic-guided fine-needle biopsy of the pancreas for histology determination].Computed tomography-guided fine-needle biopsies of the pancreas were performed in 54 patients. In 46/54 biopsies, the material obtained permitted a histological diagnosis despite the small external needle diameter of only 0.95 mm. The only complication was due to laceration of an artery of the transverse mesocolon. The prevalence of malignant tumors was 67%. Adenocarcinoma was diagnosed in more than 80% of all biopsies; rare findings were malignant carcinoid or centroblastic lymphoma. Benign tumors included mucinous adenocystoma and serous microcystic adenoma. Within the group of patients where pathologic-anatomic evaluation was possible, the sensitivity of fine-needle biopsy for malignant tumors was 87% and the specificity 100%. A positive needle biopsy diagnosis for a malignant tumor reduces the number of exploratory laparotomies needed and is helpful in the planning of surgery.Rapid on-site evaluation by endosonographer during endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration for pancreatic solid masses.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is an established diagnostic method for patients with suspected pancreatic ductal carcinoma. Rapid on-site evaluation (ROSE) has been reported to improve the accuracy. However, an on-site cytopathologist is not routinely available in many institutions. One of the solutions may be ROSE by endosonographer. The aim was to examine whether diagnostic accuracy increases through ROSE by endosonographer using our cytological criteria.Patients who underwent EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses from January 2006 to August 2009 (n = 53, period 1) and September 2009 to April 2011 (n = 85, period 2) were retrospectively identified. Before initiating ROSE at the start of period 2, two endosonographers underwent training for cytological interpretation, which was focused on four cytological features of pancreatic ductal carcinoma: anisonucleosis, nuclear membrane irregularity, overlapping, and enlargement. During EUS-FNA in period 2, endosonographers classified the Diff-Quik smears under three atypical grades and evaluated the adequacy. All diagnoses were made by one pathologist without knowledge of clinical information.The rate of "inconclusive" diagnoses, interpreted as "suspicious," "atypical," and "inadequate for diagnosis" was reduced from 26.4% in period 1 to 8.2% in period 2 (P = 0.004). Moreover, diagnostic accuracy was increased from 69.2% in period 1 to 91.8% in period 2 (P < 0.001).This cytological grading system used in ROSE by endosonographers is invaluable for the diagnosis of pancreatic solid masses.Cyst fluid carcinoembryonic antigen concentration and cytology by endosonography-guided fine needle aspiration in predicting malignant pancreatic mucinous cystic neoplasms.To assess the value of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) level and cytology examination obtained by endosonography-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in predicting the malignancy of pancreatic mucinous cystic neoplasm (MCN).The data of patients with pancreatic MCN who underwent EUS-FNA in Changhai Hospital, Second Military Medical University (Shanghai, China) from November 2005 to April 2010 were collected and analyzed. The area under receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve of cyst fluid CEA, sensitivity, specificity, positive (PPV) and negative predictive value (NPV) of the cytology as well as cyst fluid CEA were determined.Of the 20 MCNs confirmed by surgical pathology, 10 were malignant and the remainder were premalignant. Cytology had some value in differentiating malignant from premalignant MCN with a sensitivity of 60.0%, specificity of 100.0%, PPV of 100.0% and NPV of 71.4%. CEA of > 692.8 ng/mL was able to predict malignancy (P = 0.007) with sensitivity of 80.0%, specificity of 90.0%, PPV of 88.9% and NPV of 81.8%, and its area under ROC curve was 0.855.Cyst fluid CEA level and cytology obtained by EUS-FNA are useful for predicting the malignancy of pancreatic MCN.Advantage of EUS Trucut biopsy combined with fine-needle aspiration without immediate on-site cytopathologic examination.Endoscopic ultrasonographically guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is a safe and accurate method for obtaining diagnostic material from lesions within and immediately adjacent to the upper GI tract.To determine whether EUS Trucut biopsy (EUS-TCB) (Quickcore, Wilson-Cook, Winstom Salem, NC) can increase the accuracy of EUS-guided tissue sampling when combined with FNA when no cytopathologist is present.Retrospective case review.University-based referral practice.All patients who had lesions that were accessible through the esophagus or stomach and that were greater than 20 mm and amenable to Trucut biopsy were included.A total of 41 patients underwent both EUS-FNA and TCB with a separate pathologist evaluating each specimen.The diagnostic performance of FNA, TCB, and its combination were compared.The overall accuracy in our series was as follows: FNA, 76%; TCB, 76% (P not significant); and combination of FNA and TCB, 95% (P = .007). In the 26 patients with malignant diagnoses, the accuracy of combination was 100% versus 77% for FNA (P = .03). The median number of passes with the FNA and TCB was 4.4 (range 2-8) and 2.8 (range 2-5), respectively. One patient in the series had fever and chest pain after EUS biopsy.Retrospective study.In our series EUS-TCB accuracy was equal to FNA when no on-site cytopathologist is present. TCB was helpful in the diagnosis of pancreatic masses, gastric submucosal lesions, lymphoma, and necrotic tumors. A 100% accuracy of FNA + TCB was seen in patients with malignant diseases and in patients who had failed or been refused biopsy by other modalities in the past. More data are needed before the exact role of TCB in the absence of on-site cytopathology can be accurately defined.Feasibility and yield of a novel 22-gauge histology EUS needle in patients with pancreatic masses: a multicenter prospective cohort study.The option of obtaining tissue samples for histological examination during endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) has theoretical and practical advantages over cytology alone. The aim of this study was to evaluate the feasibility, yield, and diagnostic accuracy of a new EUS 22-G fine-needle biopsy (FNB) device in patients with solid pancreatic masses in a multicenter, prospective study.All consecutive patients who underwent EUS-guided fine-needle biopsy (EUS-FNB) using a newly developed 22-G FNB needle between September 2010 and October 2010 were enrolled in the study. The EUS-FNB technique was standardized among the participating endoscopists. Only a single needle pass was performed.A total of 61 patients (35 males, mean age 64.2 ± 12.4 years) with solid pancreatic masses with a mean size of 32.4 ± 8.5 mm (range 13-90 mm) participated. EUS-FNB was performed through the duodenum in 35 cases (57.4 %) and was technically feasible in all but one of the 61 (98.4 %) patients without complications. Tissue samples for histological examination were obtained from 55 patients (90.2 %) and were deemed adequate in 54 of the cases (88.5 %). The diagnoses established by EUS-FNB were adenocarcinoma (39 patients), neuroendocrine tumors (5), chronic focal pancreatitis (5), sarcoma (2), lymphoma (1), acinar cellular tumor (1), and pancreatic metastasis from renal cell carcinoma (1). In an intention-to-treat (ITT) analysis, sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy for the histologic diagnosis of a pancreatic mass were 87.5, 100, 100, 41.7, and 88.5 %, respectively.EUS-FNB was technically feasible in 98 % of patients with a solid pancreatic mass. A suitable sample for histological evaluation was obtained in 88.5 % of the cases after only one single needle pass. The apparently low negative predictive value is likely to be improved by increasing the number of needle passes.Diagnostic value of quantitative EUS elastography for malignant pancreatic tumors: relationship with pancreatic fibrosis.EUS elastography has been used to facilitate the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer, but as yet the interpretation of this procedure has been largely subjective. The present study has been designed to validate a quantitative approach for the analysis of EUS elastography, and to assess its relationship with pancreatic fibrosis.86 patients with malignant pancreatic masses and 28 control subjects without any evidence of pancreatic diseases were examined by EUS elastography. EUS video sequences were subjected to a quantitative analysis based on mean hue histogram analysis. Pancreatic fibrosis was determined by quantitative morphometry in tissue specimens from 36 patients.The mean RGB (red, green, blue) value was significantly higher in the cancer patients compared to the controls (14.0 ± 0.4 vs. 11.5 ± 0.9; p = 0.0085), albeit with significant overlap between the groups. In contrast, a much sharper separation between the groups was obtained based on the individual color values for blue, green and red (p < 0.0001, respectively). By these means, 100 % sensitivity and specificity for the distinction between tumor and normal tissue was obtained for the blue color value, while the red and green color values were less discriminative. The fractional fiber content of the tumors was unrelated to the respective hue histogram color values.Quantitative EUS elastography allows for clear differentiation between malignant pancreatic tumors and normal tissue. Using this approach, we demonstrated that the stiffness of pancreatic tumors is largely independent of their fiber content.Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography: image quality, ductal morphology, and value of additional T2- and T1-weighted sequences for the assessment of suspected pancreatic cancer.To assess image quality and duct morphology on magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and also the value of additional T2- and T1-weighted sequences for differentiation of benignity and malignancy in patients with suspected pancreatic tumors.One-hundred-and-fourteen patients received MRCP and unenhanced and contrast material-enhanced MR imaging. MR results were analyzed independently by two blinded readers, and subsequently correlated with the results from surgery, biopsy, and follow-up. Assessment included the evaluation of image quality, duct visualization and morphology, and the differentiation of pancreatic lesion status (benign versus malignant).Overall, 49 patients had benign final diagnoses, while 65 had a malignant diagnosis. Image quality of single-shot thick-slab MRCP was rated significantly better than the MIP images of multisection MRCP. With MRCP alone, the two readers' accuracy in the assessment of pancreatic lesion status was 72% (95% CI, 64% to 83%) and 69% (95% CI, 56% to 77%), respectively; with the addition of T2- and T1-weighted images the accuracy significantly improved to 89% (95% CI, 82% to 95%) and 84% (95% CI, 77% to 92%) for readers 1 and 2, respectively.Single-shot thick-slab MRCP and multisection MRCP provide complementary results; however, single-shot MRCP had superior image quality. Moreover, assessment of ductal morphology with MRCP alone facilitated the diagnosis of different pathologic conditions of the pancreatobiliary system in the majority of patients. However, with the addition of T2- and T1-weighted sequences the overall diagnostic accuracy was significantly improved and thus we consider that a comprehensive MR approach should comprise both MRCP techniques and parenchymal sequences.EUS-FNA with rescue fluorescence in situ hybridization for the diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma in patients with inconclusive on-site cytopathology results.Detection of chromosomal abnormalities by fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) analysis has not been well-studied in FNA samples of pancreatic masses. Selective use of FISH in patients with inconclusive on-site cytopathology results may improve the sensitivity of EUS for malignancy.To determine the sensitivity and specificity of FISH analysis in patients with inconclusive on-site cytopathology results.Consecutive patients with suspected pancreatic malignancy, nonrandomized cohort study. Final diagnosis was based on either surgical biopsy or disease progression on extended follow-up or death.Academic center, tertiary-care referral cancer center.A total of 212 EUS examinations were performed in 206 patients for solid pancreatic lesions over a 24-month period (January 2009-December 2010). FISH analysis was done for 69 patients with inconclusive or nonavailable on-site cytology results.EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) of solid pancreatic masses with cytology and FISH analysis for polysomy of chromosomes 3, 7, and 17 and deletion of 9p21.Sensitivity/specificity of cytology, FISH, and a composite of cytology and FISH.Patients with positive on-site cytology (110), neuroendocrine tumors (22), insufficient follow-up (1), FISH not obtained (3), and renal cancer with pancreatic metastasis (1) were excluded. Sixty-nine patients comprised the study cohort, 54 with malignancy and 15 with benign disease. Sensitivity for malignancy of cytology, FISH analysis, and the combination were 61%, 74%, and 85%, respectively (P = .009). FISH detected an additional 13 cases of pancreatic adenocarcinoma missed by cytology. There was no false-positive FISH analysis in 15 patients with benign disease. No major complications occurred from EUS-FNA.Single center, selected patients underwent FISH analysis, limited number of patients with benign disease.In patients with suspected pancreatic cancer, FISH analysis can detect additional cases missed by cytology without compromising specificity. FISH analysis to detect polysomy of chromosomes 3, 7, and 17 and deletion of 9p21 should be considered when cytology is negative for malignancy in patients with a known pancreatic mass.Focal pancreatic mass: distinction of pancreatic cancer from chronic pancreatitis using gadolinium-enhanced 3D-gradient-echo MRI.To determine the accuracy of MRI including T1-weighted gadolinium (Gd)-enhanced three-dimensional-gradient-echo (3D-GE) sequences to distinguish pancreatic cancer from chronic pancreatitis in patients with pancreatic mass or focal enlargement.The study included 22 patients (15 males and seven females; mean age +/- SD, 56.2 +/- 11.5 years) with pancreatic mass or focal enlargement. Fourteen had pancreatic carcinoma and eight had chronic pancreatitis based on the histopathological and clinical findings. MRI examinations of all patients were retrospectively evaluated by two independent reviewers for the predetermined imaging findings of carcinoma and chronic pancreatitis. The accuracy of MRI for differentiating pancreatic carcinoma from chronic pancreatitis was determined. MRI findings of both entities were compared using t-tests, chi-squared tests, and logistic regression analyses for the differentiation of these two entities. The extent of agreement between two reviewers was determined with Kappa statistics.The sensitivity and specificity of MRI including T1-weighted 3D-GE sequences for differentiating pancreatic carcinoma from chronic pancreatitis were 93% (13/14) and 75% (6/8), respectively. The most discriminative finding for pancreatic carcinoma was relative demarcation of the mass compared to background pancreas in contrast to chronic pancreatitis on post-Gd 3D-GRE sequences (P < 0.05).MRI including Gd-enhanced T1-weighted 3D-GE sequences can differentiate pancreatic carcinoma from chronic pancreatitis successfully in most cases.Predictive factors associated with malignancy of intraductal papillary mucinous pancreatic neoplasms.To identify preoperative predictive factors associated with malignancy of intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) of the pancreas.Between April 1995 and April 2010, 129 patients underwent surgical resection for IPMNs at our institute and had confirmed pathologic diagnoses. The medical records were retrospectively reviewed and immunohistochemical staining for mucin (MUC) in pancreatic tissues was performed.Univariate analysis showed that the following five variables were closely associated with malignant IPMNs preoperatively: absence of extrapancreatic malignancy; symptoms; tumor size > 4 cm; main pancreatic duct (MPD) size > 7 mm; and lymph node enlargement on preoperative computed tomography (CT). Multivariate analysis revealed that the following two factors were significantly associated with malignant IPMNs preoperatively: MPD size > 7 mm [odds ratio (OR) = 2.50]; and lymph node enlargement on preoperative CT (OR = 3.57). No significant differences in the expression of MUC1, MUC2 and MUC5AC were observed between benign and malignant IPMNs.MPD size > 7 mm and preoperative lymph node enlargement on CT are useful predictive factors associated with malignancy of IPMNs.Cystic tumours of the pancreas.Cystic pancreatic tumours may be misdiagnosed as pseudocysts.From August 1990 to January 1998, 21 patients (16 women) with a median age of 60 years underwent operation for a cystic mass in the pancreas with histological confirmation of neoplasia (six serous cystadenoma (SCA), three mucinous cystic adenoma (MCA), ten mucinous cystadenocarcinoma (MCAC), one ductal adenocarcinoma with cystic degeneration, one cystic islet cell tumour).While the lesion had been labelled as a pseudocyst in eight patients, only one patient (MCA in the pancreatic head) had had acute pancreatitis previously. In seven patients the computed tomogram (CT) lacked suspicious neoplastic features, while endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, angiography and percutaneous cyst fluid analysis were unhelpful or misleading in 16 of 18 investigations with respect to differentiating tumour from pseudocyst. Attempted operation for cure was performed in 18 patients despite diagnostic delays of up to 6 years and initial treatment with cystenterostomy in two cases.Retrospective review revealed that all 21 cystic neoplasms could be diagnosed before operation by a history excluding previous pancreatitis (20 of 21 patients) or a CT suspicious for neoplasia (14 of 21). The diagnosis relies more on absence of previous pancreatitis and a suspicious clinician who errs on the side of resecting a pseudocyst rather than watching or draining a cystic neoplasm.Can EUS alone differentiate between malignant and benign cystic lesions of the pancreas?The aim of this study was to evaluate the ability of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) alone to predict and differentiate malignant from benign cystic lesions of the pancreas.From January, 1995, to August, 1999, 98 cases of pancreatic cystic lesions were evaluated by EUS; all of these were originally imaged by cross-sectional modalities that were not diagnostic. Among these, surgical/pathological correlation was available in 48 patients. The original endosonographic images were reviewed by two endosonographers who were blinded to each other's interpretation and to the surgical and pathological interpretation. The EUS images were assessed for the presence or absence of the following characteristics: 1) wall, 2) solid component, 3) septae, 4) lymphadenopathy, and 5) number of cysts. These characteristics were then correlated with the surgical and pathological findings and were assessed to determine if any were predictors of the lesion being benign or malignant.For reviewer A, the presence of a solid component by EUS was the only statistically significant predictor of malignancy (odds ratio = 4.73, 95% CI = 1.13-19.68, p = 0.03). However, 61% of patients with benign lesions were also interpreted by EUS to have a solid component. For reviewer B, none of the features were found to be significant predictors of a malignant lesion. When the results of both reviewers were combined, the presence of a solid component was not found to be a statistically significant predictor of malignancy (odds ratio = 1.046, 95% CI = 0.99-1.09, p = 0.07).Endosonographic features cannot reliably differentiate between benign and malignant cystic lesions of the pancreas after a nondiagnostic cross-sectional modality.[Endosonography in the assessment of pancreatic tumors. A comparison of the endosonographic findings of carcinomas and segmental inflammatory changes].To examine the value of endoscopic ultrasonography in distinguishing malignant and benign tumours of the pancreas.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) was performed on 130 consecutive patients (35 women and 95 men; mean age 56.6 [38-71] years), 61 with carcinoma of the pancreas (CP), 69 with segmental inflammatory (pseudotumorous) lesions of the pancreas (SILP). The diagnosis was confirmed by histology in 41 cases of CP, by autopsy in 4, by clinical follow-up (4-56 weeks, mean of 7 months) in 16. It was confirmed histologically in 39 cases of SILP, by clinical follow-up in 30 (12-93 weeks, mean of 12 months). All EUS findings were performed and recorded according to a standardized protocol and subsequently compared.There were no significant differences in EUS findings between CP and SILP. Statistical analysis between the two groups revealed any differential diagnostic relevance only with regard to some individual findings: coarse echo-dense deposits were seen by EUS in 16 of SILP cases (23%), but in only 4 of those with CP (7%), and then only in the face of similar changes in the rest of the organ or if there was additional chronic pancreatitis. Absence of demarcation from the duodenal or gastric wall was recorded in 18 cases of CP (30%), but in only 5 of SILP (7%). Lack of demarcation from the portal vein, splenic vein or coeliac artery was noted in 17 cases of CP (28%) and 6 of SILP (9%). Extension of tumour into vessel lumens was seen only in CP, but even here in only 7 cases (11%).Despite the high resolution of EUS it does not provide reliable differentiation of benign and malignant lesions of the pancreas in the individual case.Retrospective analysis of the utility of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in pancreatic masses, using a 22-gauge or 25-gauge needle system: a multicenter experience.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) is now performed routinely in many advanced endoscopy centers and has enhanced the ability to diagnose pancreatic masses. However, there is uncertainty about which needle size is optimal for EUS-FNA of pancreatic masses. We aimed to evaluate the performance of the 22-gauge and 25-gauge needles in obtaining cytologic diagnosis of pancreatic masses.All cases that were referred for EUS-FNA for pancreatic masses between February 2001 and June 2007 were reviewed, and patients who underwent EUS-FNA using the 22-gauge and 25-gauge needle system were identified. In patients who underwent surgery, operative histopathological findings were compared with the cytopathological findings from EUS-FNA.A total of 842 patients with pancreatic masses detected on computed tomography (CT) and/or magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and confirmed by EUS underwent EUS-FNA with the 22-gauge needle (n = 540) or the 25-gauge needle (n = 302). Results of EUS-FNA cytology findings were compared with the gold standard of surgical histopathological findings or long-term clinical follow-up. The sensitivity, specificity, PPV, and NPV of FNA were respectively 84%, 100%, 100%, and 73% [corrected] for the 22-gauge needle compared with 92%, 97%, 98%, and 87%, [corrected] respectively for the 25-gauge needle. No complications were noted in the 25-gauge needle group, compared with pancreatitis in 2% of the 22-gauge needle group.This retrospective comparative study shows that EUS-FNA with a 25-gauge needle system is a safe and reliable method for tissue sampling in pancreatic masses. The system is more sensitive and has a slightly [corrected] higher NPV than the standard 22-gauge needle. Our study suggests that perhaps the smaller caliber FNA needle causes less trauma during EUS-FNA and hence less complications. Further studies including randomized trials are needed.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided tissue sampling by combined fine needle aspiration and trucut needle biopsy: a prospective study.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) has a diagnostic accuracy of 70-90%, depending on the site under evaluation. In order to improve EUS-guided tissue sampling a novel 19-gauge trucut-type needle has been designed to obtain core biopsies during EUS. We prospectively evaluated the safety and accuracy of EUS-FNA alone versus combined EUS-FNA and trucut needle biopsy (TNB) in patients referred to our Unit over a 3-year period.A total of 159 patients underwent EUS-FNA alone (lesions<2 cm) or the combination of both sampling modalities (lesions>or=2 cm). The adequacy of sampling, sensitivity, specificity and overall accuracies of EUS-FNA or EUS-TNB alone and combined EUS-FNA/TNB were determined.Adequate samples were obtained by EUS-FNA, EUS-TNB and EUS-FNA/TNB in 91%, 88% and 97% of patients, respectively. From the pancreas (n=83), adequate samples were obtained by FNA in 94% and by TNB in 81%, compared with 87% and 92% from non-pancreatic sites (n=76), respectively. The combination of both techniques resulted in more adequate samples from non-pancreatic cases than EUS-FNA alone (P=0.044). The specificity was 100%. Overall accuracy for EUS-FNA alone was 77%, for EUS-TNB alone 73% and for EUS-FNA/TNB 91% (P=0.008). For pancreatic sampling, the accuracy of EUS-FNA alone was 77%, for EUS-TNB alone 56% and for EUS-FNA/TNB 83%. For non-pancreatic sampling, the accuracy for EUS-FNA alone was 78%, for EUS-TNB alone 83% and for EUS-FNA/TNB 95% (P=0.006). The complication rate was 0.6%.Combined EUS-FNA/TNB for lesions>or=2 cm improves adequacy of sampling and diagnostic accuracy compared with either technique alone and is safe.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration of the pancreas: cytomorphological evaluation with emphasis on adequacy assessment, diagnostic criteria and contamination from the gastrointestinal tract.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) has been proved to be safe, efficient and reliable in the diagnosis of pancreatic lesions. This study evaluated specimen adequacy, diagnostic criteria of various pancreatic neoplasms and contamination from the gastrointestinal (GI) tract.EUS-guided FNA of the pancreas and subsequent surgical resections performed at the University of California Irvine Medical Center during February 1996-October 2000 were retrospectively selected. Modified Papanicolaou staining method was used for immediate evaluation and cell block prepared.A total of 267 cases were available for review, including 147 (55.1%) positive/suspicious, 10 (3.7%) atypical, 96 (36.0%) negative and 14 (5.2%) unsatisfactory cases. Eighty-six (58.5%) positive/suspicious cases had histological confirmation and 12 (8.3%) had lymph node or distant metastases by cytology. Three atypical, two negative, and two unsatisfactory cases proved to have adenocarcinoma. Contamination from duodenum, stomach or pancreas was found in 77 positive/suspicious, three atypical and 90 negative cases. The sensitivity, specificity, diagnostic accuracy, positive and negative predictive values were 94.6%, 100%, 95.6%, 100%, 82% respectively.EUS FNA is efficient and accurate in the diagnosis of pancreatic neoplasms in adequate samples. Contamination from the GI tract should be well recognized to avoid misinterpretation.The differential diagnosis of pancreatic cysts by MR imaging.The usefulness of magnetic resonance imaging (MR imaging) in the differential diagnosis of cystic lesions of the pancreas was assessed.Pseudocyst was present in 9 patients, retention cyst in 4, simple cyst in 2, serous cystadenoma in 1, mucinous cystadenoma in 6, mucinous cystadenocarcinoma in 6. The relative signal intensity (SI) of each cystic lesion on MR imaging was assessed in comparison with that of the liver.It was difficult to distinguish the cystic types from each other based on the SI on MR images. Insofar as mucinous cystic tumors, those containing gelatinous mucin showed higher SI on T1-weighted images than those containing mucinous but watery fluid. five of the 6 mucinous cystic tumors containing gelatinous mucin were histologically malignant, whereas all except one those containing watery fluid were benign.Our results suggest that the SI on T1-weighted images may be useful in distinguishing malignant from benign mucinous cystic tumors.Immunohistochemical analysis of p53 and MIB-1 in tissue specimens obtained from endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy for the diagnosis of solid pancreatic masses.Endoscopic ultrasonography-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy (EUS-FNAB) has been shown to be a highly accurate technique for distinguishing benign from malignant pancreatic masses. In this study, we examined p53 immunohistochemical analysis in FNAB specimens obtained from solid pancreatic diseases, and prospectively evaluated clinical applications for the diagnosis of malignancy in combination routine histological examination. Tissue specimens obtained from 62 pancreatic masses (51 pancreatic cancers and 11 chronic pancreatitis) by EUS-FNAB were evaluated by routine histological examination and p53 immunostaining. The conventional EUS-FNA diagnostic test statistics for the pancreatic masses were as follows: 76% sensitivity, 91% specificity and 79% accuracy. p53 protein overexpression was observed in 67% patients with pancreatic cancer, but not in patients with chronic pancreatitis. If the diagnosis of malignancy was made using the combination of p53 protein overexpression and conventional histological examination, the diagnostic test statistics changed as follows: 90% sensitivity, 91% specificity and 92% accuracy. p53 immunostaining in combination with routine histological examination of EUS-FNAB may improve the diagnostic accuracy for pancreatic cancer.Histopathologic findings of multifocal pancreatic intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms on CT.The criteria for resection of solitary pancreatic side-branch intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN) have been well described by the Sendai consensus statement. However, the management of multiple pancreatic cystic lesions is less certain, with no clear guidelines in the literature to date. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the histopathologic findings in pancreatic IPMNs in patients with multiple (≥ 4) pancreatic cysts.The CT scans of all patients with a pathologically proven IPMN at our institution were reviewed, and a total of 52 patients with four or more pancreatic cysts were found. Each case was reviewed for the number of cysts and the presence of signs of invasive malignancy including a coexistent solid pancreatic mass, pancreatic ductal dilatation, and mural nodularity.A total of 52 patients (19 men, 33 women; mean age, 71.8 years) were found to have multifocal IPMNs, defined as four or more cysts, on CT. Of these 52 patients, nine also had evidence of a solid pancreatic mass on CT. Retrospective review of the pathologic results for the remaining 43 patients (17 men, 26 women; mean age, 71.76 years) showed 18 cases of an IPMN with either high-grade dysplasia or a coexistent invasive carcinoma. Most important, 37% (7/19 patients) had no CT findings of an invasive malignancy according to the Sendai criteria (i.e., cysts ≥ 3 cm in the axial plane, main pancreatic ductal dilatation ≥ 6 mm, or mural nodularity within a cyst) but were found to have an IPMN with either high-grade dysplasia or invasive carcinoma. When the pancreas contained 10 or more cysts, high-grade dysplasia or invasive carcinoma tended to be more likely than low- or intermediate-grade dysplasia (odds ratio, 3.83; 95% CI, 0.87-16.8; p = 0.075).The presence of multiple pancreatic cysts should be looked on with suspicion, particularly when there are a large number of cysts, even when none of the cysts individually meet the imaging criteria for resection according to the Sendai consensus recommendations. At the very least, these patients need to be followed very closely.Efficacy, safety, and predictive factors for a positive yield of EUS-guided Trucut biopsy: a large tertiary referral center experience.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided trucut biopsy (EUS-TCB) technique has the advantage of obtaining tissue for histological examination rather than for cytology alone. However, the diagnostic yield may depend on factors related to both technical aspects and the lesions sampled. Safety of EUS-TCB is yet to be established in a large number of procedures. The aim of the study was to determine factors predicting a positive diagnostic yield, and safety for EUS-TCB in a large tertiary referral center-based service.All patients were referred for EUS-guided tissue sampling as a part of their diagnostic workup. Linear-array echoendoscope (GF-2000-OL5, KeyMed) with a 19-gauge trucut needle (Quick-Core, Wilson-Cook) was used by two operators to obtain tissue samples. Clinical data, details of the EUS-TCB, post-procedure complications, and histology were prospectively collected between May 2002 and February 2008.In total, 247 patients (143 men) aged 57-73 (median 66) had EUS-TCB performed. Lesions sampled were in the pancreas (113), esophagogastric wall (34), and extra-pancreatic areas (100) (lymph nodes: 52). The maximum diameter of the lesion/wall thickness ranged from 0.6 to 5.4 cm (median 3). One to five passes were made (median 3) to obtain tissue cores 2-18 mm (median 10) in length. The procedure failed in 6% of cases. The overall diagnostic accuracy was 75%. The overall complication rate was 2% (bronchopneumonia, minor hemoptysis, minor hematemesis, mucosal tear, retropharyngeal abscess) with no procedure-related deaths. Site of lesion (pancreatic vs. extra-pancreatic, P<0.032), site of biopsy (stomach vs. duodenum vs. esophagus, P<0.001), and number of passes (< or =2 vs.>2, P<0.013) were predictors of a positive diagnostic yield in univariate analysis. However, only the site of biopsy (P<0.001, 95% CI: 0.58-2.32) and number of passes (P=0.05) were independent predictors in multinominal logistic regression.Diagnostic yield of EUS-TCB is higher when lesion is approached through the stomach and better when more than two passes were made. In this large series, the complication rate of 2% associated with EUS-TCB was similar to that reported with EUS-fine needle aspiration technique.The efficacy and safety of single-session endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography for evaluation of pancreatic masses.There have been limited studies evaluating single-session EUS-FNA and ERCP for evaluation of pancreatic masses. The aim of this study was to determine the safety of single-session EUS-FNA and ERCP, and to compare the diagnostic accuracies of cytodiagnosis by EUS-FNA, ERCP, and their combination.A total of 100 patients with pancreatic masses were prospectively enrolled. All patients underwent single-session EUS-FNA and ERCP. The main outcome measurement was frequency of post-procedural complications. Another measurement was diagnostic accuracy of cytodiagnosis by EUS-FNA, ERCP, and their combination.Procedure-related pancreatitis occurred in 10 patients, but all patients were conservatively managed. Cytodiagnosis by EUS-FNA was significantly superior to ERCP in accuracy. In patients with a pancreatic head mass, 3 cases of false negative EUS-FNA were positive on ERCP. The combination procedures improved accuracy compared with EUS-FNA alone. By contrast, in the subgroup of the pancreatic body or tail mass, the combination of EUS-FNA and ERCP did not improve cytodiagnosis compared to that with EUS-FNA alone.Single-session EUS-FNA and ERCP appears to be as safe as performing each procedure separately. EUS-FNA should be considered the principal procedure for cytodiagnosis. ERCP has only a complementary role in patients with pancreatic head mass.Endoscopic ultrasound guided fine-needle aspiration core biopsy: comparison between an automatic biopsy device and two conventional needle systems.endoscopic ultrasound guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) allows cytologic and/or histologic diagnosis of lesions within or adjacent to the gastrointestinal tract. However, the amount of tissue obtained with a regular 22 gauge needle is not always satisfactory. With the development of a needle XNA-10J-KB (Shot-Gun) that resembles the automatic liver biopsy needle, it is expected that significant samples be obtained more frequently (core biopsy), optimizing histological analysis.to compare samples obtained with EUS-FNA using 3 different needle systems: GIP, NA-10J-1 and Shot-Gun.19 patients underwent EUS-FNA for diagnosis (5) or tumor staging (14). Mean age was 58.9 years (range 27-82), being 50% men. All patients were submitted to EUS-FNA with the 3 needle models. The Shot-Gun model was "shot" when its tip was near the target inside the lesion, followed by aspiration. Samples were submitted for cytologic and histologic examination.mean lesion size was 3.0 cm (range 0.8-5.5 cm). Final diagnoses were made after surgery or intra-operative biopsy: 13 pancreatic tumors (12 adenocarcinomas and 1 neuroendocrine tumor), 4 chronic pancreatitis, 1 acute pancreatitis, and 1 cholangiocarcinoma. Specimens adequate for cytologic diagnosis were obtained in 13/19 (68. 4%) patients using GIP model, in 14/19 (73.7%) with NA10J-1 model, and in 17/19 (89.5%) with ShotGun, model (p=0.039). Histologic analysis was possible in 10/19 (52.6%) patients using the GIP model, in 14/19 (73.7%) with NA10J-1, and in 17/19 (89.5%) with Shot-Gun, model (p=0.005). Adequate samples for cytologic or histologic assessment in 16/19 (84.2%) patients using the GIP model, in 17/19 (89.5%) with NA10J-1, and in 18/19 (94.7%) with Shot-Gun, model (p=0.223). In two cases biopsies were negative due to very hard tumors.the Shot-Gun needle obtained better samples for histological diagnosis than NA10J-1 needle and GIP.Indications for endoscopic ultrasound and diagnosis on fine-needle aspiration and cytology.To determine common indications for requesting Endoscopic Ultrasound (EUS) and to describe the diagnosis made after endoscopic ultrasound/Fine-Needle Aspiration and Cytology (FNAC) during two years at a tertiary gastrointestinal unit.Cross-sectional descriptive study.The study was carried out in Gastrointestinal Department of Military Hospital, Rawalpindi, from March 2006 to February 2008.One hundred and eighty nine patients who underwent EUS during study period at Military Hospital were included in the study. Patients too ill (hypoxemic/hypotensive) to undergo procedure safely and those with complete esophageal blockage at upper end by tumour not allowing scope/EUS probe to advance beyond were excluded. EUS was done with Olympus Exera EUS 160, linear or radial scope, as required. EUS findings were recorded against indications as enlarged lymph nodes, tumour, staging, normal or incomplete. Fine-Needle Aspiration (FNA) was done as per findings on EUS using 21-22 G needle. An on-site cytopathologist made the provisional cytopathological diagnosis. Final cytology/histopathology report was given after review of slides by consultant histopathologists at Armed Forces Institute of Pathology (AFIP), Rawalpindi, and were documented as tuberculosis, malignancy, chronic pancreatitis or reactive hyperplasia. Data was analyzed for documentation of patients' age, gender, common indications, findings on EUS/FNAC, using SPSS version 10. Percentages and frequencies were calculated for the presence of these above-mentioned variables.Of the 189 patients, 145 (77%) were male and 44 (23%) female. Age was 18-80 years (mean 49 years). Major indications for referral were lymphadenopathy in 92 (49%), suspected growth pancreas in 57 (28%), growth of stomach in 20 (11%) and a heterogeneous group included esophageal, liver, retroperitoneal masses, rectal and other pathologies. Findings on EUS included lymphadenopathy in 76, mostly in sub-carina and AP window. Mass in pancreas was seen in 36, followed by stomach tumour in 17 and esophagus in 9. FNAC was done in 142 out of 189 patients. Final diagnosis out of 67 FNAC/histopathology of lymph nodes were tuberculosis in 26 and malignant lesions in 23. These included metastatic adenocarcinoma in 8, lymphoproliferative disorder in 7, metastatic squamous cell carcinoma in 5, small cell carcinoma in 2 and anaplastic in 1. Pancreatic tumours were adenocarcinoma in 16, poorly differentiated in 3 and neuroendocrine in 2. Stomach tumours were found in 11, and included lymphomas 5, GIST 3, carcinoids 2, metastatic choriocarcinoma 1 and adenocarcinoma in 1. Therapeutically, 3 celiac blocks and one pancreatic pseudocyst drainage was done.The main indication of EUS and pathology of mediastinal and celiac nodes were metastatic malignancy and tuberculosis. Pancreatic adenocarcinoma was another common cause for asking EUS.Macroscopic on-site quality evaluation of biopsy specimens to improve the diagnostic accuracy during EUS-guided FNA using a 19-gauge needle for solid lesions: a single-center prospective pilot study (MOSE study).Although rapid on-site cytologic evaluation provides high efficacy of EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA), its availability is limited. Alternatively, macroscopic on-site quality evaluation (MOSE) may increase the efficacy of EUS-FNA.To assess the efficacy of MOSE in estimating the adequacy of histologic core specimens obtained by EUS-FNA using a standard 19-gauge needle (19GN) for solid lesions.A prospective pilot study.Tertiary-care referral center.One hundred patients with solid lesions (n = 111 lesions).EUS-FNA using 19GN MAIN OUTCOME MEASUREMENTS: The relation of a macroscopic visible core (MVC) in the FNA specimens on MOSE with histologic core and the diagnostic yields were studied.The feasibility of EUS-FNA using a 19GN was 99%. The final diagnoses were malignancy in 83 lesions and benign in 28. MOSE revealed MVC in 91.1% with the median length of 8 mm. Histologic core was confirmed in 78.9%. The receiver-operating characteristic curve of the length of MVC for the presence of histologic core showed the cut-off MVC length of 4 mm with area under the curve of .893. Comparisons of per-pass diagnostic yields showed significantly superior histologic, cytologic, and overall diagnostic yields in MVC ≥ 4 mm as compared with <4 mm. The multivariate analysis for false-negative pass identified lesion in the pancreas and MVC < 4 mm as significant risk factors. No adverse events were seen.Single center, limited operatorsMVC of ≥4 mm on MOSE can be an indicator of specimen adequacy and can improve diagnostic yield; however, additional FNA may be recommended for pancreatic lesions. (UMIN000010417.).Morphological analysis and differentiation of benign cystic neoplasms of the pancreas using computed tomography and magnetic resonance imaging.To evaluate morphologic characteristics and establish a standardized diagnostic algorithm to differentiate benign cystic pancreatic tumors (CPTs) in non-pancreatitis patients using multidetector computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI).Patients with histopathologically proven CPTs who had undergone MRI and/or CT and subsequent tumor resection in our institution were retrospectively identified. Images were analyzed for morphology and enhancement patterns by three independent blinded observers. Preoperative image findings were correlated with histopathological results. Based on the evaluated morphologic parameters, a standardized diagnostic algorithm was designed to help characterize the lesions.A total of 62 consecutive patients with 64 CPTs were identified from the surgical database (21 intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms; 10 mucinous cystic neoplasms; 12 serous microcystic adenomas; 3 serous oligocystic adenomas; 6 solid pseudopapillary tumors; 12 neuroendocrine neoplasms). The overall averaged accuracy for the 3 observers was 89.9 % for CT and 93.1 % for MRI with increasing overall accuracy in relation to the experience of the observer (88.2 %, 91.5 %, and 93.8 %, respectively). Overall, the generalized kappa value was 0.69 (CT, 0.64; MRI, 0.76); p < 0.001). The accuracy of the standardized diagnostic algorithm was 91.1 %.It is possible to characterize benign CPTs with MRI and CT, while MRI appears to be superior to CT. Diagnostic accuracy depends on the observer's experience. The standardized algorithm can aid in the differential diagnosis but still needs to be tested in other patient populations.Characterization of cystic pancreatic masses: relative accuracy of CT and MRI.The objective of our study was to determine the role and relative accuracy of CT and MRI in the characterization of cystic pancreatic masses.We retrospectively identified 58 patients with histopathologically proven cystic pancreatic masses at our institution who underwent preoperative CT (n = 40), MRI (n = 6), or both (n = 12). Two radiologists independently recorded their leading diagnoses with levels of diagnostic certainty (0-100%), their estimates of overall likelihood of malignancy (0-100%), and the morphologic characteristics of the tumors. Data were analyzed to determine relative accuracy in the diagnosis of malignancy, relationship between diagnostic certainty and accuracy, and frequency of malignancy in unilocular thin-walled cysts smaller than 4 cm.Twenty-one (36%) of 58 masses were malignant. CT and MRI were equally accurate in establishing the diagnosis of malignancy (area under the receiver operating characteristic curve [A(z)] = 0.91 and 0.85 for reviewers 1 and 2 at MRI vs 0.82 and 0.76 at CT, respectively; p > 0.05). The leading diagnosis given by reviewers 1 and 2 was correct in 46% (32/70) and 43% (30/70) of the studies, respectively. When reviewer diagnostic certainty was 90% or more, the corresponding values were not significantly (p > 0.05) improved at 55% (12/22) and 48% (10/21), respectively. Two (15%) of 13 unilocular thin-walled cysts smaller than 4 cm were frankly malignant.CT and MRI are reasonably and similarly accurate in the characterization of cystic pancreatic masses as benign or malignant; limitations include a substantial rate of misdiagnosis even when reviewer certainty is high and a moderate frequency of malignancy in small morphologically benign-appearing cysts.Relative accuracy of CT and MRI for characterization of cystic pancreatic masses.Usefulness of EUS combined with contrast-enhancement in the differential diagnosis of malignant versus benign and preoperative localization of pancreatic endocrine tumors.Pancreatic endocrine tumors (PETs) develop in relatively few patients, but they are often difficult to diagnose because of their small size and various clinical symptoms.The aim of this study was to investigate the usefulness of EUS combined with contrast enhancement (CE-EUS) in the preoperative localization of PETs and the differentiation between malignant and benign PETs.Single-center retrospective study.Sixty-two pathologically certified PETs of 41 patients who underwent EUS, multiphasic multidetector computed tomography (MDCT), and transabdominal US at our institute since 2001.Intravenous injection of US contrast media.Comparison of EUS, MDCT, and US in the preoperative identification of PETs, and the characteristic findings of EUS with malignancy.EUS showed high sensitivity (95.1%) in identifying PETs compared with MDCT (80.6%) and US (45.2%). Multivariable logistic regression analysis showed that heterogeneous ultrasonographic texture was the most significant factor for malignancy (OR = 53.33; 95% CI, 10.79-263.58). Most heterogeneous hypoechoic areas and anechoic areas corresponded to hemorrhage or necrosis on pathologic examination. They were identified as filling defects in CE-EUS and were more clearly recognized than in conventional EUS.Retrospective study.EUS has higher sensitivity in preoperative localization of PETs compared with MDCT and US. The characteristics of EUS and CE-EUS findings in malignant PETs were clarified, and they will improve the diagnostic accuracy of PETs.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas: differentiation of malignant and benign tumors by endoscopic ultrasound findings of mural nodules.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs)have a wide pathologic spectrum and it is difficult to differentiate malignant from benign tumors. The aim of this study was to identify predictors of malignancy using contrast-enhanced endoscopic ultrasound (CE-EUS).In our institute, main duct type and mixed type IPMNs, branch duct type IPMNs with mural nodules, and IPMNs with coexistent invasive ductal cancer were indications for surgery. Eighty-seven IPMNs (14 main duct, 25 mixed, and 48 branch duct type) were resected and CE-EUS findings were compared with pathologic findings. Twelve clinicopathological variables and CE-EUS morphologic findings were assessed.Mural nodules defined as blood flow supplied protrusions were classified into 4 types: type I: low papillary nodule, type II: polypoid nodule, type III:papillary nodule, and type IV: invasive nodule.Forty-two, 26, 16, and 3 were pathologically diagnosed as adenoma,noninvasive carcinoma, invasive IPMNs, and coexistent invasive ductal cancer, respectively. Multivariable logistic regression analysis showed that types III/IV mural nodule (odds ratio = 10.8; 95% confidential intervals = 2.75-56.1) and symptomatic IPMNs (odds ratio = 4.31; 95% confidential intervals = 1.37-14.7) were significant for malignancy. For mural nodule diameter, invasive IPMNs were significantly larger, but types III and IV mural nodules were more frequently associated with malignancy, particularly invasive cancer, at 88.9% and 91.7%, respectively. The diagnosis of IPMNs with types III or IV mural nodule as malignant resulted in a sensitivity of 60%, specificity of 92.9%, and accuracy of 75.9%.In conclusion, new morphologic criteria were useful to identify the malignant potentials of IPMNs.FDG-PET is able to detect pancreatic carcinoma in chronic pancreatitis.2-(18F)-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) is an imaging technique which enables detection of malignancies. FDG-PET has been established as a tool for the diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma (CA). Early detection is mandatory as cure can only be achieved in non-advanced disease. This is, however, very difficult with conventional radiological techniques. Patients with chronic pancreatitis (CP) are at risk of developing CA. A simple, reliable screening method for malignant degeneration is highly desirable. We set out to investigate whether FDG-PET is able to detect CA in the setting of CP and can fulfil a potential role in the early detection of CA in CP.FDG-PET was performed in 77 CP patients and in six patients with CP complicated by CA (CP + CA). We included 26 CA patients as a positive control. A positive scan was defined as focal FDG accumulation in the pancreas region.In 67 of the 77 CP (87%) patients, pancreatic FDG accumulation was absent. Six patients had significant accumulation. In CA, 24/26 patients had a positive PET. Five out of the six patients with CP + CA had focal uptake, while minor uptake was seen in one patient. FDG-PET was positive in almost all CA patients and CP + CA patients. FDG-PET was negative in the large majority (87%) of CP patients, which suggests that a positive PET scan in CP patients must lead to efforts to exclude a malignancy.These data suggest that FDG-PET has a potential role as a diagnostic tool for detecting CA in longstanding CP.Performance of endosonography-guided fine needle aspiration and biopsy in the diagnosis of pancreatic cystic lesions.Preoperative diagnosis of cystic lesions of the pancreas remains difficult despite improvement in imaging modalities and cystic fluid analysis. The aim of our study was to assess the performance of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and EUS-guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) in the diagnosis of pancreatic cystic lesions.Data from a series of 127 consecutive patients with pancreatic cystic lesions were prospectively studied. EUS and EUS-guided FNA were performed in all patients, and cystic material was used for cytological and histological analysis as well as for biochemical and tumor markers analysis. Performance of EUS diagnosis, biochemical and tumor markers, and FNA diagnosis were compared with the final histological diagnosis obtained at surgery or postmortem examination. Sixty-seven patients underwent surgery and therefore constituted our study group.EUS provided a tentative diagnosis in 113 cases (89%). Cytohistological FNA provided a diagnosis in 98 cases (77%). When the results of EUS and EUS-guided FNA were compared with the final diagnosis (67 cases), EUS correctly identified 49 cases (73%), whereas FNA correctly identified 65 cases (97%). Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of EUS and EUS-guided FNA to indicate whether a lesion needed further surgery were 71% and 97%, 30% and 100%, 49% and 100%, and 40% and 95%, respectively. Carbohydrate antigen 19-9 > 50,000 U/ml had a 15% sensitivity and a 81% specificity to distinguish mucinous cysts from other cystic lesions, whereas it had a 86% sensitivity and a 85% specificity to distinguish cystadenocarcinoma from other cystic lesions.EUS-guided FNA is a valuable tool in the preoperative diagnostic assessment of pancreatic cystic lesions.Comparison of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration for focal pancreatic lesions in patients with normal parenchyma and chronic pancreatitis.The clinical value of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) of pancreatic lesions is uncertain in patients with normal parenchyma and chronic pancreatitis. The aim of this study was to analyze the diagnostic yield and influence of EUS-FNA on the clinical management of patients with pancreatic lesions, in the presence (CP) or absence (NP) of chronic pancreatitis.A total of 207 consecutive patients with NP (n = 133) and CP (n = 74) were examined using linear array echo endoscopes for the procedure and 22-gauge needles.Adequate specimens were obtained from 200 lesions. A correct final diagnosis was established at histology (n = 108), bacteriology (n = 9), and clinical follow-up (n = 83). Cytology gave 17 false-negative EUS-FNA results (overall sensitivity: 85%). In patients with NP, 60 solid adenocarcinomas were detected, 32 other malignancies, and 38 benign lesions, with 11 false-negative results (sensitivity: 89%). In patients with CP, only seven of 13 malignancies (all solid adenocarcinomas) were identified using FNA (sensitivity: 54%). Overall, malignancy was identified in 116 patients, 32 of whom (27%) had lesions other than primary solid adenocarcinomas. Management was altered in 25 of these patients, which changed the surgical approach in 21%. EUS-FNA influenced the therapeutic approach in 44% of the total patient group.EUS-FNA was especially useful in patients with a focal pancreatic lesion with normal parenchyma. Its sensitivity in patients with CP was unacceptably low, and resection of the tumor using standard surgical techniques was still usually required to confirm the correct diagnosis. Diagnostic EUS-FNA influenced clinical management in nearly half of patients.Evaluation of fine needle aspiration vs. fine needle capillary sampling on specimen quality and diagnostic accuracy in endoscopic ultrasound-guided biopsy.To compare percutaneous and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)-guided biopsy techniques.From July 2005 to February 2006, all patients referred for EUS-guided fine needle aspiration (FNA) were considered. If inclusion criteria were met, the first 2 biopsy passes were performed without suction (fine needle capillary [FNC] sampling). Two additional passes were performed using the same needle with 10 mL of applied suction (FNA). A single blinded pathologist later retrospectively evaluated each set of slides. Fifty-three patients met inclusion criteria. The study group comprised pancreatic masses (23), lymph nodes (26), subepithelial masses (3) and liver lesion (1). There were 38 malignant and 15 benign lesions.No statistically significant differences were found with the scoring systems considered in the study. In the subgroups of patients with pancreatic masses, lymph nodes, benign disease and malignant disease, no statistically significant outcomes were noted.No difference exists between quality and diagnostic accuracy of specimens obtained from EUS-guided tissue acquisition via FNC and FNA. The decision to use FNC or FNA should be left to the discretion of the individual endosonographer.Additional value of FDG PET/CT to contrast-enhanced CT in the differentiation between benign and malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms of the pancreas with mural nodules.This study aimed at determining the additional value of FDG PET/CT to contrast-enhanced CT in the differentiation between benign and malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) of the pancreas with mural nodules.This retrospective review of medical records was approved by our institutional review board. The preoperative PET/CT images of 16 non-diabetic patients with surgically proven IPMN, where mural nodules of 3 mm or larger were shown by preoperative contrast-enhanced CT, were retrospectively evaluated. The 16 patients were divided into two groups: 7 patients with benign IPMN [adenoma (n = 1) and borderline tumor (n = 6)] and 9 patients with malignant IPMN [carcinoma in situ (CIS) (n = 8) and invasive carcinoma (n = 1)]. Nuclear medicine physician blinded to the pathologic assessment of malignancy of IPMN set a spherical volume of interest (VOI) over the mural nodules on PET/CT images and recorded the peak standardized uptake value (SUV(max)) in the VOI, referring the contrast-enhanced CT images. Statistical differences in the size of mural nodule, the diameter of main pancreatic duct (MPD), and SUV(max) of the tumors between benign IPMNs and malignant IPMNs were compared using the Mann-Whitney U test. Statistical significance was set at p < 0.05. Additionally, the diagnostic accuracy of FDG PET for the detection of malignancy was calculated.The SUV(max) of the malignant IPMNs with mural nodules of 3 mm or larger was higher than that of benign IPMNs (2.7 ± 0.6 vs. 1.9 ± 0.3, p < 0.01). Meanwhile, there was no significant difference in mural nodule diameter and MPD diameter between the two groups. FDG PET/CT showed an excellent diagnostic accuracy for the differentiation between malignant and benign IPMNs with mural nodules: the sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV, and accuracy in malignant IPMN with mural nodule of FDG PET/CT were 77.8, 100, 100, 77.8, and 87.5 for the cutoff value of 2.3; and 100, 57.1, 75.0, 100, and 81.3 for the cutoff value of 2.0, respectively.The result of this study indicates that FDG PET/CT can provide additional information for the differentiation between benign and malignant IPMNs of the pancreas with mural nodules.Is positron emission tomography using 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose and 11C-acetate valuable in diagnosing indeterminate pancreatic masses?It can be impossible to differentiate a mass forming chronic pancreatitis from adenocarcinoma of the pancreas using standard anatomical imaging. Positron emission tomography using 2-[18F] fluoro-2deoxy-D-glucose (18FDG-PET) and 1-[11C]-acetate (11C-acetate-PET) are methods taking advantage of the metabolic differences between benign and malignant tissues.To determine the diagnostic accuracy of 18FDG-PET and 11C-acetate-PET in indeterminate pancreatic masses.Twenty patients with an indeterminate mass of the head of the pancreas were prospectively studied. All patients underwent 18FDG-PET and eighteen of them 11C-acetate-PET. Scans were evaluated qualitatively and quantitatively; the later by using regional standardised uptake value (SUV). Final diagnosis was established using histopathologic evaluation of resected specimen or biopsy.Adenocarcinoma was diagnosed in twelve patients and chronic pancreatitis in eight. Qualitative evaluation of 18FDG-PET imaging revealed three false negative and one false-positive results. The sensitivity, specificity, and diagnostic accuracy were 75 %, 88 %, and 80 %, respectively. The cut-off SUV to differentiate malignant from benign disease was 3,5 demonstrating a sensitivity of 91.7 % and a specificity of 75 %.18FDG-PET imaging could not confirm or exclude malignancy in indeterminate masses of the head of the pancreas with high sensitivity and diagnostic accuracy. 11C-acetate-PET provided no additional diagnostic benefits.Usefulness of PET/CT for the differentiation and characterization of periampullary lesions.At present, there is no ideal imaging modality for the diagnosis of periampullary lesions. We prospectively evaluated the preoperative diagnostic usefulness of PET/CT for differentiating malignant from benign periampullary lesions.A total of 62 patients aged 27-86 years with periampullary lesions scheduled for surgical resection were consecutively recruited. Dual-phase (18)F-FDG PET/CT was performed in all patients. An additional 3'-deoxy-3'-[(18)F]fluorothymidine (FLT) scan was performed in 21 patients (33.9%). The relationship of visual interpretation, SUV, and lesion to background ratio (LBR) with surgical histopathology diagnosis was evaluated.There were 36 patients with malignancies, 15 with benign neoplasms, and 11 with benign non-neoplasms. Using visual analysis, FDG PET/CT had good sensitivity (86.1%; 31/36), lower specificity (57.7%; 15/26), and fair accuracy (74.2%; 46/62). Regional lymph node metastases were identified in 7 of 11 patients by FDG PET/CT and only in 1 patient by abdominal CT. On the other hand, hepatic metastasis was detected in 1 patient by FDG PET/CT. Dual-phase FDG (P < 0.001) and FLT (P < 0.05) SUV(max) and LBR were significantly higher in malignant than in benign lesions, and in malignant neoplasms than in benign neoplasms. Although average FLT SUV(max) was significantly lower than the average FDG SUV(max) (P < 0.001), the specificity and accuracy of the former were significantly better.FDG PET/CT may help identify patients with periampullary malignancy. FDG SUV(max) and LBR appear to aid in the differential diagnosis and add diagnostic confidence. In addition, higher specificity and diagnostic accuracy may be achieved by additional FLT PET/CT.Preoperative multidetector row computed tomography for evaluation and assessment of resection criteria in patients with pancreatic masses.preoperative assessment of pancreatic masses is still challenging as regards the characterization and assessment of irresectability. The opportunities of modern multidetector computed tomography (MDCT) with image postprocessing can be expected to enhance the diagnostic performance if accurate criteria are elaborated.to estimate the accuracy of MDCT and multiplanar image reconstructions with the use of standardized imaging criteria for preoperative evaluation of pancreatic masses with respect to irresectability.a total of 105 consecutive patients who underwent exploratory laparoscopy or pancreatic resection and had preoperative 3-phase MDCT (4-64 rows) were enrolled retrospectively. First, transverse sections and secondly additional 3Ds were reviewed by two independent blinded observers (O1/O2). Preoperative imaging findings were correlated with intraoperative and histopathologic results.among all 105 patients, 70 malignant pancreatic tumors and 35 benign pancreatic diseases were found (accuracy of 93% for O1 and 91% for O2). For arterial tumor invasion, receiver operator characteristic (ROC) analysis (values averaged from the results of O1 and O2) revealed an area under the curve (AUC) of 0.931 for transverse sections and 0.986 for 3Ds. Regarding irresectability, positive predictive values were 97% (with 3Ds, 97%) for O1/O2; negative predictive values were 84% (with 3Ds, 89%) for O1 and 86% (with 3Ds, 91%) for O2.MDCT with 3Ds was highly accurate for evaluation and assessment of irresectability criteria in patients with pancreatic masses. However, due to the limited specificity regarding arterial tumor infiltration, the indication for surgical exploration should be made generously in case of inconclusive findings.[Ultrafast magnetic resonance tomography changes the standard in pancreas diagnosis].Since the introduction of MRI, including imaging of the hepato-pancreatic duct system (MRCP) and 3D-MR angiography (3D-MRA), new pancreatic diagnostic procedures have been developed.We report on 143 patients with benign and malignant diseases of the pancreas, who only received MRI preoperatively. All radiologic findings were confirmed intraoperatively.For resectability, MRI obtained sensitivity of 96.0% and specificity of 89.5% and for classification sensitivity of 99.1% and specificity of 95.2%.Based on our experience, the benign vs malignant nature of the disease, MRI is a safe and reliable method for pancreatic tumors being able to become the standard diagnostic procedure in the future.F-18 fluorodeoxyglucose PET in vivo evaluation of pancreatic glucose metabolism for detection of pancreatic cancer.To evaluate positron emission tomography (PET) with fluorine-18-labeled fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) for detection of pancreatic cancer compared with computed tomography (CT) and ultrasonography (US).Forty patients with suspected pancreatic cancer underwent static PET after intravenous injection of 150-300 MBq FDG. Focal FDG accumulation was regarded as a sign of malignancy and was quantitated by calculating differential uptake ratios (DURs) and tumor-liver ratios (TLRs).Malignancy was histologically proved in 27 patients. PET helped correctly classify 25 of 27 malignant conditions and 11 of 13 benign disorders. DUR and TLR were statistically significantly higher in malignant compared with benign disease (P < .01). False-negative findings were obtained in patients with insulin-dependent diabetes. False-positive findings were noted in a patient with retroperitoneal fibrosis and in one with pancreas divisum with chronic pancreatitis. PET was superior to CT and US in detection of lymph node metastases (13 of 17 vs three of 17 or one of 15, respectively.FDG PET has the potential to improve the detection of lymphadenopathy and the differential diagnosis of pancreatic masses.Prediction of malignancy with endoscopic ultrasonography in patients with branch duct-type intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm.We evaluated the accuracy of a new endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) scoring system to predict malignancy in branch duct-type intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (BD-IPMNs).We performed a retrospective multicenter study of patients who underwent EUS within 3 months before surgery and were diagnosed as having BD-IPMNs by postoperative pathologies at 8 hospitals in Korea from August 2002 to December 2011. To predict the malignancy, we applied the EUS scoring system consisting of pancreatic cyst size, height of mural nodules, main duct dilatation, septal thickening, and patulous orifice. We evaluated the diagnostic accuracy of the new EUS scoring system and compared it with previous individual risk factors.Eighty-four patients (male-to-female ratio, 55:29; mean [SD] age, 64.7 [7.1] years) had 68 benign BD-IPMNs and 16 malignant intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms. The EUS scoring system showed 75.0% sensitivity and 94.1% specificity at 7 points. This system (area under the curve, 0.939; 95% confidence interval, 0.884-0.994) resulted in a more accurate prediction than the previous known other factors including Sendai criteria, dilatation of ducts, size of the cyst, and presence of septal thickening and mural nodules.The EUS scoring system predicted BD-IPMN malignancy more accurately than the Sendai criteria and individual risk factors.[Hydrospiral CT of the pancreas in thin section technique].To evaluate a new technique for imaging the pancreas (spiral hydro-CT) based on a combination of pharmacological intestinal paralysis and water distension of the stomach and duodenum with specific reference to tumor detection rate, differentiation of malignant versus benign tumors, differential diagnosis and assessment of tumor resectability.In an open prospective study, 151 patients with a suspected pancreatic neoplasm based on clinical, laboratory or other imaging data were examined between May 94 and October 95. Our newly developed Hydro-CT methodology included intravenous injection of 40 mg N-butylscopolaminium bromide (Buscopan) for intestinal paralysis, gastric and duodenal wall distension by oral administration of an average of 1.51 warm tap water, 30 degrees RAO patient positioning, an individualized contrast injection technique as determined beforehand by time-to-peak measurement in the portal vein and thin-slice spiral CT (3 mm increment, 6 mm table feed and 3 mm secondary reconstruction). A detailed evaluation form was used to assess (1) tumor detection rate, (2) differentiation of malignant versus benign disease, (3) differential diagnosis, and (4) accuracy of assessment of resectability by identification of infiltration into adjacent organs and vessel structures relevant for resectability such as splenic, superior mesenteric, portal vein and celiac trunk, superior mesenteric, splenic and hepatic arteries. As the gold standard for positive tumor detection surgery and microscopic diagnosis were used, and for negative tumor detection an event-free survival of 6 months.Almost all examinations were well tolerated. In only 4% was on-site administration of a gastric tube required because of vomiting. In 2% of the patients a slight allergic reaction to the contrast medium was seen. The prevalence of a pancreatic neoplasm was 38%. In tumor detection Hydro-CT reached an overall accuracy of 97.4% with a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 95.9%. In the differentiation of benign versus malignant disease Hydro-CT reached an overall accuracy of 89.7% with a sensitivity of 92.5% and a specificity of 83.3%. The prevalence of a pancreatic carcinoma was 24%; 4% other malignant tumors were found (distal common bile duct carcinoma, cystadenocarcinoma). Fifty-eight patients underwent surgical exploration. In those assessment of resectability reached an overall accuracy of 95% with a sensitivity of 90.5% and specificity of 100%.The new technique of Hydro-CT based on thin slice and spiral methodology, including pharmacological intestinal paralysis and water distension, results in a high tumor detection rate and increases sensitivity and specificity of tumor differential diagnosis and of assessment of resectability.Agreement between rapid onsite and final cytologic interpretations of EUS-guided FNA specimens: implications for the endosonographer and patient management.The practice of onsite cytology interpretation varies across endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) programs in the United States and Europe. The value, reliability, and agreement of rapid onsite evaluation (ROSE) compared with final interpretation and its impact on patient management remain largely unknown. We compared agreement between ROSE of EUS-FNA (endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration) specimens with final cytology interpretation and their respective operating characteristics.We prospectively evaluated consecutive EUS-FNA specimens obtained by a single endosonographer in the presence of an attending cytopathologist (July 2000-November 2002). The "agreement" between ROSE and final cytology interpretation was assessed by the "kappa" statistic. The frequency and possible reasons for discrepancy between ROSE and final cytologic interpretation were determined.A total of 540 patients (median age 63 yr, 77% white) underwent EUS-FNAs of 656 lesions. These included lymph nodes (LNs, N = 248), solid pancreatic masses (SPMs, N = 229), cystic pancreatic masses (CPM, N = 57), mural lesions (41), bile duct/gallbladder (N = 28), liver (N = 17), mediastinum/lung (N = 17), adrenal (N = 15), spleen (N = 3), and kidney (N = 1). Data were available for onsite evaluation in 607 lesions. Initial cytology was benign (N = 243), atypical (N = 23), suspicious (24), malignant (300), and indeterminate (N = 17). Out of the 243 benign lesions interpreted by onsite evaluation, five lesions (2.1%) were upgraded to be malignant or suspicious for malignancy on final cytology report. Of the 300 lesions initially reported malignant on ROSE, 294 (98%) remained malignant on the final cytology. There was an excellent agreement between ROSE and final cytologic evaluation (kappa = 84.0%, 95% CI 80.2-87.7), Compared with the true final status, accuracy for final interpretation was slightly higher than for ROSE but was not statistically significant (95.8%vs 93.9%). Scant cellularity remained the most frequent reason for discrepancy, accounting for 21 of 51 discrepancies (41%). Other reasons for discrepancy included: cases requiring an intradepartmental consultation (22%), cases requiring ancillary studies (12%), intra-observer variability (10%), and challenging diagnosis (10%). In three cases, (6%) we were unable to determine the possible reason for discrepancy.ROSE of EUS-FNA specimens is highly accurate compared with final cytologic evaluation. Because the diagnosis of malignancy rarely changes, informing our patients and their families and our referring physicians of a cancer diagnosis significantly reduces physician work load and expedites patient management. The majority of discrepancies are related to the nature of the lesion either because it sheds few cells, has challenging morphology, and/or requires additional ancillary studies.Differential diagnosis of benign and malign pancreatic masses with 18F-fluordeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography recorded with a dual-head coincidence gamma camera.Metabolic imaging using 18F-fluordeoxyglucose and a ring-positron emission tomography camera is an established method in the differential diagnosis of pancreatic masses. Ring-positron emission tomography cameras, however, are expensive and available in only few specialized centres. The aim of this study was to investigate how far 18F-fluordeoxyglucose scan with a conventional dual-head gamma-camera could differentiate between benign and malign pancreatic masses.Forty-one patients (male/female: 25/16; mean age: 64.0 years; range: 41-86 years) with a pancreatic mass detected by ultrasound, computed tomography or MRI were included. In all patients 18F-fluordeoxyglucose scan was performed after overnight fasting and injection of 4 mCi 18F-fluordeoxyglucose using an ADAC Vertex MCD dual head gamma-camera (ADAC; Milpitas, California, USA), equipped with a 5/8-inch NaI-crystal. Images were acquired through a 180 degrees grade rotation in the three dimensional mode. The chosen matrix was 128 x 128 x 16, a Butterworthfilter (ADAC) was used and data were transferred into visible sinograms via Fourier-Rebinning. Coronar, sagittal and transversal slices of 3.9 mm thickness each were acquired. Focal tracer enhancement was suspicious for a malignoma and therefore regarded as positive, diffuse or no tracer uptake was suspicious for a benign process and was regarded as negative for cancer. DEFINITION OF GOLD STANDARDS: A diagnosis of cancer had to be confirmed histologically by specimens obtained by 18G-needle biopsy, surgical resection or at autopsy. A diagnosis of an inflammatory mass was considered proven, if no carcinoma could be found histologically in the surgically resected mass or at autopsy, or if there was no progression of the disease during a follow-up of at least 12 months.In 22 patients carcinoma was diagnosed (pancreatic cancer: n=17; endocrine tumour: n=3; carcinoma of the common bile duct: n=2). 18F-fluordeoxyglucose scan showed a focal tracer enhancement in 19 of these 22 patients (sensitivity: 86.4%). False negative results were acquired in two patients with cancer of the common bile duct and in one patient with poorly controlled insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus. In 19 patients the final diagnosis was an inflammatory pancreatic mass. 18F-fluordeoxyglucose scan showed a diffuse tracer enhancement in 15 of these 19 patients (specificity: 78.9%). False positive results were acquired in three patients whose blood tests showed signs of an acute episode of chronic pancreatitis. Positive and negative predictive values of 18F-fluordeoxyglucose scan were 82.6% and 83.3%, respectively.18F-fluordeoxyglucose scan with a conventional dual-head gamma-camera is a highly sensitive and specific method in the differential diagnosis of benign and malign pancreatic masses.Accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound in the evaluation of cystic pancreatic neoplasms: a community hospital experience.Reports on the use of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) in differentiating benign, premalignant, and malignant pancreatic lesions have been widely variable, particularly with cystic neoplasms. We evaluated the use of EUS for cystic pancreatic lesions in a community hospital setting.All patients who underwent EUS for cystic pancreatic neoplasms from 2007 to 2010 were reviewed. A final EUS diagnosis was determined based on the examiner's impression and fine-needle aspiration results if available. Lesions were stratified as benign, premalignant, or malignant. Patients underwent surgical resection, serial imaging studies, or medical oncology/palliative care consultation as indicated.One hundred eighteen patients with cystic pancreatic lesions underwent EUS during the study period. Endoscopic ultrasound diagnoses included 75 benign (63.6%), 35 premalignant (29.7%), and 8 malignant (4.2%) lesions. Thirty-eight patients (32.2%) underwent surgery, 77 (65.3%) were monitored with imaging, and 3 (2.5%) had unresectable malignancies. Elevated carcinoembryonic antigen levels showed a trend toward predicting mucinous cysts (P = 0.062). Accuracy, sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value for cystic lesions were 87.3%, 86.8%, 87.5%, 76.7%, and 93.3%, respectively.Endoscopic ultrasound is a valuable diagnostic modality in the evaluation of cystic pancreatic neoplasms in a community hospital setting.Periductal hypoechoic sign: an endosonographic finding associated with pancreatic malignancy.Despite advances in imaging, differentiating benign from malignant causes of pancreatic duct dilation is difficult.The aim of our study was to assess the accuracy of the periductal hypoechoic sign (PHS), defined as patchy hypoechoic areas adjacent to a dilated pancreatic duct, for the diagnosis of pancreatic malignancy.Single-center, retrospective analysis.Tertiary care university hospital.All patients who underwent EUS from 2006 to 2008 for evaluation of pancreatic pathology were identified. Those with pancreatic duct dilation of 4 mm or more in the head of the pancreas or 3 mm or more in the body or tail were included. Digitally recorded EUS images were analyzed for PHS by 1 endoscopist blinded to final results. The final diagnosis was based on pathology results or clinical follow-up.During the study period, 84 of 427 patients who underwent EUS for pancreas pathology had dilated pancreatic ducts. Of these, 42 patients had benign disease and 42 had pancreatic malignancy. The PHS was noted in 31 (73.8%) of 42 patients with malignancy compared with 6 (14.3%) of 42 patients with benign disease (P < .001). The PHS had a sensitivity of 73.8%, a specificity of 85.7%, and an accuracy of 79.8% for the diagnosis of pancreatic malignancy. After adjusting for age, patients with the PHS were 17 times more likely to have a malignancy (odds ratio 16.66; 95% CI, 5.01-55.44). Pancreatic duct diameter or dilation of both bile and pancreatic ducts were not predictive of malignancy.A retrospective design.The PHS was an accurate and independent predictor of pancreatic malignancy in patients with a dilated pancreatic duct.Diagnosing pancreatic cancer: the role of percutaneous biopsy and CT.To determine the sensitivity and complications of percutaneous biopsy of pancreatic masses, and whether typical computed tomography (CT) features of adenocarcinoma can reliably predict this diagnosis.A 5 year retrospective analysis of percutaneous core biopsies of pancreatic masses and their CT features was undertaken. Data were retrieved from surgical/pathology databases; medical records and CT reports and images.Three hundred and three patients underwent 372 biopsies; 56 of 87 patients had repeat biopsies. Malignancy was diagnosed in 276 patients, with ductal adenocarcinoma in 259 (85%). Final sensitivity of percutaneous biopsy for diagnosing pancreatic neoplasms was 90%; for repeat biopsy it was 87%. Complications occurred in 17 (4.6%) patients, in three of whom the complications were major (1%): one abscess, one duodenal perforation, one large retroperitoneal bleed. CT features typical of ductal adenocarcinoma were: hypovascular pancreatic mass with bile and/or pancreatic duct dilatation. Atypical CT features were: isodense or hypervascular mass, calcification, non-dilated ducts, cystic change, and extensive lymphadenopathy. Defining typical CT features of adenocarcinoma as true-positives, CT had a sensitivity of 68%, specificity of 95%, positive predictive value (PPV) of 98%, and negative predictive value of 41% for diagnosing pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Final sensitivity of percutaneous biopsy for establishing the diagnosis was 90%. CT features typical of pancreatic adenocarcinoma had high specificity and PPV. On some occasions, especially in frail patients with co-morbidity, it might be reasonable to assume a diagnosis of pancreatic cancer if CT features are typical, and biopsy only if CT shows atypical features.Cyst fluid carcinoembryonic antigen is an accurate diagnostic marker of pancreatic mucinous cysts.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) may offer a diagnostic tool through the combination of imaging and guided fine-needle aspiration of pancreatic cysts. The purpose of this investigation was to determine the most accurate test for differentiating mucinous from nonmucinous cysts.The results of EUS imaging, cytology, and cyst fluid biochemical markers were prospectively collected and compared in a large single-center study (776 patients) using histology or malignant cytology as the final diagnostic standard in 198 patients.The mean cyst fluid carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) was greater in mucinous cysts (4703.0 ng/mL) compared with nonmucinous cysts (25.8 ng/mL) (P = 0.008). When using the optimal cutoff value of 109.9 ng/mL, the CEA was more accurate (86%, receiver operating characteristic area = 0.928) than EUS imaging (48%) and cytology (58%) in predicting a mucinous cyst (P < 0.0001). Malignant cysts had a mean cyst fluid CEA value (2558.2 ng/mL) similar to benign cysts (4700.2 ng/mL). Cytology (75%) more accurately diagnosed malignant cysts than EUS (66%) and CEA (62%) (P < 0.05).Cyst fluid CEA concentration provides a highly accurate test for the diagnosis of a mucinous cyst, but does not distinguish benign from malignant cysts. Cytology is the most accurate test for the diagnosis of a malignant cyst.Cyst fluid analysis obtained by EUS-guided FNA in the evaluation of discrete cystic neoplasms of the pancreas: a prospective single-center experience.Accurate assessment of pancreatic cystic neoplasms is imperative before selecting available treatment options, such as surgical resection, drainage, or conservative therapy. Available modalities, CT and magnetic resonance imaging, have been inconsistent in diagnosis. Reports involving EUS and cyst fluid analysis have been encouraging, including studies of EUS features and/or cyst fluid analysis, which may differentiate pancreatic cystic neoplasms.To retrospectively determine cyst fluid characteristics that differentiate cystic neoplasms.Patient evaluation included (1) EUS features (reported elsewhere) and (2) cyst fluid analysis (carcinoembryonic antigen [CEA], carbohydrate antigen 19-9 [CA 19-9], amylase and lipase, viscosity [VIS], mucin stain, and cytology). Exclusion criteria included the following: intraductal papillary mucinous tumor lesions, bloody cyst aspirate, neuroendocrine tumors, and patients without surgical histopathology.Pancreatic Biliary Center, St Luke's Medical Center, Milwaukee, Wisconsin.A total of 102 patients (60 women, 42 men; age, 23-76 years) presented for evaluation of pancreatic cystic neoplasm; 71 underwent surgical resection.Seventy-one of 102 patients who underwent surgery presented the following histopathologic correlates: 23 pseudocysts (PC), 13 serous cystadenoma (SCyA), 21 mucinous cystadenoma (MCyA), and 14 mucinous cystadenocarcinoma (MCyA-CA). Cyst fluid analysis of these patients showed the following: VIS was lower in PC (mean, 1.3) and SCyA (1.27) when compared with MCyA (1.84) and MCyA-CA (1.9). All mucinous neoplasms had VIS >1.6, whereas only 2 mucinous cystic neoplasms (MCN) had VIS = 1.6 (both PC). The CEA level was significantly higher in MCyA (adenoma [878 ng/mL], carcinoma [27,581 ng/mL]) vs PC (189 ng/mL), and SCyA (121 ng/mL). Amylase levels were higher in PC (7210 U/L) compared with cystic neoplasm (SCyA, 679 U/L; MCyA, 1605 U/L; MCyA-CA, 569 U/L).Differential diagnosis of pancreatic cystic neoplasm is significantly enhanced by cyst fluid analysis. Elevated CEA (> or =480 ng/mL) and VIS (>1.6) accurately predict MCN from SCyA and PC. Malignant from benign MCN can be differentiated by CEA levels > or =6000 ng/mL.Application of contrast-enhanced ultrasound in the diagnosis of solid pancreatic lesions--a comparison of conventional ultrasound and contrast-enhanced CT.To explore the diagnostic value of contrast-enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) by comparison with conventional ultrasound (US) and contrast-enhanced CT (CECT) in solid pancreatic lesions.Ninety patients with solid pancreatic focal lesions were enrolled, including 36 cases of pancreatic carcinoma, 28 cases of pancreatitis, 6 cases of pancreatic neuroendocrine tumor, 12 cases of solid pseudopapillary tumor of the pancreas, 6 cases of pancreatic metastases, 1 case of cavernous hemolymphangioma and 1 case of lymphoma. US and CEUS were applied respectively for the diagnosis of a total of 90 cases of solid pancreatic lesions. The diagnostic results were scored on a 5-point scale. Results of CEUS were compared with CECT.(1) 3-score cases (undetermined) diagnosed by CEUS were obviously fewer than that of US, while the number of 1-score (definitely benign) and 5-score (definitely malignant) cases diagnosed by CEUS was significantly more than that of US. There was a significant difference in the distribution of final scores using the two methods (p<0.001). The overall diagnostic accuracies of the 90 cases for CEUS and US were 83.33% and 44.44%, respectively, which indicated an obvious advantage for CEUS (p<0.001). (2) The diagnostic consistency among three ultrasound doctors: the kappa values calculated for US were 0.537, 0.444 and 0.525, compared with 0.748, 0.645 and 0.795 for CEUS. The interobserver agreement for CEUS was higher than that for US. (3) The sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of the diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma with CEUS and CECT were 91.7% and 97.2%, 87.0% and 88.9%, and 88.9% and 92.2%, respectively, while for the diagnosis of pancreatitis, the corresponding indices were 82.1% and 67.9%, 91.9% and 100%, and 88.9% and 90%, respectively, showing no significant differences (p>0.05).CEUS has obvious superiority over conventional US in the general diagnostic accuracy of solid pancreatic lesions and in the diagnostic consistency among doctors. The performances of CEUS are similar to that of CECT in the diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma and focal pancreatitis.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA): experience of an academic centre in the USA.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) has become widely accepted as an effective modality for obtaining tissue for primary diagnosis and staging. We have been using EUS-FNA since July 2001 and herein we summarize our experience over a 5-year period.A computer-based search for in-house EUS-FNA was performed in the pathology database from July 2001 to October 2006. To calculate the sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of EUS-FNA, the cytology diagnosis was compared with the surgical follow-up.A total of 951 EUS-FNAs were performed during the study period and included 279 pancreatic solid lesions, 186 pancreatic cyst lesions, 249 lymph node aspirations, 111 gastrointestinal (GI) tract submucosal lesions, and 126 miscellaneous lesions. EUS-FNA had a very high sensitivity and accuracy for solid pancreatic lesions (94.7 and 97.7%, respectively), low sensitivity and accuracy but high specificity (47, 64.8 and 95%, respectively) for cystic lesions. Cyst fluid carcinoembryonic (CEA) levels were significantly higher in mucinous neoplasms than non-neoplastic cysts. EUS-FNA also had very high sensitivity and specificity for detecting metastatic carcinoma in lymph nodes (95 and 100%, respectively). GI submucosal spindle cell tumours were further classified with immunohistochemical stains performed either on a cell block or a core biopsy obtained via EUS guidance.EUS-FNA has a very high sensitivity and accuracy for pancreatic solid lesions, but the sensitivity for cystic lesions is generally low. Cyst fluid chemical analysis for CEA is helpful, but the overlap between mucinous neoplasm and non-neoplastic cysts is significant. Recognizing GI contamination is important and immunohistochemical stains are useful for GI submucosal spindle cell lesions.Telomerase activity is a useful marker to distinguish malignant pancreatic cystic tumors from benign neoplasms and pseudocysts.Pancreatic serous cystadenoma, mucinous cystic neoplasms, ductal adenocarcinoma with cystic change, and pseudocysts are a spectrum of pancreatic cystic lesions. Their management strategy and prognosis are extremely diverse. Imaging study, cytology, and analysis of the tumor markers of cyst fluid are not always reliable in differentiation of these disease entities.Fifteen patients with pancreatic cystic neoplasms (including six mucinous cystadenocarcinomas, two mucinous cystic neoplasms with borderline malignancy, two mucinous cystadenomas, and five serous cystadenomas), 4 patients with pancreatic ductal adenocarcinomas with cystic change, and 10 patients with pseudocysts were studied. Echo-guided or computed tomography-guided biopsies of pancreatic cystic lesions and their normal counterparts were conducted on all patients prior to operation or other management. The specimens were assayed for telomerase activity by using TRAP (telomere repeat amplification protocol). The level of telomerase activity in each specimen was semiquantitated as strong, moderate, weak, and none. The final diagnoses were made from histopathological examination of surgically resected or biopsied specimens. The efficacy of telomerase activity as a tumor marker to predict malignancy of pancreatic cystic lesions was evaluated.Three of the four pancreatic ductal adenocarcinomas with cystic change had strong or moderate telomerase activity; four of the six mucinous cystadenocarcinomas had moderate or weak telomerase activity; one of the two mucinous cystadenomas with borderline malignancy had weak telomerase activity; and none of their normal counterparts had detectable telomerase activity. In contrast, none of the two mucinous cystadenomas, five serous cystadenomas, and 10 pseudocysts had detectable telomerase activity. Based on these results, the sensitivity of telomerase activity for prediction of malignancy or premalignancy of pancreatic cystic lesions was 67%, the specificity was 100%, and the positive and negative predictive values were 1.0 and 0.81, respectively. The overall accuracy was 86%.The differential expressions of telomerase activity have been detected specifically in malignant and premalignant pancreatic cystic tumors, but not in benign cystic neoplasms or pseudocysts. The implications of these results are that telomerase activation takes part in the malignant transformation of pancreatic cystic neoplasms and that telomerase activity is a useful marker to distinguish malignant pancreatic cystic tumors from benign neoplasms and pseudocysts.Diagnostic yield of malignancy during EUS-guided FNA of solid lesions with and without a stylet: a prospective, single blind, randomized, controlled trial.Use of a stylet during EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) is believed to improve the quality and diagnostic yield of specimens.To compare samples obtained by EUS-FNA with (S+) and without (S-) a stylet for diagnostic yield of malignancy and cytological characteristics.Randomized, controlled trial.Tertiary referral center.Consecutive patients referred for EUS-FNA of solid lesions.EUS-FNA; the number of passes was determined by lesion site (6 pancreas/others and 4 lymph nodes).Diagnostic yield of malignancy and degree of cellularity, specimen adequacy, contamination, and amount of blood.One hundred patients were prospectively enrolled in this randomized, controlled trial and the sites of EUS-FNA were the pancreas, 58; lymph node, 25; and other, 17. The overall diagnosis was malignancy in 56, benign in 30, suspicious/atypical in 7, and inadequate specimen in 7 lesions. There were 550 passes made (275 with a stylet and 275 without a stylet). Interim analysis demonstrated no difference in the diagnostic yield of malignancy (94 passes with a stylet [34.2%] vs 110 without a stylet [40%], P = .2) and in the proportion of inadequate specimens (57 with a stylet [20.7%] vs 64 without a stylet [23.3%], P = .2). There was no difference with regard to cellularity (P = .83), contamination (P = .31), number of cells (P = .25), and amount of blood (P = .6). Similar results were noted in a subgroup analysis based on lesion site. Applying the rules of futility, the study was terminated.Subjectivity in cytopathologists' assessment, endosonographer not blinded.There was no difference in the diagnostic yield of malignancy or proportion of inadequate specimens between passes with and without a stylet. These results suggest that the use of a stylet does not confer any advantage during EUS-FNA.[The role of multi-detector-row computed tomograph in the diagnosis of intraductal papillary-mucinous tumors of the pancreas in comparison to endoscopic retrograde pancreatography, endoscopic ultrasonography, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography].Thirty patients with intraductal papillary-mucinous tumor (IPMT) of the pancreas underwent multidetector-row CT (MD-CT) in addition to endoscopic retrograde pancreatography (ERP), and, in 27 cases magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS). The usefulness of MD-CT was investigated by comparing various imaging methods of the communication from the main pancreatic duct (MPD) to patulous/bulging papilla in addition to the indices for benign or malignant disease, the degree of dilation of the MPD, localization and size of cystic lesions, and presence or absence of neoplastic lesions, such as thickened walls and septa, intramural nodule, solid mass. With MD-CT, dilation of the MPD and localization and size of cystic lesions were accurately assessed, even in patients with obstruction of the main pancreatic duct in whom ERP was difficult to perform regardless of the presence or absence of massive amount of mucus. MD-CT with reconstructive imaging, such as MPR imaging and CPR imaging, allowed us to assess communication with the MPD and patulous/bulging papilla easier than MRCP. In our study, MD-CT was useful in the evaluation of thickened walls and septa that are predictive factors of malignancy in IPMT.Intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms with associated invasive carcinoma of the pancreas: imaging findings and diagnostic performance of MDCT for prediction of prognostic factors.The purpose of this study was to assess the diagnostic accuracy of MDCT for determining the prognostic factors, including the T category, lymph node metastasis, tumor size, and perineural invasion, in surgically proven intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasms (IPMNs) with an associated invasive carcinoma (IPMC) and to investigate the imaging findings.Our study group consisted of 38 patients with surgically proven IPMC who underwent preoperative dynamic CT. Two radiologists retrospectively assessed the morphologic type of IPMN, size of the cyst, size of the main pancreatic duct, and presence or absence of mural nodules. The radiologists also assessed the T category, lymph node metastasis, and perineural invasion. They graded the perineural invasion using a 3-point scale as follows: 1, normal; 2, streaky and strandlike structure in fat tissue as well as a fine, reticular pattern; and 3, irregular masses adjacent to the lesions. Statistical analyses were performed using receiver operating characteristic analysis, the McNemar test, and Fisher exact test. Kappa statistics were used to determine interobserver agreement.The morphologic types of IPMC included the main-duct type (n=11, 29%), combined type (n=18, 47%), and branch-duct type (n=9, 24%). The diagnostic accuracy for the T category was 73.7% (n=28) and 68.4% (n=26) and for the lymph node metastasis was 68.4% (n=26) and 76.3% (n=29), respectively, for the two readers, with moderate interobserver agreement (κ=0.636 and 0.708). The areas under the receiver operating characteristic curve for perineural invasion were 0.868 and 0.821. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive predictive value were 100%, 71.4%, 55.5%, and 90%, 71.4%, 52.9%, respectively. Interobserver agreement was moderate (κ=0.659). The tumor size seen on CT was not statistically different from the tumor size determined on pathology (3.9±[SD] 2.7 cm vs 3.8±2.1 cm, p=0.582). The main duct size was 11.5+6.2 mm. Mural nodules were detected in 74% (n=28) of our study patients.CT might be useful for preoperatively evaluating the T category, lymph node metastasis, tumor size, and perineural invasion of IPMC. Main pancreatic duct dilatation and the presence of mural nodules are common findings of IPMC.Endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration for solid pancreatic masses. Optimizing the diagnostic yield.Modern imaging methods versus clinical assessment in the evaluation of hospital in-patients with suspected pancreatic disease.Various modern imaging procedures such as endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), computed tomography (CT), and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) have been shown to be highly accurate in the diagnosis of specific disorders of the pancreas. However, prior information often causes bias in the interpretation of these results. Little information is available concerning the value of these examinations in the primary and differential diagnosis of suspected pancreatic disease-particularly in comparison with clinical evaluation, including laboratory tests and transabdominal ultrasound (TUS).Clinical and imaging information (EUS, ERCP, and CT) was collected for 184 inpatients who were referred over a 5-yr period for evaluation of suspected pancreatic disease. On the basis of patient history, laboratory tests, and the results of routine TUS, one gastroenterologist, who was unaware of any of the other procedures or the final diagnosis, made a presumptive clinical diagnosis. CT and ERCP images and EUS videotapes were then analyzed by three different and independent examiners, who had the same clinical information except for the TUS results, but were completely blinded to the results of the other examinations and the patients' diagnoses. The final diagnoses were obtained by surgery, histology, and cytology, plus a follow-up of at least 1 yr (mean 35 months) in all noncancer cases.The final diagnoses were: normal pancreas (n = 36), chronic pancreatitis without a focal inflammatory mass (n = 53) or with a focal inflammatory mass (n = 18), and pancreatic malignancy (n = 77). Clinical evaluation, including ultrasonography, achieved a sensitivity for pancreatic disease of 94% but a specificity of only 35%. The figures for the sensitivity and specificity of the three imaging procedures were 93% and 94%, respectively, for EUS; 89% and 92% for ERCP; and 91% and 78% for CT (p < 0.05 for the specificity of clinical assessment vs all three imaging tests, p > 0.05 for comparison of the three imaging procedures). In the differential diagnosis between cancer and chronic pancreatitis as well as between malignant and inflammatory tumors, there was no difference among clinical assessment and the three imaging tests.In a group of patients with a high suspicion of pancreatic disease, little additional sensitivity in the diagnosis of pancreatic disease is provided by sophisticated imaging procedures such as EUS, ERCP, and CT, in comparison with clinical assessment including laboratory values and TUS. However, the specificity can be substantially improved. To confirm the diagnosis, one of the three examinations is needed, depending on the suspected disease and local expertise. The imaging procedures should be performed in a stepwise fashion for specific purposes, such as exclusion of pancreatic disease and the planning of treatment in chronic pancreatitis and pancreatic cancer.Endosonography-guided, fine-needle aspiration cytology extending the indication for organ-preserving pancreatic surgery.Organ preserving pancreatic resections are considered whenever malignant disease is ruled out. In tumors of low malignant potential such as cystadenomas and neuroendocrine tumors, the diagnosis is rarely established preoperatively. We studied the feasibility of cytodiagnosis using endosonography-guided fine-needle aspiration in determining the operative approach.A total of 78 patients (16 female, 62 male; mean age 61.4 yr, range 31-82 yr) with focal pancreatic lesions underwent EUS-FNA. Final diagnosis was confirmed by histology, cytology, or clinical follow up (>9 months). Patients with tumors of low malignant potential were managed by customized pancreatic resections.Final diagnosis was malignant tumors in 36 patients, tumors of low malignant potential in nine (six, neuroendocrine, two, borderline mucinous cystadenomas, one, borderline adenocarcinoma), and benign in 31 (two inadequate smears). No complications occurred. With six false-negative and no false-positive results, the accuracy, sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values were 92%, 84%, 100%, 100%, and 86%, respectively. Five patients with low malignant tumors underwent duodenum-preserving pancreatic head resection, three mid segment resection, and one pylorus-preserving pancreatoduodenectomy.EUS-FNA is useful in the preoperative cytodiagnosis of pancreatic tumors of low malignant potential. It extends the indication for organ-preserving pancreatic resections and avoids the unnecessary sacrifice of adjacent organs.